

THIS work was specially designed to teach anatomy
by dissection of the human body in regions or parts,
and thereby to promote instruction after a practical
method.
Since the first appearance of the publication its usefulness has been tested by repeated trial ; and the demand for another edition may be received as evidence
of the fitness of the book for the attainment of the end
in view.
In this edition of my " Demonstrations of Anatomy"
no alteration has been made in the plan of the work,
which still consists of a system of dissections after the
following method. In the examination of a region the
attention of the student is directed first to its limits, to
the superficial prominences of bone or muscle, and to
the impressions that point out the situation of the subjacent vessels. The different strata interposed between
the surface and the bones are next examined in succession, with reference particularly to the natural position
of the several objects, and their connections one with
another, so that they may be observed in much the same
order as they would be met with in an operation of
surgery. The anatomical description of the whole is
likewise arranged in conformity with the mode of dissection, and each blood-vessel, nerve, or other structure,
50.1 224 2
iv PREFACE.
is described only to such an extent as it may be laid
bare in the region under examination.
The full instructions for conducting the progressive
stages ofa dissection, which were peculiar to the former
edition, have been revised, and are now better adapted
for enabling the student to follow without other aid the
more difficult directions, and to recognize objects that
become visible on the removal of the superficial parts.
A few changes in the order of arrangement, which
farther experience suggested, have also been made in
the book ; whilst occasional repetitions, and some detail
have been omitted, to render it more serviceable to the
beginner. At the same time I have not failed to introduce those additions which had become necessary
from the increase in our stock of anatomical knowledge.
G. V. E.
Sept. 28. 1849.
CONTENTS.
CHAPTER I.
DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Section 1. External Parts of the Head
2. Internal Parts of the Head
Page1
7. Sub-maxillary Region
3. The Face
4. The Orbit
5. The Neck, right side
6. Pterygo-maxillary Region·
8. Superior Maxillary Nerve and Vessels
20
37
48
78
88
95
9. Deep Vessels and Nerves of the Neck 97
10. Left Side of the Neck 111
11. The Pharynx 117
12. The Mouth 125
13. Cavity of the Nose 127
14. Spheno-palatine and Otic Ganglia, Facial and
Nasal Nerves, and Internal Maxillary Artery 131
15. The Tongue 138
16. The Larynx.
142
17. Hyoid Bone, Cartilages and Ligaments of the
Larynx, Structure of the Trachea 149
18. Prevertebral Muscles and the Vertebral Vessels · 154
19. Ligaments of the first two Cervical Vertebræ, and
ofthe Clavicle
1
CHAPTER II.
DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Section Membranes and Vessels
2. Origin of the Cranial Nerves
157
169 6991
A 3
vi CONTENTS.
Section 3. Medulla Oblongata and Pons Varolii
4. The Cerebrum, or Great Brain
The under Surface, or the Base
(Page 174
- 179
180
The upper Surface · 184
The Interior 186 Structure of the Cerebrum 198
5. The Cerebellum, or Little Brain 200
Surfaces and Lobes - 201
Structure of the Mass 203
Fourth Ventricle 205
CHAPTER III.
DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Section 1. The Wall of the Thorax, and the Axillary Space
2. Scapular Muscles, Vessels, Nerves, and Ligaments
3. The Front and Back of the Arm
4. The Front of the Fore-arm
214
232
240
254
5. The Palm of the Hand 269
6. The Back of the Fore-arm 281
7. Ligaments ofthe Elbow, Wrist, and Hand 289
CHAPTER IV.
DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Section 1. Cavity of the Thorax
The Pleuræ ·
The Pericardium
302
303
ofthe Lung
-
Connections ofthe Lung
The Heart and its large Vessels
Nerves of the Thorax ·
The Trachea, and the Characters and Structure
Parts in Front of the Spine and the Cord of
the Sympathetic Parietes of the Thorax
305
307
309
330
· 335
341
349
2. Ligaments of the Trunk · 351
Articulation of the Ribs to the Vertebræ 352
Articulation of the Ribs to the Sternum 353
CONTENTS. vii
Page Articulations of the Sternum 354
Articulations of the Vertebræ 354
CHAPTER V.
DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
First Layer of Muscles 360
Second Layer of Muscles 363
Third Layer of Muscles 366
Fourth Layer of Muscles with Vessels and Nerves 368
Fifth Muscular Layer, and the Sacral Nerves 375
CHAPTER VI.
DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD.
Membranes of the Cord 381
Roots of the Spinal Nerves 885
Vessels ofthe Cord 387
Form and Divisions of the Cord 388
Structure of the Cord, and the deep Origin of the Nerves 390
Intra-spinal Vessels - 392
CHAPTER VII.
DISSECTION OF THE PERINEUM.
Section 1. Perinæum of the Male
Anal Half of the Space
Urethral Half of the Space
Operation of Lithotomy
2. Perinæum of the Female -
CHAPTER VIII.
DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Section 1. Wall of the Abdomen
2. Hernia of the Abdomen ·
3. Cavity ofthe Abdomen
394
396
399
409
410
413
435
447
viii CONTENTS.
Section
Connections of the Viscera
Peritoneum and its Folds -
Mesenteric Vessels and Part of the Sympathetic
Nerve - - ·
Connections of the Aorta and Vena Cava
Connections of the Duodenum and Pancreas
Vessels and Nerves of the Chylo- poietic Viscera
Sympathetic and Vagus Nerves
4. Anatomy ofthe Abdominal Viscera
The Stomach ·
The Small Intestine
The Large Intestine
The Pancreas
The Spleen
The Liver
The Gall Bladder
·
-
·
The Kidney and Ureter
The Supra-renal Capsule
The Testis and the Vas Deferens
5. Vessels ofthe Abdomen and some deep Muscles
6. Lumbar Plexus and the Cord of the Sympathetic
Nerve
DISSECTION OF THE PELVIS.
Section 1. Fascia of the Cavity and the Muscles of the Pelvic
Page 448
453
458
464
465
467
471
476
476
479
484
489
490
493
499
501
506
508
514
528
Outlet - · 533
2. Connections of the Viscera in the Male
3. Connections of the Viscera in the Female
538
- 547
4. Vessels and Nerves of the Pelvis 551
5. Anatomy of the Viscera of the Male 563
The Prostate Gland and the Seminal Vesicles 563
The Urinary Bladder · 566
The Urethra and the Penis 569
The Rectum · · 574
6. Anatomy of the Viscera ofthe Female 576
External Organs of Generation 577
The Vagina · 579
The Uterus 581
Ovaries and Fallopian Tubes 584
Bladder, Urethra, and Rectum 586
7. Internal Muscles, and the Ligaments of the
Pelvis 587
CONTENTS. ix
CHAPTER IX.
DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Page
Section 1. The Front of the Thigh with Femoral Hernia
2. The Buttock, or the Gluteal Region
597
634
3. The Back of the Thigh and the Popliteal Space
4. The Back of the Leg
646
656
5. The Sole ofthe Foot 667
6. The Front of the Leg and the Dorsum of the
Foot 679
7. Ligaments of the Knee, Ankle, and Foot · 688
CHAPTER X.
DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
Sclerotic Coat and Cornea 707
Choroid Coat and Ciliary Processes 710
Ciliary Ligament and Muscle 713
The Iris 713
Ciliary Vessels and Nerves - 715
The Retina and Jacob's Membrane 716
Vitreous Body, and Hyaloid Membrane, with the Canal of Petit 719
Crystalline Lens and its Capsule 720
CHAPTER XI.
DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
The Auditory Canal
The Tympanum, with its Vessels and Nerves ·
Ossicles ofthe Tympanum, and their Muscles and Ligaments
The Osseous Labyrinth of the Inner Ear
Vestibule
Semicircular Canals
Cochlea and its Septum
The Membranous Labyrinth, or Sacs
Utricle
Saccule
-
-
Blood-vessels ofthe Labyrinth
723
725
728
· 733
733
734
735
738
739
739
740
Nerve ofthe Cochlea and of the Membranous Sacs 741
Page
CORRIGENDA.
1. line 19. for " retrahens " read " attollens."
35. line 2. for " anterior " read " posterior. "
58. line 6. insert " muscle " after " digastric."
91. line 11.
92. line 12 .. for " superior "" read " middle."
136. line 17. for " inwards " read " outwards."
249. line 12. for " coraco- brachialis " read " brachialis anticus. "
249. line 22. for " outer " read " inner. "
275. line 12. for "' carpal " read " metacarpal."
275. line 38. for " second " read "third. "
327. line 9. for " subclavian " read " carotid."
352. line 22. for " between " read " with two."
410. line 31. for " and " read " or."
419. line 16. for " triangular " read "suspensory. "
438. line 20. for " ilium " read "os pubis."
DEMONSTRATIONS OF ANATOMY.
CHAPTER I.
DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
SECTION I.
EXTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD.
tions rethe dis
THE superficial parts of the head may be examined first Direc
with most advantage so as to allow the speedy removal of specting
the brain. When beginning his task the student should ob- section.
serve that he has to proceed as far as the end of the description of the posterior triangular space of the neck before the
position of the body is changed for the dissection of the
back.
of the Dissection. -During the examination of the scalp, the body lies Position
on the back with the head raised to a suitable height. On the body.
left side, the muscles are to be exposed, and on the opposite side
the vessels and nerves are to be afterwards displayed.
tion of
ofthe ear ;
To expose two small muscles above the ear, draw down the pinna Dissecwith hooks, and carry the scalpel upwards on the side of the head muscles
for about three inches above the ear, along the centre of a subcutaneous prominence. A second incision, of about the same length,
is to be made transversely close to the ear. On carefully raising
the flaps of skin and the subjacent tissue, very thin muscular fibres
come into view, the more anterior fibres constituting the attrahens,
and the posterior the retrahens aurem muscle. For the dissection
of a posterior muscle, draw forwards the ear, and behind it make
an incision from the transverse one already existing, as far as to a
level with the lower extremity of the pinna, where it is to be
carried forwards below the ear. Reflect the piece of skin forwards,
B
2 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
and of occipitolis.
and the retrahens muscle will be easily found beneath the subcutaneous tissue, for it is stronger though deeper than the others.
On the same side of the head ( the left) the occipito- frontalis is
fronta- to be dissected. To bring this muscle into view, make a cut along
the middle line of the skull, from the root of the nose to a little
below the occipital protuberance, and connect it in front with the
transverse incision on the side of the head. In raising and throwing backwards the flap of skin, the dissector will expose first the
anterior fleshy part of the muscle, next a white shining thin aponeurosis, and lastly a posterior fleshy belly towards the outer part
of the cranium. The student should bear in mind that the aponeurosis of the muscle is easily taken away with the granular fat.
Muscles of the ear.
Attra- hens- aurem muscle
MUSCLES OF THE EXTERNAL EAR. -Three muscles fix
the pinna to the side of the head. Two are above the ear,
one elevating it, the other drawing it forwards ; and one, a
retrahent muscle, is behind the ear. There are other special
muscles of the cartilage of the ear, which will be afterwards
described.
The ATTRAHENS AUREM is a small fan-shaped muscle that
arises from the aponeurosis of the occipito -frontalis, near its
anterior part. Its fibres are directed backwards, and are
inserted into the front of the rim of the ear (the helix) .
is united This muscle is united with the following at its origin, but a
cellular interval exists between them near the ear. Beneath
it are the temporal vessels.
with next.
Attol- lens- aurem muscle.
Retra- hens aurem
The ATTOLLENS AUREM has the same form as the preceding, though its fibres are more marked. Arising also from
the tendon of the occipito- frontalis, the fibres converge to
their insertion into the posterior aspect of the pinna of the
ear (viz. the concha).
The RETRAHENS AUREM (musculi retrahentes, Alb. ) consists of two or three roundish bundles of fibres, which are
of two or stronger than those of the other muscles. The fibres arise
bundles. from the mastoid process, and pass almost transversely inconsists
three
Occipi- to-fron- talis ;
wards to be inserted by aponeurotic fibres into the lower
part of the concha at its cranial aspect. The posterior auricular artery and nerve are in connection with this muscle.
The OCCIPITO-FRONTALIS MUSCLE covers the arch of the
skull, and consists of an anterior and a posterior fleshy part,
with an intervening tendon.
EXTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD. 3
part ; The anterior or frontal part is a thin muscular expansion frontal
over the os frontis, which has little attachment to the subjacent bone, but mixes with the muscles of the face . Along
the line of the eyebrow (its origin) the fibres are blended
with those of the orbicularis palpebrarum and pyramidalis
nasi, and a few are also fixed to the internal angular process
of the os frontis. From this attachment the fibres are directed upwards to the aponeurosis, which they join rather below the level of the coronal suture.
part,
The posterior or occipital part is stronger than the an- occipital
terior ; it arises from the mastoid process of the temporal
bone, and the outer two-thirds of the upper curved line of
the occipital bone. The fibres ascend to end in the aponeurosis.
neurosis. The tendon, or epicranial aponeurosis, extends over the and apoupper part of the cranium, and is continuous across the
middle line with the same structure of the opposite half of
the head. On the side it gives origin to the auricular
muscles, and a thin fascia is prolonged from it over the
temporal aponeurosis.
nections. Superficial to the occipito-frontalis are the different ves- Its consels and nerves of the scalp. The aponeurosis is moreover
closely connected to the skin, whilst it is separated from the
pericranium by a loose cellular membrane, which admits of
the free movement of the tendinous structure. Posteriorly
the fleshy parts of the muscles of opposite sides do not meet,
and the aponeurosis is attached to the ridge of the occipital
bone between them.
-
tion . Dissection. The attachment of the temporal fascia will be seen Dissec
on the side of the head after the removal of the superior auricular
muscles, the epicranial aponeurosis and its prolongation, together
with the temporal vessels.
ral fasments,
The temporal fascia is a white, shining membrane, which Tempois much stronger than the epicranial aponeurosis, and gives cia.
attachment to the subjacent temporal muscle. Superiorly it Attachis inserted into the curved line that limits the temporal fossa
on the side ofthe skull ; and inferiorly, where it is narrower
and thicker, it is fixed to the zygoma. By its cutaneous connecsurface the fascia is in contact with the muscles already ex- tions,
B 2
4 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
ers .
amined, and with the superficial temporal vessels and nerves.
and lay- An incision into the fascia, a little above the zygoma, shows
it to consist there of two layers, which are fixed to the margins of that process of bone. Between the layers is some
cellular membrane, with a small branch of the temporal
artery, and a slender twig from the orbital branch of the
superior maxillary nerve.
Dissec- tion.
Tempo- ral musDissection.- Detach the fascia from the skull and temporal
muscle, and throw it down. Then remove a soft cellular tissue
that lies between the two, near the zygoma. The difference in the
thickness of parts of the fascia will be conspicuous.
The TEMPORAL MUSCLE is now partly exposed.
It is wide
cle. and thin above, but becomes narrower and thicker at the
Origin. lower part. The muscle arises from the temporal fascia,
and from all the surface of the impression on the side of the
skull known as the temporal fossa. From this origin the
fibres descend and converge around a tendon which is in- Inser- serted into the coronoid process of the lower jaw. On the
cutaneous surface is the temporal fascia, with the parts
connec- superficial to that membrane ; and the muscle conceals the
deep temporal vessels and nerves, which ramify in it. The
insertion of the muscle beneath the zygoma will be afterwards followed.
tion and
tions.
Arteries
Dissection. -Next remove the piece of skin that covers the op- posite half of the head, to expose the vessels and nerves. An
incision may be made along the eyebrow and zygoma to a little
behind the ear, which will allow the flap of integument to be raised and thrown backwards. Behind the ear the skin should be reflected as on the other side, in order to expose the posterior auri- cular vessels and nerves. All the subcutaneous fat should be left
till the nerves are found. Along the eyebrow are the branches of
vessels and nerves that come from the orbit, but lie at first beneath
the occipito-frontalis, viz. the supra- orbital and frontal vessels,
and the supra-orbital and supra-trochlear nerves. On the side of
the head, in front of the ear, are the superficial temporal vessels
and nerves, with branches of the facial nerve ; and behind the ear
the posterior auricular vessels and nerve. At the back of the head
are the ramifications of the occipital vessels, and the large and
small occipital nerves.
CUTANEOUS Vessels. The arteries of the scalp are fur-
EXTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD.
10
scalp. nished by the internal and external carotid arteries, and of the
anastomose freely on both sides of the head. Only two
small branches, the supra-orbital and frontal, come from the
former ; whilst the temporal, occipital, and posterior auricular
arteries are offsets of the latter.
The supra orbital -orbital branch of artery leaves the orbit with the nerve Supraof the same name, and is distributed on the forehead. Some of its artery.
branches are superficial to the occipito -frontalis, and ascend towards the top of the head, whilst others remain beneath the muscle,
and supply it and the periosteum.
The frontal branch is close to the inner angle of the orbit, and is Frontal
much smaller than the preceding. It soon ends in branches of artery.
distribution to the muscles, integuments, and periosteum.
cial tem- The superficial temporal artery is the terminal branch of the Superfiexternal carotid. Ascending over the zygoma, the vessel divides poral dion the temporal fascia into anterior and posterior branches.
vides into
and a. The anterior division runs forwards with a serpentine course to anterior
the forehead, and supplies muscular, cutaneous, and pericranial offsets ;
it also anastomoses with the supra- orbital artery. It is this branch of
bifurcation that is opened when blood is taken from the temporal
artery.
b. The posterior division is larger than the other, and arches back- poste- rior part.
wards above the ear towards the occipital artery, with which it anastomoses. Its branches of distribution are similar to those of the other
division, and it communicates moreover with the artery of the opposite
side over the top of the head.
tal ar- tery.
Occipital Artery. -The terminal part of this artery, after per- Occipiforating the trapezius, divides into large and tortuous branches,
which spread over the back of the head and occipito-frontalis
muscle. Communications are established between these branches
and the artery of the opposite side, the posterior division of the
temporal, and the following artery. Some offsets pass deeply to
supply the muscle, pericranium, and bone.
rior au- The posterior auricular artery appears in front of the mastoid Posteprocess, where it divides into two branches. One (mastoid) is ricular.
directed backwards to supply the occipito-frontalis, and anastomose
with the occipital artery. The other (auricular) is furnished to
the retrahent muscle and back of the pinna of the ear ; and an
offset pierces the pinna to be distributed on the opposite surface.
of the The VEINS of the exterior of the head are so similar to the Veins
arteries, that a full notice of each is not required. All veins scalp
B 3
6 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
same as the ar- teries.
Nerves ofthe
corresponding to the branches of the internal carotid artery
enter the facial vein, whilst the rest open into the jugular
veins.
The frontal vein is directed towards the inner angle of the orbit,
where it receives the supra-orbital vein, the two giving rise to the
angular vein of the face. Both the superficial temporal and posterior auricular veins open into the external jugular ; and the occipital joins the internal jugular vein.
CUTANEOUS NERVES. The terminal parts of the several
scalp are nerves that now come into view are furnished from both the
cranial and spinal nerves. The half of the head anterior to
the ear receives branches from the three divisions of the fifth
cranial nerve, and a few filaments from the facial nerve.
All the rest of the head is supplied by spinal nerves, from
both anterior and posterior divisions, except close behind
the ear, where there is a branch of the seventh cranial or
facial nerve.
Supra.
orbital nerve ;
its two cutane- ous
es,
The supra-orbital nerve is a branch of the first division of the
fifth nerve, and escapes from the notch in the upper margin of the
orbit ; whilst beneath the occipito- frontalis muscle, the nerve
gives offsets to it and the orbicularis palpebrarum, also others to
the pericranium. Finally, the nerve ends in two cutaneous
branches, which ramify between the epicranial aponeurosis and the skin.
One of these (inner) soon pierces the occipito- frontalis, and reaches
backwards as far as the parietal bone. The other branch (outer) is of
branch- larger size, and perforating the muscle farther back, extends over
the arch ofthe head to the occipital bone. Whilst the nerve is escaping
from the supra-orbital notch it furnishes some filaments (palpebral) to
the upper eyelid. In the orbicular muscle a communication is established
between the supra-orbital and facial nerves.
and su- pra- troch- lear branch.
TempoAt the inner angle of the orbit is the small supra - trochlear branch of the same nerve. It turns upwards to the forehead beneath the orbicular muscle of the eyelids, and piercing the muscular fibres ends in the
integument. Branches are given from it to the orbicularis and corrugator supercilii, and some twigs (palpebral) descend to the eyelid.
The superficial temporal nerves are derived from the
nerves ; second and third divisions of the fifth, and from the facial ral
nerve.
EXTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD.
superior a. The branch of the superior maxillary nerve (second division of from
the fifth) is usually a slender twig, which perforates the temporal maxil- lary ;
aponeurosis, about a finger's breadth above the zygoma. When
become cutaneous, the nerve is distributed on the temple, and
communicates with the facial nerve, also sometimes with the next.
ferior
lary.
b. The temporal branch of the inferior maxillary nerve (third from indivision of the fifth) is near the ear, and accompanies the temporal maxilartery to the top of the head. As soon as the nerve emerges from
beneath the parotid gland, it furnishes an auricular branch (upper)
to the anterior part of the pinna, above the auditory meatus, and
then divides into two terminal branches. The more posterior
branch is the smaller of the two, and supplies the attrahens aurem
muscle and the integument above the ear. The other branch ascends
vertically to the top of the head, and is distributed above the
epicranial and temporal aponeuroses.
facial c. The temporal branches of the facial nerve are directed upwards andfrom
over the temporal aponeurosis to the orbicularis palpebrarum nerve.
muscle. They will be noticed in the dissection of the trunk of the facial nerve.
rior aunerve has
The posterior auricular nerve is close behind the ear with the Posteartery of the same name. It arises from the facial nerve close to ricular
the stylo-mastoid foramen, and turns upwards in front of the mastoid process. Soon after the nerve becomes superficial, it
communicates with the great auricular nerve, and divides into an
occipital and an auricular branch, which are distributed as their
names express.
a. The occipital branch is long and slender, and ends in the posterior occipital branch,
belly of the occipito-frontalis. It lies near the occipital bone, enveloped in dense fibrous structure, and furnishes offsets to the integuments.
b cular. . The auricular branch ascends to the back of the ear, supplying the andauriretrahent muscle and posterior aspect of the pinna.
auricu- The great auricular nerve ( of the cervical plexus) is seen to some Great
extent at the lower part of the ear, but its anatomy will be after- lar
wards given with the description of the cervical plexus.
nerve.
The great occipitul is the largest cutaneous nerve at the back of Great occipital the head, and is recognised by its proximity to the occipital artery. nerve
Springing from the posterior division of the second cervical nerve,
it perforates the muscles of the back of the neck, and divides on
the occiput into numerous large branches, that spread over the
posterior part of the occipito- frontalis muscle. The branches of gives an
the nerve end mostly in the integument, and one (auricular branch) lar
reaches the cranial aspect of the ear. As soon as this nerve pierces
auricubranch.
B 4
8 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Small occipital nerve
has an auricu- lar branch.
the trapezius, it is joined by an offset from the third cervical nerve ;
and on the back of the head it communicates also with the smaller
occipital nerve.
The small occipital nerve of the cervical plexus is midway between the ear and the preceding nerve. With this position, the
nerve is continued upwards in the integuments higher than the level of the ear. It communicates with the nerve on each side ;
viz. the posterior auricular and great occipital. Usually this
nerve furnishes an auricular branch to the upper part of the ear at
its cranial aspect, which supplies also the attollens aurem muscle.
Dissec- tion to
skull .
Dissection. --
SECTION II.
INTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD.
Before opening the skull, detach the temporal
open the muscle of the right side from the bone nearly down to the zygoma,
without separating the fascia and muscle one from another. Then
divide the soft parts around the skull, the knife being carried
about one inch above the margin of the orbit in front, and as low
as the occipital protuberance at the posterior part of the head.
Next saw the outer plate of the bones of the cranium in the same
line as the incision, and break through the inner plate with a
chisel, in order to avoid injuring the subjacent membrane of the
brain (dura mater). Forcibly detach the skull cap, and the dura
mater is exposed.
Dura mater.
ance of outer surface.
The DURA MATER is the most external of the membranes
investing the brain. It is a strong, fibrous structure, that
serves as an internal periosteum to the bones, and supports
Appear- the cerebral mass. The outer surface of the membrane is
rough, and presents, now it is separated from the bone,
numerous small fibrous and vascular processes. Along the
line of the sutures, and at the base of the skull, the attachment of the dura mater to the bone is much the most intimate. Ramifying on the membrane are branches of the
middle meningeal vessels, ascending towards the top of the
head. Small granular bodies, glands of Pacchioni, are also
seen along the middle line. The number of these bodies is
very variable, and is increased with age. Occasionally the
surface of the skull is indented by these so-called glands.
INTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD. 9
tion .
Dissection. Cut through the dura mater with a scissors close Dissecto the sawn skull, except in the middle line before and behind,
where the superior longitudinal sinus lies . Raise the cut membrane towards the top of the brain, and on the right side break
through the veins connecting it with the cerebral hemisphere.
surface.
When the dura mater is cut through, its inner surface is Inner
seen to present a smooth and polished aspect, in consequence
of the reflection over it of the arachnoid or serous membrane.
ture This external envelope of the brain consists of white fi- Strucbrous tissue, so disposed as to give rise to two distinct layers.
At certain spots these layers are slightly separated, and form
thereby the spaces or sinuses for the passage of the venous
blood. Moreover, the innermost layer sends processes be- and protween different parts of the brain, viz. falx, tentorium, &c.
cesses.
and atments.
The falx cerebri is a process of the dura mater, in shape Falx.
like a sickle, that dips between the hemispheres of the cerebrum, along the middle line. Its form and extent will be Form
evident if the right hemisphere is gently separated from it. tach-"
It is narrow and pointed in front, where it is attached to the
crista galli of the ethmoid bone, but widens posteriorly, and
joins a horizontal piece of the dura mater, viz. the tentorium cerebelli . The upper border is convex, and is fixed
to the middle line of the skull as far backwards as the occipital protuberance ; whilst the lower, or free border, is concave, and turned towards the corpus callosum, with which it
is in contact posteriorly. In this fold of the dura mater are sinuses
contained the following sinuses : -the superior longitudinal
along the convex border, the inferior longitudinal in the
lower edge, and the straight sinus at the line of junction
between it and the tentorium.
in it.
longitusinus.
The superior longitudinal sinus extends from the ethmoid Superior
bone to the occipital protuberance. Its position in the con- dinal
vex border of the falx will be made manifest by the escape
of blood through numerous small veins, when the finger is
carried backwards along the middle line. When the sinus Situais opened, it is seen to be narrow in front, and to become ending.
wider as it proceeds backwards, till it ends in a common
point of union of certain sinuses (torcular Herophili). Its
tion and
10 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
terior.
Its in- cavity is triangular in form, with the apex of the space
turned to the falx ; and across it are stretched small tendinous cords (chorda Willisii) around the openings of the
cerebral veins. Occasionally small glandulæ Pacchioni are
present in the sinus.
Veins opening This sinus receives small veins from the substance and the
into it. exterior of the skull, and larger ones from the hemispheres
of the brain. The cerebral veins open chiefly at the posterior part of the brain, and lie for some distance against the
wall of the sinus before they perforate it ; their course is
likewise directed from behind forwards, so that the motion
Current of the blood in them is directly opposed to the current in the
sinus. This disposition of the veins may be seen on the left
side, where the parts are undisturbed.
of blood in it.
Dissec- tion for
of brain.
Dissection. -Before the rest of the dura mater can be seen, the
removal brain is to be taken from the body. To facilitate this step, raise
the shoulders by a block (if this has not been done) and incline
the head backwards, in order that the brain may separate somewhat from the base of the skull. Cut across now the anterior
part of the falx cerebri, also the different cerebral veins entering
the longitudinal sinus, and raise and throw backwards the falx.
For the division of the nerves and vessels of the brain, a very
sharp scalpel will be necessary ; and the nerves are to be cut longer on one side than the other.
Mode of proceedparts cut.
Removal of the brain. —Begin the removal of the brain by
ing and gently raising with the fingers the anterior lobes and the olfactory
bulbs. Next cut through the internal carotid artery and second
and third nerves, which first present themselves to the dissector ;
the artery having the large second nerve on its inner, and the
round third nerve on its outer side. A small branch of artery to
the orbit should likewise be divided at this time. The brain is
now to be supported in the left hand, and the pituitary body to
be dislodged from the hollow in the centre of the sphenoid bone.
Afterwards a strong horizontal process of the dura mater (tentorium cerebelli) comes into view, and along its free margin will
be seen the small fourth nerve, which is to be cut at this stage of
the proceeding. Next make an incision through the tentorium on
each side, close to its attachment to the temporal bone, without
injuring the parts underneath. The following nerves will now
appear, and be divided in succession. Near the inner margin of
the tentorium is the fifth nerve, consisting of a large and small
INTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD. 11
root ; whilst towards the middle line is the long slender sixth
nerve. Below the fifth, and somewhat external to it, is the seventh
nerve with its facial and auditory parts, the former being anterior
and the smaller of the two. Directly below the seventh are the
three divisions of the eighth nerve in one line of these, the
upper small piece is the glosso-pharyngeal ; the flat band next below, the pneumo-gastric ; and the long round nerve ascendingfrom
the spinal canal, the spinal accessory division. The remaining nerve
is the ninth, which consists of two small pieces. After dividing the
nerves, cut through the vertebral arteries as they wind round the
upper part of the spinal cord. Lastly, cut across the spinal cord
as low as possible, together with the roots of the spinal nerves that
are attached on each side. By placing the first two fingers in the
spinal canal, the cord may be raised, and the whole brain may now
be taken readily from the skull.
preserve
amine
The brain may be examined at once, or it may be immersed in How to
wood-spirit to harden the texture. If the spirit is used, the fol- and exlowing plan may be pursued to enable the student to go through the
the dissection with advantage. To allow the spirit to reach the brain.
interior of the ventricles, cut off the upper part of each hemisphere nearly to the level of the corpus callosum, and then open
each lateral ventricle by a longitudinal incision of about two inches
near the inner margin of the divided hemisphere. Now place the
brain upside down on a piece of calico, long enough to wrap over
it, and then set it aside in the spirit, with the top of one hemisphere. At the end of one day the dissector should return to the
examination of the other membranes and the vessels. As soon as
the vessels are learnt, carefully remove the membranes from all
the surface of the brain, without detaching the different cranial
nerves. Finally, let the brain remain in the spirit till the dissection ofthe head and neck is completed. The description of the
brain will be found after that of the head and neck.
Dissection. ―
tion.
After setting aside the brain, proceed with the Dissecanatomy of the dura mater, and the vessels and nerves in the base
of the skull. Let the head be raised to a convenient height, and
the tentorium be fastened in its natural position with a few
stitches. The dissector should be furnished with the base of the
skull, whilst studying the following parts.
mater in
skull ;
At the base of the cranium the dura mater is much more Dura
closely united to the bones than it is at the top of the skull. base of
Here it dips into the different inequalities on the surface of
the bones, sends processes through the several apertures, and
12 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
its pro- longa- tions
furnishes sheaths to the nerves. Beginning the examination
in front, the student will find the membrane sending a prolongation into the foramen cæcum, and a series of tubes
through the apertures in the cribriform plate. Alarge process
also enters the orbit by the sphenoidal fissure, and a covering
and con- is continued on the optic nerve to the eyeball. After lining
to bone. the sella turcica, the dura mater adheres closely to the basilar process of the occipital bone, and then descends into the
spinal canal. Its connection to the margin of the foramen
magnum is very firm .
nections
Tento- rium ceits at- tach- ments
The tentorium cerebelli is a piece of the dura mater that
rebelli ; is interposed almost in a horizontal position between the
cerebellum and the posterior part of the cerebrum. Its
upper surface is joined by the falx cerebri along the middle,
and is hollowed laterally for the reception of the back part
of the cerebral hemispheres ; whilst its under- surface corresponds to the cerebellum and falx cerebelli. The anterior
margin is free, except at the ends, where it is fixed by a
narrow slip to each anterior clinoid process. The posterior
or attached part is connected to the following bones : -occipital (its transverse groove), inferior angle of the parietal,
petrous portion of the temporal (upper border), and posterior
and the clinoid process of the sphenoid. Along the centre of the
tentorium is the straight sinus, whilst in the attached edge
are the lateral and the superior petrosal sinuses.
sinuses in it.
Falx ce- rebelli The falx cerebelli has the same position below the tentorium as the falx cerebri above that fold. It is much smaller
than the like process of the cerebrum, and will be seen by
detaching the tentorium. Triangular in form, this fold is
attached to the middle of the occipital bone, below the transverse ridge, and projects between the hemispheres of the
cerebellum. Its base is directed to the tentorium, and the
contains apex ends below, at the foramen magnum, to each side of
sinuses. which it gives a small slip. In it are contained the occipital
sinuses.
occipital
Sinuses ofthe skull.
The SINUSES of the dura mater are venous spaces between
the layers, into which the blood is received. All the sinuses
open either into a large space opposite the occipital protuberance (torcular Herophili) , or into the cavernous sinus,
by the side of the body of the sphenoid bone.
INTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD.
133
tal cenceives
A. The TORCULAR HEROPHILI is placed in the tentorium, Occipiopposite the centre of the occipital bone. It is of an irregular tre reshape, and numerous sinuses open into it ; viz. the superior
longitudinal, the straight and inferior longitudinal, the occipital and lateral sinuses.
The superior longitudinal sinus has been already described Superior
(see p. 9. ).
longitu- dinal.
longitu- The inferior longitudinal sinus resembles a small vein, Inferior
and is contained in the lower border of the falx cerebri at dinal.
its posterior part. This vein receives blood from the falx
and the larger brain, and ends in the straight sinus at the
edge of the tentorium.
sinus.
The straight sinus lies along the middle of the tentorium, Straight
and seems to continue the preceding sinus to the common
point of union. Its form is triangular, like the superior
longitudinal. Joining it are the inferior longitudinal sinus
and the veins of Galen, also some small veins from the upper
part of the small brain.
tal sinus The occipital sinus is a small space in the falx cerebelli, Occipiwhich reaches to the foramen magnum, and collects the blood
from the occipital fossæ. This sinus may be double.
sinus.
to bone.
The lateral sinus is the channel by which the blood passes Lateral
from the skull. There is one on each side, right and left,
which extends from the occipital protuberance to the foramen
lacerum jugulare, where it ends in the internal jugular vein.
In this extent the sinus corresponds to the winding groove in Position
the interior of the skull, between the two points of bone
before mentioned. Besides small veins from the brain, the Sinuses
sinus is joined by the superior petrosal sinus, opposite the it.
upper border of the petrous portion of the temporal bone, and
by the inferior petrosal at the foramen lacerum. Oftentimes
it communicates with the occipital vein through the mastoid
foramen. The right sinus is commonly larger than the left.
joining
tion in
lacerum.
The foramen lacerum jugulare is divided into three com- Situapartments, by bands of the dura mater ; through the posterior foramen
passes the lateral sinus, through the anterior space the inferior
petrosal sinus, and through the central one the divisions of
the eighth nerve.
Dissection. -
- To open the cavernous sinus, say on the left side, Dissec- tion.
14 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Cavern- ous si- nus
has nerves
wall ;
make an incision along the side of the sphenoid bone, from the anterior to the posterior clinoid process, and internal to the third
nerve. Behind the last-named process, direct the knife inwards for
about half the width of the basilar part of the occipital bone. By
placing the handle of the scalpel in the opening thus made, the
extent of the space will be manifest. A probe should be passed
into the different sinuses that join the cavernous sinus.
B. The CAVERNOUS SINUS has been so named from the
reticulate structure in its interior. This space, resulting
from the separation of the layers of the dura mater, is of an
irregular shape, and extends from the sphenoidal fissure to
the tip of the petrous portion of the temporal bone. Exterin outer nally, the piece of dura mater bounding the sinus is of some
thickness, and contains in its substance the third and fourth
nerves, with the orbital division of the fifth. The cavity of
the sinus is larger behind than before, and in it are shreds
contains of fibrous tissue with small vessels. Through the space
artery winds the trunk of the internal carotid artery, with the sixth
nerve on the outer side of the vessel ; but these are shut out
from the blood in the space by a thin lining membrane. The
cavernous sinus receives the ophthalmic vein of the orbit, and
and com- some small cerebral veins. It communicates with its fellow
cates on the opposite side by the circular and transverse sinuses,
lowing and its blood is transmitted to the lateral sinus by the supecarotid
and sixth nerve ;
muniwith folsinuses,
viz. rior and inferior petrosal channels.
sinus,
Circular The circular sinus lies around the pituitary body, and
reaches from one cavernous sinus to the other across the
middle line. Besides serving as the means of communication
between those sinuses, it receives small veins from the pituitary body. This sinus is usually destroyed by the removal
of the pituitary body.
Trans- verse sinus,
Superior
The transverse or basilar sinus crosses the basilar process
of the occipital bone, on a level with the petrous part of the
temporal bone ; through it the cavernous sinuses are joined.
A second transverse sinus is sometimes found nearer the
foramen magnum.
The superior petrosal sinus lies in a groove in the upper
petrosal , margin of the petrous part of the temporal bone, and extends
between the cavernous and lateral sinuses. A small vein
from the cerebellum is received into it.
INTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD. 15
petrosal. The inferior petrosal sinus likewise extends between the Inferior
same sinuses as the preceding, and lies along the line of
junction ofthe petrous part of the temporal with the basilar
process of the occipital bone ; it is joined by a small vein
from the outside of the skull, through the foramen lacerum
medium at the base of the cranium. The sinus passes
through the jugular foramen in the anterior compartment of
that space, and ends in the lateral sinus, as this is about to
become the internal jugular vein.
-
of dura MENINGEAL ARTERIES. The arteries that supply the Arteries
dura mater are found in all three fosse of the base of the mater
skull, and may be accordingly named anterior, middle, and
posterior.
are,
menin- a. The anterior meningeal are very small branches which are Anterior
derived from the ethmoidal arteries : they are distributed to the geal.
dura mater, near the ethmoid bone.
menininternal
b. The middle or large meningeal branch of the internal max- Middle
illary artery enters the skull by the foramen spinosum of the sphe- geal from
noid bone, and ascends towards the anterior inferior angle of the maxilparietal bone. At this spot the vessel enters a deep groove in the lary,
bone, and ends in ramifications that spread over the side of the
head, some of these reaching to the top, and others towards the
occiput. Two veins run with this artery.
branches
mater
Branches. Before the artery enters the skull it gives off the small gives
meningeal branch, which is transmitted through the foramen ovale to the to dura middle fossa. As soon as it enters the cranial cavity, it furnishes
branches of distribution to the dura mater and osseous structure, and the
ganglion of the fifth nerve. One small branch, petrosal, enters the and ear ;
hiatus Fallopii, and extends through the aqueduct of the same name
till it meets the stylo-mastoid artery. One or two branches also enter
the orbit, and anastomose with the ophthalmic artery.
Another meningeal branch from the ascending pharyngeal artery, andfrom
appears in the middle fossa of the skull, after passing through the
foramen lacerum medium basis cranii.
ascend- ing pha- ryngeal.
rior me- c. The posterior meningeal branches are likewise small, and are Postefurnished by the occipital and vertebral arteries. Those from the ningeal.
occipital (one on each side) enter the skull by the jugular foramen ;
and those from the vertebral arise opposite the foramen magnum.
Both sets ramify in the posterior fossa of the skull.
MENINGEAL NERVES. -- The source of the nerves of the Nerves
dura mater is very uncertain. Some authors describe the mater.
of dura
16 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Cranial nerves in
skull are,
offsets as coming from the fourth and fifth cranial nerves ;
whilst others refer their origin to the sympathetic. To make
these nerves apparent, it would be necessary to steep the dura
mater in diluted nitric acid.
CRANIAL NERVES. - The cranial nerves consist of nine
base of pair, and pass from the skull by the apertures in its base.
As each leaves the cranium it is invested by processes of
the membranes of the brain, which are thus disposed : those
of the dura mater and pia mater are lost on the nerve ;
whilst that of the arachnoid membrane passes but a short
distance before it is reflected back to the skull. Some of
the nerves, those in the middle fossa of the skull for instance, are received into sheaths of the dura mater before
they approach the foramina of transmission. Only part of
the course of these nerves will be now seen, the rest is learnt
in the dissection of the base of the brain.
Olfac- tory nerve,
The FIRST NERVE ends anteriorly in the enlargement of
the olfactory bulb. This swelling lies on the cribriform
plate of the ethmoid bone, and from it filaments of distribution descend to the nose through the small foramina in the
subjacent bone. These delicate nerves are surrounded by
ends in prolongations of the membranes of the brain, whose disposition will be noticed in the dissection of the nose.
thenose.
Optic nerve- The SECOND NERVE diverging from its commissure to the
enters eyeball, enters the orbit through the optic foramen : accompanying the nerve is the ophthalmic artery.
the eye.
Dissec- Dissection. To expose the nerves that lie in the outer wall of tion.
Motor oculi nerve
the cavernous sinus, viz . the third, fourth, and ophthalmic division of the fifth, it will be necessary to remove the sheaths ofthe
dura mater that they receive. Follow outwards also the trunk
ofthe fifth nerve, and take away the dura mater from the surface
of its large Gasserian ganglion, on the point of the petrous part of
the temporal bone. Trace also the two other large trunks that
leave the ganglion , viz. superior and inferior maxillary, to their
apertures in the skull.
The THIRD NERVE enters the wall of the cavernous sinus,
near the anterior clinoid process, and is deprived at this
spot of its tube of arachnoid membrane. From that point
forwards the third is above the other nerves in the wall of
INTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD. 17
the sinus, till it is about to enter the orbit by the sphenoidal
fissure. Near the orbit this nerve is joined by one or two passes to
delicate filaments of the cavernous plexus.
orbit .
lear The FOURTH NERVE is the smallest of the nerves in the Trochwall of the sinus. Like the preceding nerve, below which nerve
it lies, it courses forwards to the orbit ; but as it is about to
pass through the sphenoidal fissure it becomes higher than all
the other nerves. In the wall of the sinus, the fourth nerve in the
is joined by twigs of the sympathetic, and sometimes it is cavernunited with the ophthalmic division of the fifth. Some sinus.
branches are furnished by it to the dura mater. (Bidder. )
wall of
ous
nerve
roots.
FIFTH NERVE. -The two roots of the fifth nerve pass to- Trifacial
gether through an aperture in the dura mater, into the middle has two
fossa of the base of the skull. Immediately afterwards, the
large or sensitive root enlarges in the Gasserian ganglion,
whilst the small or motor root passes beneath the ganglion
without communicating with it.
rian
lion on
root,
The ganglion of the root ofthe fifth nerve ( Gasserian Gasseganglion) is placed in a depression on the point of the petrous gangpart of the temporal bone. The upper surface of the gan- large
glion is closely united to the dura mater, and presents a semilunar elevation, whose convexity looks forwards. Some
filaments of the sympathetic enter its inner side, from the
plexus on the carotid artery.
-
three
es .
Branches. From the front of the ganglion proceed the gives
three following trunks : The ophthalmic nerve is the first branchand highest, and is destined for the orbit and face. Next in
order is the superior maxillary nerve, which leaves the skull
by the foramen rotundum, and ends in the face below the
orbit. And the last, or inferior maxillary nerve, passes
downwards through the foramen ovale to reach the lower
jaw, tongue, and face. If the ganglion is raised, the small
root will be seen to enter the trunk ofthe inferior maxillary
nerve.
ence in
branchThose branches of the ganglion that are unconnected with Differthe small or motor root, viz. the ophthalmic and superior the
maxillary, are nerves of sensation ; but the inferior maxil- es.
lary is a nerve of sensation and of motion, like a spinal
nerve. It is not the whole of the inferior maxillary nerve
C
18 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Oph- thalmic
enters orbit
that so differs from the rest, for the motor root is mixed
almost exclusively with that part of the trunk which supplies
the muscles of the lower jaw ; and therefore it is that
small part of the nerve that possesses a double function, and
resembles a spinal nerve.
The ophthalmic nerve is the only one that needs a morespenerve of cial notice in this stage of the dissection. In form it is a flat ganglion band, and it enters the orbit bythe sphenoidal fissure. In its
course to the orbit, the nerve is contained in the wall of the
cavernous sinus, where it lies beneath the third and fourth
Supplies nerves. In this situation the nerve is joined by filaments
of the cavernous plexus, and gives a small recurrent filament to that part of the dura mater, which forms the tentorium cerebelli (Arnold).
dura mater.
Abdu- cens nerve is in
ous siThe SIXTH NERVE enters the space of the cavernous sinus
by piercing the dura mater behind the body of the sphenoid
cavern- bone, and reaches the orbit through the sphenoidal fissure.
In the sinus, the nerve is placed close against the outer side
of the carotid artery, where it is joined by one or two
branches of the sympathetic nerve surrounding that vessel.
nus.
Seventh nerve SEVENTH NERVE. Both the facial and auditory trunks of
has two this cranial nerve enter the meatus auditorius internus. In parts.
the bottom of the meatus they separate ; the facial nerve
courses through the aqueduct of Fallopius to the surface of
the skull, whilst the auditory nerve is distributed to the internal ear.
Eighth nerve
parts.
EIGHTH NERVE. - The three parts of this nerve pass
has three through the central compartment of the foramen lacerum
jugulare, but all are not contained in the same tube of dura
mater and arachnoid membrane. The glosso-pharyngeal
nerve is external to the other two, being separated from
them by the inferior petrosal sinus, and has distinct sheaths of
Their the dura mater and arachnoid membrane. But the pneumothrough gastric and spinal accessory nerves are inclosed in the same
lacerum. tube of the dura mater, a piece of the arachnoid only intervening between them.
passage
foramen
The NINTH NERVE consists of two small pieces that pierce
separately the dura mater opposite the anterior condyloid
foramen, and unite after passing through that aperture.
INTERNAL PARTS OF THE HEAD. 19
Dissection. -
tion of The dissector may now return to the examination Dissecof the trunk of the carotid artery, as it winds through the caver- carotid,
nous sinus.
On the opposite side, viz. that on which the nerves in the wall of sym- pathetic.
of the cavernous sinus are untouched, an attempt may be made to
expose the small plexuses of the sympathetic on the carotid artery.
It will be necessary to cut off the anterior clinoid process, and to dissect out with care the third, fourth, fifth, and sixth nerves.
Small filaments pass from the plexuses to these nerves. In an
injected body this dissection is scarcely possible.
carotid
through cavern- ous si- nus.
The INTERNAL CAROTID ARTERY appears in the base of Internal
the skull at the apex of the petrous part of the temporal artery
bone. In its ascent to the brain, the vessel lies along the
side of the body of the sphenoid bone, and makes two re- winds
markable bends (like the letter S reclined) in the space of
the cavernous sinus. On entering the sinus, the artery ascends, at first, to the posterior clinoid process ; it is then
directed forwards to the root of the anterior process of the
same name ; and lastly, it turns upwards internal to this point
of bone, perforates the dura mater a second time, and divides into cerebral arteries at the fissure of Sylvius. In this
course the artery is enveloped by nerves derived from the
sympathetic in the neck.
The branches
dura the mater
The branches of this part of the artery are few. In the
sinus there are some small arteries (arteriæ receptaculi) to areto
the dura mater ; and opposite the anterior clinoid process
ophthalmic branch arises. The terminal branches of the
carotid, at the base of the brain, will be seen in the dissection of that part.
and or- bit.
thetic on SYMPATHETIC NERVE. - Around the carotid artery is a Sympaprolongation of the sympathetic nerve of the neck, which carotid
forms the following plexuses : -
forms
a. The carotid plexus is situate on the outer side of the vessel, carotid at its entrance into the cavernous sinus, and communicates with plexus,
the sixth nerve, the Gasserian ganglion, and the spheno-palatine
ganglion.
ous plex- us.
b. The cavernous plexus is placed below the bend of the artery, cavernwhich is close to the root of the anterior clinoid process. This small
plexus is more immediately connected with the offset of the sympathetic, that courses along the inner side of the carotid artery.
C 2
20 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Union with cranial
Filaments are given from this plexus to unite with the third, fourth,
and ophthalmic nerves. One filament is also furnished to the
nerves. lenticular ganglion, either separately from, or in conjunction with
the nasal nerve. Other branches of distribution surround the trunk
of the carotid, and are lost on the cerebral arteries.
Two pe- trosal
base of
Petrosal nerves. - Beneath the Gasserian ganglion is the large
nerves in superficial petrosal nerve, entering the hiatus Fallopii. External
skull. to this is occasionally seen another small petrosal nerve (nervus
petrosus superficialis tertius, Bidder), which springs from the sympathetic on the middle meningeal artery, and enters the bone to
join the facial nerve with the preceding. A third petrosal nerve
is contained in the substance of the temporal bone.
ofbody.
SECTION III.
THE FACE.
Position THE previous position of the body for the examination of
the base of the skull will require to be changed. The head
is to be lowered, and the side of the face to be examined is
to be placed upwards. On the left side the dissector will
expose the muscles and vessels, and the right side he is to
reserve for the nerves.
Dissec- tion Dissection. - As a preparatory step, make tense the fibres of
the eyelids, lips, and side of the nose, by inserting a little tow or
cotton wool into the different apertures ; then fasten the margins
of the eyelids and lips with a few sutures. Divide the integuments
on the left side of the face by an incision in front of the ear, from
above the zygoma to the angle of the jaw, and continued from the
last point along the base of the jaw to the chin. Raise the flap of
integument from without inwards, and leave it adherent along the
ofmus- middle line. Much care must be taken in detaching the skin from
eyelid, the thin, and oftentimes pale fibres of the orbicular muscle of the
eyelids, otherwise these will be destroyed in consequence ofthe little
fat that intervenes between the two. On the side ofthe nose the
skin is closely united to the subjacent parts, and must be detached with care. Around the mouth are many fleshy slips that extend
mouth. both upwards and downwards from the orbicular muscle, but they
are all marked so distinctly as to escape injury, except the small
risorius muscle that comes from the angle of the lower jaw towards the corner of the mouth. When removing the fat from the
cle of
side of nose,
and around
THE FACE. 21
muscles, each fleshy slip should be made tense by means of hooks.
The facial vessels and their branches will come into view as the parts
are cleaned ; but the nerves may be disregarded on this side.
Near the ear is the parotid gland, whose duct is on a level with
the meatus auditorius, and pierces the middle of the cheek.
face the
surthe aperMUSCLES OF THE FACE. -The superficial muscles of the In the
face are gathered around the apertures of the eye, nose, and muscles
mouth. An orbicular or sphincter muscle surrounds the round
aperture both of the eye and mouth ; and other muscles tures.
are blended with it to enlarge each aperture. There are
three distinct sets of muscles : one of the opening of the
eyelids ; another of the nostril ; and a third of the aper
ture of the mouth. One of the muscles of mastication,
viz. the masseter, is also now seen, but it will be afterwards
examined.
muscles
lids.
The muscles of the eyelids are four in number, viz. Four
orbicularis palpebrarum, corrugator supercilii, levator pal- of eyepebræ superioris, and tensor tarsi. The two latter are
dissected in the orbit, and will be described with that
part.
larisbrarum
ternally,
The ORBICULARIS PALPEBRARUM is the sphincter muscle of orbicu
the elliptical opening between the eyelids. It is a flat and palpethin layer, which extends from the margin of the lids to beyond the circumference of the orbit. At the inner angle of arises inthe orbit the muscle is fixed to the internal angular process
of the frontal bone, and to the nasal process of the superior
maxillary bone ; also to the borders of a small tendon (tendo
palpebrarum), and to the anterior margin of the groove for
the lachrymal sac. From this origin the fibres are directed
above and below the aperture of the lids, giving rise to
ovals, which increase in size towards the outer margin of
the muscle. The external fibres (orbital ) are the strongest, and conand project beyond the margin of the orbit ; the internal three
fibres (ciliary) are very pale and thin, and form a small fibres.
bundle close to the cilia or eyelashes ; whilst the fibres which
occupy the eyelids ( palpebral) are intermediate in size. The Connecmuscle is subcutaneous, and its circumference is free, except parts
above, where it is blended with the occipito-frontalis. Beneath the upper half of the orbicularis, as it lies on the
sists of
sets of
tion with
around.
c 3
2222 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Corru- gator sumargin of the orbit, is the corrugator supercilii muscle
with the supra-orbital vessels and nerve, and beneath the
lower half is part of the elevator of the upper lip.
The CORRUGATOR SUPERCILII is found beneath the orbipercilii cularis, near the inner angle of the orbit. Its fibres arise
from the inner part of the superciliary ridge of the frontal
is blend- bone, and are directed thence outwards to join the orbicular
orbicu- muscle about the middle of the orbital arch. It is a short
muscle, and is distinguished by the closeness of its fibres.
ed with
laris.
Four muscles The muscles of the nose are the following : pyramidalis
ofnose . nasi, compressor naris, levator alæ nasi, and depressor alæ nasi.
Pyrami- dalis nasi is over nasal bone.
Com- pressor naris
Covers
The PYRAMIDALIS NASI is a small pyramidal slip that covers
the nasal bone, and appears to be a prolongation of the
occipito-frontalis muscle. Its fibres end in an aponeurosis,
which joins that of the compressor naris over the cartilaginous part of the nose. By the outer border the muscle
is united with the orbicularis palpebrarum, and along the
inner border is the muscle of the opposite side.
COMPRESSOR NARIS. -This muscle is not well seen till
after the examination of the following one. Triangular in
shape it arises by a point from the canine fossa of the upper
maxillary bone. The fibres are directed inwards, spreading
out at the same time, and end in an aponeurosis, which covers
ofnose. the cartilaginous part of the nose, and joins the tendon of
the opposite muscle as well as the nasal cartilage. This
muscle is partly concealed by the common elevator ofthe ala
of the nose and the upper lip.
cartilage
Elevator ofwing The LEVATOR LABII SUPERIORIS ALÆQUE NASI is placed
ofnose by the side of the nose, and arises from the nasal process of
the upper maxillary bone, below the orbicularis. As the
fibres descend from the inner part of the orbit, the most internal are attached by a narrow slip to the wing of the nose,
is part whilst the rest are blended inferiorly with those of the orbi- elevator
of upper cularis oris . The origin of the muscle is concealed by the
orbicularis palpebrarum ; in the rest of its extent the muscle
is subcutaneous.
lip.
Depres- sor of The DEPRESSOR ALÆ NASI is found beneath the mucous
wing is membrane on the side of the frænum of the upper lip. It
THE FACE. 23
seen from arises below the nose from a depression of the upper jawbone near the incisor teeth, and ascends to be inserted into mouth.
the septum and posterior part of the ala of the nose.
of The muscles that act on the aperture of the mouth consist Muscles
of a sphincter ; an elevator of the upper lip and of the angle mouth.
of the mouth ; depressors of the lower lip and angle of the
mouth, and an elevator of the lower lip ; together with other
small muscles that act on the corner, viz. zygomatici and
risorius of Santorini. Lastly, the buccinator muscle may be
reckoned in this set, as it acts on the mouth.
ter of
without
tachThe ORBICULARIS ORIS MUSCLE surrounds the aperture of Sphinc
the mouth with elliptical fibres, like the sphincter muscle ofmouth
the eyelids. The muscle has not an attachment to bone, bony atbut at the corners of the mouth the fibres are blended with, ment.
or continued into those of the other muscles that are there
inserted, especially the buccinator. The inner margin of Blends
the muscle is free, and bounds the aperture of the mouth ; other
whilst to the outer edge are united the different muscles that
elevate or depress the lips and the angle of the mouth. Beneath the orbicularis in each lip is the coronary artery.
with
muscles.
ofupper
from the
The LEVATOR LABII SUPERIORIS extends vertically from Elevator
the lower margin of the orbit to the orbicularis oris. It lip
arises from the upper maxillary and malar bones, above the
infra-orbital foramen, and is inserted into the orbicularis passes
oris, between the middle line and angle of the mouth. orbit to
Near the orbit the muscle is overlapped by the orbicularis
palpebrarum, but below that spot it is subcutaneous. To its
inner side is the common elevator of the ala of the nose and
the upper lip, and to its outer side the zygomatic muscles.
Beneath it are the infra- orbital vessels and nerve.
mouth.
ofthe The LEVATOR ANGULI ORIS has well-marked fibres, and is Elevator
partly concealed by the preceding muscle. Arising from angle
the canine fossa, beneath the infra-orbital foramen, its fibres
spread out towards the angle of the mouth, where they mix mixes
with the rest of the muscles, but the greater number are
continued into the depressor anguli oris. This muscle is
deep at its origin beneath the elevator of the upper lip, but
it soon passes from beneath that muscle.
with de- pressor ofangle.
The DEPRESSOR LABII INFERIORIS is opposite the elevator of Depres- C 4
24
DISSECTION
OF THE
HEAD
AND
NECK
.
sor of lowerlip the upper lip, and much yellow fat is mixed with its fibres.
The muscle takes its origin from the front of the lower jaw,
and ascends to be blended with the orbicularis in the lower
is in the lip. The inner border of the depressor is contiguous to the
ofchin . muscle of the opposite side, and the outer is overlapped by
the depressor anguli oris.
middle
Depres- sor of angle
The DEPRESSOR ANGULI ORIS is triangular in shape, and
passes from the oblique line on the outer surface ofthe lower
jaw to the angle of the mouth, where its fibres are continued
into the elevator of the angle. This muscle conceals the strong muscle. labial branch of the inferior dental vessels and nerve.
is a
Elevator of chin
At
its origin the depressor is united with the platysma myoides,
and at its insertion with the risorius muscle.
The LEVATOR MENTI is a small muscle on the side of the
frænum ofthe lower lip, and it corresponds to the depressor of
the ala ofthe nose in the upper lip . When the mucous membrane is removed this muscle is seen to arise from a fossa
mouth. near the symphysis of the lower jaw, and to descend to its
insertion into the integument of the chin. Its position is
internal to the depressor of the lip.
is seen inside
Zygo- matic The ZYGOMATIC MUSCLES are directed obliquely from the
muscles; arch of the same name towards the angle of the mouth.
One is longer and larger than the other ; hence the names
major and minor.
large
and small :
a. The zygomaticus major arises from the outer part
of the malar bone near its union with the temporal, and is
inserted into the angle of the mouth.
b. The zygomaticus minor is attached to the malar bone
anterior to the other, and is blended more frequently with
the fibres of the elevator of the upper lip, than with the
absent. orbicularis at the angle of the mouth.
last may be
Riso- rius The RISORIUS MUSCLE ( Santorini) is a narrow bundle of
muscle fibres, sometimes divided into two or more parts, which
is almost arises externally from the fascia over the masseter muscle,
and is connected internally with the apex of the depressor
anguli oris.
trans.
verse.
tor mus- Buccina- The BUCCINATOR is a thin flat muscle, that occupies the
cle. interval between the jaws, and bounds the cavity of the
Origin. mouth in that direction. Superiorly and inferiorly the
THE FACE. 25
tion at corners of
muscle arises from the outer surface of the upper and lower
maxillæ, as far forward as the first molar tooth, and in the
interval between the jaws it is attached to the band of the
pterygo-maxillary ligament. From this origin the fibres Inserare directed forwards to the angle of the mouth, where they
mix with the orbicularis ; and as some fibres descend to the mouth .
lower lip whilst others ascend to the upper lip, a decussation
takes place at the angle of the mouth. On the cutaneous Parts in
surface of the buccinator are the different muscles that con- with it.
verge to the angle of the mouth ; and crossing the upper
part is the duct of the parotid gland, which perforates the
muscle opposite the second upper molar tooth. Internally the
muscle is lined by the mucous membrane of the mouth. By
the intermaxillary origin the buccinator corresponds to the
attachment of the superior constrictor of the pharynx.
contact
of the The VESSELS OF THE FACE consist of the facial and Arteries
transverse facial arteries with their accompanying veins. The face.
arteries are branches of the external carotid, and the facial
vein is received into the internal jugular trunk.
artery ; The facial artery emerges from the neck, and appears on Facial
the lower jaw, anterior to the masseter muscle. From this
point the artery ascends in a tortuous manner near the angle
of the mouth and the side of the nose to the inner angle of
the orbit, where it anastomoses with the ophthalmic artery.
The course of the vessel is comparatively superficial, though course,
lying in the mass of fat of the inner part of the cheek, and is
crossed by some of the muscles of the face. At first the and conartery is concealed by the platysma whilst crossing the jaw,
but this thin muscle does not prevent pulsation being recognised during life ; and near the mouth the zygomatic muscle
is superficial to it. The vessel rests successively on the
lower jaw, buccinator muscle, elevator of the angle of the
mouth, and that of the upper lip. Accompanying the artery
is the facial vein, which is nearly a straight tube, and lies to
its outer side.
-
nections.
the Branches. - From the outer side of the vessel unnamed Plan of
branches are furnished to the muscles and integuments, some branchof which anastomose with the transverse facial artery. From
the inner side are given the following branches : —
es.
26 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
labial.
Inferior 1. The inferior labial branch runs inwards beneath the depressor
anguli oris muscle, and is distributed between the lower lip and chin ;
it anastomoses with the inferior coronary, and with the labial branch of
the inferior dental artery.
Two co- ronary
arch in
2. Coronary branches. -There is one for each lip (superior and inferior), which arise together or separately from the facial, and are
form an directed inwards between the orbicular muscle and the mucous memeach lip. brane of the lip, till they inosculate with the corresponding branches of
the opposite side. From the arterial arches thus formed, offsets are
Branch supplied to the lips and labial glands. From the arch in the upper lip
a branch is given to the septum of the nose ( artery of the septum).
to nose.
Lateral nasal 3. The lateral nasal branch arises opposite the ala of the nose, and
branch. passes beneath the levator labii superioris alæque nasi, to be distributed on the side of the nose, where it anastomoses with the nasal
branch of the ophthalmic artery.
branch.
Angular 4. The angular branch is the terminal twig of the facial artery at the
inner angle of the orbit, and anastomoses with a branch of the ophthal- mic artery.
Facial vein
from
Thefacial vein commences at the root of the nose by a
small vein named angular. It then crosses over the elevator
is away of the upper lip, and separating from the artery courses
artery; beneath the zygomatic muscles to the side of the jaw. Afterwards it has a short course in the neck to join the internal
jugular vein.
is joined,
by
es.
Branches. At the inner side of the orbit it receives veins from the
branch- lower eyelid (inferior palpebral) and the side of the nose. Below the
orbit it is joined by the infra-orbital vein, by a large branch that comes
from the pterygoid region (alveolar branch), and thence to its termination by veins corresponding to the branches of the artery both in the face and neck.
Trans- verse facial artery.
Dissec- tion.
The transverse facial is a branch of the temporal artery,
and it appears in the face at the anterior border of the parotid
gland. It lies along the parotid duct, with branches of the
facial nerve, and distributes offsets to the muscles and integuments ; some branches anastomose with the facial artery.
Dissection. - Expose now the parotid gland. Tosee the gland,
raise the skin from its surface towards the ear by means of an incision from the base of the jaw to the anterior border of the sternomastoid muscle ; this cut may be united with that made for the
dissection of the posterior muscle of the ear. A strong fascia
covers the gland, and is connected above and behind to the
THE FACE. 27
zygoma and cartilage of the ear, but in front is continued over the
face. After the fascia is removed, the superficial connections of
the gland will appear. The great auricular nerve is seen ascending to the lobe of the ear.
gland.
The PAROTID, so named from its position, is the largest of Parotid
the salivary glands, and it occupies the space between the
ear and the lower jaw. Its excretory duct enters the mouth
through the middle of the cheek.
lar in
between
The shape of the gland is irregular, and is determined Irregusomewhat by the bounding parts. Thus inferiorly, where shape ;
there is not any resisting structure, the gland projects into the
neck, and comes into close proximity with the submaxillary
gland, though separated from it by a process of the cervical
fascia. A line from the angle of the jaw to the mastoid is lodged
process marks usually the extent of the parotid in this the jaw
direction. Above and at the posterior part, the gland is
limited by the zygoma, temporal bone, and sterno-mastoid
muscle. Anteriorly the gland projects somewhat on the
face, and has a small accessory part, socia parotidis, pro- accessolonged from it over the masseter.
and ear ;
ry part.
duct crosses side of
reach
Connected with the anterior border is the excretory duct The
(duct of Stenson), which crosses the masseter below the
socia parotidis, and perforates the buccinator muscle oppo- face to
site the second molar tooth of the upper jaw. The duct mouth.
lies between the transverse facial artery and branches of the
facial nerve, the latter being below it. A line drawn from
the meatus auditorius to a little below the nostril would
mark the level of the duct, and the central point of the line
its opening into the mouth. The length of the duct is Its
about two inches, and its capacity is about equal to a large and size.
crow-quill, but the opening into the mouth is only large
enough to allow a small probe to pass.
length
ous surgland.
The cutaneous surface of the parotid is smooth, and has Cutaneone or two lymphatic glands seated on it, but the deep part face of
sends processes into the inequalities of the space between
the jaw and the mastoid process.
-
tion.
Dissection. -By removing with care the parotid gland, the Dissechollows that it fills up will come into view : at the same time the
dissector will see the vessels and nerves that pass through the
28 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Deep surface
behind jaw.
gland. An examination of the processes of the gland, and the
number of important vessels that are in relation with it, will demonstrate the impossibility of removing this body, and the dangers
attending any operation on it. The duct may be opened now,
and a probe passed along it to the mouth to show the diminished
size of its aperture.
Two large processes of the gland extend deeply into the
sinks neck. One dips behind the styloid process, and projects
beneath the mastoid process and sterno-mastoid muscle,
whilst it reaches also the deep vessels and nerves of the
neck. The other piece is situate in front of the styloid process ; it reaches behind the articulation of the lower jaw,
and beneath the ramus of that bone along the internal
maxillary artery.
Vessels and nerves in the gland.
The gland
by terducts,
Passing through the middle of the gland is the external
carotid artery, which ascends behind the ramus of the jaw,
and furnishes the transverse facial, auricular, superficial
temporal, and internal maxillary branches. Superficial to
the artery is the trunk formed by the junction of the temporal and internal maxillary veins, from which the external
jugular springs ; and opening into this common trunk are
some veins from the parotid, whilst a branch through the
gland connects it with the internal jugular vein. Crossing
the gland from behind forwards is the trunk of the facial
nerve, which distributes its branches through the parotid.
The superficial temporal branch of the inferior maxillary
nerve likewise passes through the upper part of the glan- dular mass.
The structure of the parotid resembles that of the other salivary
formed glands. The glandular mass is divided into numerous small
mination lobules by intervening processes of fascia, and each lobule consists of the of a set of the terminal ramifications of the excretory duct, which
end in closed extremities, and are surrounded by capillary vessels.
The size of the ducts, which by their aggregation form the mass of
the lobule, is about of an inch in diameter. From the lobules
issue small ducts, which unite to form larger tubes, and finally all and the the ducts of the gland are collected into one. An examination of
two the common duct (duct of Stenson) will show it to be composed of
an external fibrous or contractile coat, and an internal mucous
coat which is covered with columnar epithelium.
duct has
coats.
THE FACE. 29
The and parotid receives its arteries from the external carotid, Vessels
and its nerves from the sympathetic, facial, and great auri- nerves.
cular. The lymphatics join those of the neck.
glands.
Two or three small glands (molar) lie along the origin of the Molar
buccinator, and open into the mouth near the last molar tooth by
separate ducts.
carti- CARTILAGES OF THE NOSE. -These close the nasal aperture Nasal
which exists in the skeleton, and form part ofthe septum nasi ; lages.
they are five in number, two on each side (lateral cartilage
and cartilage of the aperture), together with a central one,
or cartilage of the septum of the nose. Only the lateral
cartilages are seen in this stage of the dissection.
tion. Dissection. To expose the lateral cartilages take away all the Dissecmuscular and cellular structure from the left side of the nose, and
remove the skin from the lower part of the nostril of the same
side. By passing the knife deeply in the middle line, the cartilage
of the septum will be seen to project between the lateral cartilages of each side.
upper
touches
low in
dle.
The upper lateral cartilage is flattened, and is somewhat The
triangular in form. Posteriorly it is attached to the nasal cartilage
and superior maxillary bones, and anteriorly it touches the its felone of the opposite side for a short space ; but the two are the midseparated below by an interval, in which appears the cartilage of the septum. Inferiorly the lateral cartilage is contiguous to the cartilage of the aperture, and is connected to
it by fibrous tissue.
lower
suraperThe cartilage ofthe aperture forms nearly a ring around The
the nostril, which it keeps always open ; a piece extending cartilage
both on the outer and inner sides of that aperture. This rounds
cartilage has not any attachment directly to bone, but is türe.
united superiorly to the lateral cartilage by fibrous tissue
and inferiorly it is connected with the dense structure that
forms the lower margin of the aperture of the nostril. The One par
outer part of the cartilage bounds the nostril externally ; it
is narrow and pointed behind, but swells out in front, and
forms with its fellow the prominence of the apex of the nose.
The inner part projects backwards along the septum of another
the nose, nearly to the superior maxillary bone ; this part nostril.
outside ;
inside
309
DISSECTION
OF
THE
HEAD
AND
NECK
.
Acces- sory carassists in the formation of the partition between the nostrils,
and lies below the level of the septum nasi.
Behind the outer half of the cartilage of the aperture, in
tilages . the dense tissue that fixes it to the bone. are two or three
small pieces of cartilage (cartilagines minores vel sesamoidea), which seem to result from the breaking up of the
posterior extremity of the cartilage of the aperture.
Acces- sory The APPENDAGES OF THE EYE consist of the eyebrow, the
parts of eyelid, and the lachrymal apparatus. These parts can be
seen now on the opposite side of the face ; but the apparatus
for the tears will be dissected after the orbit is completed.
the eye.
Eye- brow.
Eyelids.
the largest.
The eyebrow (supercilium) is a curved eminence just
above the eye, which corresponds to the orbital arch of the
frontal bone. Each consists of thickened integument with
subjacent fat, and its prominence is due to the orbicularis
palpebrarum. Each is furnished with long coarse hairs, that
are directed outward.
The eyelids are two semilunar folds in front of the eyeball. When the lids are open there is an interval (fissura
palpebrarum) between them, and when they are closed the
Upper upper lid (which is the largest) descends below the middle
of the eyeball. Externally and internally they are united
by a commissure or canthus. The free margin of each is
thicker than the rest of the lid, and presents towards the
inner side a small elevation, in which is the punctum
lachrymale, or the opening of the canal for the tears. This
has hairs margin is provided with hairs (cilia), and is sloped obliquely
from before backwards, so as to leave a space in front of the
eyeball when the lids are closed. Behind the eyelashes are
except the openings of the Meibomian glands. Both the cilia and
part. the Meibomian glands are absent from the part of the lid
which is internal to the opening of the lachrymal canal.
Free margin
and aper- tures,
at inner
Eye- lashes.
DifferThe eyelashes (cilia ) are two or more rows of long hairs,
which are fixed into the anterior edge of the free border of
the lid ; they are largest in the upper lid, and diminish in
length from the centre towards the sides. The cilia are so
arranged as to be convex towards one another.
STRUCTURE OF THE EYELIDS. - Each lid consists of inin eye.. tegument, of a layer of fibres of the orbicularis palpebrarum,
ent parts
lids.
THE FACE. 31
of the palpebral ligament and tarsal cartilage, with a mucous
lining of the conjunctiva. The upper lid has also in it the
tendon ofthe levator palpebræ. Vessels and nerves are furnished to these parts.
-
ticn. Dissection. Examine the structure of the lids on the side on Dissecwhich the muscles are dissected . Let the bit of tow or wool remain beneath the lids, and then throw inwards the palpebral part
of the orbicularis palpebrarum by means of an incision around the
margin of the orbit. In raising the muscle, take care of the palpebral ligament, and the vessels and nerves ofthe lids.
-
orbicu- Orbicularis palpebrarum. — The palpebral and ciliary Layer of
fibres of this muscle form the thin pale layer that occupies laris.
the eyelids. A thin stratum of cellular tissue, without fat,
connects the muscle with the skin.
layer. Thepalpebralligament is a layer of fibrous membrane, that Afibrous
is continued from the margin of the orbit to join the tarsal
cartilages. At the inner part of the orbit the ligament is
thin and loose, but at the outer part it is much thicker and
stronger.
cartilage
part of
The tarsal cartilages are two fibro- cartilaginous plates, one Fibrofor each eyelid, which give the form and strength to the lids. forms
They are fixed internally by the tendo palpebrarum, and the lid.
externally by fibrous bands ( external tarsal ligament) to the
outer part of the orbit. One margin is free and thicker than
the rest of the cartilage, whilst the opposite margin is thin,
and is connected with the palpebral ligament. On the inner
surface the cartilages are lined by the mucous membrane or
conjunctiva. The cartilages are not alike in the two lids. DifferIn the upper eyelid, in which the cartilage is the largest, it the two
is about half an inch wide in the centre, but gradually tapers
to the ends ; and to its upper convex border is attached the
tendon of the levator palpebræ. In the lower lid the cartilage is a narrow band, about two lines broad, with borders
nearly straight.
ence in
lids.
ofeyetaches
Tendon ofthe eyelids (tendo palpebrarum, tendo oculi ) is Tendon
a small band at the inner part of the orbit, which is attached lids atto the anterior margin of the lachrymal groove. It is about cartitwo lines long, and divides into two processes, which are
united with the tarsal cartilages. This tendon gives a
lages.
32 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Follicu- lar tubes
carti- lage,
fibrous expansion to the lachrymal sac, and the fleshy fibres
of the orbicularis palpebrarum arise from it.
The Meibomian glands or follicles are placed on the
beneath ocular surface of the tarsal cartilages, which are grooved
for them. They extend parallel to one another, from the
thick to the thin margin of the cartilage ; and their number is about forty in the upper, and twenty in the lower lid.
The apertures of the glands are at the posterior edge of the
free border of the lid. Each gland is a small yellowish tube,
closed at one end, and having minute lateral appendages connected with it. Each contains a sebaceous secretion, and is
lined by scaly epithelium.
their struc- ture.
Tendon of leva- If the palpebral ligament is cut through in the upper lid,
tor pal- the tendon of the levator palpebræ will be seen to be attached to the upper part of the tarsal cartilage by a wide
tendinous expansion.
pebræ.
Mucous lining of lid
forms
The conjunctiva, or mucous membrane, lines the interior
of the eyelids, and covers the anterior part of the ball
of the eye. At the free margin of the eyelids this membrane joins the common integument, and it is continued down
the lachrymal canals and lachrymal sac to the interior of the
nose. At the inner commissure of the eyelids the conjunctiva forms a prominent, red, fleshy-looking body (caruncula
lachrymalis), which encloses a group of mucous follicles.
and the On this eminence are a few minute hairs. External to the contigu- ous fold. caruncle is a small fold of the mucous membrane ( plica
semilunaris), which extends to the ball of the eye, and
resembles the membrana nictitans of birds.
caruncle
Arteries of lids.
Palpe- bral
-
Bloodvessels of the eyelids. The arteries of the eyelids
are furnished by the ophthalmic artery, and consist of the
palpebral and lachrymal branches.
The palpebral arteries, one for each eyelid, run outwards from the
inner canthus, lying between the orbicularis muscle and tarsal cartilage,
and anastomose with the lachrymal artery. From the arch that each
and lach- forms, branches are distributed to the eyelids. The lachrymal artery
perforates the palpebral ligament near the outer part of the orbit, and
its branches supply the lid, as well as anastomose with the palpebral
branches.
rymal.
Veins.
The veins of the lids open into the frontal and angular
veins at the root of the nose.
THE FACE. 33
of lids The NERVES OF THE EYELIDS are supplied from the Nerves
ophthalmic and facial nerves.
fifth The branches of the ophthalmic nerve (of the fifth) that enter the from
upper eyelid are the following : -lachrymal, near the outer part ; supraorbital, about the middle ; and supra - trochlear and infra -trochlear at the inner side. All these nerves give filaments to the structures of the lid.
In the lower eyelid, about its middle, is a branch of the superior maxillary nerve. The branches of the facial nerve enter both lids at the outer and part, and supply the orbicularis muscle ; they also communicate with the nerve.
branches of the fifth nerve.
seventh
external EXTERNAL EAR. The outer ear consists of a trumpet- Parts of
shaped structure, named pinna or auricle, to collect sounds, ear.
and of a tube (meatus auditorius) to convey those sounds to
the inner ear. The pinna may be examined on the left side
of the head, but the meatus will be described with the rest
of the anatomy of the ear.
and
pinna.
The pinna, or auricle of the ear, is an uneven piece of Texture
cartilage, which is covered with integument, and is fixed to form of
the margin of the meatus auditorius externus. It is of an
oval form, with the margin folded, and the larger end placed
upwards.
marked
and emiThe surface next the head is convex, but the opposite one Surfaces
is hollowed out, and presents the undermentioned elevations by fossæ
and depressions. In the centre of the ear is a deep hollow nences.
(concha), which conducts to the meatus auditorius. In front
of that hollow is a cartilaginous projection of a triangular
shape (tragus), which has some hairs on the under-surface ;
and on the opposite side of the hollow, rather below the level
of the tragus, is another projection, the antitragus. The
round, rim-like margin of the ear is called the helix, and the
depression internal to it, the groove, or fossa of the helix.
Within the helix, between it and the concha, is the large
eminence of the antihelix, which presents at the upper part
a well- marked depression, the fossa of the antihelix. Inferiorly, the external ear is terminated by a soft, pendulous
part, the lobule.
small The muscles of the pinna, which extend from one part of Five
the cartilage to another, are very delicate, and in some bodies muscles
are not to be found. Five small muscles are usually de- nal ear.
scribed, which receive their names for the most part from
D
of exter-
34 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Dissec- tion.
One muscle
the several eminences of the external ear, except the antihelix .
Dissection. In seeking the following small muscles, remove the
integument from over the spot on which each muscle is said to
be placed. A very sharp knife and a good light are necessary for
success in detecting the muscular fibres. Frequently the dissector
will not find one or more of the set described below.
The muscle of the tragus is always found on the external aspect
on tra- of the process from which it takes its name. The fibres are short,
nearly vertical, and extend from the lower to the upper part of
the tragus.
gus.
Onefrom
gus to anti- helix.
The muscle ofthe antitragus is the best marked of all. It arises
anti -tra- from the outer part of the antitragus, and the fibres are directed
upwards to be inserted into the pointed extremity of the antihelix.
The small muscle of the helix is often indistinct or absent. It is
root of placed on the part of the rim of the ear, that extends into the concha.
One on
helix.
Another higher The large muscle ofthe helix arises above the small muscle of the
on helix . same part, and is inserted into the front of the helix, where this is
about to curve backwards. It is usually present.
And one muscle
of con- cha.
The transverse muscle of the auricle is found at the back of the
at back ear, in the depression between the antihelix and the convexity of
the surface. It arises from the convexity of the cartilage that
forms the concha, and is inserted into the back of the antihelix.
The muscle is mixed with much fibrous tissue, but it is well seen
when this is removed.
Dissec- tion.
Carti lage
onlypart
nal ear.
Defi- cientin
Dissection. The pinna may now be removed by cutting it as
near as possible to the bone. When the integuments are entirely
taken off, the cartilage of the pinna will be apparent ; but in removing the integuments, the lobule of the ear, which consists of
skin and cellular structure, will disappear.
The cartilage of the pinna resembles much the form of
forms the external ear, and presents for notice nearly the same
of exter- parts. The rim of the helix terminates posteriorly about
the middle of the pinna in the antihelix ; anteriorly a small
piece projects from it, and a fissure is placed above that proferiorly jection. The antihelix is divided posteriorly into two
pieces ; one of these is pointed, and is joined by the helix,
the other is continued into the antitragus. Inferiorly, the
cartilage forms the external part of the auditory canal, and
is fixed to the margin of the external auditory aperture in
THE FACE. 35
upper
meatus.
the temporal bone, but it does not give rise to a complete tube, and at
for the upper and anterior part of the auditory canal is closed part of
by fibrous tissue. On the posterior aspect of the concha is
a strong vertical process of cartilage.
In the piece of cartilage that forms the under sures -part of the Its fismeatus are two fissures ( Santorini) ; one is at the base of
the tragus, the other passes from before backwards.
ments.
of facial
The ligaments of the pinna are two bands of fibrous tissue and liga.
that extend between the tragus and helix, and the antitragus
and antihelix ; the former completes the tube of the meatus.
The FACIAL NERVE ( portio dura) is a part of the seventh Outline
cranial nerve, and confers motor power on the muscles ofnerve.
the face. Numerous communications take place between it
and the fifth nerve, and the chief of these junctions are
found above and below the orbit, and on the side of the lower
jaw.
tion of nerve beyond
Dissection. On the right side of the face, the facial nerve is to Dissecbe displayed. To expose its ramifications beyond the parotid
gland, raise the skin from the face in the same manner as on the parotid,
left side. Seek then the different branches of the nerve as they
escape from beneath the anterior border of the gland, and follow
them forwards to their termination. The highest branches that go
to the temple have been already partly exposed above the zygoma ;
and their junction with the temporal branch of the superior
maxillary and with the supra- orbital nerve has been seen. Other
still smaller branches are to be traced to the outer part of the eye,
where they enter the eyelids and communicate with the other
nerves therein ; and by means of this set, whilst they cross the
malar bone, a junction is formed with the subcutaneous malar
nerve. With the duct of the parotid are two or more large
branches, that are to be followed below the orbit to their junction
with the infra- orbital, nasal, and infra- trochlear nerves.
The remaining branches to the lower part of the face are smaller in size :
one joins with the buccal nerve at the lower part of the buccinator
muscle ; and one or two others are to be traced forwards to the
lower lip and to the labial branch of the inferior dental nerve.
the
the paIn order to trace backwards the trunk of the nerve through the and of
gland, take the integuments from the surface of the parotid as on nerve in
the other side, and remove the gland piece by piece. In this step rotid.
seek the small branches of communication of the great auricular
nerve with offsets of the facial, and the branches that dip down D 2
36 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Branch- es outskull.
from the facial to the auriculo- temporal nerve. Lastly, cut off
with a chisel the tip of the mastoid process, and after turning it
backwards with the sterno- mastoid muscle adhering to it, seek the
small branches ofthe facial nerve to the back of the ear, and to the
digastric and stylo-hyoid muscles.
THE FACIAL NERVE OUTSIDE THE SKULL. -The facial
side the nerve issues from the stylo- mastoid foramen, after traversing
the aqueduct of Fallopius, and furnishes immediately the
three following small branches :
Poste- rior au- ricular branch.
Branch ofdi- gastric.
Branch of stylo- hyoid.
The up- per divi- sion
-
The posterior auricular branch turns upwards in front of the mastoid
process, where it communicates with the auricular branch of the
pneumogastric , and ends in auricular and mastoid divisions ( p. 7. ) .
The branch of the digastric muscle generally arises in common with
the next. It is distributed by many branches to the posterior belly of
the muscle near its origin. One of these branches passes through the
fleshy fibres, and descends to join the glosso- pharyngeal nerve.
The branch ofthe stylo- hyoideus is a long slender nerve, that is di- rected inwards to its muscle, which it enters about the middle. This
branch communicates with the sympathetic nerve on the external carotid
artery.
As soon as the facial nerve has given off those branches,
it is directed forwards through the gland, and divides near
the ramus of the jaw into two large trunks —temporo- facial
and cervico-facial.
A. The TEMPORO-FACIAL DIVISION furnishes offsets to the
side of the head and face, whose ramifications extend as low
as the meatus auditorius. As this trunk crosses over the
external carotid artery, it sends downwards branches to join
the auriculo-temporal division of the inferior maxillary.
nerve, and in front of the ear it gives some filaments to the
hasthree tragus of the pinna. Three sets of branches, temporal,
branch- malar, and infra- orbital, are derived from the temporofacial division.
sets of
es...
Tempo- ral branchThe temporal branches ascend obliquely over the zygoma to the orbicular muscle and anterior part of the occipito-frontalis, in which they are united with offsets of the supra-orbital nerve. The attrahens aurem
head. muscle is supplied by this set ; and a junction takes place above the
zygoma with the temporal branch of the superior maxillary nerve.
es pass to side of
Malar branch- The malar branches are directed to the outer angle of the orbit where
erant they are distributed to the orbicular muscle and the eyelids. In the eyelids.
THE ORBIT. 37
eyelids communications occur with the palpebral filaments of the fifth
nerve (p. 33.) ; and near the outer part of the orbit with the small
subcutaneous malar branch of the superior maxillary nerve.
bital
es are
tween
3
eye and
The infra-orbital branches are larger than the rest, and are furnished Infra-orto the muscles and integument between the eye and mouth. Close to branch- the orbit, and beneath the elevator of the upper lip, a remarkable com- lost be- munication is found between these nerves and the infra-orbital branches
of the superior maxillary. After crossing the branches of the fifth mouth.
nerve, some small offsets of the facial nerve pass inwards to the side of
the nose, and others upwards to the inner angle of the eye, to join the nasal and infra-trochlear branches of the ophthalmic nerve.
B. The CERVICO division - FACIAL DIVISION of the portio dura is Lower
smaller than the other trunk, and supplies branches to the
lower part of the face and to the upper part of the neck. Its
highest branches join the lowest offsets of the temporo-facial
division, and thus complete the network on the face. This
trunk, whilst in the parotid, gives twigs to the gland, and is also
united with the great auricular nerve. The branches of three
distribution are buccal, supra-maxillary, and infra-maxillary. branchgives
sets of
es .
branchcorner of mouth.
maxilThe buccal branches pass forwards to the angle of the mouth, where Buccal
they terminate in the orbicular muscle. On the buccinator they join es to
the branch of the inferior maxillary nerve to that muscle.
The supra- maxillary branches course inwards above the base of the Supralower jaw to the middle line of the chin, and supply the muscles and lary beintegument between the chin and mouth. Beneath the depressor an- mouth
guli oris the branches of the facial join offsets of the labial branch and chin.
ofthe inferior dental nerve, in the same manner as the union is made
below the orbit, viz. the branches of the facial cross those of the fifth
nerve in their course onward to the middle line.
tween
The maxil- infra-maxillary branches are placed below the jaw, and are dis- Infratributed to the upper part of the neck. The anatomy of these nerves lary
is given with the dissection of the anterior triangle of the neck.
branch- es
SECTION IV.
THE ORBIT.
of the In the examination of the orbit, the head is placed in the Position
same position as in the dissection of the sinuses of the base body.
of the skull.
Dissection. To open the orbit, raise the roof in the following Dissec- tion.
D 3
388
DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Perios- teum of
manner : —-- through the margin of the orbit make two cuts with
a saw, one being placed at the outer angle, the other at the inner
angle of the cavity. With a chisel extend backwards these cuts
along the roof of the orbit, nearly to the optic foramen. The piece
of bone included in the incisions may now be tilted forwards, but
is not to be cut away. Afterwards, with the bone forceps, remove
all the rest of the roof of the orbit, except the ring of bone that
surrounds the optic foramen, and take away any over-hanging
bone on the outer side that may interfere with the dissection . The
dissector should take care that all the wadding is removed from
the eyelids, and the eye pulled gently forwards. The periosteum
is now exposed.
The periosteum of the orbit is a prolongation of the dura
orbit. mater of the brain through the sphenoidal fissure. It incases the contents of the orbit like a sac, and adheres but
Aper- loosely to the bones. Apertures exist posteriorly in the
membrane for the entrance of the different nerves and vessels,
and on the sides prolongations of the membrane accompany
the vessels and nerves that leave the cavity.
tures in it.
Dissec- tion.
In the
-
Dissection. Divide the periosteum along the middle of the
orbit, and take it away. After the removal of a little fat, the fol- lowing nerves, vessels, and muscles come into view : the frontal
nerve and vessels lie in the centre, the lachrymal nerve and vessels
close to the outer wall of the cavity, and the small fourth nerve at
the back of the orbit. These nerves enter the orbit above the
muscles. The frontal and lachrymal should be followed forwards
to their exit from the orbit, and all of them backwards through
the sphenoidal fissure to the wall of the cavernous sinus. In
tracing back the nerves, it will be expedient to remove the projecting clinoid process, if this still remains ; and some care and trouble
will be necessary in order to follow the lachrymal nerve to its
commencement. The superior oblique muscle is recognised by
the fourth nerve entering it : the levator palpebræ and superior
rectus are beneath the frontal nerve ; and the external rectus is
partly seen below the lachrymal nerve. In the outer part of the
orbit, near its front, is the lachrymal gland. The muscles, vessels,
and nerves referred to above are to be cleaned and examined, but
it is not requisite to take all the fat from the orbit in this stage of
the dissection.
Contents ofthe orbit. -Besides the eyeball and lachrymal
orbit eyeballis, gland, there is a great quantity of granular fat in the orbit.
THE ORBIT. 39
-
seven
cranial
Connected with the eye are six muscles four straight and with
two oblique ; and there is also in the cavity an elevator of muscles,
the upper eyelid. The nerves in this small space are nu- several
merous, viz. the second, third, fourth, ophthalmic (of the nerves,
fifth), and sixth nerve, and their general distribution is as
follows : -the second nerve enters the eyeball, the third is
furnished to all the muscles but two, the fourth enters the
superior oblique (one of the two excepted), and the sixth is
spent in the external rectus muscle. The fifth nerve supplies some filaments to the eyeball, but the greater number
of its branches pass through the orbital cavity to the face.
The ophthalmic vessels are likewise contained in the orbit. sels.
The lachrymal gland secretes the tears, and is situate in Lachrythe hollow on the inner side of the external angular process gland is
of the frontal bone. It is of a lengthened form, something outer
like an almond ; and from its anterior part a thin piece pro- orbit.
jects towards the upper eyelid. The upper surface is convex, and in contact with the periosteum, to which it is
connected by fibrous bands (ligament of the gland) ; the
lower surface rests on the eye and the external rectus muscle.
and vesmal
at the
part of
open on
eyelid.
In structure, the lachrymal resembles the salivary glands ; Its ducts
and its ducts, from about six to twelve in number, open upper
by as many apertures in a semicircular line on the inner
surface of the upper eyelid, near the outer canthus.
nerve The FOURTH NERVE is the most internal in position of the Fourth
three nerves that enter the orbit above the muscles. After
reaching this space, it is directed inwards to the superior supplies
oblique muscle, which it enters at the external surface, con- oblique.
trary to the general distribution of the nerves on the ocular
surface of the muscles.
superior
thalmic The OPHTHALMIC NERVE (of the fifth) as it approaches Ophthe sphenoidal fissure, furnishes from its inner side the nerve gives nasal branch, and then terminates by dividing into the frontal three
and lachrymal branches ; the former enters the orbit be- es.
tween the heads of the external rectus, but the other two are
above the muscles.
branchbranch 1. The frontal nerve is close to the outer side of the fourth as it Frontal
enters the orbit, and is much larger than the lachrymal branch.
In its course to the forehead the nerve lies along the middle of supplies
D 4
40 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
the fol- the orbit, and bifurcates anteriorly into the supra- trochlear and
lowing. supra- orbital branches.
Branch a. The supra- trochlear branch, which is of small size, passes inwards above the pul- towards the pulley of the superior oblique muscle, where it leaves the ley of orbit to end in the eyelid and forehead (p. 6.) . Before the nerve turns oblique muscle; round the margin of the frontal bone, it sends downwards a branch of
communication to the infra-trochlear branch of the nasal nerve. Frequently there are two supra-trochlear branches ; in such instances one branch arises near the back of the orbit.
some- times two
and b. The supra-orbital branch is the continuation of the frontal nerve
branch in direction and size, and passes from the orbit by the supra-orbital through orbital notch. It then turns upward on the forehead, and supplies the external
part of the head (p. 6. ). Whilst in the notch the nerve gives downwards palpebral filaments to the upper lid.
notch.
mal nerve
Lachry- 2. The lachrymal nerve, after entering the orbit in a separate
tube of dura mater, is directed forwards in the outer part of the
ends in cavity, and beneath the lachrymal gland, to the upper eyelid,
eyelid ; where it pierces the palpebral ligament, and is distributed to the
structures of the lid.
its off- sets join su- perior maxil- lary.
Dissec- tion .
Elevator ofupper
is atThe nerve furnishes branches to the lachrymal gland, and near the
gland it sends downwards one or two small filaments to communicate
with the orbital branch of the superior maxillary nerve. Occasionally
this nerve takes origin from the fourth as well as the ophthalmic
nerve.
3. The nasal nerve is not visible at this stage of the dissection :
it will be noticed afterwards at p. 42.
Dissection. - Divide the frontal nerve about its middle, and
throw the ends forwards and backwards. In raising the posterior
part of the nerve, the distinct origin of the nasal branch from the
ophthalmic trunk will be seen. The lachrymal nerve may remain uncut.
The LEVATOR PALPEBRÆ SUPERIORIS is the most superficial
eyelid muscle, and is attached posteriorly to the roof of the orbit
in front of the optic foramen. The muscle widens as it extends forwards, and in front of the eyeball it turns downwards, and is inserted by a wide tendon into the upper part
tached of the tarsal cartilage. By one surface the muscle is in con- carti- tact with the frontal nerve and the periosteum, and by the
is high- other with the superior rectus muscle. If it is cut across
cle in about the centre, a small branch of nerve (from the third)
will be seen entering the under- surface.
to tarsal
lage;
est musorbit.
THE ORBIT. 41
rectus The RECTUS SUPERIOR is the upper of the four muscles that Upper
lie around the globe ofthe eye. It arises from the upper part muscle.
of the optic foramen, and is connected with the other recti Origin.
muscles around the optic nerve. Near the front of the eye
tion .
the fleshy fibres end in a tendon, which is inserted into the Insersclerotic coat rather behind the point of union between it and
the cornea. The lower surface of the muscle is in contact Position
with the globe of the eye, and the vessels and nerves to be to other
afterwards seen : the other surface is covered by the preceding muscle.
parts.
Upper
muscle
The SUPERIOR OBLIQUE MUSCLE is thin and narrow, and
passes through a pulley at the inner angle of the orbit. The oblique
muscle arises from the inner part of the optic foramen, and
ends anteriorly in a tendon, which, after passing through the enters a
pulley.
pulley, is reflected between the superior rectus and the globe
of the eye, and is inserted into the sclerotic coat rather behind Inserthe middle of the eyeball. The fourth nerve is supplied
to the orbital surface of the muscle, and the nasal nerve lies
below it. The insertion of the muscle is between the supe- Connecrior and the external rectus, and close to the tendon of the
inferior oblique.
tion .
tions.
The of the pulley, or trochlea, is a fibro- cartilaginous ring, which Pulley
is attached to the depression of the frontal bone at the inner muscle.
angle of the orbit. A synovial membrane lines the ring,
and facilitates the movement of the tendon through it.
From the margins of the pulley there is a fibrous prolongation on the tendon. To see the synovial membrane the
prolongation must be taken away.
tion. Dissection. Cut across the superior rectus muscle about the Dissecmiddle, and turn it backwards, seeking at the same time a branch of
the third nerve to its under- surface. The nasal nerve and the ophthalmic artery and vein will be found crossing inwards above the
optic nerve these should be traced to the inner angle and to the
posterior part of the orbit. By taking away some ofthe fat between of lentithe optic nerve and the external rectus at the back ofthe orbit, the cular
small lenticular ganglion and its branches will be discovered : the lion.
student will find the ciliary branches that lie along the side of the
optic nerve the best guide to the ganglion. The dissector should
then find the branches to the ganglion from the nasal and third
nerves. And, lastly, he should separate from one another the nasal,
gang-
42 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Third nerve
as it enters orbit.
Its upper
third, and sixth nerves, as they enter the orbit between the
heads ofthe external rectus muscle.
The THIRD NERVE is highest in position in the wall of the
cavernous sinus, but at the sphenoidal fissure it descends
below the fourth, and the two branches (frontal and lachrymal) of the ophthalmic nerve. The nerve enters the orbit
between the heads of the outer rectus, having previously
divided into two parts.
a. The upper division, the smallest in size, ends in the under surfaces branch. ofthe levator palpebræ and the superior rectus muscle.
Lower b. The lower division supplies some of the other muscles, and will be
dissected afterwards.
branch.
Nasal nerve.
The nasal branch of the ophthalmic nerve enters the
orbit between the heads of the rectus, and lies between the
divisions of the third nerve. In the orbit the nerve is
directed obliquely inwards, to reach the anterior of the two
General foramina in the inner wall. Passing through this aperture,
the face. the nerve appears in the cranium, at the outer margin of the
cribriform plate of the ethmoid bone. Finally, it enters the
nasal cavity by an aperture in the front of the cribriform
plate, and ends on the outer side of the nose, after passing
between the nasal bone and cartilage.
course to
Position in orbit.
In the orbit, the nasal lies, at first, over the optic nerve,
and beneath the superior rectus and levator palpebræ muscles,
and afterwards below the superior oblique ; in this part of its
Branch- course it furnishes the following branches :
es.
root of This is
Long a. The branch to the lenticular ganglion is about half an inch long and
lenticu- very slender, and arises as soon as the nerve enters the orbit.
lar gang- the long root of the lenticular ganglion. lion.
Long ciliary branch es.
Infralear
These lie on the
b. Long ciliary branches. -As the nasal crosses the optic nerve, it
supplies two or more ciliary branches to the eyeball.
inner side of the optic, and join the short ciliary
lenticular ganglion.
branches of the
c. The infra-trochlear branch arises as the nasal nerve leaves the troch- orbit, and is directed forwards below the pulley of the superior oblique
branch. muscle to the inner part of the orbit, where it ends in the upper eyelid,
conjunctiva, and side of the nose. Before this branch leaves the orbit
it receives an offset of communication from the supra-trochlear nerve .
THE ORBIT.
43
-
of nasal
largangTermination of the nasal nerve. After the nerve be- Ending
comes cutaneous on the side of the nose, it descends beneath nerve.
the compressor naris muscle, and ends in the integuments of
the ala and tip of the nose.
The OPHTHALMIC or LENTICULAR GANGLION is a small Lenticuroundish body, of the size of a pin's head, and of a reddish lion.
colour. It is placed at the back of the orbit, between the Situaoptic nerve and the external rectus, and commonly on the
outer side ofthe ophthalmic artery. By its posterior part the Connecganglion has branches of communication with other nerves
(its roots), and from the anterior part proceed the ciliary
nerves to the eyeball. In the ganglion are combined sen- Strucsory, motory, and sympathetic filaments.
tion.
tion .
ture.
roots :
The branches ofcommunication are three in number. One, the long Three
root, is the branch of the nasal nerve before noticed, which joins the long,
superior angle. A second branch of considerable thickness ( short root) short,
passes from the inferior angle to join the branch of the third nerve to
the inferior oblique muscle. And the third root is derived from the and sym- pathetic .
sympathetic (its cavernous plexus), either as a distinct branch to the
posterior border of the ganglion, or in union with the long root.
Branches ofdistribution . —The short ciliary nerves are ten or twelve Ciliary
in number, and are collected into two bundles, which leave the upper es to eyeball.
and lower part (superior and inferior angle) of the ganglion. In the
upper bundle are four or five, and in the lower, six or seven nerves.
As they extend along the optic nerve to the eyeball they occupy its
outer and under part, and communicate with the long ciliary branches of the nasal nerve.
branchthalmic The OPHTHALMIC ARTERY is a branch of the internal caro- Ophtid, and enters the orbit through the optic foramen. At artery
first the vessel is outside the nerve, but it then courses
inwards, over the nerve, to the inner angle of the orbit, in orbit .
where it ends in terminal branches.
The branches of the artery are numerous, though incon- esBranch- .
siderable in size, and they are sometimes arranged in three
sets ; one outside the optic nerve, another above it, and a
third set internal to the same.
mal a. The lachrymal branch accompanies the nerve of the same naine to Lachrythe upper eyelid, where it ends by supplying that part, and anas- branch
tomosing with the palpebral arches. It supplies branches, like the supplies
nerve, to the lachrymal gland and to the conjunctiva ; it anastomoses also gland.
44 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Branch
with the middle meningeal and deep temporal arteries, by offsets
through the sphenoidal fissure and outer wall of the orbit.
b. The central artery of the retina is a very small branch that enters
the optic nerve, and so reaches its destination in the eyeball.
ofthe retina.
Supra- orbital c. The supra-orbital branch arises beneath the levator palpebræ and
branch. superior rectus muscles ; it then takes the course of the nerve of the
same name through the notch in the margin of the orbit, and ends in
branches on the forehead ( p. 5.). As it turns round the margin of the
orbit it supplies the eyelid and the orbicularis muscle.
Ciliary arteries are pos- terior ;
d. The ciliary branches are uncertain in their origin, and enter the
eyeball either at the front or back. The posterior ciliary are furnished
from the ophthalmic, or some of its branches. About twelve in number,
they are continued to the eyeball around the optic nerve, and perforate
the sclerotic coat at its posterior part. In the eye these arteries extend
forwards between the sclerotic and choroid coats to the iris. Two of
this set (one on each side of the optic nerve) are named long ciliary ;
ciliary ; they pierce the sclerotic coat further out than the rest, and are then and placed along the middle of the eyeball. The anterior ciliary arteries
ciliary. arise from the muscular branches, and pierce the sclerotic coat near the cornea. In the eyeball they anastomose with the posterior ciliary.
two named long
anterior
Muscu- lar.
moidal
es.
Postee. The muscular branches are furnished from the artery in its course,
and those to the lower muscles often arise together.
Eth- f. The ethmoidal branches are two, anterior and posterior, which pass
branch- through the two foramina in the inner wall of the orbit. The posterior
is the smaller of the two, and furnishes small meningeal arteries to the
rior and dura mater of the base of the skull. The anterior accompanies the anterior. nasal nerve, and gives small meningeal offsets to the dura mater.
Both send branches to the nose through the apertures in the cribriform
plate.
es to Branch- g. The palpebral branches, one for each eyelid, generally arise togeeyelids. ther opposite the pulley of the superior oblique muscle, and then
The arches they form have been dissected
Oph- thalmic vein
separate from one another.
with the eyelids ( p. 32.).
h. The nasal branch is one of the last branches of the ophthalmic,
and is distributed to the side of the nose, on which it anastomoses with
the nasal and angular branches of the facial artery.
i. The frontal branch turns round the margin of the orbit, and is
distributed on the forehead (p. 5.). ·
The ophthalmic vein corresponds in its course and
branches to the artery of the same name. It begins at the
inner angle of the orbit, where it joins the facial vein, and
receives tributary branches in its progress to the back of that
cavity. Posteriorly, it leaves the artery, and escapes from
THE ORBIT. 45
the orbit by the sphenoidal fissure, between the heads of the ends in
external rectus. It ends in the cavernous sinus.
cavern- ous si- nus.
The OPTIC NERVE is now seen to extend from the optic Optic
foramen to the back of the eyeball. As the nerve enters nerve
the foramen, it is surrounded by the recti muscles ; and beyond that spot, as far as the eyeball, the ciliary arteries and
nerves entwine around it. It terminates in the retina.
ends in retina.
tion.
Dissection. Take away the ophthalmic artery, and divide the Dissecoptic nerve about its middle, together with the small ciliary vessels and nerves. Turn forwards the eyeball, and fasten it in
that position with hooks. On removing some fat , the three recti
muscles (inner, outer, and inferior) , and the lower division of the third nerve will appear.
branch
nerve is
lar,
The lower division of the third nerve, in entering the Lower
orbit, lies below the nasal, and rather above the sixth nerve. of third
Almost immediately afterwards the nerve divides into three muscularge branches. One of these enters the internal rectus, another the inferior rectus ; and the third, the longest and most
external branch, is continued forwards to the inferior oblique muscle. Soon after its origin, the last nerve communicates with the lenticular ganglion (short root), and fur- ticular
nishes two or more filaments to the inferior rectus.
and joins len
gang- lion.
nerve
external
The SIXTH NERVE enters the orbit between the heads of Sixth
the external rectus, and above the ophthalmic vein. In the enters
orbit it turns outwards to the ocular surface of the external rectus.
rectus muscle, to which it is distributed.
-
muscles
ball.
RECTI MUSCLES. The internal, inferior, and external Straight
rectus muscles are placed, as their names express, with refer- of eyeence to the eyeball. They arise posteriorly by a common Origin.
attachment around the optic nerve ; and the external rectus
has, moreover, an additional fasciculus of origin, which is
united with the superior rectus. The muscles are directed Inserforwards, and have a tendinous insertion into the ball of the
eye, near the cornea. From the margins of the tendons an
aponeurotic expansion is derived, which forms a partial peculiacovering for the globe of the eye (tunica albuginea). Be- the tenneath each tendon, near its insertion, is situate a small bursa.
Between the heads of origin of the external rectus, the diftion and
rity of
dons.
46 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Dissec- tion.
Lower oblique
ferent nerves before mentioned enter the orbit, viz. the third,
the nasal branch of the fifth, and the sixth.
-
Dissection. By opening the optic foramen, the attachment of
the recti muscles will be more fully seen. To dissect out the
inferior oblique muscle, replace the eyeball in its natural position,
take away the conjunctiva of the lower eyelid near the inner part,
and remove the fat that conceals the muscle.
The INFERIOR OBLIQUE MUSCLE is situate near the antemuscle. rior margin of the orbit, and differs from the other muscles
in the fact of its being directed across, instead of in the axis
Origin . of the orbit. It arises from the superior maxillary bone,
just within the margin of the orbit, and near the groove for
Course. the lachrymal sac. From this spot the muscle passes outwards beneath the inferior rectus, and then between the Inser- eyeball and external rectus, to be inserted into the sclerotic
coat, between the last muscle and the superior rectus. The
borders of the muscle look forwards and backwards, and
tion.
Connec- tions . the posterior receives the branch of the third nerve.
Dissec- tion.
Tensor tarsi
The
tendon of insertion is close to that of the superior oblique
muscle, but nearer the optic nerve.
Dissection. To expose the small tensor tarsi muscle, separate
the eyelids from the margin of the orbit, where this has not been
done, and leave them attached at the inner angle by means of the
tendo palpebrarum. By looking to the posterior aspect of the
tendon, after the fibres of the orbicularis have been removed from
it, the pale fibres of the tensor tarsi will be seen.
The TENSOR TARSI MUSCLE arises from the ridge on the
muscle. os unguis, and slightly from the bone behind the ridge. Its
fibres are pale, and form a very small flat band, behind the
tendo palpebrarum, which divides like that tendon into a slip
for each eyelid. Each slip is attached to the inner part of
the tarsal cartilage.
Inser- tion.
Dissec- tion.
Dissection. —A small nerve, the orbital branch of the superior
maxillary nerve, lies in the outer angle of the floor of the orbit,
and will come into view by the removal of the eyeball and its
muscles. This nerve is very soft and is easily broken. Two
branches, temporal and malar, are to be traced forwards from it,
and a filament of the lachrymal nerve is to be followed to its junction with the former. The outer wall of the orbit may be cut
THE ORBIT. 47
away, bit by bit, to follow the temporal branch through to the
surface ofthe head.
branch
rior
The orbital branch of the superior maxillary nerve arises Orbital
in the spheno-maxillary fossa, and enters the orbit by the of supefissure of the same name. At the back of the orbit the maxil- lary
nerve divides into malar and temporal branches, which nerve ;
ramify in the face and the side of the head.
a. The malar branch (r. subcutaneus malæ) is directed forwards along its malar
the floor of the orbit, and through a foramen in the malar bone to the
face. After emerging from its foramen, this branch supplies the orbicularis, and communicates with the facial nerve.
b. The temporal branch ascends on the outer wall of the orbit, either and tembeneath the periosteum, or in a groove in the bone, and being joined by branch- poral
a filament from the lachrymal nerve, passes into the temporal fossa es.
through a foramen in the malar bone. The nerve then turns upwards
between the temporal muscle and the bone, and perforates the temporal
fascia near the orbit. Its distribution was seen in the examination of
the cutaneous nerves of the head (p. 6. ).
-
tus of LACHRYMAL APPARATUS. The lachrymal gland and Apparaducts, with the puncta, canals, and sac, constitute the appa- the
ratus by which the tears are formed and conveyed to the
nose.
tears.
tion.
The gland has been already described (see p. 39.).
Dissection. -Some bristles should be introduced into the lachry- Dissecmal canals through the puncta of the eyelids that remain attached.
The lachrymal sac will appear by removing the tensor tarsi and
the cellular membrane from its surface, as it lies on the os unguis.
The prolongation from the tendo palpebrarum over the sac should
likewise be prepared.
tures in The puncta lachrymalia are two small apertures, one for Apereach lid, by which the tears enter the lachrymal canals. eyelids.
Each is placed about two lines from the inner canthus, and
in an elevation (papilla lachrymalis) in the free margin of
the lid.
for the The lachrymal canals are two small tubes that reach Canals
from the puncta, and convey the tears to the lachrymal sac ; tears .
their situation is marked by the bristles that are inserted in
them. In their course inwards, the canals lie along the
tendo palpebrarum, one above and the other below it, and
they are somewhat arched with the concavity towards the
tendon. Internally, they open near together into the
48 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
ence in Differ- lachrymal sac, rather above its middle. The canal in the
the two upper eyelid is longer and more arched than that in the
lower lid.
lids.
Recep- tacle of The lachrymal sac and duct extend from the inner part of
thetears. the orbit to the nose, and convey the tears into the latter
cavity. They form one tube, of which the upper dilated part
is the sac, and the lower constricted end the duct.
Situa- tion of the sac,
or di- lated part.
Canal leading to the nose.
Ana- tomy of
afterThe sac is situate in the hollow of the os unguis and
nasal process of the superior maxillary bone. Externally, it
is crossed by the tendo palpebrarum, and is covered by an
expansion derived from that tendon, which is fixed to the
margins of the bony groove. If the aponeurotic covering is
removed, the mucous membrane will be seen lining the interior. Into the outer side of the sac the lachrymal canals
open.
The duct (ductus ad nasum) is the narrow part of the
tube that reaches to the inferior meatus of the nose, into the
anterior part of which it opens. It is entirely encased by
bone, and its length, size, and direction are the same as in
the dried skull. A bent probe will pass readily into the
duct from the meatus.
The examination of the eyeball must be made on the
eyeball fresh eye of either the ox or sheep, and this may be omitted
wards. with advantage to the student till after the dissection of the
head and neck is completed.
SECTION V.
THE NECK.
Position Position. -IN this dissection let the head be supported
part. at a moderate height. Turn, then, the face to the left ofthe
Bounda- ries of
side, and fasten it in that position with hooks ; next let
the right arm be placed under the body, so that the point of
the shoulder may be depressed. By these means the parts
will be put on the stretch, and a good view obtained of the
right side of the neck.
Surface marking.The side of the neck presents a somethe of neck side what square outline, and is limited by the following parts :—
.
POSTERIOR TRIANGLE OF THE NECK. 49
into two
bysterno
inferiorly is the prominence of the clavicle, and superiorly is
the base of the lower jaw and the skull. In front, the limit
is marked by a line from the chin to the sternum, and behind
by another line from the occiput to the acromial end of the
clavicle. The part thus marked out is divided into two tri- Division
angular spaces by the diagonal position of the sterno-mastoid triangles
muscle. From the direction of that muscle the base of the mastoid.
anterior space is at the jaw, and the apex at the sternum,
whilst the base of the posterior one is at the clavicle, and the
apex at the head. The surface in front of the sterno-mastoid
is depressed at the upper part of the neck, over the position
of the carotid vessels ; and behind the muscle is another
slight hollow, near the clavicle, which points to the situation
of the subclavian artery.
nencesin
dle line
of neck,
Along the middle line of the neck the following parts will Promibe recognised through the skin : -about two inches and a the midhalf from the base of the jaw is the eminence of the oS
hyoides, with its cornu extending laterally. Below this will
be felt the wide prominence of the thyroid cartilage (pomum
Adami), which is most marked in man ; and between the
cartilage and the hyoid bone is a slight interval, corresponding
to the thyro-hyoid membrane. Inferior to the thyroid is the
narrow prominent ring of the cricoid cartilage, and between
the two the finger will distinguish another hollow, which is
opposite the crico-thyroid membrane. From this spot to the and su
sternum there is a depression between the sterno- mastoid nal demuscles, in which the tube of the trachea can be felt ; the
depth ofthis depression is much increased in emaciated individuals. In some bodies, especially in women, the swelling
of the thyroid gland can be perceived by the side of the
upper part of the trachea.
-
pra- sterpression.
tion of
terior
Dissection. It will be more advantageous for the student to Dissecexamine one triangular space at a time, than to lay bare at once theposthe whole side of the neck. To expose the posterior triangle, and triangle.
the structures that cross this part of the neck, divide the skin
along the sterno-mastoid from one end to the other, and make a
second incision along the clavicle to the acromion. Reflect the
flap of skin towards the posterior part, or the trapezius muscle.
The superficial fascia, which will be then brought into view, conE
50 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Platys- ma mus- cle
shoul- der ;
tains the platysma. To see that muscle, it will be necessary to
take the subcutaneous layer from its surface.
The PLATYSMA MYOIDES is a thin muscular layer, which is
now seen only in its lower half. The muscle is placed across
the side of the neck, and extends from the top of the shoulder
arises at to the base of the lower jaw. The fibres take origin from
the superficial fascia over the upper part of the pectoral and
deltoid muscles, and then ascend over the clavicle and the
triangular spaces of the neck, to be inserted into the jaw.
The lower part of the muscle is more closely united to the
skin than the upper, and covers the posterior triangle in
part, also the external jugular vein. At first the fibres of
the muscle are thin and scattered, but they increase in
strength as they ascend.
inserted into jaw;
Covers triangle.
Dissec- tion.
Exter- naljuguDissection. Raise with care the platysma as far as the border
of the sterno-mastoid muscle, without destroying the deep fascia
of the neck, the external jugular vein, or the superficial descending branches of the cervical plexus, which are close beneath the platysma. The dissector should note the direction of
the fibres of the platysma, because in venesection of the external
jugular vein the incision is so made as to cut them across.
The external jugular vein, commencing in the parotid
lar vein gland (p. 28. ), is directed backwards between the platysma
and deep fascia to the lower part of the neck, where it
crosses pierces the fascia to open into the subclavian vein. In its
neck to course down the neck it is joined by small superficial
branches, and sometimes an offset connects it with the anterior jugular vein. Its size, and the height at which it crosses
the sterno-mastoid muscle, may be very uncertain.
side of
subcla- vian.
Cervical fascia.
The deep cervical fascia consists, like the aponeuroses of
other parts, of a superficial layer that surrounds continuously
the part invested, and of processes that are prolonged inwards
between the muscles. In some bodies this fascia is thin and
indistinct. In its extent round the neck the membrane
incases the sterno- mastoideus, and presents a different disposiPart be- tion before and behind that muscle. Passing backwards
sterno from the muscle, the fascia is continued over the posterior
muscle triangular space, and then to the border of the trapezius,
which it encloses in its progress to the spines of the vertebræ.
hind
mastoid
POSTERIOR TRIANGLE OF THE NECK. 51
a process
At the lower part of the neck the fascia is attached to the
clavicle, and is perforated by the external jugular vein and
the cutaneous nerves. If the superficial layer is removed sends
near the clavicle, a deep process may be observed to en- beneath
velop the small omo-hyoid muscle, and to extend beneath
the clavicle to the costo- coracoid sheath of the axillary
vessels.
clavicle .
tion . Dissection. -By the removal of the cervical fascia and the fat Dissecfrom the space between the sterno- mastoid and trapezius muscles,
the posterior triangle ofthe neck will come into view. Above the
omo-hyoid muscle, whose position is about an inch from the clavicle, will be found the ramifications of the branches of the cervical
plexus and the spinal accessory nerve. The latter is recognised of nerves
by its piercing the sterno-mastoid muscle. The greater number of
the branches of the cervical plexus descend to the shoulder, but the
small occipital and great auricular nerves ascend to the head,
whilst the superficial cervical branch turns forwards over the
sterno-mastoid muscle. Belowthe omo-hyoideus are the subclavian
artery and brachial plexus, which have a deep position. Seek the and vessupra- scapular vessels behind the clavicle ; the transverse cervical
vessels beneath the omo-hyoid muscle ; and, lastly, the branch of in trinerve to the subclavian muscle, which lies about the middle of space.
the space between the clavicle and that muscle.
sels
angular
rior trispace of
The POSTERIOR TRIANGULAR SPACE OF THE NECK is Postebounded in front by the sterno-mastoid muscle, and behind angular
by the trapezius. Its base corresponds to the middle third the neck
of the clavicle, and its apex is at the skull. Covering the
space, are found the structures already examined, viz. the
skin and superficial fascia, the platysma in the lower third, and
-the deep fascia. The small omo-hyoid muscle crosses the
lower part of the space, so as to subdivide it into a lower or intotwo
clavicular, and an upper or occipital part.
is di- vided
hyoid- eus.
near cla- The clavicular part is of small size, and is close to the Part
clavicle ; in it is the subclavian artery. This small space vicle.
measures commonly about one inch and a-half from before
backwards, but somewhat less from above downwards. It is
bounded in front by the sterno- mastoid, above by the omohyoid muscle, and below by the clavicle.
Crossing the area of the space, rather above the level of Vessels
the clavicle, is the trunk of the subclavian artery (its third nerves and
E 2
52 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
part,
in this part), which issues from beneath the anterior scalenus muscle,
and is directed over the first rib to the axilla. Above the
artery are the large cords of the brachial plexus, which
accompany the vessel, and become closely applied to it beneath the clavicle. Beneath the artery and the nerves is the
posterior scalenus muscle. Along the clavicular side of the
space, and somewhat beneath the clavicle, are the suprascapular vessels ; and crossing the upper part, at the meeting
of the omo-hyoid and sterno-mastoid muscles, are the transand their verse cervical vessels. Entering the space from above is the
position . external jugular vein, which descends over the omo-hyoideus
near its anterior part, and opens into the subclavian vein ; in
this spot the vein receives the supra- scapular and transverse
cervical branches, and sometimes a small vein, over the
clavicle, from the cephalic vein of the arm.
relative
Varia- tions in
of the
also in the de th ,
The size of the clavicular part of the posterior triangular
the size space is influenced by the extent of attachment of the traspace ; pezius and sterno-mastoid muscles along the clavicle, since
in some bodies these muscles occupy nearly the whole length
of the bone. Again ; the space may be increased or diminished by the position of the omo-hyoideus in the neck ;
for this muscle may lie close to the clavicle, being attached
thereto, or it may be distant one inch and a half from that
bone. In depth the space varies naturally, and in a short
thick neck, with a prominent clavicle, the artery is farther
from the surface than in the opposite condition of the parts.
both na- But the depth is altered much more by the position of the
and arti- arm to the body, according as the limb is raised or depressed ; for the arm and shoulder may be carried upwards
until the clavicle rises above the level of the omo-hyoid
muscle, and entirely conceals the artery in its usual position.
Depar- Peculiarities in the vessels. -The situation of the trunk of the subclafrom the vian artery, just above the prominence of the clavicle, may vary so
ordinary much as to be placed one inch and a half higher in the neck, or at any
the ves- point intermediate between the two extremes. Further, its position to
tural
ficial.
ture
state of
sels.
the anterior scalenus may be altered, for instead of the subclavian being
beneath, it may be in front of, or even between the fibres of that
muscle. Commonly there is not any branch on the artery in this
part of its course ; but the posterior scapular branch may take origin
from it at different distances from the scalenus, or there may be more
POSTERIOR TRIANGLE OF THE NECK. 53
than one branch. In the ordinary disposition of the vessels the subclavian vein is not seen, owing to its situation being lower down, beneath the clavicle, but it may rise upwards so as to touch the artery, or
even lie with the artery beneath the anterior scalenus in rare instances.
The position of the external jugular vein with regard to the subclavian
artery is very uncertain, and the branches connected with its lower
part may form a kind of plexus over the arterial trunk.
trianguspace
head
cervical
and
The occipital part of the posterior triangular space is of Part of
larger extent than the other. Its boundaries in front and lar
behind are the same as in the clavicular part, and it is near the
separated from that space by the omo-hyoid muscle. In it
are contained chiefly the ramifications of the cervical plexus, contains
and a chain of lymphatic glands lies along the sterno-mastoid plexus
muscle. Beneath the spinal nerves is the posterior scalenus, lymphand still farther behind are some of the muscles of the back. glands ;
The spinal accessory nerve is directed obliquely across this also spiinterval from the sterno-mastoid muscle, which it pierces, cessory
to the under- surface of the trapezius ; and a communication
takes place between this cranial nerve and the spinal nerves
in the triangular space.
-
atic
nal acnerve.
Nerves of the
plexus
SUPERFICIAL BRANCHES OF THE CERVICAL PLEXUS.
Behind the sterno-mastoid muscle appear some of the rami- cervical
fications of the cervical nerves in the plexus of the same
name, and from them superficial branches are furnished both
upwards and downwards.
cend are A. The ASCENDING SET are three in number, viz. small that asoccipital, great auricular, and superficial cervical.
occipital,
1. The small occipital branch comes from the second cervical small
nerve, and is directed upwards to the head along the posterior
border of the sterno-mastoid muscle. At first the nerve is beneath
the fascia, but near the occiput it becomes cutaneous, and is distributed between the ear and the great occipital nerve (see p. 8.) .
Occasionally there is a second nerve to the head.
ricular.
2. Thegreat auricular nerve is a branch of that part of the plexus great auwhich is formed by the second and third nerves. Perforating the
deep fascia at the posterior border of the sterno- mastoid muscle,
the nerve is then directed upwards beneath the platysma to the lobule of the ear, where it ends in the following branches : -
a. Thefacial branches are sent forwards to the integument over the E 3
Supplies facial,
54 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
auricu- lar,.
and mastoid
parotid, and a few slender filaments pass through the gland to join the facial nerve.
b. The auricular branches ascend to the external ear, and are chiefly
distributed on its cranial aspect ; one or more reach the opposite surface
by piercing the pinna. On the ear they communicate with the branches furnished from the facial and pneumogastric nerves.
c. The mastoid branch is directed backwards to the integument bebranch tween the ear and mastoid process ; it joins the posterior auricular branch of the facial nerve.
es.
Super- ficial
nerve.
3. The superficial cervical nerve springs from the same source as
cervical the preceding, and turns forwards round the sterno-mastoid muscle
about its middle. Afterwards it pierces the fascia, and ramifies
over the anterior triangular space, beneath the platysma myoides
(see p. 55.) . There may be more than one branch to represent this nerve.
Nerves that de- scend are
sternal,
supra-.
clavicu.
lar,
and acro- mial.
Lymph- atic
of neck.
B. The DESCENDING SET of branches (supra-clavicular)
are derived from the third and fourth nerves of the plexus,
and are directed towards the clavicle over the lower part of
the posterior triangular space. Their number is somewhat
uncertain, but usually there are about three.
The most internal branch (sternal) crosses the clavicle near its
inner end ; the middle branch lies about the middle ofthe clavicle ;
and the posterior ( acromial) turns over the attachment of the trapezius to the acromion. All are distributed to the integuments of the chest
and shoulder.
The lymphatic glands (glandulæ concatenatæ) that lie
glands along the sterno- mastoid muscle, are continuous at the lower
part of the neck with the glands in the cavity of the thorax.
There is also a superficial chain along the external jugular
vein.
Dissec- tion.
Dissec- tion
made
- Dissection. Repeat the dissection of the posterior triangle on
the left side of the neck. Afterwards replace the reflected parts,
and carefully fasten them in their natural position with a few
stitches, after some preservative fluid has been applied by means of
strips of calico.
The posterior part of the neck may be most advantageof back ously examined at this stage with the dissection of the back.
After the completion of the muscles, vessels, and nerves of
the back, the student will dissect the spinal cord, and then
return to the examination of the front of the neck.
now.
ANTERIOR TRIANGLE OF THE NECK. 55
ofbody
amine
side of
Position.-When the body is turned again for the dissec- Position
tion of the remainder of the right side of the neck, the posi- to extion should be the same as that for the dissection of the pos- right
terior triangular space. If the thorax is finished, the head neck.
and neck may be taken from the trunk by dividing the
spinal column between the second and third dorsal vertebræ.
By this step the dissector obtains the clavicles and the first Direcribs, and preserves the natural position of the parts at the be obroot of the neck : he should moreover be careful to take the bythe arch of the aorta. After the part is detached, place a small
narrow block beneath the neck, and make it tense with hooks,
in the position mentioned above.
-
tions to
served
student.
tion. Dissection. — Raise the piece of integument in front of the Dissecsterno-mastoideus towards the middle line. The incision along the
base of the jaw readily allows of this proceeding. Beneath the
skin is the superficial fascia, containing the ramifications of the
superficial cervical nerve. Dissect out the nerve by following
forwards the trunk, and then take away the fat to expose the
anterior part of the platysma muscle.
ma musfront of
mastoid.
Inser- tion into
PLATYSMA MYOIDES.-The anterior part of the platysma Platysextends from the sterno-mastoid muscle to the lower jaw, cle in
covering part of the anterior triangular space in the same sternomanner as it concealed the posterior. The fibres have the
same appearance in the upper as in the lower half of the
muscle, but they are rather stronger. At the base of
the jaw they end in the following manner : the most internal fibres are blended with the muscle of the opposite
side ; the most external are inserted into the oblique line on
the side of the jaw ; and the intervening fibres mingle with.
the depressor anguli and depressor labii inferioris muscles.
This part of the muscle is superficial, and covers the upper Covers
part of the anterior triangular space.
jaw.
anterior triangle.
cial cernerve.
The superficial cervical nerve has been traced from its superfiorigin in the cervical plexus to its position superficial to the vical
fascia of the neck (p. 54.). Beneath the platysma the nerve
divides into an ascending and a descending branch. The
nerve may arise from the plexus by two pieces.
es to The ascending branch perforates the platysma, and is distributed to Branchthe integuments over the anterior triangle, about half way down the inteE 4
56 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
guments neck.
and pla- Whilst this branch is beneath the platysma it joins with the
tysma facial nerve. The platysma receives branches from this nerve.
of neck.
Dissec- tion.
Branch- es of
nerve to
The descending branch likewise passes through the platysma, and is
distributed below the preceding, reaching as low as the sternum.
Dissection. -Raise the platysma to the base of the jaw, and
dissect out the cervical branches of the facial nerve that are
beneath it. Clean also the deep fascia of the neck.
The infra-maxillary branches ofthe facial nerve (rami subcutanei
facial colli) pierce the deep cervical fascia, and pass forwards beneath
theneck. the platysma, forming arches across the side of the neck, which
reach as low as the hyoid bone. Most of the branches end in the
platysma, but a few filaments perforate it and supply the integument. Beneath the muscle there is a communication established
between these branches of the facial and the superficial cervical
Cervical fascia in
nerve.
The deep cervical fascia, before the sterno-mastoideus,
front of is stronger than it is behind that muscle, and has the folmastoid lowing disposition. Near the sternum the fascia forms a
sternowhite firm membrane, which is attached to that bone ; but
higher in the neck it becomes thinner, and is fixed to the
base of the jaw and the zygoma, covering the parotid gland.
From the angle of the jaw a piece is prolonged downwards
between the parotid and sub-maxillary glands, to join the
forms styloid process ; this piece is named stylo- maxillary ligamaxil- ment. Intermuscular partitions are sent between the muscles,
lary liga- ment and the layer beneath the sterno-mastoid assists in forming
sheath of the sheath of the cervical vessels. One of these layers, beneath the sterno-thyroid muscle, descends in front of the
great vessels at the root of the neck to the arch of the aorta
and to the pericardium.
styloand
vessels.
Dissec- tion.
Dissection ofthe anterior triangular space.— Raise the deep fascia
of the neck towards the middle line, and clean the surface of the
hyoid muscles, dissecting out at the same time the anterior jugular
vein. Next expose the parts that occupy the anterior triangle by
taking away the fat and fascia, but without displacing or injuring Seek them. In removing the sheath of the cervical vessels, as these
nerves. appear from beneath the muscles at the lower part of the neck, the
dissector should be careful of the small descending branch of the
small .
ninth nerve in front of it. In the sheath between the vessels
(carotid artery and jugular vein) will be found the pneumo-gastric
ANTERIOR TRIANGLE OF THE NECK. 57
Follow up- Trace nerve, and behind the same the sympathetic nerve.
wards the trunks of bifurcation of the artery, especially the more
superficial one (external carotid) , whose numerous branches are to
be traced as far as they lie in the space. Crossing the space, in the
direction of a line from the mastoid process to the hyoid bone, are
the digastric and stylo-hyoid muscles ; and lying below them is the
hypo-glossal nerve, which gives one branch (descendens noni) in
front of the sheath, and another to the thyro-hyoid muscle. Directed downwards from beneath the same muscles to the sternoarteries.
geal mastoid muscle, is the spinal accessory nerve. On the inner side Larynof the vessels, between the hyoid bone and the thyroid cartilage, nerves,
the dissector will find the superior laryngeal nerve, and its small
external laryngeal branch lying with the descending part of the
superior thyroid artery. Lastly, clean the submaxillary gland
close to the base of the jaw ; and on partly dislodging it from the and
surface of the mylo-hyoid muscle, the student will expose the mylosmall branch of nerve to that muscle with the submental artery.
The interval between the jaw and mastoid process is supposed to
be cleared out by the removal of the parotid gland in the dissection ofthe facial nerve.
nerve to
hyoid.
front of
ries.
The ANTERIOR TRIANGULAR SPACE OF THE NECK contains Trian- gular the carotid artery and branches, and corresponds to the hol- space in
low on the surface of the neck in front of the sterno- mastoid neck.
muscle. This space is limited behind by the sterno-mastoid
muscle. In front, along the middle line of the neck, it is Bounda
bounded by the larynx and by the small muscles that reach
from the hyoid bone to the lower jaw and sternum, viz.
above the os hyoides by the mylo-hyoid and digastric muscles,
and below that bone by the sterno-hyoid and sterno-thyroid
muscles. The base of the triangle is directed upwards, and is
marked by the base of the jaw, and a line prolonged from it
to the sterno-mastoid muscle ; whilst the apex is below at
the sternum. Over this space are placed the skin and
superficial fascia, the platysma in part, the deep fascia, and
the ramifications of the facial and superficial cervical nerves.
tents of In the area of the anterior triangular space, as it is above Condefined, are seen the ascending muscles of the hyoid bone, as space.
high as the level of the cricoid cartilage. But above that
spot the common carotid artery appears from beneath those Carotid
muscles at the root of the neck, and divides into two large
trunks opposite the upper border of the thyroid cartilage.
artery ;
58 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
tion and
Position of two trunks to one another.
its situa- From the place of division these trunks are continued onbifurca- wards beneath the digastric and stylo-hyoid muscles to the tion . interval between the jaw and the mastoid process. At first
the trunks lie side by side, the vessel destined for the internal
parts of the head being more posterior of the two, but above
the digastric one becomes superficial to the other. The more
superficial artery is named external carotid, and furnishes
many branches to the neck and to the outer part of the head,
viz. some forwards to the larynx, tongue, and face ; others
backwards to the occiput and ear ; and others upwards to Branch- the head. The deeper trunk, internal carotid, ascends
to the head without branching, and is distributed to the interior ofthe skull. In close contact with the outer side of the
common trunk and the internal carotid artery, is the large
internal jugular vein, which receives branches in the neck
corresponding to some of the branches of the artery.
es.
Nerves in con- In connection, more or less intimate, with the large vesnection sels, are the following nerves : —within the sheath of the
arteries . vessels, between the carotid artery and jugular vein, is the with the
Sub- maxillapneumogastric nerve, and behind the sheath is the sympathetic nerve. Along the outer part of the vessels the spinal
accessory nerve extends for a short distance till it pierces the
sterno-mastoid muscle. Crossing over the vessels, so as to
form an arch below the digastric muscle, is the hypo-glossal
nerve, which gives downwards a branch (descendens noni)
in front of the sheath. Opposite the hyoid bone the superior
laryngeal nerve appears on the inner side of the internal
carotid artery ; and a little lower down is the external
laryngeal branch of that nerve, with the descending branches
ofthe thyroid artery. Between the two carotid arteries and
higher in the neck than the superior laryngeal nerve, is the
arch formed by the glosso-pharyngeal nerve.
Altogether in front of the vessels, and partly concealed by
ry gland the jaw, is the submaxillary gland ; and on the surface of the
mylo-hyoideus is the small nerve to that muscle, with the
and thy- submental artery. On the side of the thyroid cartilage, between it and the common carotid artery, is the prominence
of the thyroid body, covered by the sterno-thyroid muscle :
roid body.
ANTERIOR TRIANGLE OF THE NECK. 59
and in the female this body is much more strongly marked
than in the male.
ence in the place of divi- sion of
Peculiarities in the vessels.-The chief peculiarity to be now noticed Differrefers to the division of the common carotid. The branching of that
vessel may be removed from the upper border of the thyroid cartilage,
either upwards or downwards, so that the trunk of the carotid may re- carotid,
main undivided till it is beyond the os hyoides, or it may end in branches
opposite the cricoid cartilage. The division beyond the usual place is
more frequent than the branching short of that spot.
But there may
be two trunks issuing from beneath the hyoid muscles instead of one,
for the common carotid has been found divided after an extent of one
inch and a half ; and, as an extremely rare occurrence, the external
and internal carotids may arise as distinct arteries from the arch of the aorta. Sometimes the artery corresponding to the common carotid
ascends, without division, in the place of the external carotid, and furnishes branches to the neck and head.* In some cases the jugular vein Jugular
and vagus nerve cover the common carotid artery, especially on the vagus
left side, and the veins joining the jugular may form a kind of plexus sition on
over the upper part of the common arterial trunk. The descendens left side .
noni nerve is frequently found in the sheath of the vessels.
-
vein and
alter pojugular Anterior jugular vein. This small vein occupies the Anterior
middle line of the neck, and its size is dependent upon the vein
condition of the external jugular. Beginning in some small
branches below the chin, the vein descends to the sternum,
and then turns outwards, beneath the sterno-mastoid muscle,
to open into the subclavian vein. In the neck the anterior joins
and external jugular veins communicate. There are two vian
anterior veins, one for each side, though one is usually larger
than the other, and at the bottom of the neck they are joined
by a transverse branch.
subclavein .
mastoid The STERNO- CLEIDO- MASTOID MUSCLE forms the prominence Sternoof the side of the neck, and by its position divides the lateral muscle
aspect of the neck into two triangular spaces. The muscle
is narrower in the centre than at the ends, and is attached to
the trunk by two heads of origin, which are separated by a
cellular interval. The inner head is fixed by a tendon to the has its origin at anterior part of the sternum, and the outer head has a wide sternum,
* For fuller information here, and in other parts of the book, respecting the peculiarities of the vessels, reference may be made to the admirable work on " The Anatomy of the Arteries of the Human Body. "
By Richard Quain, F.R.S.
60 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
attachment to the sternal third of the clavicle. From this
origin the heads are directed upwards, the internal passing
backwards, and the external almost vertically ; and are
blended about the middle of the neck in a roundish muscle,
and in- which is inserted into the front of the mastoid process, and
at skull ; by a wide aponeurotic part into a rough surface of bone behind that process. The borders of the muscle correspond to
sertion
the proof side of
Position
parts.
-
forms the triangular spaces of the neck, and the anterior one is the
minence guide to the position of the common carotid artery. By its cu- neck. taneous surface the sterno-mastoid is covered by the common
to other integuments, by the platysma, bythe external jugular vein and
superficial branches of the cervical plexus (across the middle
part), and by the deep fascia. If the muscle is cut through
below and raised, it will be seen to lie on the following
parts : – the clavicular origin lies over the anterior scalenus
muscle ; and the sternal attachment conceals the lower hyoid
muscles, the common carotid artery, and the accompanying
vein and nerves. After the union of the heads, the muscle
is placed over the cervical plexus, and rests on the posterior
scalenus and some other muscles of the back of the neck ;
also near the skull, on the digastric muscle and the occipital
artery, and on a part of the parotid gland. The spinal accessory nerve perforates the muscular fibres about the upper
third. The extent of the attachment to the clavicle varies,
and in some bodies it may reach even to the trapezius.
Omo- hyoid
the scaat hyoid
The OмO-HYOID MUSCLE crosses beneath the sterno - masmuscle toideus, and consists of two fleshy bellies united by a small
begins at round tendon. The origin of the muscle from the scapula,
pula, and the connections of the posterior part, are studied in the
and ends dissection of the back. From the intervening tendon, the
bone. anterior fleshy part is directed forwards along the border of
the sterno-hyoid muscle, and is inserted into the os hyoides
Connec- at the junction of the body and cornu. The anterior belly
ofthe muscle is close beneath the fascia after escaping from
the sterno-mastoid, and rests on the sterno-thyroid muscle.
This muscle crosses the common carotid artery on a level
with the cricoid cartilage.
tions.
Sterno.
hyoid
The STERNO- HYOID MUSCLE is a flat thin' band nearer the
muscle middle line than the preceding. It arises from the posterior
HYOID MUSCLES OF THE NECK. 61
from its
ments.
aspect of the sternum and the ligaments between that bone
and the clavicle . From this spot the fibres ascend, and are
inserted into the lower border of the body of the os hyoides named
close to the median line, and internal to the omo-hyoid mus- attachcle. One surface is in contact with the fascia, and is often
marked by a tendinous intersection near the clavicle. When Parts
the muscle is divided and turned aside, the deep surface will and bebe found to rest on the sterno-thyroideus and its continuation
(thyro-hyoid), also on the superior thyroid vessels. The
muscles of opposite sides are separated by a cellular interval
which is largest below.
above
neath.
The origin of the muscle varies ; sometimes it comes from the car- Origin
tilage ofthe first rib, at other times from the clavicle.
varies.
is named
attachThe STERNO-THYROID MUSCLE is wider and shorter than Sterno- thyroid the sterno-hyoid, beneath which it lies. Like the other hyoid muscle
muscle, it arises from the posterior surface of the sternum, from its
opposite the cartilage of the first or second rib, sometimes ments.
also from the contiguous cartilage ; and is inserted into the
oblique line on the side of the thyroid cartilage, where it is
continuous with the thyro-hyoid muscle. The inner border Parts
corresponds to the muscle of the other side and to the thyroid and beveins, whilst the outer reaches the carotid artery. The
superficial surface is concealed by the preceding hyoid muscles ; and the opposite surface is in contact with the lower
part of the carotid artery, the trachea, and the larynx with
the thyroid body. A transverse tendinous line crosses the
muscle near the sternum.
above
neath.
hyoid a
ation of preced- ing to os
The THYRO-HYOID MUSCLE is a continuation of the last. ThyroBeginning on the side of the thyroid cartilage, the fibres continuascend to the body and the inner half ofthe great cornu of the
os hyoides. On the muscle lie the omo-hyoideus and sterno- hyoides .
hyoideus ; and beneath it are the superior laryngeal vessels
and nerve. This is sometimes considered one of the special
muscles of the larynx.
-
tion
subcla- vian arDissection ofthe subclavian artery. The student should now Dissectake away (supposing the sterno-mastoid to be cut) the fat and of the
fascia from the lower part of the neck, so as to expose the scaleni
muscles, the remainder of the subclavian artery with its branches, tery.
and the cervical and brachial plexuses and their branches. By
62 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
and branch- es
The brachial
means of a little dissection the anterior scalenus muscle will be
seen ascending from the first rib to the neck, with the phrenic
nerve lying obliquely on the surface, and the subclavian vein in
front of it near the rib. Trace then the part of the subclavian
artery that is on the inner side of the scalenus, and be careful not
only ofits branches, but of the branches of the sympathetic nerve,
which course from the neck to the chest. This dissection will be
facilitated by the removal of a part or the whole of the clavicle.
All the branches of the artery are in general easily found, except
the superior intercostal, which is to be sought in the thorax in
front ofthe neck of the first rib. On the branch (inferior thyroid)
ascending to the thyroid body, or near it, is the middle cervical
ganglion of the sympathetic, and the dissector should follow downwards from it the small nerves to the thorax. Only the origin and
first part of the course of the branches can now be seen ; their
termination is exposed in other stages of the dissection, or in the
dissection of other parts of the body.
The outer part of the subclavian artery having been already
plexus. prepared, let the dissector remove more completely the cellular
membrane from the nerves of the cervical and brachial plexuses.
From the brachial plexus trace the small subclavian branch, and
some branches of the rhomboid and serratus muscles, which pierce
the posterior scalenus. If it is necessary, the anterior scalenus
may be cut through after the artery has been studied .
Cervical plexus.
Scalenus anticus
from first rib to cervitebræ ;
From the cervical plexus, besides the muscular branches, the
student should seek small twigs to join the descendens noni, and
should define the roots of the phrenic nerve. Lastly, let the surface of the posterior scalenus muscle be cleaned, as it lies beneath the cervical nerves.
The SCALENUS ANTICUS MUSCLE extends from the first rib to
the lower cervical vertebræ. It is somewhat conical in shape,
reaches and the apex or lower part arises from the inner border and
upper surface of the first rib, in front of a slight depression ;
cal ver whilst the base is inserted into the anterior tubercles of four
of the cervical vertebræ, from the sixth to the third, inclusive.
has nu- More deeply seated below than above, the muscle is concealed
connec bythe clavicle and subjacent muscle ( subclavius), and by the
clavicular part of the sterno- mastoid : the phrenic nerve lies
vessels, along the muscle, and the subclavian vein crosses over it near
the rib. Along the inner border is the internal jugular and vein. Beneath the scalenus are the nerves of the brachial
merous
tions with muscles,
nerves.
SCALENI MUSCLES AND SUBCLAVIAN VESSELS. 63
plexus and the subclavian artery. At the origin from the
rib there is often a small projecting point of bone (tubercle) ;
and the insertion corresponds to the origin of the rectus
capitis anticus major muscle.
to ribs
vical verThe SCALENUS POSTICUS MUSCLE is larger than the an- Scalenus posticus terior, and is bifid at its attachment to the ribs.
One process of origin is attached to the upper surface of the first rib attached
behind the groove for the subclavian artery, and the other is and cerconnected to the second rib between the tubercle and angle. tebræ.
The muscle ascends behind the spinal nerves, and is inserted
into the posterior tubercles on the transverse processes of
the lower six cervical vertebræ. In contact with the an- Parts in
terior surface are the subclavian artery and the spinal nerves, with it .
together with the sterno- mastoid muscle, whilst the posterior
surface touches the deep muscles of the back of the neck.
The outer border is perforated by the nerves of the rhomboid
and serratus muscles.
contact
ofscaleni
differIt may here be remarked that many writers divide this mass into Number
two muscles corresponding to the separate attachment to the ribs. Thus stated
the larger piece which is attached to the first rib is named middle scalenus, whilst the small part, connected to the second rib, is the posterior scalenus of the same authors.
ently.
vian
to upper
The SUBCLAVIAN ARTERY is the commencement of the Subclalarge vessel that supplies the upper limb with blood, and has artery
received this name from its position beneath the clavicle.
The vessel is derived from the branching of the innominal extends
artery behind the sterno- clavicular articulation, and it re- limb,
mains subclavian as far as the lower border of the first rib.
To reach the limb the artery crosses the lower part of the
neck, taking an arched course over the bag of the pleura
and the first rib, and between the scaleni muscles. For the and is
purpose of describing its numerous connections, the artery into
may be divided into three parts : the first extending from parts
the sterno-clavicular articulation to the inner border of the
anterior scalenus ; the second, beneath the scalenus ; and
the third, from the outer border of that muscle to the lower
edge of the first rib.
divided
three
part in- First part. —Internal to the anterior scalenus the artery First
is deep in the neck, and ascends slightly from its origin. ternal to
64 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
scalenus Between the vessel and the surface will be found the com- is deep.
mon tegument and the deep fascia, the sterno-mastoid, sternohyoid, and sterno-thyroid muscles, and a deep process of
Parts in fascia from the inner border of the scalenus muscle. Crossing
the artery near the scalenus is the internal jugular vein with
the small vertebral vein, and internal to these veins is the
front,
pneumogastric nerve. Some branches of the sympathetic
behind, are likewise placed in front of the vessel. This part of the
subclavian lies over the longus colli muscle, though at some
distance from it, and separated from it by cellular membrane, by the recurrent branch of the pneumogastric nerve,
below. and by the sympathetic nerve. Below the artery, both in
this and the next part, is the pleura, which ascends into the
Branch- arch formed by the vessel. Three branches arise from the es.
Second part be- neath scalenus.
front,
subclavian in this part of its extent.
Second part.
- Beneath the scalenus the vessel is less
deep than it is when internal to that muscle, and at this spot
Parts in it rises highest in the neck. This second part, like the first,
is covered by the integuments and deep fascia, then by the
clavicular origin of the sterno-mastoideus, and lastly by the
behind, anterior scalenus with the phrenic nerve. Behind the vessel
above. is the posterior scalenus. And above it, in the interval
between the scaleni, are the large trunks of the lower cervical nerves, with the exception of the trunk formed by the
union of the last cervical and first dorsal, that lies between
the artery and the posterior scalenus. The subclavian vein
is below the level of the artery, and separated from it by the
Branch- scalenus muscle. From this part of the subclavian one
branch takes its origin.
es.
Third part Third part. Beyond the scalenus the subclavian artery
is contained in the clavicular part of the posterior triangular
space (p. 51.), and is nearer the surface than in the rest of its
course. This part of the artery is comparatively superficial,
ficial. whilst in the space before mentioned, for it is covered only
vering it ; by the integuments, platysma, and deep fascia, with some
beneath superficial nerves of the cervical plexus ; but near its termiis superParts coit ;
nation the vessel gets under cover of the clavicle and subclavius muscle, and the supra- scapular artery and vein. In
the third part of its course the artery rests on the surface of
BRANCHES OF SUBCLAVIAN IN THE NECK. 65
and be- the first rib. Above the vessel is the brachial plexus, and above
below it is the subclavian vein. Usually no branch leaves low.
the last part of the artery.
rities of origin of
Peculiarities of the artery. -With reference to the origin, in one case Peculia
it may be above the sterno-clavicular articulation ; in another, below
that joint. Or the artery may spring as a separate trunk from the arch the trunk ;
of the aorta ; and in such a state of the parts, the vessel takes a deeper
place than usual to reach the scaleni muscles : a condition that will be
referred to with the arch of the aorta in the thorax. It has been before
said that the artery may be in front of the scalenus, or in its fibres, and
that the vein may be beneath that muscle.
branch- es.
The branches of the first part of the artery arise near the scalenus of the
muscle, so as to leave an interval at the origin free from offsets. This
interval varies in length, being from half an inch to an inch in the greater
number of cases ; and its extremes range from somewhat less than half
an inch to an inch and three quarters. (Quain.)
es of
vian arBranches of the subclavian. Usually there are four Branchbranches to the subclavian artery. Three of these arise from subclathe first part of the arterial trunk ; one ( vertebral) ascends tery.
in the neck, another (internal mammary) descends to the
chest, and the remaining one (thyroid axis) is a short
thick trunk, which furnishes branches inwards and outwards.
The fourth branch (superior intercostal) arises from the
second part of the artery, or beneath the anterior scalenus,
and gives off the deep cervical branch. If there is a branch
present on the third part of the artery, it is commonly the
posterior scapular.
bral ar- tery in the neck.
1. The vertebral artery is generally the first and largest branch Verteof the subclavian, and arises from the upper and posterior part of
that vessel. Ascending between the contiguous borders of the scalenus and longus colli muscles, this branch enters the aperture in
the transverse process of the sixth cervical vertebra, and is continued upwards to the foramen magnum of the skull, through the
chain of foramina in the tranverse processes of the other cervical
vertebræ. Before the artery enters the transverse process it is
partly concealed by the internal jugular vein, and passes beneath
the thyroid artery ; it is accompanied by branches of the sympathetic nerve, and supplies small muscular branches. Its course Small
and distribution will be given afterwards.
branch- es.
side. On the left side the commencement of the vertebral artery is on left
crossed by the thoracic duct.
F
66 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Differ- ence in place of origin.
Verte- bral vein,
and branch- es.
Internal mammain the neck.
Thyroid]
axis
The origin of the vertebral may vary in its position along the first
part ofthe trunk of the subclavian ; or it may be transferred to the arch
of the aorta, especially on the left side, or to the right common carotid
artery, when the subclavian of the same side arises from the aorta.
The course of the artery is not constant through the hole in the
transverse process of the sixth vertebra ; it may enter any other as high as the second.
The vertebral vein is superficial to its artery in the neck, and is
directed over the subclavian artery to join the subclavian vein ; it
receives the deep cervical vein and the branch that accompanies the
ascending cervical artery.
nerve.
2. The internal mammary branch leaves the lower part of the
ryartery subclavian artery, and coursing downwards beneath the clavicle
and subjacent muscle, and the subclavian vein, enters the thorax
between the first rib and the bag of the pleura. As the artery is
about to enter the chest, it is crossed (superficially) by the phrenic
The distribution of the vessel to the walls of the chest
and abdomen will be seen with the dissection of those parts.
3. Thyroid axis.— This is a short thick trunk, that arises from
the front ofthe artery near the anterior scalenus muscle, and soon
divides divides into three branches : one to the thyroid body, and two
to the scapula that run outwards across the neck. On the left
side of the body the thoracic duct lies in front of the thyroid axis.
Supra- a. The supra-scapular branch courses outwards across the lower part
scapular of the neck, beneath the clavicle and subclavian muscle to the superior
costa ofthe scapula, and entering the supra-spinal fossa is distributed to
the muscles on the dorsum of that bone. The connections of this artery are seen in the dissection of the back.
into three.
branch.
Trans- verse
-
b. The transverse cervical branch, usually larger than the preceding,
cervical takes a similar direction, though higher in the neck, and ends beneath branch. the border of the trapezius muscle in the superficial cervical and posterior scapular arteries. ( See “ Dissection of the BACK. ”) In its course
outwards this artery crosses the anterior scalenus, the phrenic nerve, and
the brachial plexus, and lies in the upper part of the space that contains
the third part of the subclavian artery, the supra- scapular artery lying
Offsets. along the base of the same space. Some small branches are supplied by
it to the posterior triangular space of the neck.
Place of origin varies.
Inferior
2
Though the transverse cervical artery supplies ordinarily the posterior scapular branch, there are many examples in which, though holding
its usual position in the neck, it is too small in size to give origin to so
large an offset. In such instances the diminished artery ends in the
trapezius muscle, whilst the posterior scapular branch arises separately
from the third, or even the second part of the subclavian artery.
c. The inferior thyroid branch is the largest offset of the thyroid
BRANCHES OF SUBCLAVIAN IN THE NECK. 67
branch axis. Directed inwards to the thyroid body, the artery passes be- thyroid
neath the common carotid artery with its accompanying vein and
nerves, and in front of the longus colli muscle and the recurrent
nerve. In this course the vessel is tortuous. At the lower part of
the thyroid body it divides into branches that enter the structure of
that body, whilst others communicate with the superior thyroid
and the corresponding artery of the opposite side, forming a very
free anastomosis between these vessels. Near the larynx a laryn- gives lageal branch is distributed to the back of that tube, and other offsets offset,
are furnished to the trachea.
ryngeal
branch.
The ascending cervical artery is a branch of the thyroid near its com- and as- sending mencement ; it is directed upwards between the scalenus and rectus cervical
capitis anticus major, and ends in branches to those muscles and to the
posterior triangle of the neck. Some small spinal branches are conveyed along the spinal nerves to the cord and its membranes.
sory
to the
In connection with the thyroid artery may be noticed a third thyroid Accesartery, which has been named lowest thyroid (art. thyroidea ima). This branch
small branch usually comes from the trunk of the innominal artery, lower
but it may spring from the common carotid, or from the arch of the thyroid.
aorta. Whatever its origin, the small vessel ascends in front of the
trachea to the thyroid body, and either takes the place of an absent
inferior thyroid artery, or assists a smaller vessel than usual in supplying that body.
sponding
ries .
The veins corresponding to the branches of the thyroid axis Veins
have the following destination : -those with the supra- scapular and corre
transverse cervical arteries open in the external jugular vein. But to artethe inferior thyroid vein begins in a plexus connected with the
thyroid body, and descends in front of the trachea, beneath the
muscles covering it, to end in the innominal vein.
intercos- 4. The superior intercostal artery arises from the posterior part Superior
of the subclavian, and bends downwards over the neck of the first tal arterib to the thorax. Its distribution to the first two intercostal ry in
spaces will be seen in the thorax.
neck.
cervical Arising in common with this branch is the deep cervical artery Deep
(art. profunda cervicis) . Analogous to the dorsal branch of an artery .
intercostal artery, it bends backwards between the transverse process ofthe last cervical vertebra and the first rib, and ends beneath
the complexus muscle at the posterior part of the neck.
vian The SUBCLAVIAN VEIN has the same limits as the artery of Subcla
the same name, viz. between the lower border of the first vein ;
rib and the sterno- clavicular articulation. It is a continuation upwards of the axillary vein, and ends by joining the F 2
68 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
its branch- es ;
internal jugular to form the innominate vein. Its course
is nearly straight, but below the level of the artery, from
which it is separated by the anterior scalenus muscle. The
external jugular joins this vein outside the scalenus, and
the vertebral and superior intercostal veins enter it inside
opening that muscle. Into the angle of union of the subclavian and
lymph jugular veins the right lymphatic duct opens ; and at the same
spot, on the left side, is the entrance of the left lymphatic
duct.
of
atic ducts.
nerves.
andnum- ber.
Cervical The ANTERIOR DIVISIONS OF THE CERVICAL NERVES spring
from the common trunks of the spinal nerves in the interPosition vertebral foramina, and appear on the side of the neck between the inter- transverse muscles. Eight in number, the
nerves are equally divided between the cervical and the
brachial plexus, the highest four being combined in the
former, and the remaining nerves in the latter plexus. At
their commencement the nerves receive offsets of communication from the sympathetic, and they are further intermixed
by communicating branches.
First two dif- To this general statement it is necessary to make excepfer from tion respecting the first two nerves ; and the peculiarities
here referred to will be verified in Section 18.
rest.
Brachial plexus BRACHIAL PLEXUS. - The first dorsal and four lower
cervical nerves are blended in this plexus, and a fasciculus
is added to them from the lowest nerve entering the cervical
formed plexus. Thus formed the plexus reaches from the lowest
nerves. part of the neck to the axilla, where it ends in nerves for by five
Disposi- tion of
the upper limb. Only the part above the clavicle can now
be seen. In the neck the nerves have but little of a plexiform arrangement : they lie at first between the scaleni
muscles, and have the following disposition : -
The fifth and sixth nerves unite near the vertebræ ; the seventh renerves in mains distinet as far as the outer border of the posterior scalenus ; and
theplex- the last cervical and first dorsal are blended in one trunk beneath the us in the neck. anterior scalenus ; so that they are combined at first into three cords.
Near the attachment of the posterior scalenus to the rib, the seventh
nerve throws itself into the trunk formed by the fifth and sixth, and
there then result two cords to the plexus : -the one formed by the
fifth, sixth, and seventh cervical nerves ; and the other, by the eighth
cervical and the first dorsal nerve. These two trunks accompany the
SPINAL NERVES OF THE NECK. 69
subclavian artery, lying to its acromial side, and are continued to the
axilla, where they are more intimately blended.
-
es Branches. -The branches of the plexus may be classed Branchinto those above the clavicle, and those below that bone.
The highest set end chiefly in the muscles of the lower part in the
of the neck, of the chest, and of the shoulder ; whilst the
other set consist of the terminal branches, and are furnished
to the upper limb.
neck are
nerve, BRANCHES ABOVE THE CLAVICLE. —1 . Branch to the phrenic Phrenic nerve. This offset comes from the trunk of the fifth cervical nerve,
and joins the phrenic on the anterior scalenus muscle.
subcla- 2. The branch of the subclavius muscle is a very slender twig, Nerve of that arises from the trunk formed by the fifth and sixth nerves, vius,
and is directed downwards over the subclavian artery to the undersurface ofthe muscle ; it is often united with the phrenic nerve at
the lower part of the neck.
rhom- 3. The branch for the rhomboid muscle springs from the fifth Nerve of
nerve in the substance of the posterior scalenus, and perforates the boideus,
fibres of that muscle ; it is afterwards directed beneath the levator
anguli scapula to its destination. Branches are usually given from
this nerve to the levator anguli scapula.
serratus,
4. The posterior thoracic nerve (nerve of the serratus ; external Nerve of
respiratory nerve of Bell) is contained in the scalenus, like the
preceding, and arises from the fifth and sixth nerves, near the intervertebral foramina. Piercing the fibres of the scalenus lower
than the preceding branch, the nerve is continued behind the
brachial plexus, and enters the serratus magnus muscle on the
axillary surface.
of scale- 5. Branches ofthe scaleni and longus colli muscles. These are Nerves
small twigs that are seen when the anterior scalenus is divided ; ni and
they arise from the trunks of the nerves as soon as these leave the longus
spinal canal.
colli ,
scapular 6. The supra-scapular nerve is larger than either of the others. SupraIt arises from the upper cord of the plexus, and is traced to the
dorsum ofthe scapula in the dissection of the back.
nerve.
plexus is The CERVICAL PLEXUS is formed by the anterior divisions Cervical
ofthe first four cervical nerves. Situate at the upper part
of the neck, it lies beneath the sterno- mastoid muscle, and
on the posterior scalenus and levator anguli scapula. Its
appearance differs much from that of the brachial plexus,
for it resembles a network more than a bundle of large
F 3
70 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
by
ing of the
-
formed cords. The following is the general arrangement of the
branch- nerves in the plexus : each nerve, except the first, divides
into an ascending and a descending branch, and these unite
with similar parts of the contiguous nerves, so as to give
rise to a series of arches. From these loops or arches the
different branches arise.
nerves.
Its offsets
perficial,
Branches. -The branches of the plexus are either superare su- ficial or deep. The superficial set are described with the triangular space of the neck (p. 53. ) as consisting of ascending
and descending nerves. In this stage of the dissection the
ascending branches are seen to spring from the union of the
second and third nerves, and the descending ones to come
and deep from the loop between the third and fourth nerves. The
deep set of branches remain now to be examined.
branch- es .
Deep branches are,
Phrenic nerve,
The DEEP BRANCHES OF THE PLEXUS are either muscular
or communicating, and may be arranged into an internal and
an external series.
A. INTERNAL SERIES. —1 . The phrenic nerve is derived from
the third and fourth nerves of the plexus, and is usually joined by
a fasciculus from the fifth cervical nerve. Descending obliquely on
the surface of the anterior scalenus, it enters the chest in front of
the internal mammary artery, but behind the subclavian vein.
The final distribution of the nerve is to the diaphragm. At the
lower part of the neck the phrenic nerve is joined by a filament of
the sympathetic, and sometimes by an offset of the nerve of the
subclavius muscle.
Nerves 2. The branches communicating with the descendens noni are two in tojoin descend- number. One of the branches arises from the second, and the other
ens noni, from the third cervical nerve ; they are directed inwards either
over or under the internal jugular vein, and communicate with
the descending muscular branch of the ninth nerve.
Branch- es of 3. Muscular branches are furnished to the recti muscles ; these
recti, arise from the loop between the first two nerves, and from the
trunks ofthe other nerves close to the intervertebral foramina.
Branch- es to other nerves.
Branch- es to
4. Some connecting branches pass from the loop between the first
two nerves to the sympathetic, and the cranial nerves near it ; these
will be afterwards referred to.
B. EXTERNAL OR POSTERIOR SERIES. - · 1 . Muscular branches
other are given from the second nerve to the sterno- mastoideus ; from muscles,
the third nerve to the levator anguli scapula ; and from the third
CAROTID VESSEL IN THE NECK.. 71
and fourth nerves to the trapezius. Further, some small branches
supply the substance of the posterior scalenus .
—- The Branch- es join.
nal ac2. Connecting branches with the spinal accessory nerve.
communications between this cranial and the spinal nerves are nu- ing spimerous. First, in the sterno- mastoid muscle ; next, in the posterior cessory.
triangular space ; and, lastly, beneath the trapezius. The union
with those branches that are distributed to the trapezius has almost
the appearance of a plexus.
carotid The COMMON CAROTID ARTERY is the chief vessel for the Common
supply of blood to the neck and head, and is remarkable in artery .
not furnishing collateral branches. The origin of the vessel
is different on the two sides of the body.
tion.
The artery of the right side commences opposite the Origin.
sterno- clavicular articulation at the bifurcation of the innominal artery, and ends at the upper border of the thyroid
cartilage, by dividing into two trunks, external and internal
carotid arteries. The course of the artery is along the side Course.
of the trachea and larynx, gradually diverging from the
vessel of the opposite side, in consequence of the increasing
size of the larynx ; and its position will be marked by a line Situadrawn to the sterno-clavicular articulation from a point midway between the angle of the jaw and the mastoid process.
Contained in a sheath of cervical fascia, with the internal
jugular vein to the outside, and the pneumogastric nerve between the two, the carotid artery has the following connections with the surrounding parts : —as high as the cricoid Parts co veringit,
cartilage the vessel is deeply placed, and is concealed by the
common teguments and fascia, and by the muscles at the
lower part of the neck, viz. sterno-mastoid (sternal origin ),
sterno- hyoid, sterno-thyroid, and omo-hyoid ; and beneath
the muscles by the middle thyroid vein. But above the
cricoid cartilage to its termination the artery lies near the
surface, and is covered only by the common investments of
the part ; superficial to it here is the descendens noni nerve,
and crossing the upper part are the superior thyroid veins.
The vessel rests on the longus colli muscle, on the sympa- beneath
thetic nerve and branches, also on the recurrent nerve and the
inferior thyroid artery. To the inner side of the carotid lie and on
the trachea and larynx, with the œsophagus and the thyroid
it,
its sides .
F 4
72122 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Internal jugular vein
lies close to
body, the last overhanging the vessel by the side of the
larynx. Along the outer side of the carotid sheath is a chain
of lymphatic glands.
INTERNAL JUGULAR VEIN. -Only the part of this vein
that accompanies the common carotid artery is now seen.
Placed on the outer side of the artery, the vein ends below
by uniting with the subclavian in the innominate vein. Its
side of proximity to the carotid is not equally close in all the extent
of that vessel, for at the lower part of the neck the vein
inclines outwards, leaving a space between it and the artery,
except in which is seen the vagus nerve, about midway between the
Branch- two. In this part of its course the vein receives the superior
and middle thyroid branches.
artery,
below.
es.
Differ- ences ob- Peculiarities in the carotid artery.— Usually the common carotid is
served in without branch, but it may give origin to the superior thyroid, the incarotid. ferior thyroid, or the vertebral artery. Mention has been made of the
fact, that occasionally the common carotid artery is not divided into two.
(see page 59.).
Disee- tion .
Digas.
tric
has two
Dissection. -Trace out completely the trunk of the external
carotid, and follow the branches until they disappear beneath different parts. Separate from one another the digastric and stylohyoid muscles, which cross the carotid, and define their origin and
insertion.
The DIGASTRIC MUSCLE consists of two fleshy bellies,
muscle united by an intervening tendon, whence its name. The
bellies, posterior belly arises from the digastric fissure and the anterior border of the mastoid process, whilst the anterior belly
takes origin from the base of the lower jaw, on the side of
the symphysis. From these places of origin the fibres are
directed to the intervening tendon. Those of the posterior
belly are the longest, and are inclined obliquely forwards,
and those of the anterior belly pass downwards, but less obwhich liquely. The tendon of the muscle is surrounded by fibres of
ed by a the stylo- hyoideus, and is attached to the side of the os hyoides tendon. by means of a membranous expansion from its lower border.
Position The arch formed by the digastric is superficial, except at
parts. the outer part, where it is beneath the sterno- mastoid
muscle. The posterior belly crosses the carotid vessels and
the accompanying veins and nerves, and the anterior rests
are jointo other
MUSCLES OF THE NECK. 73
on the mylo-hyoid muscle. The direction of the posterior
belly across the anterior triangular space of the neck is that
of a line from the mastoid process to the hyoid bone ; and
along its lower border will be found the occipital artery and
the hypo-glossal nerve, the former passing backwards, the
latter forwards.
muscle
space
The digastric muscle describes an arch across the side of The
the neck, and forms the lower boundary of a space that bounds a
reaches upwards to the jaw and in front of the ear. This
space is divided into two parts by the stylo-maxillary
ligament. In the posterior part are contained the parotid that congland and the vessels and nerves in connection with it rotid and
(p. 28.) ; in the anterior are the submaxillary gland and the maxilfacial vessels, and deeper still the muscles between the chin glands .
and the hyoid bone.
tains pasublary
the Stylo- hyoideIt us.
tion .
The STYLO-HYOID MUSCLE is thin and slender, and has
same position as the posterior belly of the digastric.
arises from the outer aspect of the styloid process, about the Origin.
middle, and is inserted into the body of the os hyoides : the Inserfleshy fibres are usually perforated by the tendon of the Surdigastric. The muscle has the same connections as the digastric
digastric (posterior belly). In many bodies the stylo-hyoid
muscle is absent.
rounds
tendon.
nerve in
rior triThe HYPO-GLOSSAL NERVE (ninth cranial) may now be Ninth
examined in the anterior triangle of the neck. Appearing the anteat the lower edge of the digastric muscle, the nerve hooks angle.
round the occipital artery, and is then directed forwards
below the digastric, disappearing beneath the mylo-hyoid
muscle. As the nerve crosses the neck, it lies over the carotid vessels, and near the cornu of the os hyoides it crosses
the lingual artery, so as to become higher than it.
branches Branches.In this part of its course the nerve gives the Its
descendens noni branch, and a small muscular offset to the here are
thyro-hyoideus.
muscu lar.
of lower
muscles ;
The descending branch (ram. descend. noni) arises from the Branch
trunk ofthe hypo-glossal on the outer side of the carotid artery, hyoid
and descends on the front, or in the sheath of the vessel, to about
the middle of the neck, where it is joined bythe communicating
branches of the cervical nerves. After the union of the spinal is joined
74 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
vical nerves
with cer- nerves the descendens noni ends in muscular branches for the
supply of the lower hyoid muscles, viz. omo- hyoid (both bellies) ,
sterno-hyoid, and sterno-thyroid. Sometimes another offset is
continued to the thorax, where it joins the phrenic and cardiac
by inter- commu- nicating fibres.
External carotid vessel.
Extent.
and diperficial to it,
nerves.
The connection between the descendens noni and the spinal nerves
is formed by two or more cross filaments, in the form of an arch with
the concavity upwards ; and M. Cruveilhier describes an interchange of filaments between the two sets of nerves.
The EXTERNAL CAROTID ARTERY springs from the bifurcation of the common carotid at the upper border of the
thyroid cartilage, and furnishes branches to the face, the neck,
and the outer parts of the head.
From the place of origin the vessel ascends to the interval
between the jaw and the mastoid process, and ends near the
condyle of the jaw, in the internal maxillary and temporal
Course branches. In this extent the artery is at first on the inner
rection. side of the internal carotid, but it afterwards becomes superficial to that vessel ; and its course is somewhat arched forwards, though the direction would be marked sufficiently by
a line from the front of the meatus of the ear to the cricoid
Parts su- cartilage. At first the external carotid is comparatively
superficial, and easily reached from the surface, being overlaid
only by the common coverings of the anterior triangular
space, viz. the skin, the superficial and deep fascia with the
platysma, and the superficial nerves. But above the situation
of a line extended from the mastoid process to the hyoid
bone the carotid artery is crossed by the digastric and stylohyoid muscles with the hypo-glossal nerve ; and still higher it
enters the substance of the parotid gland, where it lies
beneath the facial nerve and the external jugular vein. The
external carotid is also crossed by the branches of veins
beneath joining the internal jugular trunk. The artery lies on the
inferior and middle constrictor muscles of the pharynx and
on the superior laryngeal nerve ; then above the angle of the
jaw on the stylo-glossus and stylo-pharyngeus muscles, and
the glosso-pharyngeal nerve, which separate it from the internal carotid . To the inner side of the vessel is the os
it,
and on
CAROTID ARTERY AND BRANCHES. 75
hyoides with the muscles passing from it to the jaw side. , and still inner
higher is the stylo-maxillary ligament.
branch- The branches of the external carotid are numerous, and Its
are classed into anterior, posterior, and ascending sets. The es are
anterior set comprise branches to the thyroid body, the tongue, anterior,
and the face, viz. superior thyroid, lingual, and facial arteries ;
in the posterior set are the occipital and posterior auricu- postelar branches ; and the ascending set include the ascending and
pharyngeal, temporal, and internal maxillary arteries. Be- ing.
sides these, the carotid gives other branches to the sternomastoid muscle and the parotid gland.
rior,
ascendAll the branches, except the ascending pharyngeal, lingual, esBranch- now
and internal maxillary, may now be examined ; but the seen are
three referred to will be afterwards described with the regions they occupy.
thyroid,
The superior thyroid artery arises near the cornu of the os Superior
hyoides, and turns downwards on the inner side of the common
carotid artery, passing beneath the omo-hyoid, sterno-hyoid, and
sterno thyroid muscles, to the thyroid body, to which it is distributed on the anterior aspect. This branch is superficial in the an- has offterior triangle, and furnishes offsets to the lowest constrictor as
well as to the muscles beneath which it passes, in addition to the
following named branches :
-
sets to
a. The hyoid branch is very inconsiderable in size, and runs inwards the hyoid below the hyoid bone ; it supplies the parts attached to that bone, and bone,
anastomoses with the vessel of the opposite side.
mastoid b. A branch for the sterno-mastoid muscle lies in front of the sheath sternoofthe common carotid artery, and is distributed chiefly to the muscle muscle,
from which it takes its name.
to la- c. The laryngeal branch pierces the membrane between the hyoid rynx ,
bone and thyroid cartilage, with the superior laryngeal nerve, and ends in the interior ofthe larynx.
d. A small crico-thyroid branch is placed on the membrane between to crico- thyroid the cricoid and thyroid cartilages, and communicates with the cor- memresponding artery of the opposite side, forming an arch.
brane.
The superior thyroid vein commences in the larynx and the thy- Accom- panying roid body, and crosses the end of the common carotid artery, to vein.
open into the internal jugular vein.
artery The facial artery arises above the lingual, and is directed upwards Facial
over the lower jaw to the face. In the neck the artery passes
beneath the digastric and stylo- hyoid muscles, and is afterwards
76 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
branches
received into the submaxillary gland, on which it makes a remarksupplies able sigmoid turn. Its disposition in the face has been examined
(p. 25.) . The cervical part of the artery gives branches to the
pharynx and to the parts below the jaw, viz. :
in the neck
to the palate,
tonsil,
sub- maxil- lary gland and mylo- hyoid
a. The inferior palatine branch ascends to the pharynx beneath the
jaw, and between the stylo-glossus and stylo-pharyngeus muscles. In
its course it furnishes a branch to the tonsil, and is then distributed to
the soft palate. This branch frequently arises from the ascending pharyngeal artery.
b. The tonsillar branch is smaller than the preceding, and ascends
between the internal pterygoid and stylo-glossus muscles. Opposite
the tonsil it perforates the constrictor muscle, and ends in branches to
that body.
c. Glandular branches are supplied to the submaxillary gland, and
are given from the part of the artery in contact with it.
d. The submental branch arises near the inferior maxilla, and passes
forwards on the mylo-hyoid to the anterior belly of the digastric muscle,
muscle. where it distributes branches : some of these turn over the jaw to the
chin and lower lip, and the rest supply the muscles between the jaw
and the hyoid bone, one or two perforating the mylo-hyoideus to anas- tomose with the sublingual artery.
Facial vein.
Occipi- tal artery
ends on
The facial vein joins the internal jugular vein. In the cervical
part of its course it receives branches corresponding to those of
the artery.
The occipital artery is of considerable size, and is destined for
the back of the head. It arises from the carotid opposite the facial
branch, and at the lower border of the digastric muscle. From
this spot the artery ascends to the inner part of the mastoid process of the temporal bone ; next it turns horizontally backwards on occiput ; ! the occipital bone, passing above the transverse process of the
in neck atlas, and finally becomes cutaneous (p. 5.) . In the neck this
offset to artery passes beneath the digastric muscle and part of the parotid
gland, and crosses over the internal carotid artery, the jugular vein,
and the spinal accessory and hypo-glossal nerves.
has an
the dura mater.
Occipital vein.
The only offset from the artery in the front of the neck is a small
meningeal branch of the dura mater in the posterior fossa of the base of
the skull. It ascends along the internal jugular vein, and enters the
skull by the foramen lacerum .
The occipital vein has the same course as the artery, and opens
into the internal jugular, sometimes into the external jugular vein.
The posterior auricular artery is smaller than the preceding
auricular branch, and takes origin above the digastric muscle. Ascending
Poste- rior
BRANCHES OF THE CAROTID ARTERY. 77
neck in the same direction as the occipital artery, viz. to the interval artery in
between the ear and the mastoid process, it divides into two final supplies
branches for the ear and occiput (p. 5.) .
A small branch, stylo- mastoid, enters the foramen of the same name, a branch
and supplies the internal ear.
to the ear.
The vein with the artery terminates in the trunk formed by the Vein
temporal and internal maxillary veins.
with artery.
ral ar- The temporal artery is in direction the continuation of the Tempoexternal carotid, and is one of the terminal branches of that tery,
artery. Ascending through the parotid gland, in the interval
between the ear and the articulation of the jaw, the vessel crosses
the posterior root of the zygoma, and divides on the temporal besides
fascia (about two inches above the zygoma) into anterior and pos- branchterior branches for the front and side of the head (p. 5.) . The es, gives
trunk of the artery gives offsets to the surrounding parts : thus,
terminal
a. Parotid branches are furnished to the gland as this conceals the branchartery. Articular twigs are supplied to the articulation of the lower es to parotid,
jaw, and other muscular branches enter the masseter. Some anterior to articuauricular branches are also distributed to the pinna and the meatus of jaw,
the external ear.
lation of
and the ear.
to face.
b. The transverse facial branch quits the temporal artery opposite the Branch
condyle of the jaw, and is directed forwards over the masseter muscle ;
on the side of the face it supplies the muscles and the integuments, and
anastomoses with the facial artery.
of tem- c. The middle temporal branch arises just above the zygoma, and Branch
pierces the temporal aponeurosis to enter the substance of the temporal poral muscle. In the muscle it anastomoses with branches of the internal muscle
maxillary artery.
d. A small branch of the temporal artery is likewise found between and of
the layers of the temporal fascia ; this becomes cutaneous near the the tem- ple.
orbicularis muscle.
vein.
The temporal vein commences on the side of the head, and is Correcontiguous to its artery. Near the zygoma it is joined by the sponding
middle temporal vein, next by other branches corresponding to
those of the artery ; and finally it ends by uniting with the internal
maxillary to give rise to the external jugular vein.
-
ternal
Peculiarities of the external carotid artery. - The deviations from Branchthe usual place of origin, and the occasional connection of the external es of excarotid with the arch of the aorta were alluded to in the peculi- carotid
arities of the common carotid artery (p. 59.) . The regular origin of change
the branches, as described above, may also be departed from by means in origin
of the closer aggregation of these branches on the trunk of the carotid.
78 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
number.
and in Further, the usual number may be diminished by two or more taking
origin by a common trunk ; or the number may be increased by some
ofthe secondary branches being transferred to the trunk of the external carotid.
SECTION VI.
of the
PTERYGO-MAXILLARY REGION.
Contents IN this region the dissector will find the masseter muscle
region. on the side of the jaw ; and in the space beneath the ramus of
the jaw are contained the pterygoid muscles, the internal
maxillary artery, and the commencement of the inferior
maxillary trunk of the fifth nerve.
Dissec- tion.
Masse- ter
Dissection. —Cut through the branches of the facial nerve and
the transverse facial artery, and turn them backwards off the face ;
then clean the fibres of the masseter muscle, defining its origin and
following its insertion into the ramus of the lower jaw. Take out
ofthe mouth the material that made tense the fibres of the orbicularis, if any of it remains.
The MASSETER MUSCLE conceals the ramus of the lower
jaw, and presents at the anterior border, near its attachment
to the zygoma, an aponeurosis, which projects into the muscle,
has two and divides it into two parts.
parts.
Superfi- cial is di- rected backThe superficial part arises from the two anterior thirds of
the zygomatic arch, and its fibres are directed downwards
and backwards to be inserted into the angle, and the lower
Deep half of the ramus of the jaw. The deeper part takes origin
wards. by fleshy fibres from the remaining third and the posterior
wards.
part forMuscle nearly
neous ;
aspect of the arch ; and its fibres, taking an opposite direction
to those of the superficial part, are inserted into the outer
surface of the coronoid process and the ramus of the jaw
above the other fibres of the muscle.
The lower part of the masseter is subcutaneous, but the
subcuta- upper is partly concealed by the parotid gland ( socia parotidis ), and is crossed by Stenson's duct, and by the transverse
facial vessels and the facial nerve. The anterior border projects over the buccinator muscle, and a quantity of fat resembling that in the orbit is found beneath it. The muscle
covers the ramus of the jaw, and the masseteric branch of
nerve and artery that enter it by the under-surface.
lies on he jaw.
PTERYGO-MAXILLARY REGION. 79
tion.
Dissection. -Detach the temporal fascia from the upper border Dissecof the zygomatic arch, and remove it from the surface of the temporal muscle. Next the arch is to be sawn through in front
and behind, so as to include its whole extent. Throw down the
zygomatic arch with the masseter muscle still attached to it, and
separate the fibres of that muscle from the upper half ofthe ramus
of the jaw, seeking, at the same time, the masseteric nerve and
artery that appear through the sigmoid notch. The surface and the
insertion of the temporal muscle may then be cleaned . Afterwards
saw off the coronoid process by a cut passing from the centre of the
sigmoid notch nearly to the last molar tooth, in order to include
the whole of the insertion of the temporal muscle ; and in doing
this be careful of the buccal artery and nerve issuing from beneath.
Lastly, raise up the coronoid process, and separate the lower fibres
of the temporal muscle from those of the external pterygoid, close
below them.
of temmuscle.
The upper attachment of the temporal muscle has been Insertion
seen (p. 4. ) to occupy the temporal fossa, spreading upwards poral
to the semicircular line on the side of the skull ; and its extent downwards now appears to reach to the crest on the
outer aspect of the great wing of the sphenoid bone. From
this extensive origin the fibres converge around a tendon,
which is inserted into the inner surface of the coronoid process, from the apex to near the last molar tooth. Behind
the posterior border of the tendon are the masseteric vessels
and nerve, and in front of it the buccal vessels and nerve :
the last nerve occasionally perforates some of the fibres of
the muscle.
tion . Dissection. -Separate the greater part of the temporal muscle Dissecfrom the subjacent bone with the handle of the scalpel, and seek
the deep temporal vessels and nerves in the fibres of the muscle.
A piece of the ramus of the jaw is next to be removed, but without
injuring the vessels and nerves in contact with the inner surface.
For this purpose, saw across the bone close to the condyle, and
again close above the dental foramen on the inner surface. The
handle of the scalpel may be inserted beneath the bone and carried
downwards to the entrance of the foramen, to make the dental
vessels and nerve secure from injury. The masseteric artery and
nerve are liable to be cut in sawing the bone ; should these be divided, turn them upwards for the present, and afterwards unite
the ends. Take away now the loose piece of bone, and free the
80 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Position ofthe
after rethe jaw.
subjacent parts from cellular membrane, but be careful of the thin
membrane of the internal lateral ligament which is beneath the
jaw.
On the removal of the fat the pterygoid muscles will appear, the parts external being directed outwards to the condyle of the jaw, and
moval of the internal, which is parallel in direction to the masseter, being
inclined to the angle of the jaw. Many vessels and nerves will be
found in this region, with the following position to other parts.
Crossing inwards over the external pterygoid muscle is the internal maxillary artery, which distributes offsets upwards and
downwards ; sometimes this artery will be placed beneath the
muscle. Escaping from beneath the lower border of the same
muscle are the large dental and gustatory nerves, the latter being
the more internal of the two ; and appearing between the upper
border ofthe muscle and the cranium, are the masseteric and deep
temporal nerves. The buccal branch of nerve perforates the fibres
of the external pterygoid near its inner attachment. Branches of
the artery accompany these nerves. At the anterior part of the
space now dissected, coursing along the posterior part of the upper
jaw, is the small superior dental nerve with an artery. And between the jaws is the whitish narrow band ofthe pterygo- maxillary
ligament, to which the buccinator and superior constrictor muscles are connected.
External pteryis horibeneath
Attach- ments.
The EXTERNAL PTERYGOID MUSCLE extends almost horigoid zontally from the zygomatic fossa to the condyle of the lower
zontal jaw. Its origin is from the wing of the sphenoid bone, below
the jaw. the crest on it, and from the upper margin of the sphenomaxillary fissure ; also from the outer aspect of the external
pterygoid plate, and the tuberosity of the palate bone. The
fibres are directed outwards and somewhat backwards, those
attached to the margin of the fissure forming at first a separate bundle, and are inserted into the condyle and the interarticular cartilage of the lower jaw. Externally the muscle
is concealed by the temporal muscle and the lowerjaw, and the
internal maxillary artery lies on it. By the deep surface it is
in contact with the inferior maxillary nerve, a plexus of veins,
and the internal lateral ligament. The parts in contact with
the borders of the muscle have been enumerated in the dissection of the region.
Inser- tion .
Contigu- ous parts.
Internal ptery- goid is
The INTERNAL PTERYGOID MUSCLE is nearly parallel to the
ramus of the jaw, and its fibres are longer than those of the
PTERYGO-MAXILLARY REGION : THE JOINT. 81
the rathe jaw ;
and
around.
preceding muscle. Arising from the pterygoid fossa, but beneath
chiefly from the inner aspect of the external pterygoid plate, mus of
the fibres descend to be inserted into the angle and part of the
ramus of the jaw. On the muscle are placed the dental and vessels
gustatory nerves, the dental artery, and the internal lateral nerves
ligament. The deep surface is in connection with the superior constrictor, and at its origin with the tensor palati.
Before proceeding farther in the dissection, the student
should examine the anatomy of the articulation of the lower
jaw.
-
lower TEMPORO- MAXILLARY ARTICULATION. In this joint the Joint of
condyle of the jaw is received into the anterior hollow of the jaw.
glenoid fossa of the temporal bone. The following ligaments
are concerned in uniting the bones ; but the bones are retained
in contact chiefly by the strong muscles of the lower jaw.
lateral The external lateral is a short, weak, ligamentous band, External
which is attached above to the tubercle at the bifurcation of and
the root of the zygoma, and below to the outer side of the
neck of the inferior maxilla.
lateral
ment.
The internal lateral ligament is a long, thin, membranous internal
band, which is not in contact with the joint. Superiorly it ligais connected by a pointed piece to the spinous process of the
sphenoid bone, and inferiorly is inserted into the orifice of
the dental canal in the lower jaw. This ligament lies beneath
the ramus of the jaw, between it and the internal pterygoid
muscle, and its origin is concealed by the external pterygoid
muscle. Between the ligament and the jaw is the internal
maxillary artery.
Besides these ligaments there are some scattered fibres Capsule.
surrounding the articulation, which serve the purpose of a
capsular membrane.
-
tion. Dissection. Remove the external lateral ligament and capsule Dissec
of the joint, and an inter-articular cartilage, with a synovial membrane above and below it, will be exposed.
carti- The inter-articular fibro- cartilage is adapted to the sur- Fibrofaces of the bones. It is elongated transversely, is thin- lage ;
ner in the centre than at the margins, and an aperture is
sometimes present in the middle. The upper surface fits its form
into the glenoid fossa, being concavo-convex from before
G
82 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
and attach- ments.
Two sy- novial mem- branes.
Stylo- maxilment.
backwards, and the lower is moulded to the convexity of
the condyle of the jaw. Externally it is connected with the
external lateral ligament, and in front the external pterygoid
muscle is attached to it.
Two synovial membranes are present in the articulation—
one above, and one below the fibro- cartilage. The lower
one, besides investing the surfaces of the bone and cartilage,
extends from the condyle to the surface of the jaw.
Another structure the stylo-maxillary ligament --- is
lary liga- described as a uniting band to this articulation. This is a
process of the deep cervical fascia, which extends from the
styloid process to the lower part of the ramus of the jaw.
The piece of fascia here referred to has been seen to separate
the parotid and sub-maxillary glands, and it gives attachment to the stylo -glossus muscle.
Dissec- tion .
Internal maxiltery .
Dissection. -Disarticulate the condyle of the jaw, still keeping
the external pterygoid muscle attached to it, and draw both forwards ; but in cutting through the ligaments be careful of the auriculo - temporal nerve close beneath. By the cautious removal of
some cellular membrane the dissector will find the trunk and
branches of the inferior maxillary nerve, and the small chorda
tympani joining the posterior part of the gustatory nerve near the skull. The small muscular branches of the fifth nerve should be
traced to the trunk in the foramen ovale of the sphenoid bone, and
the auriculo- temporal nerve should be followed backwards with care
behind the articulation . The middle meningeal artery ascends beneath the external pterygoid, and oftentimes the trunk of the internal maxillary artery will be found beneath that muscle. The
external pterygoid muscle is to remain uncut.
The INTERNAL MAXILLARY ARTERY is one of the terminal
lary ar- branches of the external carotid, and takes a winding course
beneath the lower jawand the temporal muscle to the sphenomaxillary fossa, where it ends in branches for the face, the
interior of the nose, and the palate.
and con- Course At first the artery is directed inwards beneath the jaw, benections. tween the bone and the internal lateral ligament of the joint,
and crosses the dental nerve. The vessel then winds over
the external pterygoid muscle, being placed between it and the
temporal muscle. And, lastly, the artery enters the spheno-
PTERYGO-MAXILLARY REGION : VESSELS.
888 83
maxillary fossa, between the processes of origin of the external pterygoid muscle. The course of the artery may be
divided into three parts : one beneath the jaw, a second between the muscles, and a third in the spheno- maxillary
fossa.
es are
sets .
The branches of this artery are very numerous, and are Branchclassed into three sets, corresponding to the divisions made three
in the artery : thus, one set arises beneath the jaw, another
beneath the temporal muscle, and another in the sphenomaxillary fossa.
beneath'
A. Two branches leave the internal maxillary artery, Those
whilst it is in connection with the ramus of the jaw, viz. the the jaw
inferior dental and middle meningeal.
are
dental ;
1. The inferior dental branch descends between the internal inferior
lateral ligament and the jaw, and entering the foramen on the inner
surface of the ramus, with the dental nerve, supplies the teeth.
branch As this artery is about to enter the foramen it furnishes a small twig, has a
mylo-hyoid branch, to the muscle of that name : this is conducted by a to mylo- groove on the inner surface of the bone, with a branch from the dental hyoid muscle ;
nerve, to the superficial surface of the mylo-hyoid muscle, where it
anastomoses with the submental artery.
menintery
2. The middle or great meningeal artery is the largest branch, Middle and arises opposite the preceding one. It ascends beneath the ex- geal arternal pterygoid muscle, crossing the internal lateral ligament, and
enters the skull through the foramen spinosum of the sphenoid
bone. When in the skull the artery ends in branches which ascend ends in
to the vertex of the head, supplying the bone and the dura mater
(p.15. ). Before the meningeal artery enters the skull, it furnishes but gives
the two following small branches.
skull,
a. The tympanic branch enters the tympanum through the Glasse- branch
rian fissure, and is distributed in that cavity, anastomosing with the to tymother arterial branches of the part.
panum,
b. The small meningeal branch arises also near the skull and passes to me- ninges.
through the foramen ovale with the inferior maxillary nerve ; supplies the dura mater in the middle fossa of the skull.
es of
part are
B. The branches from the second part of the artery, viz. Branchwhilst it is between the muscles, are altogether muscular in second
their destination, and are named temporal, masseteric, buccal,
and pterygoid.
1. The deep temporal arteries are two in number (anterior and to the temporal posterior), and each occupies the part of the temporal fossa indicated muscle;
G 2
84 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
to the masse- ter ;
to the buccina- tor ;
to ptery- goid
by its name. They ascend beneath the temporal muscle, and
anastomose with the superficial temporal artery. The anterior
also communicates, through the malar bone, with branches of the
lachrymal artery.
2. The masseteric artery is directed outwards with the nerve of
the same name behind the tendon of the temporal muscle, and
passing through the sigmoid notch, enters the under- surface of the
masseter muscle. Its branches of distribution anastomose with the
other branches to the muscle from the external carotid trunk.
3. The buccal branch quits the artery near the upper jaw ; it then
descends beneath the coronoid process with its companion nerve,
and is distributed to the buccinator muscle and the side ofthe face,
where it joins the branches of the facial artery.
4. The pterygoid branches are uncertain in their position ; they
muscles. are derived either from the trunk or some of the branches of the
internal maxillary, and enter the pterygoid muscles.
Branch- es of third part,
only one now seen.
dental.
C. Of the branches that arise from the artery when it is
about to enter, or has entered the spheno-maxillary fossa, only
one, the superior dental, will be now described ; the remainder will be examined with the superior maxillary nerve
and Meckel's ganglion ; they are infra- orbital, superior palatine, pterygo-palatine, spheno-palatine, and vidian.
Superior 1. The superior or posterior dental branch arises near the upper
maxillary bone, and descends with a tortuous course on the outer
surface of that bone, along with a small branch of the superior maxillary nerve. Offsets enter the foramina in the bone, and supply
upper molar and bicuspid teeth, whilst others are furnished to the gums. Some branches reach the lining membrane of the
antrum.
Internal maxillaplexus
goid),
the
The INTERNAL MAXILLARY VEIN receives the veins corryvein responding to the branches of the artery in the first two
begins in parts of its course. The different veins of this region form
(ptery- a plexus (pterygoid) between the two pterygoid muscles, and
in part between the temporal and external pterygoid muscles.
This plexus communicates with the facial vein by a large
branch (alveolar), and with the cavernous sinus in the interior of the skull, by means of branches that pass through
and ends apertures in the base of the cranium. Escaping from the
nal jugu- plexus, the vein accompanies the artery to the parotid gland,
in which it joins the superficial temporal vein, the union of
the two giving rise to the external jugular vein.
in exterlar.
PTERYGO-MAXILLARY REGION : NERVES. 85
-
maxilvaries
and in its
Peculiarities of the vessels. · The position of the internal maxillary Internal
artery is sometimes beneath, instead of over the external pterygoid lary
muscle. In such instances the artery gains the spheno-maxillary fossa in its
by coming forwards between the origin of the muscle that covers it. position,
When the vessel has this unusual position some of the branches are branchaltered with respect to the muscles ; for the posterior of the two temporal branches lies over, whilst the anterior is beneath the pterygoid
muscle, and the buccal branch pierces the fibres of that muscle.
es.
maxillaof a musThe INFERIOR MAXILLARY NERVE is the largest of the three Inferior
trunks arising from the Gasserian ganglion of the fifth nerve, ry nerve
and resembles a spinal nerve in possessing fibrils with both
motor and sensory power (see p. 17. ) . The nerve leaves the consists
skull by the foramen ovale in the sphenoid bone, and divides cular and
into two chief parts beneath the external pterygoid muscle : part.
an anterior, small, or muscular part ; and a large, posterior,
or sensory part.
sensory
lar divi- A. The SMALL DIVISION receives nearly all the fibres of Muscuthe motor root of the nerve, and ends in branches to the sion
muscles of the pterygo-maxillary region, viz. temporal, masseteric, buccinator, and pterygoid. These branches are suffi- supplies
ciently exposed by the dissection of the arteries which they branches
accompany ; but should the internal maxillary artery obstruct the view of them, it may be taken away.
four
to
muscle :
two in
1. The deep temporal branches are furnished to the temporal temporal
muscle. Like the arteries, they are two in number, anterior and
posterior. From their origin these nerves course upwards along number,
the outer surface of the skull, passing first beneath the external
pterygoid, and, lastly, beneath the temporal muscle.
and The posterior branch is the smallest, and is often derived from the posterior
masseteric nerve ; it is near the back of the temporal fossa.
The anterior branch supplies the greater part of the muscle, and anterior.
usually communicates with the buccal nerve.
ter.
2. The masseteric branch takes at first a backward direction above Massethe external pterygoid muscle, and then a horizontal one, behind
the temporal muscle and through the sigmoid notch, to the undersurface ofthe masseter muscle. In the masseter the nerve can be
followed to near the anterior border. As this branch passes by
the articulation of the jaw it gives one or more twigs to that joint.
3. The buccal branch is longer than the others, and perforating Buccinathe external pterygoid near its inner attachment, is directed inwards, beneath the coronoid process and the temporal muscle, to
tor.
G 3
86 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
This branch ends in two parts,
upper and
lower.
Branch- es to pterythe surface of the buccinator, where it ends in two terminal
branches. As the nerve perforates the pterygoid muscle filaments
are given to the substance ; and after it has passed through the
fibres, it furnishes a branch to the temporal muscle, which frequently joins the deep temporal nerve (anterior) . Some offsets
are likewise distributed to the upper part of the buccinator muscle
and to the mucous membrane lining it .
a. The upper branch of distribution reaches the upper part of the
buccinator muscle, and communicates with the facial nerve around the
facial vein.
b. The lower branch is in direction the continuation of the nerve. Its
branches are inclined towards the angle of the mouth, supplying the
integument, and the buccinator muscle and the lining mucous membrane.
This branch is united freely with the facial nerve, and forms a kind
of plexus.
4. The pterygoid branches are supplied to the muscles of that name. The branch or branches to the external pterygoid enter goid muscles. the under- surface, but the nerve to the internal pterygoid is placed
trunk of
maxilon the pharyngeal aspect of that muscle close to the skull : this
last will be given in the dissection of the otie ganglion, Section 14.
Sensory B. The LARGE BRANCH OF DIVISION of the inferior maxinferior illary nerve ends in three large trunks, auriculo-temporal,
lary. dental, and gustatory nerves. A few of the fibres of the
Conveys small ( motor) root of the fifth are applied to this trunk, and
fibres. are conveyed by it to certain muscles, viz. circumflexus
palati, tensor tympani, and mylo- hyoideus.
a
motor
Auricu- lo- tem- poral division
neath jaw,
A. The AURICULO-TEMPORAL NERVE arises near the base
of the skull, and oftentimes by two roots. Its course to the
surface of the head is first backwards beneath the external
lies be- pterygoid, as far as the inner part of the articulation of the
jaw ; and then upwards with the temporal artery in front of
the ear, and beneath the parotid gland. In this course the
nerve furnishes branches to the surrounding parts, viz. the
joint, the ear, the parotid gland, and communicates also with
the facial nerve. Its ramifications on the head are described
and pliessup- at page 6. Its branches in the part now dissected are the branch- following :
es,
to join facial ;
a. Branches communicating with the facial nerve. Two or more
branches connect the auriculo-temporal with the facial nerve, and these
usually surround the external carotid artery.
PTERYGO-MAXILLARY REGION : NERVES. 87
meatus b. Branches of the meatus auditorius and articulation. - From the point tothe
of union of the branches of the facial with the auriculo-temporal nerve,
two offsets are directed to the interior of the auditory meatus, between
the cartilage and the bone. The branch of nerve to the articulation of and joint ofjaw ;
the jaw is supplied from the trunk of the auriculo- temporal near the
same spot, or from the branches of it to the meatus.
to the c. The inferior auricular branch supplies the parts of the external ear a branch
below the meatus auditorius. This branch also furnishes offsets along ear, and
the internal maxillary artery, which communicate on it with the sympathetic nerve.
d. Parotid branches.
stance of the gland.
- These are small filaments that enter the sub- parotid branch- es .
dental
tween
goid
B. The INFERIOR DENTAL NERVE is the largest of the three Inferior
trunks, into which the inferior maxillary nerve divides, and
it enters the canal in the lower jaw. At first the nerve lies is be.
beneath the external pterygoid muscle, where it is external pteryin position to the gustatory ; and is afterwards placed on the muscles,
internal pterygoid, and near the dental foramen, on the internal lateral ligament. After the nerve enters the bone, it is and supcontinued forwards beneath the teeth to the foramen in the teeth :
side of the jaw, and ends at that spot by dividing into an
incisor and a labial branch. Only one other muscular branch
(mylo-hyoid) is supplied by the dental nerve. Its branches
are :-
plies
branchto a. The mylo-hyoid branch arises from the trunk of the nerve as also
this is about to enter its foramen, and is continued along a groove mylo- hyoide- on the inner aspect of the ramus of the jaw, to the cutaneous
surface of the mylo-hyoideus and the anterior belly of the digastric
muscle.
us.
branches b. The dental branches arise in the bone and supply the fangs ofDenta!
the molar and bicuspid teeth. If the bone is soft, the canal con- to grind
taining the nerve and artery may be laid open so as to expose
these branches.
ing
c. The incisor branch continues the trunk of the nerve onwards and cut- ting to the middle line, and furnishes offsets to the canine and incisor teeth.
teeth, beneath which it lies ,
of lower d. The labial branch (mental ?) issues on the face beneath the Branch
depressor of the angle of the mouth. At first it communicates lip.
with the facial nerve, and gives branches to the muscle that covers
it, also to the orbicularis and the integuments. But the greater
part ofthe nerve is directed upwards, beneath the depressor labii G 4
88 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Dental artery
has an
incisor and
labial branch .
Gustato- ry nerve
to
1
inferioris, and is distributed on the inner and outer surfaces of the
lower lip.
The inferior dental artery, after entering the lower jaw
with the nerve, has the same course and distribution. Thus
it supplies dental branches to the molar and bicuspid teeth,
and ends anteriorly in an incisor and a labial branch.
The incisor branch is continued to the symphysis of the jaw, beneath
the canine and incisor teeth, which it supplies, and anastomoses with
the artery of the opposite side.
b. The labial brunch, after it has left the bone, ramifies in the structures covering the lower jaw, and communicates with the branches of
the facial artery.
C. The GUSTATORY or LINGUAL NERVE is the remaining
part of the inferior maxillary, and is concealed at first, like
courses the others, by the external pterygoid muscle. It is then
tongue ; directed inwards over the internal pterygoid muscle, and
under cover of the side of the jaw to the tongue. The remainder of this nerve will be seen in the dissection of the
submaxillary region.
nobranch here,
but is joined by chorda tympani.
cupying the re- gion.
In this extent of the nerve there is not any branch of distribution, but a communicating branch ( chorda tympani) is
received by it.
The chorda tympani is a branch of the facial nerve which crosses
the tympanum, and leaves the cavity by an aperture near the
Glasserian fissure. This small nerve is then inclined forwards to
join the gustatory nerve at an acute angle, beneath the external
pterygoid muscle. From the point of junction some fibres are
prolonged on the gustatory to the submaxillary ganglion .
SECTION VII.
SUBMAXILLARY REGION.
Parts oc- THE part to which the term submaxillary region is applied,
is placed between the jaw and the hyoid bone. In it will be
found the small muscles between the os hyoides and the jaw
and tongue, the vessels and nerves of the tongue, and the
sublingual and submaxillary glands.
Dissec- tion. Dissection.In this dissection the position of the neck is the
same as for the examination of the anterior triangle. The parts
SUBMAXILLARY REGION. 89
should have been cleaned with the triangular space ; but if any
cellular membrane is left on the submaxillary gland, or the mylohyoid muscle, let it be taken away.
tion
nections
The submaxillary gland lies below the jaw in the anterior Situapart of the space limited by it and the digastric muscle. Its
shape is irregular, and the facial artery winds over the surface. The gland rests on the mylo-hyoid muscle, and sends and cona process round the posterior or free border. In front of it is
the anterior belly of the digastric, and behind it is the stylo- of submaxillary ligament, separating it from the parotid. Occu- ry gland.
pying this position, somewhat beneath the side of the jaw,
the gland is very near the surface, being covered only by the
integuments and platysma, and by the deep fascia.
In structure, the submaxillary resembles the parotid gland,
and its duct (duct of Wharton) extends beneath the mylohyoid muscle to the mouth.
―
maxilla.
tion.
Dissection. To expose the mylo-hyoid muscle, detach the an- Dissecterior belly ofthe digastric from the jaw and throw it downwards ;
dislodge also the submaxillary gland from its position under the jaw.
from
into
bone.
The MYLO- HYOID MUSCLE is triangular in shape, with the Mylo- hyoideus base at the jaw and the apex at the hyoid bone, and unites
along the middle line with its fellow of the opposite side. It arises
arises from the ridge ( mylo-hyoid) on the inner surface of jaw ;
the jaw, and is inserted into the body of the hyoid bone, as inserted
well as into a central line between the jaw and that bone. hyoid
On the cutaneous surface are the digastric muscle, the submaxillary gland, the facial artery with its submental branch,
and the branch of nerve and artery to the muscle. Its fibres
are frequently deficient near the jaw, and allow the next
muscle to appear. Only the posterior border is unattached, Parts
and round it turns a piece of the submaxillary gland. The it.
parts in contact with the deep surface of the muscle will be
perceived after the following dissection has been made :
-
around
tion, to Dissection. The student is now to expose the deep muscles, and Dissecto trace the vessels and nerves to the substance of the tongue. doch
For this purpose cut through the facial vessels on the jaw, and re- mylomove them with a superficial part of the submaxillary gland, but
be careful to leave the deep part of the gland that turns beneath
hyoid.
90 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
To see deep
the mylo-hyoideus. Detach the mylo-hyoid from the jaw and from
its fellow, and cut through the small branch of artery and nerve
on its surface ; then throw down the muscle to the os hyoides, but
without injuring the genio-hyoid muscle beneath it.
Next the lower jaw is to be sawn through rather on the right
muscles side of its symphysis, after the soft parts covering it are divided .
The side of the jaw, which will then be loose, for the ramus of the
bone has been previously cut, is neither to be taken away, nor to be
separated from the mucous membrane of the mouth. To enable
the dissector to raise upwards this detached piece of bone, seize the
apex of the tongue, draw it well out of the mouth over the upper
teeth, and fasten it in that position with a stitch ; then sink the
scalpel between the cut surfaces of the bone to divide a strong
band ofthe mucous membrane of the mouth, and carry the knife
onwards along the middle line of the tongue to its tip. The detached piece of the jaw can now be easily turned upwards, and it
is to be fastened in that position with a stitch.
and nerves.
Partsbe- neath mylo- hyoid
of neck,
By means of a hook, the os hyoides may be drawn down, and the
muscular fibres made tense. Remove nowthe cellular membrane,
taking care ofthe Whartonian duct, and of the hypo-glossal nerve and
its branches, that lie on the hyo-glossus muscle ; also ofthe gustatory nerve nearer the jaw, with its small ganglion close to the submaxillary gland. The ranine vessels and the gustatory nerve
should also be traced along the under part of the tongue.
The following is the position of the parts brought into
view after the removal of the mylo- hyoid muscle. Extending from the cornu of the hyoid bone to the side of the
tongue is the hyo-glossus muscle, whose fibres are crossed
on side superiorly by those of the stylo-glossus. On the hyo-glossus,
from below upwards, are placed the hypo-glossal nerve, the
Whartonian duct, and the gustatory nerve, the latter crossing
the duct ; and near the inner border of that muscle the two
nerves are united by branches. Beneath the same muscle is
the lingual artery with its vein. Above the hyo-glossus is
the mucous membrane of the mouth, with the sublingual
gland attached to it in front, and some fibres of the superior
constrictor muscle covering it behind near the jaw.
and along
line.
Between the chin and the os hyoides, along the middle line,
middle is the genio-hyoid muscle ; and larger and deeper than this is
a fan-shaped muscle, the genio-hyo-glossus. Along the outer
side of the last muscle lie the ranine vessels ; and a sub-
SUBMAXILLARY REGION : MUSCLES. 91
lingual branch of the gland springs from the lingual artery.
On the under aspect of the tongue, near the margin, is the
gustatory nerve ; and in the fibres of the genio-hyo-glossus,
the hypo-glossal nerve.
from
ment ;
The HYO-GLOSSUS MUSCLE is thin and somewhat of a Hyo- glossus square shape. The muscle arises from the body and cornua
ofthe os hyoides, and is inserted into the side of the tongue,
its fibres mingling with those of the stylo-glossus and lin- is named
gualis. The parts in contact with one aspect of the hyo- attachglossus have been already enumerated ; and those beneath
the muscle are part of the genio- hyo-glossus and the superior
constrictor, with the lingual artery. Along the anterior is in conborder is the genio-hyo-glossus muscle, and beneath the pos- many
terior pass the lingual artery, the glosso- pharyngeal nerve,
and the stylo-hyoid ligament.
tact with
parts.
The STYLO-GLOSSUS is a slender muscle, whose attachments Stylo- glossus are expressed by its name. Arising from the styloid process
near the apex, and from the stylo-maxillary ligament, the
muscle is inserted into the side of the tongue with the pre- comes to
ceding, and also sends forwards a band of fibres to the tip of tongue.
that body. This muscle lies between the carotid arteries,
and below the jaw it is crossed by the gustatory nerve.
side of
middle
The GENIO-HYOID MUSCLE arises from the lower of the two Genio- hyoideus tubercles on the inner aspect of the symphysis of the jaw,
and is inserted into the middle part ofthe hyoid bone. is along
Covered bythe mylo-hyoideus, this muscle rests on the genio- line of
hyo-glossus. The inner border is close to its fellow of the
opposite side, and the two are often united.
neck.
hyonected
chin ,
The GENIO-HYO- GLOSSUS is the largest muscle of this Genioregion, and is in contact along the middle line with the cor- glossus
responding muscle of the other side. It takes origin from
the upper tubercle behind the symphysis of the jaw. From is conthis spot the fibres radiate to their insertion into the hyoid with
bone (the small cornu ), and the whole length of the tongue, hyoid
from root to point. Lying along the middle of the tongue, and
and in contact with its fellow, except near the os hyoides
where a small interval exists, the lower border of the muscle Contigucorresponds to the genio-hyoideus, and the upper to the parts.
frænum linguæ. On its outer side are the ranine vessels and
bone,
tongue.
ous
92 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Lingual artery
to the
beneath hyothe hyo-glossus muscle, and the ninth nerve perforates the
posterior fibres.
The lingual artery is one of the anterior branches of the
external carotid, and arises between the superior thyroid and
ascends facial branches. At first it is directed inwards above the os
tongue hyoides, but is afterwards inclined slightly upwards beneath
the hyo-glossus to the under part of the tongue, and ends at glossus. the anterior border of that muscle, in the sublingual and
ranine branches. Before reaching the hyo-glossus, the artery
is superficial, though it is crossed near that muscle by the
ninth nerve, and by the digastric and stylo-hyoid muscles.
Beneath the hyo- glossus, the vessel rests on the superior
constrictor and genio-hyo-glossus muscles, and is situate
Its below the level of the glosso- pharyngeal nerve. Its branches
are these :
Branches areto hyoid bone ;
to back oftongue ;
to the sublin- gual gland.
to the subtongue.
A small hyoid branch is distributed along the upper border of the os
hyoides, anastomosing with the one of the opposite side, and with the
hyoid branch of the superior thyroid artery.
The fibres Abranch to the dorsum of the tongue arises beneath the hyo-glossus
muscle, and ascends to supply the substance of that organ.
of the muscle must be divided to see it.
The sublingual branch springs from the final division of the artery at
the edge ofthe hyo- glossus, and is then directed outwards to the gland from which it takes its name. Some branches also supply the gums
and the mylo-hyoid muscle, and one offset continues behind the incisor
teeth to join a similar artery from the other side.
The ranine branch is the terminal part of the lingual artery, and
stance of extends forwards along the outer side of the genio- hyo-glossus to
the tip of the tongue, where it ends by anastomosing with the
artery of the other side of the body. Muscular offsets are furnished This lies to the substance of the tongue. This artery corresponds to the along frænum. frænum linguæ, near the tip of the tongue, but is close to the muscular fibres.
Lingual vein.
Lingual nerve
The lingual vein commences both on the upper and under surfaces ofthe tongue. It accompanies the artery of the same name,
and ends in the internal jugular vein.
The GUSTATORY or LINGUAL NERVE has been followed in
the pterygo-maxillary region to its passage between the
ramus of the lower jaw and the internal pterygoid muscle.
In this dissection the nerve is seen to be inclined forwards
tongue to the side of the tongue over the mucous membrane of the
along side of
SUBMAXILLARY REGION : NERVES. 93
mouth and the origin of the superior constrictor muscle, and
above the deep part of the submaxillary gland. Lastly, the
nerve is directed along the side of the tongue to the apex
across the Whartonian duct. In this region the gustatory
nerve is separated altogether from the cavity of the mouth
by the layer of mucous membrane. Branches are furnished gives
to the surrounding parts, thus : —
these branches
ganglion,
Two or more branches connect it with the submaxillary ganglion, to the
near the gland of that name.
ninth Farther forwards branches descend on the hyo- glossus to unite in a to join
kind of plexus with twigs ofthe hypo- glossal nerve. nerve,
Other filaments are supplied to the mucous membrane of the mouth, to muthe gums, and the sublingual gland.
cous mem- brane,
papillæ.
Lastly the branches of the tongue ascend through the muscular to the
substance, and are distributed to the conical and fungiform
papillæ.
maxillaglion
three
fibrils ,
unite it
Submaxillary ganglion.-Closely connected with the gus- Subtatory nerve is this little ganglion, which resembles the other ry gan.
ganglia in communication with the three trunks of the fifth
nerve, in the fact of having filaments of union with sensory,
motory, and sympathetic nerves. It is a small reddish body, contains
about the size of the lenticular ganglion, and is placed above sets of
the deep process of the submaxillary gland. From the which
upper part offsets proceed to connect it with other nerves,
and from the lower part the branches of distribution arise.
Connection with nerves roots. Two or three branches, in the form with gusof loops, pass from the ganglion to the gustatory nerve.
At the pos- facial,
terior part, the ganglion is further joined by the chorda tympani (of and symthe facial nerve) , which is prolonged to it in contact with the gustatory. nerves.
And its sympathetic branch comes from the nerves around the facial
artery.
-
-
tatory,
pathetic
es to Branches of distribution. From the lower part of the ganglion five Branchor six branches descend to the substance of the submaxillary gland ; gland
and from the anterior part other large filaments are furnished to the and mumucous membrane of the mouth and to the Whartonian duct.
cous mem- brane.
nerve,
the chin
The HYPO-GLOSSAL or NINTH NERVE, after crossing the side Ninth
of the neck and the anterior triangle ( p. 73. ), enters between between
the small muscles of the submaxillary region. Here the and hynerve lies on the hyo-glossus muscle, being concealed by the
mylo-hyoideus ; but at the inner border of the hyo- glossus
oid bone
94 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
middle of
it enters the fibres of the genio-hyo-glossus, and is continued
is lost in along the middle line of the tongue to the apex. The
tongue. position of the ninth nerve is in the centre of the tongue,
whilst the gustatory lies near the margin ; the ninth supplies
branches to the muscular structure, and the gustatory ends
chiefly in the papillæ.
Its branches
muscles
Branches. On the hyo-glossus the ninth nerve furnishes branches
supply to the muscles of the submaxillary region, except the mylo-hyoid, viz.
to the hyo-glossus, stylo-glossus, genio-hyoideus, and genio-hyo-glossus.
Further, some offsets ascend on the hyo-glossus to communicate with
the gustatory nerve. Along the middle of the tongue the nerve sends
upwards long filaments with the branches of the ranine artery, that
and the supply the structure of the tongue, and communicate with the gustatory tongue.
Whar- ton's duct
frænum
nerve.
The duct of the submaxillary gland, or Wharton's duct,
issues from the deep part of the glandular mass that turns
round the border of the mylo-hyoid muscle. It is about two
inches in length, and is directed upwards on the hyo-glossus
opens by muscle, and beneath the gustatory nerve, to open on the side
linguæ. of the frænum linguæ, in the centre of an eminence. The
duct consists of a thin, fibrous, and a mucous coat, and its
opening in the mouth will be seen if a bristle is passed along
it. The deep part of the submaxillary gland extends, in
some instances, even to the sublingual gland.
Struc- ture.
Sublin- gual gland
is be- neath
The sublingual gland is somewhat of the shape of an
almond, and the longest measurement, which is about one
inch and a half, is directed backwards. It is situate beneath
tongue. the anterior part of the tongue, in contact with the inner
surface of the lower jaw, close to the symphysis. Separated
from the cavity of the mouth by the mucous membrane, the
gland is prolonged across the upper border of the genio-hyoglossus muscle, so as to touch the one of the opposite side.
Struc- ture.
Ducts open in mouth.
The sublingual resembles the other salivary glands in its
composition. The ducts of the lobules (ductus Riviniani)
are from eight to twenty in number, of which some open
beneath the tongue along a crescentic shaped fold of the
mucous membrane ; but others join the Whartonian duct,
and one or more form a larger tube, that either joins that
duct or opens near it.
SUPERIOR MAXILLARY NERVE AND VESSELS. 95
SECTION VIII.
SUPERIOR MAXILLARY NERVE AND VESSELS.
THE maxilla- remaining trunk of the fifth nerve, viz. superior maxil- Superior
lary, is now seen most conveniently after the dissection of ry nerve
the pterygo-maxillary and sub-maxillary regions.
next.
tion.
Dissection. The superior maxillary division of the fifth nerve, Dissecin its course to the face, is placed in the skull, in the spheno- maxillary fossa, and below the orbit ; and to expose the nerve, it will be
necessary to open the skull, fossa, and orbit. The orbit is supposed
to be opened ; but if it is not, see the dissection necessary for that
step. To trace the nerve in the other two parts, make the following dissection -with a chisel, cut from the inside along the
middle fossa of the base of the skull, as far back as the foramen
spinosum, and then saw through the side of the skull to meet the
end of that cut. Afterwards, with a bone forceps, divide the outer
wall of the orbit into the spheno- maxillary fissure. The piece of
bone forming part of the skull and orbit is now loose, and is to be
removed with the temporal muscle. The nerve is partly seen as it
crosses the spheno- maxillary fossa ; but to bring it more completely
into view, take away some of the sphenoid bone bounding the fossa,
leaving only an osseous ring around the nerve at its exit from the
skull. In the fat of the fossa the nerve gives off the orbital branch,
branches to Meckel's ganglion, and dental branches. Trace onwards the nerve in the floor of the orbit, and follow it through the
infra- orbital foramen to the face. Near the front of the orbit the
anterior dental branch is to be traced downwards for some distance
in the bone.
maxilla- The SUPERIOR MAXILLARY NERVE commences in the Gas- Upper
serian ganglion (p. 17. ), and leaves the cranium by the fora- ry nerve
men rotundum. The course of the nerve is then almost passes to face,
straight to the face, along the orbital aspect of the superior
maxilla. Outside the cranium the nerve is first placed across
the spheno-maxillary fossa, and it afterwards enters the through
infra-orbital canal. Issuing from the canal by the infra- orbital
orbital foramen, the nerve is concealed by the elevator of the
upper lip, and ends in branches to the eyelid, nose, and upper where it
lip. It furnishes the following branches :
: --
infracanal,
ends.
96 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Its branches are to orbit,
to the nose and palate,
to the posterior teeth ,
and buc1. The orbital branch arises in the spheno-maxillary fossa, and
enters the orbit through the fissure of the same name ; it divides
into a malar and a temporal branch (see p. 47.).
2. The spheno-palatine branches descend also from the nerve in
the fossa, and supply the nose and palate : these are connected with
Meckel's ganglion, and will be dissected with it .
3. Two posterior dental branches leave the trunk of the nerve
near the upper jaw. One is distributed to the buccinator muscle
cinator, and the gums. The other enters a canal in the upper maxilla, and
supplies branches to the molar teeth and the lining membrane of
the antrum ; it joins the anterior dental branch soon after entering
the bone, and again near the teeth.
to ante- rior teeth.
Infra- orbital
4. The anterior dental branch quits the trunk of the nerve in the
floor of the orbit, and descends to the anterior teeth in a special
canal in front of the antrum. It is distributed by two branches.
One (the inner) gives filaments to the incisor and canine teeth, and
furnishes, moreover, one or two filaments to the lower meatus of
the nose ; the other (outer) ends by supplying the bicuspid teeth.
5. Infra- orbital or facial branches . — These are larger than the
branches other offsets of the nerve, and form its terminal ramifications.
Some incline inwards to the side of the nose, and the rest descend
to the upper lip. These branches are crossed near the orbit by nerve, branches of the facial nerve, with which they communicate, the
ply side union forming the infra- orbital plexus ( p. 37.) .
join facial
and supof nose
and up- per lip.
Branch ofeyelid.
Infra- orbital artery
a. The branches to the side of the nose supply the muscular and tegumentary structures and join the nasal nerve.
b. The branches to the upper lip are three or four in number, and are
distributed chiefly to the surfaces of the lip, though they supply also
the labial glands and the muscles.
6. Before the nerve ends in the facial branches, it supplies a small
palpebral branch to the lower eyelid ; this is directed upwards to the lid
in a groove in the margin of the orbit.
The infra-orbital is one of the terminal branches of the internal
maxillary artery in the spheno-maxillary fossa, and accompanies
the superior maxillary nerve. Taking the course of the nerve
through the infra- orbital canal, the artery appears in the face
beneath the elevator muscle of the upper lip, and ends in branches,
which are distributed, like the nerve, to the part of the face be- ends in tween the eye and the mouth. In the face, its branches anastomose
with the facial and buccal arteries.
face ;
has a
branch In the canal in the upper maxilla this artery furnishes branches to to orbit, the orbit.
and one Another branch, anterior dental, runs with the nerve of the same name,
DEEP VESSELS AND NERVES OF THE NECK. 97
or teeth.
and supplies the incisor and canine teeth. This gives branches to the to anteri
antrum of the maxilla, and near the teeth it anastomoses with the
posterior dental artery.
orbital The vein, along with the artery, communicates with the facial Infravein by means of the large alveolar branch ; for the last springs vein.
from the veins corresponding to the branches of the internal
maxillary artery in the spheno-maxillary fossa.
SECTION IX.
DEEP VESSELS AND NERVES OF THE NECK.
and
this secTHE position of the part is still the same, viz. the neck is to Vessels
be fixed over a small block. In this section are included the nerves in
deep styloid muscle, the internal carotid and ascending tion.
pharyngeal arteries, with the eighth, ninth, and sympathetic
nerves.
tion.
Dissection. —To expose the remaining styloid muscle, detach the Dissecposterior belly of the digastric and the stylo-hyoid muscle from
their origin, and throw both down. Let the student observe, at
the same time, the filament of the facial nerve perforating the
digastric muscle, and joining the glosso- pharyngeal nerve. Remove the trunk of the external carotid artery by cutting it through
where the hypo-glossal nerve crosses it, and dividing those branches
that have been already examined. The veins accompanying the
artery may also be taken away, if it is necessary. Clean then the
surface of the stylo- pharyngeus muscle and the glosso-pharyngeal
nerve in contact with it. The side of the jaw is still to remain
turned upwards, as in the dissection of the submaxillary region.
pharyn- The STYLO- PHARYNGEUS MUSCLE resembles the other sty- Styloloid muscles in its elongated form. The fibres arise from geus.
the root of the styloid process on its inner surface, and Origin.
descend between the superior and middle constrictors to be inserted partly into the pharynx and partly into the pos- Inserterior border of the thyroid cartilage. The muscle lies
below the stylo-glossus, between the carotid arteries, and the carotid
glosso pharyngeal nerve turns over the lower part of the
fleshy belly.
tion.
Is be- tween
arteries.
hyoid li- The stylo-hyoid ligament is a fibrous band that extends Stylofrom the tip of the styloid process to the small cornu of the gainent H
98 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
lies by side of
ing .
os hyoides. Its position is between the stylo-glossus and
preced- stylo-pharyngeus muscles, and over the internal carotid
artery. The lower end is beneath the hyo-glossus muscle ;
and to the posterior border the middle constrictor muscle is
attached. It is frequently cartilaginous or osseous in part of,
or in all its extent.
Dissec- tion of
in the neck ;
Dissection of the internal carotid. -Detach the styloid process at carotid its root, and throw it to the middle line with the attached muscles.
Follow upwards to the skull the internal carotid artery and jugular
vein, and clean away the dense fascia that conceals them ; but let
this be done carefully, so as not to injure the branches of the
eighth and ninth nerves, that are found in contact with the vessels
near the base of the skull . In the fascia, and superficial to the
artery, are the pharyngeal branch of the vagus (near the skull), and
the glosso- pharyngeal nerve and its branches, whilst the superior
laryngeal branch of the vagus is beneath the artery. Between the
vein and artery, near the skull, are the vagus and hypo- glossal
nerves ; and crossing backwards, over or under the vein, the spinal
accessory nerve. External to the position of the vessels will be
found a loop of the first and second cervical nerves over the transverse process of the atlas, which communicates with the large
ganglion ofthe sympathetic beneath the artery, and with the eighth
and ninth nerves. Ascending to the cranium, on the inner side of
the carotid, is the ascending pharyngeal artery.
in the temporal bone.
Piece of tympaTo open the carotid canal in the temporal bone, and to follow
the contained artery into the cranium, make the following cut
down the side of the skull : —place the saw behind the mastoid process, and cut forwards to the foramen spinosum in the wing of the
sphenoid bone (to which spot the side of the skull has been already
taken away) , the saw being directed through the stylo - mastoid
foramen, the root of the styloid process, and external to the jugular foramen and the carotid canal. When the piece of detached
bone is taken away, open the carotid canal with the bone forceps.
In dissecting the artery in the canal, large reddish branches of
the superior cervical ganglion of the sympathetic will be found
on it ; and with care two small filaments may be found, one from
Jacobson's nerve, joining the sympathetic at the posterior part
of the canal ; the other from the vidian nerve, at the front of the
canal.
On the piece of bone that is cut off, the dissector may expose
num ex- very readily the tympanum with its membrane, chain of bones, and posed.
chorda tympani nerve.
DEEP VESSELS OF THE NECK. 99
carotid
the skull.
The INTERNAL CAROTID ARTERY supplies the parts within Internal
the head, viz. the brain and the orbit, and takes its name
from its distribution. Springing from the bifurcation of the
common carotid trunk, this artery extends from the upper enters
border of the thyroid cartilage to the base of the skull, then
through the petrous portion of the temporal bone, and
lastly along the base of the skull to the anterior clinoid process, where it ends in branches for the brain. This winding Its
course of the artery may be divided into three parts :
one part in the neck, another inside the skull, and a third
in the temporal bone.
-
course is first
neck,
is superlow
above ;
Cervical part. -In the neck the artery ascends almost in the
vertically from its origin to the carotid canal, and is in contact with the pharynx on its inner side. Its depth from the
surface varies like the external carotid ; and the line of the
digastric muscle may be taken as the index of this difference.
Thus, below that muscle the internal carotid is superficial in where it
the anterior triangular space, being covered only by the ficial becommon teguments, fascia, and platysma ; and is on the same
level as the external carotid, though outside it. But above but deepthat muscle the vessel is placed deeply beneath the external
carotid artery and the parotid gland, and is crossed by the
stylo-glossus and stylo-pharyngeus muscles with the stylohyoid ligament, by the glosso - pharyngeal nerve and its
branches, and by the pharyngeal branch of the vagus nerve.
Whilst in the neck the internal carotid lies on the rectus resting on longus
capitis anticus major muscle, which separates it from the colli ,
vertebræ, also on the superior laryngeal and sympathetic
nerves. Accompanying the artery is the internal jugular with invein, which is placed on the outer side, and between these jugular
two vessels is the pneumo- gastric nerve. This part of the vagus.
artery remains much the same size to the end, and usually
does not furnish any branch.
ternal
vein and
part in
bone.
Part inthe temporal bone. —In the carotid canal the tor- Second
tuous course of the vessel commences. Following the wind- temporal
ing of its canal, the artery first ascends in front of the
cochlea and tympanum ; next it is directed forwards almost
horizontally, and lastly turns upwards into the skull opposite
H 2
100 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Sur- rounded the foramen lacerum medium basis cranii. The ascending
by sym- branches of the sympathetic nerve surround the carotid
artery in the temporal bone.
pathetic .
Third part .
Internal jugular
vian .
Is on outside of caro- tids,
The cranial part of the artery is described with the base
of the skull (see p. 19. ).
The INTERNAL JUGULAR VEIN is a continuation of the
vein lateral sinus of the skull, and extends from the foramen
joins in- lacerum jugulare to the sterno- clavicular articulation . At feriorly subcla- the lower part of the neck it has been seen to join the subclavian, to form the innominal vein (p. 67.). As far as the
thyroid cartilage this vein accompanies the internal carotid,
but below that point the common carotid artery, and is
placed on the outer side of both. Its position to the artery
is not equally close in all its extent, for near the skull there
is a small interval between them, containing the eighth and
ninth nerves, and at the lower part of the neck there is
a still larger intervening space, in which is found the pneumogastric nerve. The size of the vein remains much the
same till near the os hyoides, where it is suddenly increased
branches by the addition of those branches of the head and neck, coros hyoi- responding to the branches of the external carotid artery,
that do not join the external jugular vein. The following
branches open into the internal jugular, viz. the facial,
lingual, thyroid (superior), occipital, and pharyngeal ; and
at the lower part of the neck it receives the middle thyroid
vein.
and is joined by
below
des.
Peculiar- ities in length,
Peculiarities in the carotid.— The length of the internal carotid vessel varies in a given number of bodies, both from difference in the
length of the neck, and in the point of division of the common carotid
trunk. The direction of the vessel may be very tortuous instead of
being straight. It has been already said ( p. 59.) that the internal
gin of the carotid may arise from the arch of the aorta ; and further, the vessel
may be absent from the neck.- ( Quain. )
direc- tion,
and oricarotid.
Ascend- ing pha- ryngeal artery
ends
The ascending pharyngeal artery is a long slender branch of the
external carotid, which arises near the commencement of that
vessel. Directed upwards on the spinal column, between the internal carotid and the pharynx, the artery becomes tortuous near the
skull, and divides into branches for the pharynx and the cranium.
In the neck the artery gives small branches to the surrounding
DEEP NERVES OF THE NECK. 101
skull, in parts, viz. the muscles on the vertebræ, the nerves, and the lym- near
phatic glands ; and other branches anastomose with the ascending cervical artery.
The meningeal branch enters the cranium through the foramen lace- a branch
rum medium basis cranii, and is distributed to the meninges ofthe middle tomes fossa ofthe skull.
ninges,
other to
and
The pharyngeal branch, which is larger than the preceding, turns and aninwards to the pharynx, and dividing into several twigs, supplies the pharynx
muscular structure of the pharynx, the soft palate, and the Eustachian palate.
tube. The size of this branch depends upon that of the inferior palatine branch of the facial artery.
The vein corresponding to the pharyngeal artery receives Its vein.
branches from the cranium and the pharynx, and ends in the internal jugular vein.
tions
ing
nerve.
Dissection ofthe eighth nerve. -By the time the student Direchas arrived at this stage of the dissection, it generally is not concernpossible for him to trace the very minute filaments of the eighth
eighth nerve in the foramen lacerum of the skull. The dissector is therefore recommended to omit, for the present, all
the paragraphs marked with an asterisk. Afterwards, if a
fresh piece of the skull can be obtained, in which the nerves
have been hardened by spirit, and the bone softened by acid,
the dissector may return to the examination of the parts he
now passes over.
tion to open foramen
*Inthe foramen lacerum. —Supposing the dissection of the inter- Dissecnal carotid to be made as it is described at page 98., let the student
cut across with care the jugular vein near the skull, and the inter- lacerum.
nal carotid, if it is necessary. Let him then remove, bit by bit,
with the bone forceps, the ring of bone that bounds externally the
jugular foramen, proceeding as far forwards as the crest of bone
between the foramen and the aperture of the carotid canal. Between the ring of bone and the coat of the jugular vein is the
small auricular branch of the pneumo-gastric nerve, which is directed backwards to a foramen near the styloid process.
gastric
nal ac-
* First trace the pneumo-gastric and spinal accessory nerves Follow through the canal by opening the fibrous sheath that surrounds pneumothem. On the pneumo-gastric is a small ganglion, from which and spifilaments are to be sought passing to the spinal accessory nerve, cessory
and to the ascending branch of the upper cervical ganglion of the branchsympathetic ; the auricular branch, before referred to, also takes
origin from this ganglion.
and their
es ;
H 3
102 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
after- wards,
branch-
* Now follow the glosso - pharyngeal nerve through the foramen,
glosso- and break away any bone that overhangs it. This nerve presents pharyn- geal two ganglia as it passes from the skull : one (jugular) near the
upper part of the tube of membrane that contains it, the other
much larger (petrous) is placed at the lower border of the petrous
and its portion of the temporal bone. From the lower one seek a filament
of communication with the sympathetic in the neck ; also Jacobson's nerve, that enters an aperture in, or on one side of the crest
of bone between the jugular foramen and carotid canal. Sometimes there will exist a filament of the lower ganglion to join the
auricular branch of the pneumo-gastric, and another to the upper
ganglion of the pneumo-gastric nerve.
es.
Dissec- tion of the nerves in the neck.
Below the foramen of exit from the skull, the eighth nerve is
sufficiently exposed by the dissection of the internal carotid to
examine its branches in the neck, with the exception of the inferior
laryngeal nerve. But the connections between the eighth, ninth,
sympathetic, and first two spinal nerves should be traced out near
the skull. Taking the pneumo- gastric nerve, it will be found to
swell into a large oval body (lower ganglion), which is closely
united with the ninth nerve, and is connected by branches with the
other nerves. The spinal accessory nerve will likewise be found to
give a communicating offset to the pneumo-gastric nerve, close to
the skull. The ninth nerve communicates also with the sympathetic and spinal nerves. Lastly, the student should trace the
recurrent branch from the lower part of the neck to the larynx.
Eighth The EIGHTH CRANIAL NERVE consists of three distinct
trunks, viz. glosso-pharyngeal, pneumo-gastric, and spinal
accessory, which leave the cranium by the foramen lacerum
jugulare (p. 18. ). Outside the skull these nerves take different
consists directions according to their destination ; thus the glossopharyngeal is inclined inwards to the tongue and pharynx ;
ing the spinal accessory passes backwards to the sterno-mastoid
and trapezius muscles ; and the pneumo-gastric nerve descends
to the thorax and the abdomen.
nerve
of the three followtrunks :
Glosso- pharyn- A. The GLOSSO-PHARYNGEAL NERVE is the smallest of the
geal three trunks, and in the jugular foramen is somewhat in nerve ; front of the other two ; it lies in a groove in the lower
has two border of the petrous part of the temporal bone. In the
in fora- aperture of exit, the nerve is marked by two ganglionic
lacerum swellings, the upper one being the jugular, and the lower
one the petrous ganglion.
ganglia
men
EIGHTH CRANIAL NERVE IN THE NECK. 103
neck,
to the
After the nerve has quitted the foramen it comes forwards In the
between the jugular vein and carotid artery, and crossing
inwards over the artery, reaches the lower border of the
stylo-pharyngeus muscle. At this spot the course of the courses
nerve becomes almost transverse in its direction to the pha- tongue
rynx, lying over the stylo-pharyngeus, and forming an arch rynx.
across the side of the neck, above the superior laryngeal
nerve. Finally the nerve enters beneath the hyo-glossus
muscle, and ends in branches to the pharynx, the tongue,
and the tonsil.
and phaGanglia. Thejugular ganglion (gang. superius) is of very small Its upper
size, and is situate at the upper part of the osseous groove that
contains the nerve. It occupies the outer part of the glosso-pharyngeal trunk, and includes only some fibres of the nerve.
The and lower petrosal ganglion (gang. inferius) is much larger than the preceding, gang- and encloses all the fibrils of the nerve. This ganglion is placed in
a hollow in the lower border of the temporal bone, and from it
arise the branches that unite the glosso-pharyngeal with the other
nerves.
lion.
es
it with
The branches of the glosso-pharyngeal are classed into Branchthose connecting it with other nerves at the base of the
skull, and those that are distributed in the neck.
CONNECTING BRANCHES. -These arise chiefly from the uniting
petrosal ganglion, and in this set is the tympanic nerve. others,
1. * Afilament ascends from the sympathetic nerve in the neck to join sympathe petrosal ganglion ; and sometimes there is a filament given from this and va- ganglion to the auricular branch of the vagus, as well as to the upper gus,
ganglion of that nerve.
viz.
thetic
and sym- 2. The tympanic branch (nerve of Jacobson) enters the aperture in facial
the ridge of bone situate between the jugular and the carotid foramen, pathetic,
and ascends by a special canal to the inner wall of the tympanum,
where it ends in branches. Its distribution is given with the anatomy
of the ear.
-
with fa- 3. Connecting branch of the facial nerve. · - This pierces the digastric and
muscle, andjoins the trunk of the glosso-pharyngeal, below the petrosal cial ;
ganglion.
-
tributed BRANCHES OF DISTRIBUTION. · In the neck the branches and disare furnished chiefly to the tongue and the pharynx, but theyto
are also united with other nerves.
1. Carotid branches surround the artery of that name, and com- carotid artery,
H 4
104 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
municate on it with the pharyngeal branch of the vagus and with
the sympathetic nerve.
stylo- 2. Some muscular branches enter the stylo- pharyngeus whilst the
nerve is in contact with it.
pharyn- geus,
ryngeal
pharynx , 3. Branches to the pharynx form the pharyngeal plexus by
and pha uniting with nerves from the sympathetic and vagus. This plexus
plexus, is opposite the middle constrictor, and branches are furnished by
it to the muscles and the mucous membrane of the pharynx ,
between the tongue and the hyoid bone.
th ton- sil,
and the tongue.
Vagus nerve
4. The tonsillitic branches supply the tonsil and the soft palate.
On the former they form a kind of plexus (circulus tonsillaris) .
5. Lingual branches. —The terminal branches of the nerve supply
the root, and the surface of the posterior part of the tongue. The
distribution of these is described with the tongue.
B. The PNEUMO-GASTRIC NERVE (vagus nerve) is the largest
of the three trunks of the eighth cranial nerve, and occupies
in fora- the same sheath of dura mater as the spinal accessory. In
the foramen it has a distinct ganglion (gang. of the root), to
which the spinal accessory nerve is united.
men la- cerum ,
and in the neck,
When the nerve has escaped from the foramen, it receives
a branch from the spinal accessory, and swells into a large
ganglion (gang. of the trunk). Here the nerve lies between
the carotid artery and the jugular vein, and communicates
with the several nerves at this part. To reach the thorax
coursing the vagus descends almost vertically between the internal
thorax. jugular vein and the internal and common carotid arteries,
and enters that cavity on the right side, by crossing over the subclavian artery.
to the
One ganglion in fo- ramen,
below.
Ganglia. The ganglion of the root (gang. superius) is of a
greyish colour, and in texture is like the ganglion on the posterior
root of the spinal nerves. The small branches of the vagus in the
foramen lacerum come from this ganglion. The ganglion of the
another trunk (gang. inferius) is cylindrical in form, is reddish in colour, and
is nearly an inch in length. It communicates with the hypo-glossal,
spinal, and sympathetic nerves. All the fibres of the trunk of the
nerve are not surrounded by the ganglionic substance, for those
derived from the spinal accessory nerve pass by the ganglion without being inclosed in it.
Branch- S
The same arrangement may be made of the branches of
the pneumo-gastric in the neck, as was adopted for the
EIGHTH CRANIAL NERVE IN THE NECK. 105
branches of the glosso-pharyngeal, viz. into those uniting it
with other nerves and those that are distributed to parts.
with CONNECTING BRANCHES. Branches of communication to unite
arise both from the ganglion of the root and that of the others ;
trunk of the nerve.
-
spinal * a. From the ganglion of the root. One or two short filaments viz .
unite this ganglion with the spinal accessory nerve. Another filament accessoof the sympathetic nerve in the neck enters the ganglion ; and occa- pathetic,
sionally there is a filament to join the lower (petrosal) ganglion of the and glosglosso-pharyngeal nerve.
ryngeal ;
so-phacial by The auricular branch traverses the substance of the temporal bone, with facommunicating in it with the facial nerve, and reaches the outer ear, auricular on which it is distributed. This little nerve arises from the ganglion, branch ;
and crosses the jugular fossa to enter an aperture near the root of the styloid process. Its farther course to the outer ear will be described
with the anatomy of the ear.
ninth * b. From the ganglion of the trunk. —This ganglion is connected with
intimately with the hypo- glossal nerve, and branches pass between it sympa- thetic,
and the ganglion of the sympathetic, and between it and the loop of the first two cervical nerves. The pneumo- gastric and spinal accessory nerves,
trunks are connected also by a fasciculus above the ganglion.
spinal
and spi- nal ac- cessory.
es to BRANCHES OF DISTRIBUTION.— 'These branches arise from Branchthe inner side of the nerve, and are directed to the middle line, supply
to supply the pharynx, the larynx, and the heart.
glosso1. The pharyngeal branch is an offset from the upper part of the pharynx,
ganglion of the trunk of the pneumo- gastric, which terminates, as
the name expresses, in the pharynx. The nerve is directed inwards and join
over the internal carotid artery, and joins the branches of the pharynglosso-pharyngeal nerve on that vessel. Finally it courses to the geal
side of the middle constrictor muscle, and communicates with
branches of the glosso-pharyngeal, superior laryngeal, and sympa- and pha- ryngeal thetic nerves, to form the pharyngeal plexus of the same side . plexus.
2. The superior laryngeal nerve is much larger than the preceding To enter
branch, and arises from the middle of the ganglion of the trunk of
the vagus. From this spot the nerve inclines obliquely inwards
beneath the internal carotid artery, and reaches the larynx opposite
the interval between the hyoid bone and the thyroid cartilage. The
nerve then perforates the thyro-hyoid membrane, and is distributed
to the mucous membrane of the larynx. (See " LARYNX.") In and supthe neck it furnishes the following branch to the external laryngeal and
muscles and the thyroid body.
larynx,
ply it
a. The external laryngeal branch arises in the neck, beneath the inter- abranch
106 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
outside nal carotid artery. Taking a course similar to the superior laryngeal larynx nerve, but below it, this small branch reaches the side of the larynx,
to crico- and gives offsets to the pharyngeal plexus. Finally the nerve is con- thyroid,
and thy- tinued beneath the sterno- thyroideus, to supply the crico- thyroid muscle and the thyroid body. Near its origin this branch communicates with
the sympathetic nerve ( superficial cardiac branch).
roid body.
Branch- es to the
and low3. Cardiac branches. -Some small cardiac nerves arise from the
heart pneumo- gastric at the upper part of the neck, and join branches
at upper (cardiac) of the sympathetic. At the lower part of the neck on
er part of each side there is a single cardiac nerve ; that of the right side
enters the chest, and joins one of the deep nerves of the heart
from the sympathetic ; and on the left side the corresponding
nerve terminates in the superficial cardiac plexus of the thorax.
neck.
Another branch to la- rynx,
ends in musinterior.
4. The inferior laryngeal or recurrent nerve of the right side
leaves the pneumo-gastric trunk opposite the subclavian artery,
and winding round that vessel takes an upward course in the neck
to the larynx. To reach its destination, the nerve ascends beneath
cles in the common carotid and inferior thyroid arteries, and then between
the trachea and the oesophagus. At the larynx it enters beneath
the ala of the thyroid cartilage, and it will be afterwards followed
into the interior. The following branches arise from it :
branches a. Some cardiac branches leave the nerve as it turns round the subclato heart, vian artery ; these enter the thorax, and join the cardiac nerves of the
It has
chea,
and œso.
sympathetic.
―
to tra. b. Muscular branches spring from the recurrent nerve whilst it lies
between the trachea and the œsophagus, and are distributed to both those
phagus. tubes. Near the larynx also some filaments are furnished to the inferior constrictor muscle.
Left re- current nerve.
Spinal acces- sory in foramen
and be- low it,
crosses neck to trape- zius.
On the left side of the body the recurrent nerve arises in the
thorax, opposite the arch of the aorta, around which it turns. In
the neck its position is between the trachea and the œsophagus, as
on the right side.
C. The SPINAL ACCESSORY NERVE passes through the foramen lacerum, in close contact with the pneumo-gastric, to
which it is united, but it is not marked by any ganglion
while in the foramen.
After leaving the foramen, the nerve gives an offset to the
trunk of the pneumo-gastric, and takes a backward course
through the sterno-mastoid muscle, and across the side of the
neck to the trapezius muscle. At first the nerve is somewhat concealed by the jugular vein, but it then passes either
NINTH CRANIAL NERVE IN THE NECK. 107
over or under that vein to take the course above indicated.
The connections and distribution of the nerve beyond the
sterno- mastoideus have been already examined.
This nerve furnishes chiefly muscular offsets, its branches Branchof union with other nerves being but few.
es join it
in fora- Connecting branches.-* In the jugular foramen the nerve is united by to vagus
two filaments with the ganglion of the root of the vagus. men,
vagus Below the foramen a fasciculus passes from this nerve to the pneumo- and to
gastric ; it is continued over the ganglion of the trunk of the vagus, below
and then becomes blended with that nerve, furnishing offsets to each
muscular branch of the vagus, according to Bendz.
foramen.
The branches of distribution are supplied to the sterno- Supplies
mastoid muscle and the trapezius.
muscles.
nerve The HYPO-GLOSSAL or NINTH NERVE, after passing from Ninth
the cranium by the anterior condyloid foramen, lies deeply
beneath the internal carotid artery and the jugular vein. It
then comes forwards between the vein and the artery, turning round the outer side of the vagus, to which it is closely
united. The nerve next descends in the neck, and becomes crosses
superficial below the digastric muscle, in the anterior trian- to
gular space. From this spot the nerve is directed inwards
to the tongue and its muscles.
inwards
tongue.
es join it The branches of this nerve are furnished to the muscles Branchon the fore part of the neck, and to the muscular substance of with
the tongue ; but there are also some branches connecting it
with other nerves near the skull.
Connecting branches. -Near the skull the hypo-glossal is connected by the vabranches with the vagus nerve, and the two are sometimes almost in- gus,
separably united.
Rather lower down the nerve has connecting branches with the sym- sympapathetic, and the loop of the first two spinal nerves.
thetic,
and spi- nal,
The plies branches of distribution are included in the descrip- and suption of the dissection of the neck, the submaxillary region, muscles.
and the tongue.
-
tion.
Dissection. Remove the cellular membrane from the small Dissecrectus capitis lateralis muscle, between the transverse process of the atlas and the base of the skull. At its inner border seek the
anterior branch of the first cervical nerve, which joins in the loop
of the atlas.
108 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Rectus lateralis is be- tween
verse
The RECTUS CAPITIS LATERALIS is a small thin muscle,
which is analogous to an inter- transverse muscle. It arises
skull and from the upper part of the transverse process of the atlas,
trans- and is inserted into the jugular eminence of the occipital
of first bone, close behind the foramen lacerum . On the anterior
surface rests the jugular vein ; and the posterior is in contact
with the vertebral artery. To the inner side is the anterior
branch of the first cervical nerve.
process
verte- bra.
Dissec- tion .
Sub- occipital nerve
lies on atlas,
Dissection. - Trace backwards now the anterior branch of the
first cervical nerve to its ganglion. For this purpose divide the
rectus lateralis muscle, observing the branch of nerve to it ; then
cut off the end of the transverse process of the atlas, and remove
the vertebral artery, so as to bring into view the anterior part of
the suboccipital nerve.
The anterior division of the first, or sub-occipital nerve,
is a slender nerve that arises in the common trunk on the
arch of the atlas. From that origin it is directed forwards on the atlas, beneath the vertebral artery, to the inner
side of the rectus lateralis. Here the nerve bends down in
front of the transverse process, and forms a loop by uniting forms a with the second cervical nerve. Branches pass between this loop with second. loop and the vagus, ninth, and sympathetic nerves. As the
nerve passes forwards, it supplies the rectus lateralis muscle,
Branch and sends a filament along the side of the vertebral artery.
Sympa- SYMPATHETIC NERVE. -In the neck, the sympathetic thetic nerve in nerve consists of a gangliated cord, on each side, which lies neck close to the vertebral column, and is continuous with the
has three similar cord in the thorax. On this part of the nerve are
three ganglia ; one near the skull, another on the neck of
the first rib, and a third midway between the two ; these are
named respectively superior, middle, and inferior ganglion.
From the ganglia proceed some branches that are connected
with the spinal and most of the cranial nerves, and other
branches that are distributed to viscera.
es .
ganglia,
and joins ganglia
nerve.
Besides the ganglia before mentioned, there are other
on fifth ganglionic masses in connection with the three trunks of the
fifth nerve, that communicate with the sympathetic nerve.
Dissec- Dissection. To dissect the branches of the sympathetic nerve
requires greater care than is necessary in following the white-fibred
tion of -
SYMPATHETIC NERVE OF THE NECK. 109
gang- nerves, for they are softer, more easily torn, and generally of upper
smaller size. In the neck the ganglia and their branches are fion.
already partly exposed, and will therefore require only the following dissection to bring them into view : - the carotid artery and
jugular vein being already cut through, the upper ganglion will be
seen by raising the trunks of the eighth and ninth nerves, and
cutting through the branches that unite these to the loop of the
atlas. If it is thought necessary, the two cranial nerves may be
cut through close to the skull. The several branches of the
ganglion should be traced upwards, inwards, and outwards.
The dissector has exposed the middle ganglion on or near the Middle
inferior thyroid artery, and he now has to trace out its branches.
ferior gang- lion.
To obtain a view of the inferior ganglion, the greater part of the and infirst rib is to be taken away, and a part of the subclavian artery is
to be removed, without, however, destroying the fine nerves that
pass over it. Of course the clavicle is supposed not to be in position. The ganglion is found on the neck of the first rib ; its
branches are large, and easily followed to the vertebral artery, the
spinal nerves, and the thorax.
gangnear
A. The SUPERIOR CERVICAL GANGLION is the largest of the Superior
cervical ganglia, and is of a reddish grey colour. Of a fusi- lion is
form shape, it is of the length of two cervical vertebræ skull ,
(second and third), and is placed on the rectus capitis antieus major muscle, beneath the carotid artery and the cranial beneath
nerves in connection with it. Branches either connect the
ganglion with other nerves, or are distributed to the bloodvessels, the pharynx, and the heart.
carotid.
CONNECTING BRANCHES unite the sympathetic both with Branchthe spinal and the cranial nerves.
es join it
nerves,
a. With the spinal nerves. The four highest spinal nerves have with branches of communication with the upper ganglion ofthe sympathetic. spinal
But the branch of the fourth spinal nerve may come from the cord
connecting the upper ganglion to the next.
cranial
outside
b. With the cranial nerves.- s.-Near the skull the trunks of the eighth with
(its lower ganglion) and ninth nerves are joined by branches of the and symsympathetic. In the foramen lacerum both the petrosal ganglion ofthe pathetic
glosso-pharyngeal and the ganglion of the root of the vagus receive skull,
small filaments, one to each, from an ascending branch of the ganglion.
Other communications are formed with cranial nerves by means of and with
the offset continued upwards from the ganglion into the carotid canal. theskull .
BRANCHES OF DISTRIBUTION. - This set of branches is Branchsome in
110 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
es are sent
to ex- ternal
more numerous than the preceding, and the nerves are of
larger size.
1. Branches of bloodvessels (nervi molles) . These nerves pass
carotid , to the external carotid artery, and ramify on its branches, forming
plexuses on the vessels, which have the same name as the arteries
they surround. Some small ganglia are occasionally found on
forming these ramifying branches. By means of the plexus on the facial
artery the submaxillary ganglion receives its branch of the sympathetic ; and through the plexus on the internal maxillary artery
the otic ganglion is supplied with a similar branch.
plexuses and ganglia;
to inter- nal ca- rotid,
With these nerves may be described another offset of the ganglion to the internal carotid artery and its branches. This offset
ascends from the upper part of the ganglion, of which it appears to
be a continuation. Near the skull it divides into two parts that
enter the carotid canal with the artery, one on each side of it, and
end in secondary plexuses on the ophthalmic and cerebral branches.
The communications and plexuses that these nerves form in their
nerves ; course to the base of the brain are described at p. 19 .
which join cra.
nial
to pha- ryngeal plexus ;
plexuses.
2. The pharyngeal nerves pass inwards to the side of the pharynx,
where they join the other pharyngeal branches of the eighth cranial
nerve in the pharyngeal plexus.
to cardiac 3. Cardiac nerves. -The cardiac nerves enter the thorax
to join in the cardiac plexuses of the heart. There are three
cardiac nerves on each side, viz. superior, middle, and inferior, each taking its name from the ganglion of which it is
an offset.
One nerve to deep plexus
joins others in neck.
Middle gang- lion.
Situa- tion.
Is joined
The superior or superficial cardiac nerve of the right side
continues through the neck, behind the sheath of the carotid
vessels, and enters the thorax beneath, or in front of the subclavian
artery. In some bodies this nerve ends in the neck by joining one
of the other cardiac nerves. In the neck the nerve is connected
with the cardiac branch of the vagus, the external laryngeal nerve,
and the recurrent nerve.
B. The MIDDLE CERVICAL GANGLION (gang. thyroideum)
is of small size, and is situate opposite the fifth cervical vertebra, usually on or near the inferior thyroid artery. It is
of a roundish shape, and lies beneath the great cervical
vessels. Its branches are the following :-
Connecting branches with the spinal nerves pass outwards and sink
LEFT SIDE OF THE NECK. 111
nerves,
between the borders of the longus colli and anterior scalenus to join to spinal
the fifth and sixth cervical nerves.
Branches ofdistribution.
offsets,
These consist of nerves to the and gives
thyroid body, together with the middle cardiac nerve. viz .
branch- 1. The thyroid branches ramify around the inferior thyroid thyroid
artery, and end in the thyroid body ; they join the external laryn- es
geal and recurrent laryngeal nerves.
cardiac thorax and a
cardiac nerve.
2. The middle or great cardiac nerve descends to the
across the subclavian artery ; its termination in the
plexus will be seen in the chest. In the neck it communicates
with the upper cardiac and recurrent laryngeal nerves.
ganglion
neck of
C. The INFERIOR CERVICAL GANGLION is irregular in shape, Inferior
and occupies the interval between the first rib and the transverse process of the last cervical vertebra, its position being
internal to the superior intercostal artery. Oftentimes it is on
extends in front of the neck of the rib, to join the first swel- first rib.
ling of the knotted cord in the thorax. One or two filaments
likewise connect these ganglia around the trunk of the subclavian artery, and supply filaments to that bloodvessel. BranchThe branches of this ganglion are very similar to those of bloodthe other ganglia
es to
vessels,
Other and
nerves,
a. Connecting branches join the last two cervical nerves.
nerves accompany the vertebral artery in its canal, forming a plexus spinal
(vertebral) around it, and communicate with the spinal nerves as high as the fourth.
nerve to b. Only one branch of distribution, the inferior cardiac nerve, and one
issues from the lower ganglion. It lies beneath the subclavian cardiac
artery, where it joins the recurrent laryngeal nerve, and then plexus.
enters the thorax to terminate in the deep cardiac plexus behind
the arch of the aorta.
SECTION X.
LEFT SIDE OF THE NECK.
differs In the dissection of the left half of the neck, the differences Left side
observable between it and the right side are specially to from
be studied. When the description of the right side will
suffice, reference will be made to it.
right.
112 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Dissec- tion of Dissection.- Make tense the neck over a narrow block, as on the
anterior opposite side, and dissect out the anterior triangle and the anterior
triangle part of the neck. Use the description of the right side for both
those regions, and for the examination of the sterno-mastoid and
the small lower hyoid muscles.
of sca- leni and
vian ar- tery.
Next take the scaleni muscles, and the subclavian vessels.
subcla- The dissection of the vessels on the right side will serve for those
on the left, except that the student will meet on the left side
with the thoracic duct. This little tube will be seen in connection
with the part of the artery internal to the scalenus muscle, and
afterwards to cross in front of the scalenus to join the subclavian
vein. On this side, too, the clavicle may remain articulated.
Subcla- vian ar.
tery
differs much from right
vian
The LEFT SUBCLAVIAN ARTERY arises from the arch of the
aorta, in place of the innominal artery, and ascends thence,
over the first rib, in its course to the upper limb. With
this difference on the two sides in the origin of the subsubcla- clavian, the one vessel beginning opposite the sterno-clavicular articulation, the other in the thorax, it is obvious that
the length and connections of the part of the artery on the
inner side of the scalenus must vary much on opposite sides.
First part.— The part of the artery internal to the anteof its ex- rior scalenus is much longer on the left than the right side,
and is almost vertical in direction, instead of being horizontal, like its fellow vessel. Moreover it is deeply placed in
the neck, near the spine and the oesophagus, and does not
rise so high above the first rib as the right subclavian.
Connec- Between the artery and the surface are the same parts as
with sur- cover the right vessel, viz. the common teguments and deep
ingparts. fascia, with the sterno- mastoid, hyoid, and thyroid muscles.
in the first part
tent.
tions
roundPosition of vagus
and in- ternal
Behind the vessel is the longus colli muscle, with the inferior ganglion of the sympathetic. To the inner side are the
œsophagus and thoracic duct ; and the pleura is in contact
with the anterior and outer parts.
The pneumo-gastric nerve is in connection with this part of
the artery, but its position is parallel to the vessel instead of
across it, as on the right side. The internal jugular vein,
jugular in like manner, is parallel to the artery for a short distance,
and superficial to it. Accompanying also the subclavian
artery are the cardiac branches of the sympathetic, which
course along the side of the vessel to the chest.
vein toit.
LEFT SIDE OF THE NECK. 113
the ar- tery.
of Branch- es resemThe second and third parts of the artery, viz. beneath Rest of
and beyond the scalenus, are the same as on the right side.
The branches of the artery resemble so closely those
the right side, that one description will serve for both. It blethose
may be remarked that the superior intercostal of the left vessel.
side is usually internal to the scalenus, instead of beneath it ;
in other words, this branch arises sooner (see p. 63.).
ofright
duct
comes from thorax
The thoracic duct conveys the chyle and lymph of the Thoracic
greater part of the body into the venous circulation. Escaping from the thorax, between the subclavian artery and
the oesophagus, the duct ascends in the neck as high as the
seventh or sixth cervical vertebra. At the spot mentioned
as its highest extent, the duct arches outwards above the
subclavian artery, but in front of the scalenus muscle and
phrenic nerve, to open into the subclavian vein, rather ex- and joins
ternal to the union of this with the jugular vein. Two vian
valves guard the opening of the duct into the posterior part
of the vein, and most commonly the upper part of the duct
is divided.
subcla.
vein.
Examine next the brachial and cervical plexuses, using the Spinal
description of the right side, p. 68.
nerves.
ence in
right and
rotids .
Between the common carotids of opposite sides there is also Differa difference, like that between the right and left subclavian origin of
arteries ; for on the left side the vessel arises separately left cafrom the arch of the aorta, and is, therefore, deep in the chest
and longer than the right. The part of the artery between
its origin and the upper piece of the sternum will be seen in
the dissection of the thorax.
neck
the
anatoBeyond the sterno-clavicular articulation the vessels on In the
both sides so nearly resemble one another that the samenearly
description will serve for the two ( p. 71.). It must be re- same
membered, however, that on the left side the jugular vein my.
and the pneumo- gastric nerve are much nearer to the accompanying artery than on the right side ; indeed, the left vein
commonly overlays the artery at the lower part of the neck.
body The THYROID BODY is a soft reddish mass, situate on the Thyroid
sides of the upper part of the trachea. It consists of two consists
lobes, one on each side, which are united across the front of lobes
the windpipe, opposite the second and third rings, by a
I
of two
unitedby
114 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
a cross piece.
tions and
narrow piece, half an inch in depth (isthmus). Each lobe is
somewhat conical in shape, with the smaller end upwards, and
Connec-, is about two inches in length. It is interposed between the
sheath ofthe common carotid artery and the windpipe, where
it is covered by the sterno-thyroid, sterno-hyoid, and omoextent of hyoid muscles. The extent of the lobe depends upon the
variations in its size, but commonly the lateral piece reaches
as high as the ala of the thyroid cartilage, and as low as the
sixth ring ofthe trachea.
lobes.
Accesso- ry piece
mid.
From the upper part of the thyroid body, but most comor pyra monly from the left lobe, there is occasionally found a conical
piece (pyramid) ascending towards the hyoid bone, to which
it is connected by a fibrous band. Sometimes this part is
attached to the hyoid bone by a slip of muscle (levator
glandula thyreoidea of Sommerring).
Weight and size.
No dis- tinct
This body is of a brownish red or purple hue, and weighs
from one to two ounces. Its size is larger in the woman
than in the man. No excretory tube has been found attached
to it.
Structure. The thyroid body is not provided with a distinct
capsule. capsule, but is surrounded by cellular tissue, that projects into its
substance and divides it into masses.
Consists of vesi- cles
and yellow fluid.
Blood- vessels.
Supeferior,
est thy- roid arThe substance of the gland consists of spherical or elongated vesicles, which vary in size, some being as large as the head of a small
pin, and others only of an inch. These vesicles are simple
sacs, containing a yellow fluid with nuclear bodies. Capillary
vessels and areolar tissue connect the vesicles together into small
masses or lobules, the size of the little finger nail. On cutting into
the gland a viscid yellowish fluid escapes.
Bloodvessels. -The arteries to the thyroid body are two on each
side (superior and inferior thyroid), and occasionally there is an
additional branch (lowest thyroid), of the innominal artery. The
rior, in branches of the external carotid ( superior thyroid) ramify chiefly
and low- on the anterior aspect ; while those from the subclavian (inferior
thyroid) pierce the under surface of the thyroid body. A very
free communication is established between all the arteries.
veins are also large and numerous ; they are superior, middle, and
inferior thyroid on each side. The first two have been traced to
Inferior the internal jugular vein. The inferior thyroid vein issues from
plexus the lower part of the thyroid body, and descends on the trachea,
trachea. the two forming a plexus on that tube beneath the sterno-thyroid
teries.
Veins.
form a
on the
The
LEFT SIDE OF THE NECK. 115
muscle ; the right vein joins the superior cava, and the left enters the innominal vein.
neck and
The TRACHEA, or air tube, is continued from the larynx Trachea
to the thorax, and ends by dividing into two tubes (bronchi),
one for each lung. It occupies the middle line of the body, lies in
and extends from the fifth cervical to the third dorsal ver- thorax.
tebra, measuring about four inches and a half in length, and
nearly one in breadth. The front of the trachea is rounded, Form.
and its cavity is always pervious, in consequence of the existence of firm cartilaginous bands in the anterior wall, but
at the posterior aspect the cartilages are absent, and the
tube is flat and muscular.
part is
vessels.
The cervical part of the trachea is very moveable, and Cervical
has the following relative position to the surrounding parts. amongst
Covering it in front are the small muscles from the sternum muscles
to the hyoid bone, with the deep cervical fascia : beneath the
muscles is the plexus of veins ( inferior thyroid) , and near
the larynx is the isthmus of the thyroid body. Behind the
tube is the œsophagus, with the recurrent nerves. On each and
side are the common carotid artery and the thyroid body.
The ESOPHAGUS, or gullet, reaches from the pharynx to Esopha
the stomach. It commences, like the trachea, opposite the
fifth cervical vertebra, and ends opposite the tenth dorsal occupies
vertebra. In length it measures about nine inches. This thorax.
tube reaches through part of the neck, and through the
whole of the thorax, and occupies, for the most part, the
middle line of the body.
gus
neck and
in neck In the neck its position is behind the trachea, but near the Position
thorax it projects to the left side, beyond the air tube, and
comes into connection with the thyroid body and the thoracic
duct. Behind the oesophagus is the longus colli muscle ; and and conon each side is the common carotid artery, the proximity of
the left being greatest, because of the projection of the œsophagus towards the same side.
nections.
and
in an.
Let the dissector examine next the digastric and stylo-hyoid Muscles
muscles with the hypo-glossal nerve ; also the trunk of the external nerves
carotid, and its following branches, viz. superior thyroid, facial, terior
occipital, posterior auricular, and superficial temporal. The de- triangle
scription of the right side may be used for these parts, p.
72.
I 2
116 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Pterygo- and subry reThe dissector is not to examine the pterygo-maxillary or
maxilla- sub-maxillary regions on this (the left) side of the neck,
gions to because the proceeding would interfere with subsequent dissections. Before learning the pharynx he will expose onthis
side only the middle and inferior ganglia of the sympathetic and their branches.
be omit- ted.
Dissec- tion of sympa thetic,
Dissection. To expose the two lower ganglia of the sympathetic
and their branches, cut across the common carotid artery at the
lower part of the neck, and the external and internal carotid where
they are crossed by the digastric muscle. Now remove these
vessels with the internal jugular vein, and be careful of the sympathetic beneath them. Cut through the middle of the first rib,
and take away the upper end of the sternum with the attached
clavicle. Set aside the piece of bone thus obtained for the subsequent examination of the sterno- clavicular articulation. The
and low- middle ganglion will be found in the cellular membrane near the
fgang- inferior thyroid artery ; and the inferior one will be seen on the
viz.
middle
lia.
Ganglia ofsymnerve.
neck of the first rib, after a piece of the subclavian artery has
been taken away. The upper cardiac nerve will be found descending beneath the carotid sheath.
The middle and inferior cervical ganglia of the sympathetic
pathetic nerve are so similar to the corresponding ganglia of the right
side, that the same description will suffice (page 109. ) .
Cardiac The cardiac nerves are three in number on the left, as on
the right side, viz. superior, middle, and inferior, but they
present some peculiarities.
nerves.
Upper
Middle.
Lower.
a. The superior cardiac nerve has on both sides a similar course
in the neck ; but the left in entering the chest is between the
carotid and subclavian arteries, and parallel to them.
b. The middle cardiac nerve frequently joins the next nerve, and
passes beneath the subclavian artery to the deep cardiac plexus.
c. The inferior cardiac nerve is generally a small branch that
enters the thorax conjoined with the preceding, and ends in the
cardiac plexus.
THE PHARYNX. 117
SECTION XI.
THE PHARYNX.
To examine the pharynx, it will be necessary to cut
through the base of the skull, so as to detach that part from
the rest of the body.
tach pha rynx
divide
skull ex- ternally,
the reDissection to detach the pharynx. — Remove the block from be- To deneath the neck, and place the head downwards, letting it stand on
the cut surface of the skull. Then divide the trachea and œsophagus with the vagus and sympathetic nerves near the first rib (if
these are not cut), and separate all from the spine as high as
the basilar process of the occipital bone, taking care to leave un- partly
disturbed on the left side the vessels and nerves near the skull. base of
Afterwards let the dissector chisel through the basilar process of
the occipital bone, between the attachment of the pharynx and the
muscles of the spinal column, the cut being directed backwards.
Turning upwards the inner surface of the base of the skull, the and cut
dissector will now make the following incisions in the posterior mainder
fossa. On the right side cut with a chisel along the line of union from inof the petrous part of the temporal with the occipital bone as far
forwards as the incision across the basilar process. Also, on the
left side, cut with the chisel through the occipital bone, internal to
the foramen lacerum jugulare and the inferior petrosal sinus : this
cut is to begin rather behind the foramen lacerum, and to end opposite the one on the other side. Lastly, saw through the side of the
skull close behind the mastoid part of the temporal bone, so as to
meet the posterior end of the cut made with the chisel. The base and then
of the skull is now divided into two parts (one having the pharynx parts.
attached to it, the other articulating with the spine), which can be
readily separated with a scalpel.
side.
cut soft
spine.
The spinal column, with the piece of the occipital bone con- Preserve
nected with it, should be set aside, and kept for after examination. piece of
Dissection ofthe pharynx. -Let the student take the anterior Fasten
part of the divided skull, fill the pharynx with tow, and fasten it in posiwith hooks on a block, so that the oesophagus may be pendent and towards him.
pharynx
tion.
nerves on left side,
On the left side of the pharynx a view may be obtained of the Dissect
eighth, ninth, and sympathetic nerves near the skull, after the removal of some cellular membrane, and detaching the styloid process with its muscles.
I 3
118 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
and mus- cles on the op- posite.
Pharynx is behind
and nose.
Extent,
Afterwards, on one side, usually the right, proceed to remove
the fascia from the muscular fibres of the constrictors, which radiate
from the side to the middle line. The margins of the two lower
constrictor muscles (middle and inferior) should be next defined.
Beneath the lower one, near the larynx, will be found the recurrent
nerve ; whilst intervening between the middle and superior is the
stylo-pharyngeus muscle, with the glosso- pharyngeal nerve. To
see the attachment of the superior constrictor to the lower jaw
and the pterygo- maxillary ligament, it will be necessary to cut
through the internal pterygoid muscle. Above the upper fibres of
this last muscle, and near the base of the skull (petrous part of
the temporal bone) will be found two small muscles of the palate ;
one, tensor palati, lies between the internal pterygoid plate and the
pterygoid muscle ; and the other, levator palati, is rather farther
back, and of larger size.
The PHARYNX is the upper dilated part of the alimentary mouth passage, and is situate behind the mouth, nose, and larynx.
Its extent is from the base of the skull to the cricoid cartiform , lage of the larynx, where it ends in the œsophagus. In form
it is somewhat conical, with the wide part upwards and the
length ; narrower part downwards ; and in length it measures about
four inches and a half.
and
is an in- complete bag ;
The bag of the pharynx is incomplete in front, but is
closed behind by three thin muscles, which are so arranged
that the lower overlays the middle one, and the middle the
upper muscle, like the disposition of scales ; and the bag is
farther completed by an aponeurotic expansion, which fixes
it to the base of the skull. The whole is lined by mucous
membrane. On each side of the pharynx are the trunks of
the carotid arteries, with the internal jugular vein, and the
accompanying eighth, ninth, and sympathetic nerves. Befront of hind it is the spinal column, covered by the deep muscles,
spine. viz. longus colli and rectus capitis anticus major.
is be- tween blood- vessels
and in
Aponeu.
rosis of The aponeurosis of attachment is seen at the upper part of
pharynx. the pharynx, where the muscular fibres are deficient, to connect the muscular bag to the base of the skull, and to complete its posterior boundary. Superiorly, it is fixed to the
basilar process of the occipital bone, and to the petrous part
ofthe temporal bone ; but inferiorly it becomes thin and cellular, and extends between the muscular and mucous coats.
MUSCLES OF THE PHARYNX. 119
On this membrane some of the fibres of the constrictor
muscles terminate.
constriccle
from
in middle
The INFERIOR CONSTRICTOR MUSCLE, the most superficial Lower
of the muscles of the pharynx, arises from the side of the tor muscricoid cartilage, from the oblique line on the ala of the arises
thyroid cartilage, and from the part of the last cartilage larynx
behind that line. The origin is small when compared with and ends
the insertion, for the fibres are directed backwards, radiating, line.
and are inserted along the middle line with the corresponding
muscle of the opposite side. The outer surface of the Parts in
muscle is in contact with the sheath of the carotid artery with it.
and the muscles covering the spinal column. The lower
border is straight, and marks the line of separation between
the pharynx and œsophagus, whilst the upper border overlaps
the fibres of the middle constrictor. The recurrent nerve
enters beneath the lower border.
contact
constricfrom hytomiddle beThe MIDDLE CONSTRICTOR MUSCLE is of the same shape as Middle
the preceding ; that is to say, narrow in front and expanded tor
behind. Its fibres arise from the great cornu of the os passes
hyoides, from the small cornu of the same bone, and from oid bone
the stylo-hyoid ligament. Fromthis origin the fibres radiate, line b
and are blended along the middle line with the other muscles.
The surfaces of the muscle have connections similar to those
of the preceding constrictor. The upper border is separated Connec
from the superior constrictor by the stylo- pharyngeus muscle
and the glosso-pharyngeal nerve, and ends on the aponeurosis
of the pharynx near the base of the skull. The lower border
descends beneath the inferior constrictor, and between the
two is the superior laryngeal nerve.
tions.
The stylo-pharyngeus muscle may be again seen with the Stylopharynx. Its description is given at p. 97.
pharyn geus.
the Upper constricIts tor.
front.
The SUPERIOR CONSTRICTOR is the least marked of
three muscles, and wants the regular or conical form.
origin is extensive, being connected with the inner surface Originin
of the internal pterygoid plate (its lower third), with the
pterygo-maxillary ligament, with the posterior part of the
mylo-hyoid ridge of the lower jaw, and with the side of the
tongue. The fleshy fibres pass backwards and are inserted Inserinto the aponeurosis of the pharynx as well as into the raphe hindas
tion beI 4
120 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
the others.
Contigu- ous parts.
Dissec- tion.
Interior of phato be noted.
along the middle line. The parts in contact externally with
this muscle are all the deep vessels and nerves of the neck ;
internally it is lined by the aponeurosis and the mucous
membrane. Above the upper border, which consists of the
fibres directed backwards from the pterygoid plate, are seen
the levator and tensor palati muscles. The lower border has
been seen to be overlaid by the middle constrictor muscle.
The attachment to the pterygo-maxillary ligament corresponds to the origin of the buccinator muscle.
-
Dissection. Open the pharynx by an incision along its
middle, remove from it the tow, and keep it open with hooks. A
better view of the cavity will be obtained by partly dividing the
occipital attachment on each side.
-
The interior of the pharynx is widest opposite the hyoid
rynx. bone, and in it the following objects are to be noticed :
Objects Above are the posterior openings of the nares, which are
separated by the septum nasi ; and below them is the soft
palate, partly closing the aperture into the mouth. By the
side of the opening from the nose is the trumpet- shaped end
of the Eustachian tube, one on each side. Below the soft
palate is the opening into the mouth (isthmus faucium) ; and
on each side of this is the tonsil, which is placed in a hollow
between one prominence from the soft palate to the side of
the tongue, and another from the same part to the back of
the pharynx (pillars of the soft palate). Next in order
below the mouth is the aperture of the larynx, and close in
front of it is the epiglottis, or the valve that closes the opening during deglutition. And lowest of all is the opening
from the pharynx into the oesophagus.
Seven aper- tures,
viz.
Nares ,
EustaThe APERTURES into the pharynx are seven in number,
and have the following position and boundaries :
The posterior openings ofthe nares are two in number.
Each is of an oval form, corresponding to the shape of the
osseous parts that bound it in the dried skull, and is lined
by mucous membrane. The apertures are separated by the
vomer, or the posterior part of the septum nasi.
The Eustachian tube is a canal, partly osseous, partly cartubes ; tilaginous, by which the cavity of the tympanum communichian
APERTURES OF THE PHARYNX. 121
cates with the external air. Only the cartilaginous part that
is external to the bone can now be seen.
ginous
is an inch
wide
piece of
If the mucous membrane is removed from the naris on one cartilaside, the cartilaginous part of the tube will appear to be part
about an inch long. It is narrow superiorly, where it is long,
fixed to the margins of a groove between the sphenoid and the
petrous part of the temporal bone ; and is directed downwards
from that spot to open into the pharynx by a wide aperture has a
on the inner surface of the internal pterygoid plate, rather opening ;
above the inferior spongy bone of the nose. The opening in
the pharynx is oval in form ; and the inner side, which is
larger than the outer, projects forward, giving rise to the
trumpet- shaped mouth. This part of the tube is constructed is a bent
of a piece of fibro- cartilage, which is bent downwards, and carti
encloses an angular space ; but inferiorly the cartilage is deficient, and the space is limited by fibrous membrane. Closely Mucous
united to the pterygoid plate, the tube is covered by the brane
mucous membrane ; and through it the cavity of the tym- and lines
panum receives its mucous lining from the pharynx.
The isthmus faucium is a somewhat narrowed passage be- Opening
tween the mouth and the fauces, whose size is altered by the
elevated or pendent position of the soft palate. The space
is bounded below by the root of the tongue ; above, by the
soft palate ; and on each side by the prominence of the anterior pillar of the soft palate.
lage.
memcovers
it.
offauces .
rynx.
The aperture of the larynx is wide in front, where it is Upper opening bounded by the epiglottis, and pointed behind, between the of laarytenoid cartilages. The sides are sloped from before back,
and are formed by folds of the mucous membrane extended
between the arytenoid cartilages and the epiglottis. During
respiration, this aperture is unobstructed, but during the act
of deglutition it is closed by the epiglottis.
ning of
gus.
The opening into the œsophagus is the narrowest part ofReginthe pharynx, and is opposite the cricoid cartilage or the œsopha
fifth cervical vertebra. Internally, the mucous membrane
of the œsophagus is paler than in the pharynx ; and externally the point at which the pharynx ends is marked by a
slight contraction, and by a change in the direction of the
muscular fibres.
122 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Soft pa- late is at
mouth ;
The SOFT PALATE (velum pendulum palati) is a moveable
back of structure between the mouth and the pharynx, which can
either close the isthmus of the fauces, or cut off the passage
to the nose, according as it is depressed or elevated. In
the usual position of the soft palate (the state of relaxation)
surfaces, the anterior surface looks forwards, and is continuous with
the roof of the mouth, whilst the opposite surface is turned
borders ; to the pharynx. The upper border is fixed to the posterior
margin of the hard palate, and joins the pharynx on the
from it side. The lower border is free, and presents in the centre
an elongated pendulous part (the uvula), whilst on each side
it is somewhat arched, forming the half arch of the palate.
Along the middle line is a slight prominence, indicative of
the original separation into two halves.
hangs uvula.
ments of Ele- The velum consists of an aponeurosis, together with
velum. muscles, vessels, nerves, and mucous glands, and the whole
is enveloped by the mucous membrane.
Dissec- tion of the mus- cles.
Aponeu- rosis of palate.
Nine muscles :
azygos uvulæ Dissection. To expose the thin pale fibres of the
muscle, raise with care the mucous membrane along the middle
line of the soft palate, at the posterior aspect. On each side are
the two chief muscles of the soft palate -the elevator and tensor :
these have been partly exposed on the outside of the pharynx ; but to follow them to their destination, take away the upper attachment
ofthe pharynx on the right side, and the part of the superior constrictor which arises from the internal pterygoid plate. Now the
levator will be fully exposed by the removal of the mucous membrane covering its lower part, and the tendon of the tensor palati
can be followed round the hamular process of the pterygoid
plate. The position of the Eustachian tube with respect to the
muscles should be defined.
Aponeurosis ofthe soft palate. -Giving strength to the
velum is an aponeurosis, which is attached to the hard
palate. This structure becomes thinner as it descends in
the velum, and it is joined by the tendon of the tensor palati
muscle.
The MUSCLES of the soft palate are four on each side, —an
elevator and tensor, together with the palato-glossus and
palato-pharyngeus, which act as depressors. In addition,
there is a small central azygos muscle.
MUSCLES OF THE PALATE. 123
muscle
along
The AZYGOS UVULÆ is the most superficial muscle on the Azygos
posterior aspect of the soft palate. Occupying the middle is single
*line of the velum, the muscle consists of two narrow slips of middle.
pale fibres, which arise from the spine at the posterior
border ofthe hard palate, and end inferiorly in the tip of
the uvula.
muscle
outside
The LEVATOR PALATI is a thick, roundish muscle, which is Elevator
partly situate outside the pharynx. It arises from the under arises
surface of the apex of the petrous part of the temporal bone, pharynx,
and slightly from the cartilage of the Eustachian tube. The
fibres descend, enter the pharynx above the superior constrictor, and then spread out in the soft palate, some joining
along the middle line with those of the muscle of the opposite side. This muscle rests on the Eustachian tube, and is and is
concealed in the velum by the azygos uvulæ.
lost in velum ;
muscle
outside
around
The TENSOR vel CIRCUMFLEXUS PALATI is a thin, riband- Tensor
like band, which is tendinous at its deep border, and is
situate between the internal pterygoid plate and the pterygoid muscle. The muscle arises from the slight depression arises
(scaphoid fossa) at the root of the internal pterygoid plate, pharynx ,
from the adjoining surface of the sphenoid bone, and from
the outer part of the Eustachian tube. Inferiorly, the turns
fleshy fibres end in a tendon, which is reflected round the hamular
hamular process, and widening in the soft palate, is inserted
partly into a ridge on the under surface of the palate bone,
and partly into the aponeurosis of the velum. As the and ends
tendon winds round the bone, it is thrown into folds, and in neurosis ;
the soft palate it has a deeper position than any of the other is deeper
muscles. The Eustachian tube is directed inwards, between others.
this muscle and the preceding one.
process,
in apo
than
tion of Dissection. —The two remaining muscles will be exposed by Dissectaking away the mucous membrane from the prominence before
and behind the tonsil : the palato-glossus forms the projection in
front of, and the palato-pharyngeus behind the tonsil.
glossus The PALATO-GLOSSUS MUSCLE (constrictor isthmi faucium) palatois a small, fleshy band of fibres, which is extended from the and
soft palate to the side of the tongue. The muscles of opposite sides narrowthe opening between the mouth and fauces ;
hence the name that has been applied to them. At the in-
124 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
palato .
geus,
sertion into the tongue the fibres blend with the styloglossus.
The PALATO-PHARYNGEUS is much larger in size than the
pharya- preceding muscle. Expanding in the soft palate, so as to
form a layer beneath the levator palati, the fibres are arched
downwards, and are mingled with the muscular fibres of the
posterior part of the pharynx. This muscle bounds the
or pillars tonsil posteriorly, and gives rise to the eminence of the
palate. posterior pillar of the soft palate.
Tonsil is bepillars of
The tonsil is a collection of mucous follicles close above
tween the side of the tongue, and between the pillars of the soft
palate. palate. It is oval in shape, but variable in size, and the
apertures of the follicles are generally apparent on its surface. Externally, the tonsil is opposite the superior constrictor muscle, and posterior to it is the internal carotid
artery ; but when the tonsil is enlarged it may touch that
artery.
memnues in- to the aper tures.
Mucous The mucous membrane ofthe pharynx is continuous anbrane of teriorly with the mucous lining of the mouth and nose.
pharynx conti- Covering the soft palate and its numerous small glands
(palatine), the membrane is continued to the tonsils on each
side, and is prolonged by the Eustachian tubes to the tympanum. From the dorsum of the tongue it is continued over
the epiglottis, forming its three small anterior folds, and
then lines the pharynx. In front of each arytenoid cartilage it encloses a mass of muciparous glands (arytenoid),
and then sends a prolongation into the larynx. Inferiorly,
it is continued by the oesophagus to the stomach.
Supe- riorly has co- lumnar,
The mucous membrane is thickest in the upper part of the
pharynx, and its character near the different apertures reinferior- sembles the membranes lining the cavities that open into the
epithe pharynx. Its epithelium is scaly below the nose, but
columnar and ciliated above that spot. (Henlé. )
ly scaly
lium .
Size.
-
Structure ofthe œsophagus. -It may be remarked, in addition to what has been said of the commencement of the
œsophagus and its connections in the neck, that the size of
this tube is less than that of the pharynx, and that the walls
are flaccid.
THE MOUTH. 125
On dissection, the tube will be found to consist of two layers of Formed
muscular fibres, with a lining of mucous membrane.
oftwo layers of fibres ;
The outer or external layer is formed of longitudinal fibres, which commence opposite the cricoid cartilage by three bundles, anterior and longitu- dinal ,
two lateral ; the former is attached to the ridge at the back ofthe
cartilage, and the others join the inferior constrictor. The internal and inlayer, on the other hand, is formed by circular fibres, which are circular.
continuous with those of the constrictor. The structure of the
œsophagus is described more fully in the dissection of the thorax.
SECTION XII.
THE MOUTH.
WITH the mouth may be examined the cheeks, the lips,
and the teeth, all which may be considered accessory parts.
ner or
tion,
boundaTHE MOUTH. —The cavity of the mouth is situate below Mouth.
the nose, and extends from the lips in front to the isthmus of
the fauces behind. Its boundaries are partly osseous and Situapartly muscular, and its size depends upon the position of
the lower jaw. When the lower jaw is moderately removed form,
from the upper one, the mouth is an oval cavity with the
following boundaries. The roof is generally concave, and is and
formed by the hard and soft palate, and is limited anteriorly ries.
by the arch of the teeth. In the floor is the tongue, bounded
by the arch of the lower teeth, and beneath the tip of
that body is the frænum linguæ, with the sublingual gland
on each side. Each lateral boundary consists of the
cheek and the ramus of the lower jaw ; and in it, near the
second molar tooth in the upper jaw, is the opening of the
parotid duct. The anterior opening of the mouth is bounded
by the lips, and the posterior corresponds to the pillars of
the soft palate.
The mucous membrane of the mouth is much thicker on Liningo
mouthj the hard than the soft parts of the cavity, and after lining
the interior and covering the tongue, it is continuous anteriorly with the tegument, and posteriorly with the lining of
the pharynx.
On tracing its disposition, the membrane is seen to form a small differs in
fold (frænulum) between the lip and the gum of the corresponding parts,
126 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
floor,
on roof, jaw. On the bony part of the roof it is thick and thrown into
folds, and covers vessels, nerves, cellular tissue, and glands ; but
on the soft palate it is smooth and thinner. Along the middle of
the palate is a ridge, which ends in front in a small papilla. In the
floor ofthe mouth the membrane forms the frænum linguæ beneath
the tip of the tongue, and sends tubes into the openings of the
Whartonian and sublingual ducts ; whilst on each side of the
frænum it is raised into a crest by the subjacent sublingual gland.
On the interior of the cheek and lips the mucous lining is smooth,
and is separated from the muscles by small buccal and labial glands.
The epithelium covering the membrane is of the scaly variety.
cheek,
and lips.
Cheek ;
extent
and struc- ture.
Lips,
The CHEEK extends from the commissure of the lips to
the ramus of the lower jaw, and is attached above and below
to the alveolar process of the jaw on the outer aspect. The
chief constituent of the cheek is the fleshy part of the buccinator muscle : on the inner surface of this is the mucous
membrane ; and on the outer, the integuments, together with
vessels and nerves. The parotid duct perforates the cheek
opposite the second molar tooth of the upper jaw, and receives a lining of the mucous membrane.
The LIPS surround the opening of the mouth, in the same
formed way as the eyelids limit their intervening aperture. They
cularis ; consist of the fleshy part of the orbicularis oris muscle,
by orbicovered externally by integument, and internally by mucous
membrane. The lower lip is the larger and more moveable
of the two. Between the muscular structure and mucous
covering are the labial glands ; and in the substance of the
contain lip, nearer the inner than the outer aspect, is the arch of the
coronary artery.
coronary artery.
Teeth, TEETH. —In the adult there are sixteen teeth in each jaw,
number which are set in the alveolar border of the maxilla, in the form and ar- range- of an arch, and are surrounded by the gums.
ment in jaw ;
Each dental
arch has its convexity turned forwards, and, commonly, the
arch in the upper maxilla overhangs that in the lower
maxilla when the jaws are in contact. The teeth are similar
in the half of each jaw, and have received the following
the most anterior two are incisors, and the one
next behind is the canine tooth ; two, still farther back, are
the bicuspid teeth, and the last three are molar teeth. Moreover, the last molar tooth has been also called “ dens sapidifferent names :
kinds.
―
CAVITY OF THE NOSE. 127
mastica- entiæ," from the late period of its appearance. The names Use in
applied to the teeth indicate very nearly the part they per- tion .
form in mastication ; thus the incisor and canine teeth act as
cutters of the food, those of the different jaws passing each
other like the blades of a scissors, whilst the bicuspid and
molar teeth serve to grind the aliment.
notice
where.
The several parts of the teeth, viz. the crown, fang, and Fuller
neck ; the general and special characters of these parts, and elseof the different groups of the teeth ; and the structure of the
different components of a tooth, must be referred to elsewhere. (Quain's Anatomy. )
SECTION XIII.
CAVITY OF THE NOSE.
To obtain a view of the interior of the nose, it will be necessary to make a longitudinal section through the base of the
skull.
tion be- Dissection. Before making the necessary sawing of the bone, Dissecthe loose part of the lower jaw on the right side should be taken fore sawaway ; also the tongue, hyoid bone, and larynx, all united, may be ing bone.
detached from the opposite half of the lower jaw, and set aside till
the dissector is ready to begin them.
through
with saw.
Place the saw on the right side of the crista galli of the ethmoid Cut
bone, and carry it vertically through the frontal and nasal bones, the bone
the cribriform plate of the ethmoid, and part of the body of the
sphenoid bone. Now turn upwards the roof of the mouth,
and after dividing the soft parts, saw through the hard palate on
the right side of the septum nasi ; also through the body of the
sphenoid bone in such a direction as to make the cut join the incision from above. The piece of the skull is easily separated into
two parts, right and left ; and by proceeding as above directed , the
delicate bones of the nose are less injured than they would be by
sawing uninterruptedly in one direction . The right half will
serve for the examination of the meatuses, and the left shows the
septum nasi.
In examining the boundaries ofthe nose, the student should use
a section of a skull.
tion of The CAVITY OF THE NOSE occupies the centre of the bones Situaof the face, and is situate above the mouth, and between the nose.
128 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
into two.
orbits and the sinuses of the superior maxillary bones. This
Division space is divided into two parts (nasal fosse) by a vertical
partition, and each fossa has an opening both in the face and
the pharynx, as well as apertures of communication with the
sinuses in the surrounding bones, viz. frontal, ethmoid,
sphenoid, and superior maxillary.
Open- ings.
Roof.
Floor.
Inner boun- dary
partly osseous,
partly cartila
·
Each nasal fossa presents for examination a roof, a floor,
an inner and an outer wall.
The roofis somewhat arched, and is formed by the cribriform plate of the ethmoid bone in the centre, by the nasal
bone and cartilages in front, and by the body of the sphenoid,
and part of the palate bone at the posterior part.
The floor is slightly hollowed from side to side, and in it
are found the palate and superior maxillary bones —their
palate processes. Near the front is the aperture of the
anterior palatine canal.
The inner boundary (septum narium) is partly osseous
and partly cartilaginous, and will be seen when the lining
membrane is removed. The osseous part consists of the
perpendicular plate of the ethmoid bone and the vomer.
The irregular space in front is filled by the triangular carginous . tilage ofthe septum, which forms part of the partition between the nostrils, and supports the cartilages of the anterior
aperture. Fixed between the vomer, the ethmoid plate, and
the nasal bones, the cartilage rests anteriorly on the median
ridge between the superior maxillary bones, and projects
even beyond, between the cartilages of each nostril.
septum narium is commonly bent to one side.
Outer boun- dary,
The
The outer boundary has the greatest extent and the most
irregular surface. The bones entering into this wall are,
the superior maxillary, the lateral mass of the ethmoid bone,
with the small os unguis, and posteriorly the ascending part
of the palate bone, with the internal pterygoid plate of the
is irre- sphenoid bone. On this wall are three convoluted osseous
surface ; pieces, named spongy or turbinate bones, which project into
the cavity ; the two upper are but processes of the ethmoid
bone, but the lower is a separate bone (inferior spongy)..
presents Between each turbinate bone and the wall of the nose is
a longitudinal canal or meatus.
gular on
fissures.
CAVITY OF THE NOSE. 129
fissure,
tus,
Of the three meatuses, the upper one is the smallest, and Upper
occupies about the posterior half of the outer boundary ; or meainto it the posterior ethmoidal and the sphenoidal sinuses
open-the first at the front, the other at the back ; and posteriorly is the spheno-palatine foramen, by which the nerves
and vessels enter the nose. The middle meatus is longer middle,
than the preceding, and communicates anteriorly by a funnelshaped passage (infundibulum) with the frontal sinus and the
anterior ethmoidal cells ; and about the middle of this meatus
is a small aperture into the cavity of the upper jaw. The lower.
inferior meatus reaches across nearly the whole outer wall of
the nasal fossa, and in its front is the opening of the ductus
ad nasum.
nose.
The mucous membrane that lines the nasal fossæ is called Mucous lining the pituitary or Schneiderian membrane. It is continuous ofthe
with the integument at the nostrils, and with the membrane
lining the pharynx through the posterior opening of the
nares ; moreover it is also continuous, by means of the
openings into the meatuses, with the conjunctiva, and the
lining membrane of the different sinuses, viz. frontal, ethmoidal, sphenoidal, and maxillary.
on spon- gy bones and in
with
thelium .
The membrane is, generally speaking, thick, and closely united Differs
to the periosteum and perichondrium beneath ; but in the canals
and sinuses it is very thin, and on the margins of the spongy bones sinuses .
it is projected somewhat by the large submucous vessels, so as to
increase the extent of surface. Near the nostril it is furnished
with small hairs (vibrissæ) . The surface is covered by the aper- Covered
tures of muciparous glands, which are in greatest abundance and aperof largest size about the middle and posterior parts of the nasal tures of glands
fossæ ; and lining the mucous membrane is an epithelium of the and epicolumnar ciliated kind, which becomes laminated or scaly near the
nostrils. The foramina in the dry bones, that transmit nerves or Some fovessels, are entirely closed by the membrane, viz. naso-palatine, closed,
spheno-palatine, and the holes in the cribriform plate ; and the others diapertures that lead to the sinuses and the orbit are much dimi- ed by it.
nished by the lining they receive. At the opening of the ductus
ad nasum the lining membrane forms two small folds. From the
close connection of the mucous membrane with the periosteum the
lining membrane of the nose is sometimes called a fibro-mucous
membrane.
ramina
minishK
130 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Dissec- tion of nerves and ves- sels.
Olfac- tory nerve
buted to
tum,
Dissection. ---- By the time the nose is dissected, little is seen of
the distribution of the olfactory nerve. If the septum nasi is removed, so as to leave entire the membrane covering it on the opposite side (the left), the filaments of the nerve will appear on the
surface, near the cribriform plate. On the membrane, too , near the
front of the septum, is a branch of the nasal nerve. At the
same time, the naso-palatine nerve and artery will be seen lower
down, being directed from behind forwards, towards the anterior
palatine canal. By cutting through the anterior part of the membrane covering the septum, other branches of the olfactory nerve
may be traced along the outer wall of the nasal fossa.
The OLFACTORY NERVE forms a bulb on the cribriform
plate of the ethmoid bone, from which branches descend to
the nose through the apertures in that bone. These
the roof, to about the centre.
is distri- branches are divisible into three sets. An inner set descend
half sep- in the grooves on the septum narium, and branching extend
A middle set is confined to the roof of
and two the nose. And an external set is distributed on the two spongy bones. upper spongy bones, and the flat surface of the ethmoid bone
in front of them. As the branches of the olfactory nerve
leave the skull they receive tubes from the dura mater and
pia mater, which are lost in the tissue to which the nerves
are distributed. The nerves ramify in the pituitary membrane, and form tufts of filaments that communicate freely
with the contiguous twigs, forming a network.
Struc- ture,
The olfactory nerve differs in structure from the other cranial
nerves ; its divisions are deficient in the white substance of Schwann,
and are nucleated and granular in texture. They resemble the gelatinous fibres in appearance, and seem to be formed of an extension of the
nervous matter of the olfactory bulb. (Todd and Bowman. * )
The other branches of nerves and arteries which are found
in the nose will be described in the following section.
* See Physiological Anatomy, &c. , part third, p. 9. By R. B.
Todd, M.D. and W. Bowman, London.
SPHENO-PALATINE GANGLION. 131
SECTION XIV.
SPHENO-PALATINE AND OTIC GANGLIA, FACIAL AND NASAL
NERVES, AND BRANCHES OF THE INTERNAL MAXILLARY
ARTERY.
tion of
gangDissection of Meckel's ganglion. —FROM the ganglion of Meckel Dissecin the spheno-maxillary fossa, branches are furnished to the nose Meckel's
through the spheno-palatine foramen, to the palate through the lion;
canals of the same name, and to the facial nerve along the vidian
canal. The position of these several nerves may first be ascertained by examining their apertures of transmission in the skull.
branches To find the branches of the ganglion that enter the nose, take of its
the left part of the sawn skull, and seek them opposite the spheno- tothe
palatine foramen, through which they enter the nasal fossa. One nose,
of these nerves (naso - palatine) , before referred to as lying in the
membrane of the septum, is to be isolated from the pituitary
membrane, and followed forwards to where it enters the floor of the nose. Branches of the internal maxillary artery accompany
the nerves, and are to be dissected.
branches To expose the nerves that descend to the palate, take away the of its
piece of mucous membrane that clothed the septum of the nose, as to the
well as that lining the posterior part of the nasal fossa behind the palate,
spongy bones. After this covering is removed, the palatine nerves
and vessels are seen through the thin ascending plate of the palate
bone, and will be readily reached by breaking through the bone
with a chisel. Afterwards, open the tube of membrane that contains the vessels and nerves, and follow these down to the soft
palate and roof of the mouth, and onwards towards the incisor
teeth. The palatine nerves lead upwards to the ganglion, which is of the body of
close to the body of the sphenoid bone. But to bring the ganglion gangfully into view, it will be necessary to saw through the projecting
part of the sphenoid bone, to cut away pieces of the bones surrounding the hollow in which it lies, and to remove with care the
enveloping fat and the periosteum. The ganglion is seen to be a
small reddish-looking body, from which the vidian nerve passes
backwards.
lion ;
To trace backwards the vidian branch to the carotid plexus and vidian ofthe
the facial nerve, lay open the canal which contains it in the root of nerve.
the pterygoid process ; and in doing this be careful of the small
pharyngeal branch of nerve and artery that are superficial to the K 2
132 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
lion of
and conwith
palatine
es .
vidian, and lie in the pterygo-palatine canal. At the back of the
pterygoid canal, seek a small branch from the vidian to the carotid
plexus. Lastly, follow back the nerve into the skull by cutting
away the point of the petrous part of the temporal bone and the
internal carotid artery, and pursue it in its course on the surface
ofthe temporal bone, beneath the ganglion of the fifth nerve, to the
hiatus Fallopii. Its junction with the facial nerve will be seen
with the dissection of that nerve. It is rather a troublesome task
to trace the nerve through the cartilage in the foramen lacerum
medium basis cranii.
Gang- The SPHENO- PALATINE GANGLION (ganglion of Meckel)
Meckel. occupies the spheno- maxillary fossa close to the sphenopalatine foramen, and is connected with the palatine
Situation branches of the superior maxillary nerve. The ganglionic
nection mass is somewhat triangular in form, and of a greyish colour.
spheno- It is situate behind the branches of the superior maxillary
branch- nerve to the palate, and surrounds only part of their fibres ;
but it is prolonged posteriorly into the vidian nerve.
Meckel's ganglion resembles the other ganglionic masses of
the fifth nerve in having sensory, motor, and sympathetic
filaments or roots connected with it, and in this wise : -sensory nerve fibres join it with the fifth nerve, motor fibres
unite it with the facial nerve through the vidian branch, and
sympathetic fibres in the sheath of the vidian connect it
with the carotid plexus.
Struc- ture.
Branch- es given
to the orbit,
to the palate,
are three.
The branches of the ganglion are directed upwards to the
orbit ; downwards to the mouth ; inwards to the nose ; and
backwards to the pharynx, and to the facial and sympathetic
nerves.
1. Branches to the orbit. - These are two or three in number,
and they ascend through the spheno- maxillary fissure, to end in
the periosteum. It will be necessary to cut through the sphenoid
bone to follow these nerves to their termination.
2. Branches to the palate. -The nerves of the palate, though
connected in part with the ganglionic mass, are the continuation
of the spheno-palatine branches of the superior maxillary nerve
(p. 96.) . Below the ganglion they are divided into three palatine
nerves (large, small, and external) , which are distributed to the
roof of the mouth, the soft palate and tonsil, and the lining membrane ofthe nose.
SPHENO-PALATINE GANGLION. 133
a. The large palatine nerve ( anterior) reaches the roof of the mouth Large
through the largest palatine canal, and extends forwards nearly to the incisor teeth, where it joins the naso- palatine nerve. Whilst in its has
canal the nerve furnishes two or more filaments ( inferior nasal) to the branchmembrane on the middle and lower spongy bones ; and in the roof ofnose.
the mouth it supplies the mucous membrane and glands, as well as an offset to the soft palate.
es to
and b. The small palatine nerve ( posterior) lies in the smaller canal, and small,
ends inferiorly in the soft palate and the levator palati muscle, the uvula, and the tonsil.
c. The external palatine nerve is smaller than the other two, and external palatine.
descends in the canal of the same name. Leaving the canal the nerve
is distributed to the velum palati and the tonsil.
branches 3. Branches to the nose.- -The nasal branches, from three to five Nasal
in number, are for the most part very small and soft, and pass are
inwards through the spheno- palatine foramen. One of these is the
naso- palatine nerve. Their distribution is mentioned below.
nasal, a. The superior nasal branches (anterior) are distributed in the Superior
mucous membrane on the two upper spongy bones, and a few filaments
reach the back part of the septum narium.
palatine.
b. The naso-palatine nerve ( nerve of Cotunnius) crosses the roof ofthe Nasonasal fossa to reach the septum nasi, and descends on it to near the
front. The nerve now enters a special canal, by the side of the septum,
that of the left side of the body being anterior to the other, and is conveyed therein to the roof of the mouth, where it lies in the centre of the
anterior palatine foramen. Finally, the nerves of opposite sides are united in the mouth, and are distributed in the mucous membrane behind the incisor teeth ; at their distribution they are connected with the
great palatine nerves. On the septum narium filaments are supplied by the naso-palatine nerve to the mucous membrane. To follow the
nerve to its termination the canal in the roof of the mouth ought to be
opened.
4. The posterior branches are two : a pharyngeal branch, and the Branch- vidian nerve.
es back- wards are
rynx a. The pharyngeal branch is very small, and is directed through the to phapterygo-palatine canal to the mucous membrane of the pharynx near
the Eustachian tube, in which it ends.
facial b. The vidian nerve passes backwards through the vidian canal, and and the
sends some small filaments through the bone to the membrane of the and sym- pathetic back part of the roof of the nose (upper posterior nasal branches). At nerves its exit from the canal the nerve furnishes a soft reddish offset (carotid through
branch) to join the sympathetic on the outer side of the carotid artery, dia .
The continuation of the nerve en ers the cranium through the cartilathe viK 3
134 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Vidian a com- pound nerve.
Seek other nerves
sels of nose.
ginous substance closing the foramen lacerum medium basis cranii, and
is directed backwards in a groove on the surface of the petrous part of
the temporal bone, where it takes the name large superficial petrosal
nerve. Lastly it is continued through the hiatus Fallopii, to join the
gangliform enlargement on the facial nerve. Whilst in the temporal bone
the vidian receives a twig from the tympanic nerve.
The vidian nerve may be supposed to consist of motor and sympathetic fibres in the same sheath, which are combined here in the same
manner as in the connecting branches between the sympathetic and
spinal nerves.
Dissection. The student may now direct his attention to the
remaining nerves and vessels that have been exposed by the preand ves- vious dissections. The nasal nerve is to be sought in the nose
behind the nasal bone, by gently detaching the lining membrane,
and cutting off the projecting bone. A branch is given from the
nerve to the septum, but probably this and the trunk of the nerve
will be seen but imperfectly in the present condition of the part.
The terminal branches of the internal maxillary artery in the
spheno-maxillary fossa are to be completely traced out.
Nasal nerve
neath nasal bone ;
The nasal nerve (of the ophthalmic) has already been seen in its
course in the orbit, and at its termination in the face (p. 42.) ; and
the part that connects the two through the nose is now to be
lies be learned. Entering the nasal fossa by an aperture in the front of
the ethmoid bone, the nerve gives a branch to the septum narium,
and is then continued in a groove behind the os nasi to the lower
margin of that bone, where it escapes to the surface of the nose.
- The branch to the septum divides into filaments that
ramify on the anterior part of that partition, and reach nearly to the lower part.
gives
branch to sep- tum
and to outer wall.
Branch- es ofin- ternal maxil.
lary ar- tery are
Branches. -
One or two filaments are likewise furnished by the nerve to the fore
part of the outer wall of the nasal fossa ; these extend as low as the inferior spongy bone.
――
-
supeTerminal branches of the internal maxillary artery.
The branches of the artery in the spheno- maxillary fossa,
which have not been examined, are the following :
rior palatine, naso- palatine, pterygo-palatine, and vidian.
1. The superior or descending palatine is the largest branch of
branch, the artery in the fossa, and accompanies the large palatine nerve
in its canal. Arrived at the palate, the vessel is directed forwards
in the roof of the mouth, and anastomoses behind the incisor teeth,
with the artery of the opposite side, and with a branch that
descends from the nose through the anterior palatine canal. In its
palatine
NASAL AND FACIAL NERVES. 135
course the artery supplies branches to the other palatine canals,
which pass with the contained nerves to the soft palate and tonsil,
and some offsets are furnished to the lining membrane of the nose.
In the roof of the mouth the mucous membrane, glands, and gums
receive their branches from this artery.
branch- es,
one to
2. The nasal or spheno-palatine artery enters the nose through nasal
the spheno-palatine foramen, and divides into branches. Some of
these are distributed on the spongy bones and the outer wall of
the nasal fossa, and supply offsets to the membrane lining the posterior ethmoid cells. One long branch, artery of the septum (art.
so -palatina) , runs on the partition between the nostrils to the nasi,
anterior palatine canal, through which it anastomoses with the
superior palatine in the roof of the mouth. This branch accompanies the naso- palatine nerve, and covers the septum with numerous ramifications.
naso- septum
palatine 3. The pterygo-palatine is a very small branch, which passing pterygobackwards through the canal of the same name, is distributed to branch,
the Eustachian tube and the lining membrane of the pharynx.
branch .
4. The vidian or pterygoid branch is contained in the vidian vidian
canal with the nerve of the same name, and, escaped from the
canal, ends on the upper part of the pharynx, and the Eustachian
tube.
nasal ar- Some other small nasal arteries are furnished by the anterior and Other
posterior ethmoidal branches ( of the ophthalmic) , and by the facial teries.
artery near the nostril.
tion of
nerve in
Dissection of the facial nerve in the temporal bone.
To render Dissecthis dissection easier, the student should be provided with a tem- facial
poral bone, in which the course of the facial nerve and the cavity bone,
of the tympanum are exposed. Begin the examination of the
nerve at the stylo-mastoid foramen. With this view saw through
the side of the skull between the meatus externus and the anterior
border of the mastoid process, so as to open the posterior part of
the aqueduct of Fallopius. The nerve will then be seen entering
deeply into the substance of the temporal bone ; and to follow it,
the dissector must cut away with the bone forceps all the bone
projecting above it. In this last step, the cavity of the tympanum
will be more or less opened, and the chain of bones in it exposed.
Trace onwards the nerve along the inner side of the tympanum
till it becomes enlarged and bends suddenly inwards to the meatus
auditorius internus. Remove the surrounding bone from the enlargement on the nerve, tracing to it the large superficial petrosal
nerve, and then lay open the meatus auditorius to see the facial
and auditory nerves in that hollow.
K 4
136 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
ofchorda tympa- ni,
and other branch- es.
Facial nerve.
winds through
bone,
The course of the chorda tympani nerve (branch of the facial)
across the tympanum will be exposed by the removal of the incus.
The nerve may also be traced through the wall of the cavity
behind, as well as out of the cavity in front.
The remaining branches of the facial nerve in the bone are very
minute, and are not to be seen, unless on a fresh piece which has
been softened in acid. The student may therefore omit all the
paragraphs marked with an asterisk till he is able to obtain a part
on which a minute examination can be made.
Thefacial nerve has been seen in the base of the skull to
enter the internal auditory meatus with the auditory nerve,
with which it is connected. The nerve is then received into
the aperture of the aqueduct of Fallopius in the bottom of
the meatus, and is conducted through the temporal bone to
temporal the stylo- mastoid foramen and the face (p. 36.) . In its serpentine course through the bone, the nerve is first directed
inwards to the inner wall of the tympanum : at that spot it
is mark- suddenly bends backwards, and is marked by a gangliform
swelling, swelling (intumescentia gangliformis) to which several nerves
receives are united. From this swelling the nerve is continued
twigs . through the arched course of the aqueduct, viz. along the
upper part of the inner wall of the tympanum, and then
behind that cavity to the aperture of exit from the bone.
The branches of the nerve in the bone serve to connect it
with other nerves.
ed by
which
many
Branch- es join- ing nerve
to audi- tory nerve,
to su- perior maxil.
lary,
tympa- nic, and sympa- thetic,
to auri- cular branch
Connecting branches.-These branches communicate with
the auditory, vagus, and glosso- pharyngeal nerves ; also
with two divisions of the fifth nerve (superior and inferior
maxillary) .
* a. Union with the auditory nerve. - In the bottom of the meatus
the facial and auditory nerves are connected by one or two minute filaments.
* b. Connecting branches of the gangliform enlargement. —The swelling of the facial nerve receives three small twigs. One in front is the
large superficial petrosal nerve (vidian) ; another is the small superficial
petrosal of the tympanic nerve ; and the third is the external superficial
petrosal, which is derived from the sympathetic on the middle meningeal artery.
* c. Filaments of the auricular branch of the pneumogastric join the
trunk of the facial nerve, near the stylo-mastoid foramen, the auriof vagus, cular branch crossing the other at that spot in its course to the ear.
OTIC GANGLION. 137
tory by d. Chorda tympani. —This long but slender branch of the facial to gustanerve crosses the tympanum, and becomes united with the gustatory chorda tympani.
nerve near the skull. Arising about a quarter of an inch from
the stylo-mastoid foramen, the nerve is directed forwards to the
tympanum through a canal in its posterior boundary, and enters
that cavity below the pyramid. In the cavity the nerve is enlarged by a covering of the lining membrane, and is directed forwards across the handle of the malleus and the membrana tympani
to an aperture on the inner side of the Glasserian fissure, through
which it leaves the tympanum. Outside the skull the chorda tympani descends to the gustatory nerve (see p. 88.) .
nerve.
The AUDITORY NERVE will be examined with the ear. It Auditory
may now be seen to divide into two parts, one of which enters
the cochlea, and the other the vestibule.
-
tion
be refresh
Dissection of the otic ganglion. At this late period of the Dissecdissection, there is little to be seen of the ganglion, but the student should
should remember that it is one of the things to be examined in a peated
fresh part. Its situation is on the inner aspect of the inferior fre
maxillary nerve, close to the base of the skull, and it must there- part.
fore be arrived at from the inner side. Putting the part in the
same position as for the examination of Meckel's ganglion, define
the Eustachian tube and the muscles of the palate, and then take
away the levator palati and the tube, using much care in removing
the last. When some cellular membrane is cleared away, the
internal pterygoid muscle is exposed, with the trunk of the inferior
maxillary nerve above it, and a small branch (internal pterygoid)
descending to the surface of the muscle. If the dissector traces up
this branch of nerve of the pterygoid muscle, he will be led to the
ganglion.
fine
lion
branch-
* To complete the dissection, saw vertically through the petrous To depart of the temporal bone, a little nearer the middle line than the ganginner wall of the tympanum, the bone being supported whilst it is
divided. Taking off now some membrane that covers the ganglion, and its
follow backwards a small branch to the tensor tympani muscle, es.
and open the small canal that contains the muscle by entering it
from below through the carotid canal. Above this small branch is
another minute nerve (small superficial petrosal nerve) that issues
from the skull, and joins the back of the ganglion. A small twig
is to be sought from the front of the ganglion to the tensor palati
muscle, and another to join the sympathetic nerve on the middle
meningeal artery.
138 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Otic ganglion The OTIC GANGLION (gang. auriculare, Arnold) resembles
the other ganglia connected with the fifth nerve.
It is a
side of small reddish body, which is situate on the inner aspect of
is on inner
inferior maxil- lary.
Struc- ture.
Branch- es join it with fifth,
the inferior maxillary nerve close to the skull, and surrounds
the origin of the branch of nerve to the internal pterygoid
muscle. By its inner surface the ganglion is in contact with
the Eustachian tube, and at a little distance behind is seen
the middle meningeal artery. In this ganglion, as in the
others above referred to, filaments from motor, sensory, and
sympathetic nerves are blended. Some twigs are furnished
by it to muscles.
*a. Connecting branches - roots. -The ganglion is joined by a fasciculus from the motor part of the inferior maxillary nerve, and is
closely united with the nerve of the internal pterygoid muscle, thus resympa ceiving two of its roots, motor and sensory, from the fifth nerve.
thetic,
Its
connection with the sympathetic is established by a twig received from
and tym- the plexus on the middle meningeal artery. Further, the ganglion is panic connected with the tympanic nerve by means of the small superficial
petrosal nerve that joins the posterior part.
nerves.
Other
enter
*b. Branches ofdistribution. - Two muscles receive their nerves from branches the otic ganglion, viz. tensor tympani and circumflexus palati. The
muscles. nerve of the tensor tympani is directed backwards, and enters the bony
canal that contains that muscle. The branch of the circumflexus,
arising from the front of the ganglion, may be supposed to be derived
from the internal pterygoid nerve.
internal ptery- goid.
Nerve of The nerve of the internal pterygoid muscle is a long slender
branch, that arises from the inner side of the inferior maxillary
nerve near the skull, and is directed downwards to the deep surface
of the muscle. This nerve is joined by a fasciculus from the motor
part of the fifth nerve.
The dissection of the left pterygo-maxillary region may be again
repeated on this side of the body.
Dissec- tion .
SECTION XV.
THE TONGUE.
Dissection. -Take the tongue with the larynx still attached to
it, to examine its general form. The ends of the lingual muscles
may be cut off, but enough of each should be left to trace it afterwards into the substance of the tongue.
THE TONGUE. 139
tion and
The TONGUE Occupies the interior of the mouth, and is Tongue.
retained in its position by the muscles and the mucous mem- Situabrane that are attached to the under surface. It is some- form.
what pyramidal in form, and increases in thickness from
before backwards.
tions of
base.
surface.
The apex or tip of the tongue is in contact with the Connecincisor teeth ; whilst the base looks towards the pharynx, apex,
and is connected with the epiglottis by three folds of mucous
membrane. The upper surface or dorsum of the tongue is Upper
somewhat convex, and is received into the hollow of the
roof of the mouth ; it is divided into two equal parts by a
median groove, which is less marked towards the posterior
part of the tongue, and ends oftentimes in a hollow named
foramen cæcum. This aspect is studded with numerous
papillæ, and near the posterior part are some lingual glands.
The under surface gives attachment to the mucous mem- Under
brane, and to the different lingual muscles. The borders of
the tongue are thick and round at the base of the organ, but
gradually become thinner near the apex.
-
surface.
Borders.
Papilla. There are the following kinds of papillæ on Kinds of papillæ ;
the dorsum of the tongue ; the conical and filiform , the
fungiform, and the caliciform.
and filiin mida. The conical and filiform papillæ are numerous small points conical
that cover the surface of the tongue, like the villi on the mucous form,
membrane of the small intestine, and gradually cease near its
base. Some of the papillæ (conical) are wider at their attach- situation
ment than at the free end, and are most developed at the central dle of
part of the tongue. Other sbecome longer ( filiform) , especially
towards the sides of the tongue. These small papillæ are covered
with secondary minute processes.
tongue ;
form b. Thefungiform papillæ are less numerous but larger than the fungipreceding set, amongst which they are scattered . They are wider
at the free end than at the tongue, and project beyond the other
set ; they are mostly situate at the tip and sides of the tongue. mostly
The free or larger end is covered with small filamentous pro- and
jections.
at tip
sides ;
form c. The caliciform (papillæ vallatæ) are fewer in number and calicilarger than the others, and are placed near the root of the tongue. near
Their number varies from eight to fifteen. These papillæ extend tongue ;
across the tongue in a line resembling the letter V. Each papilla
root of
140 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
form consists of a central truncated part of a conical form, which is surrounded by a fold of the mucous membrane. Its wider part or
base projects above the surface, whilst the apex is attached to the
is mark- tongue. Both the papilla and the surrounding fold are furnished with smaller secondary papillæ.
ed by other papillæ.
Second- ary pa- pillæ.
Struc- ture of
Secondary papillæ exist between the larger kinds as well as in the
part of the tongue behind the caliciform kind ; but they are not observed till the epithelium is removed. ( Todd and Bowman. )
Structure ofthe papillæ. —Each papilla contains one or more vascular
papillæ. loops, and a nervous filament. Investing the whole is a layer of laminar
epithelium, which is most marked on the filiform papillæ. On the
papillæ this covering gives rise to minute points resembling hairs.
Dissec- tion of muscles and nerves.
Parts found in
Dissection. - Place the tongue on its dorsum and dissect out the
different muscles that enter into it, and expose the septum of the
tongue along the middle line. The glosso- pharyngeal nerve is to
be traced into the lingual substance both on the dorsum and on the under surface. The gustatory and hypo- glossal nerves may
likewise be followed further into the tongue, the ramifications of
the former reaching the papillæ.
STRUCTURE. — The tongue consists chiefly of muscular
tongue. fibres, in which some fatty substance is scattered ; and a
fibrous septum occupies the middle line. Entering it are
the lingual vessels and nerves, and connected with these are
the papilla on the upper surface. The whole is enveloped
by the mucous membrane.
Afibrous incomseptum .
The fibrous septum is seen in the middle line of the
plete tongue, between the genio-hyo- glossi muscles. It is strong
posteriorly, where it is fixed to the hyoid bone, and
gradually ceases as it extends forwards. To its sides are
attached the muscular fibres. A thin piece of fibro-cartilage is sometimes present in the septum.
External MUSCLES.-In each half of the tongue are the termiof the nations of its extrinsic muscles, viz. stylo-glossus, hyo- muscles
tongue. glossus, palato-glossus, and genio-hyo-glossus. The fibres of
the stylo-glossus are directed forwards along the border of the
tongue ; and internal to these are the fibres of the palatoglossus and hyo-glossus, which mix with them. In the
middle line, from base to apex, are implanted the vertical
fibres of the genio-hyo-glossus. These muscles have been
MUSCLES OF THE TONGUE. 141
already examined, and their description will be found at
page 91.
Besides these external muscles, there are the following Special
special or intrinsic muscles of the tongue :
muscles.
lingualis Inferior lingualis . -Between the stylo- glossus and genio- Inferior
hyo-glossus of the tongue is the fleshy fasciculus of the large
or inferior lingualis muscle. It arises posteriorly at the
base of the tongue ; and its fibres, which are longitudinal,
join those of the hyo-glossus and stylo-glossus, and reach
forwards to the tip of that organ, where they terminate.
A considerable part of each half of the tongue is constituted forms
by this muscle.
―
great part.
lingualis Superior lingualis. When the mucous membrane is Superior
removed from the dorsum of one half of the tongue, a thin
layer of superficial longitudinal fibres will be exposed (lingualis longitudinalis superior). This begins by thin fibres is small
at the root of the tongue, and extends to the tip : the fibres
are best marked about the middle or near the end of the
tongue, but they do not reach the whole length of the organ.
in size.
versalis
forms
the half
tongue.
The transversalis muscle will be seen by removing the Transfibres of the upper and lower longitudinal muscles, to form muscle
the chief part of the half of the tongue, external to the most of
genio-hyo-glossus. Its fibres arise externally from the border of the
and dorsum of the tongue, and end along the middle line ; or
vice versâ. The anterior fibres are continuous with the
muscle of the opposite side, whilst those farther back are
curved upwards, are mingled with the genio-hyo-glossus,
and are inserted into the fibrous septum.
mem- The mucous membrane of the tongue is a continuation of that Mucous
lining the mouth, and is provided with a laminar epithelium. brane ;
Like the membrane of the mouth it is furnished with numerous its epimuciparous glands, and some follicles. The follicles are seen on and folthe surface, and are either single or collected in patches.
thelium
licles ;
glands at The glands (lingual) are compound in structure, similar to those and
of the lips and cheek, and are placed beneath the mucous mem- the base
brane covering the posterior third of the dorsum and the borders
of the tongue. Some of their ducts open into the foramen cæcum.
Under the tip of the tongue, on each side of the frænum, is a and becollection of the same kind of glands, from which several ducts tip.
issue.
neath
142 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Nerves from three sources,
gusta- tory,
NERVES.- There are three nerves to each half of the
tongue, the gustatory, the hypo-glossal, and the glossopharyngeal.
The gustatory nerve gives upwards filaments to the muscular
substance, and to the two smallest sets of papillæ, conical and fungininth, form ; it also joins the hypo- glossal nerve. The hypo-glossal nerve
is spent in long slender filaments that are furnished to the musand glos- cular substance of the tongue. The glosso-pharyngeal nerve so-pha- ryngeal. divides into two branches near the border of the tongue. One
turns to the dorsum of the tongue, and ends in the mucous membrane near the base. The other passes beneath the tongue,
and divides into filaments that enter the muscular substance, and
supply the papillæ caliciformes, as well as the mucous membrane
covering the part of the tongue behind those papillæ.
Arteries and veins.
VESSELS. -The arteries are derived chiefly from the lingual
artery of each side ; these, together with the veins, have been
examined, p. 92. After supplying the muscular substance the
vessels enter the papillæ, forming a loop or loops in the interior,
according to their size.
Dissec- Dissection.
tion.
Outline ofla- rynx .
Situa- tion and
SECTION XVI.
THE LARYNX.
Cur through the root of the tongue, and remove
it from the larynx, but without injuring the epiglottis. The parts that are now to be described would be much better seen on a fresh
larynx.
The LARYNX is the upper dilated part of the air tube, in
which the voice is produced. This organ is pyramidal in
shape, with the base uppermost, and consists of several cartilages, which are united together by ligamentous bands ; of
muscles to move the cartilages ; and of vessels and nerves.
The whole is lined by mucous membrane.
Occupying the middle line of the neck, the larynx is in
connec front of the pharynx, and between the carotid vessels. tions.
Superiorly it is attached to the hyoid bone, and inferiorly it
is continuous with the trachea. To the upper part the
epiglottis is attached. The front is prominent along the
middle line of the neck ; and the posterior aspect is covered
MUSCLES OF THE LARYNX. 143
by the mucous membrane of the pharynx. The larynx Is very move- is very moveable, and during deglutition is elevated and able.
depressed by the different extrinsic muscles connected with
it and the hyoid bone.
------ cial muslarynx .
MUSCLES. The special muscles of the larynx pass from six speone cartilage to another, and modify by their action the cles of
condition of the glottis. Commonly there are six muscles
described, but the number is stated differently by anatomists.
Three are outside the cartilages, viz. crico-thyroid, posterior
crico-arytenoid, and arytenoid. Three are more or less concealed by the thyroid cartilage, and are the lateral cricoarytenoideus, the thyro-arytenoideus, and the arytenoepiglottideus.
tion
external
Dissection. On one side of the larynx, say the right, the Dissecmuscles are to be dissected, and on the opposite side the nerves
and vessels. Extend the larynx, and when it is fastened in that
state with pins, clear away from the os hyoides and the thyroid
cartilage the following extrinsic muscles that are inserted into
them, viz. the constrictor, sterno-hyoid, sterno-thyroid, and thyrohyoid. Between the thyroid and cricoid cartilages in front the ofthe
dissector will see one of the three small external muscles, crico- set of
thyroid. The other two external muscles are situate at the posterior aspect of the larynx : to expose them it will be necessary to
turn over the larynx, and to remove the mucous membrane covering it. On the back of the cricoid cartilage the dissector will find
the crico-arytenoideus posticus muscle of each side ; and above
these, on the posterior part of the arytenoid cartilages, the arytænoid muscle will be seen.
muscles.
thyroi- The CRICO-THYROID MUSCLE is triangular in form, and is Cricoseparated by an interval from the one of the opposite side. deus
It arises from the side of the cricoid cartilage, and its fibres
ascend, diverging from one another, to be inserted into the
small cornu and the lower border of the thyroid cartilage, is small .
also for a short distance into the inner surface of the same.
The muscle rests on the crico-thyroid membrane, and is
concealed by the sterno-thyroid muscle.
arytæ- The CRICO- ARYTENOIDEUS POSTICUS MUSCLE lies on the Cricoposterior part of the cricoid cartilage. Its origin is from noideus
the depression on the side of the vertical ridge at the pos- posticus
144 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
is on back of cricoid cartilage.
Arytæ- noideus
has su- perficial or ob- lique,
terior aspect of that cartilage. From this origin the fibres
are directed outwards, and converge to be inserted into the
outer part of the base of the arytenoid cartilage.
The ARYTÆNOIDEUS is a single muscle in the middle line,
and is placed in the concavity on the posterior aspect of the
arytenoid cartilages, to which it is attached. Two sets of
fibres with different directions are seen in the muscle. The
superficial fibres consist of two oblique fasciculi , which cross
like the parts of the letter X, each passing from the base of
and deep one cartilage to the apex of the other. The deep fibres are
transverse, and are inserted into the outer border and the
posterior surface of the cartilages ; they close the interval
between the cartilages. A few of the oblique fibres of the
muscle are usually continued round the cartilage to join the
thyro-arytenoid muscle, or the fibres in the arytenoepiglottidean fold of mucous membrane.
or trans- verse fibres.
Dissec- tion of
muscles.
Dissection.-To expose the remaining muscles which are someinternal what concealed by the thyroid cartilage, remove the right half of
the cartilage by cutting it through near the middle line, after its
small cornu has been detached from the cricoid cartilage. By the
removal of a little cellular membrane the dissector will expose
inferiorly the lateral crico - arytenoid muscle ; above it, the thyroarytenoideus muscle ; and still higher, the thin muscular fibres in
the fold of mucous membrane between the epiglottis and the arytænoid cartilage.
Lateral crico- arytæ- noideus
The CRICO-ARYTÆNOIDEUS LATERALIS arises from the
lateral part of the upper border of the cricoid cartilage ; and
its fibres are directed backwards to be inserted, with the
thyro-arytenoid muscle, into the projection on the outer
side of the base of the arytenoid cartilage . This muscle is
thyroid concealed by the crico-thyroideus, and its upper border is
contiguous to the succeeding muscle.
is be- neath
cartilage.
Thyro- arytæ- The THYRO-ARYTÆNOIDEUS MUSCLE extends backwards in
noideus. the interior of the larynx from the thyroid to the arytenoid
cartilage ; it is thick below, but thin and expanded above.
The muscle arises from the thyroid cartilage near the middle
Some line, for about the lower third of its depth. The fibres are
cend to directed backwards, with different directions ; the external tip, ascend somewhat, and are inserted into the upper part of
fibres as-
INTERIOR OF THE LARYNX. 145
to base
noid
lage.
the arytenoid cartilage on its outer aspect ; but the internal others go
and lower fibres are transverse, and form a thick bundle, of arytæ.
which is inserted into the anterior part of the base of that carticartilage, as well as into the outer surface, and some fibres
are attached to the vocal cord. By its outer aspect the Connec
muscle is in contact with the thyroid cartilage ; and the
inner surface rests on the vocal cords, and on the ventricle
of the larynx and its pouch.
tions.
sor of
tis
origin.
The DEPRESSOR OF THE EPIGLOTTIS (reflector epiglottidis, Depresthyro-aryteno-epiglottideus) is the thin muscular layer, epiglot which is contained in the fold of mucous membrane that
bounds laterally the opening of the larynx. Its fibres arise double
posteriorly from the front of the arytenoid cartilage, some
being continuous with the oblique fibres of the arytenoid
muscle, and a fasciculus (thyro- epiglottideus) is attached anteriorly to the inner surface of the thyroid cartilage. From
this origin the fibres turn upwards with very different directions, and are inserted into the border of the epiglottis. The Inserstrength of this muscle varies much in different bodies.
tion.
inside INTERIOR OF THE LARYNX. -Within the space enclosed Parts
by the laryngeal cartilages are the parts more immediately larynx.
concerned in the production of the voice, viz. the vocal
cords, the glottis, and the ventricle of the larynx and its
pouch.
Dissec- tion to
them .
Dissection. -Open the tube of the larynx by dividing it along
the posterior part ; and in cutting through the arytenoid muscle expose
let the incision be rather to the right of the middle line, to
avoid the nerves that enter it. On looking into the larynx a
depression (ventricle) is seen on each side ; and if a probe is passed
into this hollow it will be found to enter a small pouch by an
aperture in the anterior part. The dissector is to fill the pouch
on the right side by introducing very small round bits of cotton
wool into it.
partly The space in the inside of the larynx reaches from the Space
superior aperture to the lower border of the cricoid cartilage. filled,
In the recent state of the parts, the large interval between
the alæ of the thyroid cartilage is much diminished in size by
the thyro-arytenoid muscles and ligaments, so that only a lot.
narrow interval, the glottis, is left at one spot. Above the tis..
L
produc- ing
146 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
glottis, on each side, is the lateral hollow of the ventricle of
The rest the larynx. The rest of the space remains of the same shape
and size as the cricoid cartilage, and is therefore circular,
and larger than the narrow part before alluded to.
large.
Upper orifice,
shape,
The upper orifice of the larynx will be seen by placing
in contact the cut surfaces. It is triangular in shape, with
the base in front and the apex behind, and its sides are
sloped obliquely downwards, in the antero- posterior direction. Its boundaries are, -the epiglottis in front, the arytæbounda- noid muscle and cartilages behind, and the aryteno- epiglottidean fold of mucous membrane on each side. This aperture
is closed by the epiglottis during deglutition.
and
ries.
Glottis.
Situa- tion,
form ,
The glottis, or the fissure between the lower vocal cords,
is the narrowest part of the cavity of the larynx. It is triangular in form, like the upper orifice, but its wider part is
posteriorly at the interval between the arytenoid cartilages.
and size . Its measurement from before backwards is about an inch,
whilst the base is about a third of that size. In the female,
the length is less.
Ventri- cle.
Situa- tion.
Parts around.
larynx.
Form and poThe ventricle of the larynx is the oval hollow above the
vocal cord on each side. The upper margin of the opening
is semilunar, and the lower is straight. On the outer surface are the fibres of the thyro-arytenoid muscle, and in the
anterior part is the aperture into the laryngeal pouch.
Pouch of The laryngeal pouch (sacculus laryngis ) will be best seen
by removing, still on the right side, the thyro-arytenoid
muscle. It is a small membranous sac, half an inch deep,
sition and cylindrical in form, which projects upwards between the
thyro-arytenoid muscle and the upper thyro-arytenoid ligament, and reaches as high as the upper border of the thyroid
cartilage. Its cavity communicates with the front of the
ventricle by a narrow aperture, provided with two folds of
mucous membrane. On the outer surface are numerous
small glands, whose ducts are transmitted through the coats
of the sac to the inside. Numerous nerves are also distributed over the sac.
Sur- rounding parts.
Dissec- tion.
Dissection. Remove the mucous membrane on the right side
from the two whitish bands, thyro- arytenoid ligaments, that
bound the ventricle of the larynx. Then take away the lateral
VOCAL CORDS OF THE LARYNX. 147
crico-arytenoid muscle, and any fibres that may remain of the
thyro-arytenoideus.
arytæ- The thyro-arytenoid ligaments are two bands on each Thyroside, which are extended from the angle of the thyroid to the noid liarytenoid cartilage, one forming the upper, the other the
lower margin of the ventricle.
gaments.
or vocal a. The inferior one ( chorda vocalis ) is a strong band of Inferior
elastic tissue, which is almost transverse in direction. At- cord
tached, in front, to the angle of the thyroid cartilage, about
half way down, the fibres of the ligament are directed backwards, and are inserted into the anterior projection at the
base of the arytenoid cartilage. Internally, this band is has these
free in the cavity of the larynx, the interval between it and tions.
the opposite one being the glottis ; externally, it is covered
bythe thyro-arytenoid muscle ; and inferiorly it is continuous, near the arytenoid cartilage, with the crico- thyroid
membrane.
connecb. The upper ligament (false vocal cord) is semilunar Upper in form, and is much weaker than the preceding one. It is ligament
fixed in front to the angle of the thyroid cartilage, near the
attachment of the epiglottis ; and behind to the anterior
border ofthe arytenoid cartilage. This ligament contains is a very slight some fibrous tissue in its structure, which is continuous with band,
that in the aryteno- epiglottidean fold of mucous membrane.
brane.
The mucous membrane of the larynx is prolonged to the lungs Mucous
through the trachea. When entering the larynx it is stretched be- memtween the epiglottis and the tip of the arytenoid cartilage, forming
the arytæno-epiglottidean fold on each side ofthe laryngeal orifice.
In this part it is very loose, and the submucous tissue abundant.
In the larynx the membrane closely lines the cavity, sinks into
the ventricle, and is prolonged into the laryngeal pouch. On the
thyro-arytenoid ligaments it is very thin and adherent, allowing
these to be visible through it.
Epithe- lium
ferent
A columnar ciliated epithelium covers all the surface below the
superior vocal cords, and is continued anteriorly to the posterior
aspect of the epiglottis as far as its middle. In the part of the has diflarynx above the line mentioned, the epithelium is of the laminar texture.
kind. Numerous muciparous glands are connected with the mu- Glands.
cous membrane of the larynx ; and their orifices will be seen on the
surface, especially at the posterior aspect ofthe epiglottis. In the
L 2
148 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Nerves are from vagus.
Dissec- tion.
Recur rent nerve
edge of the arytano- epiglottidean fold there is a little swelling
occasioned by a mass of subjacent glands (arytenoid) and a small
fibro- cartilaginous body. None exist over the vocal cord.
NERVES. The nerves that supply branches to the larynx
are the superior and inferior laryngeal branches of the
pneumo-gastric nerve ; the former is distributed to the
mucous membrane, and the latter to the muscles.
Dissection. The course of the laryngeal nerves in the neck
has been already traced, and their termination in the larynx is to
be dissected on the untouched side. For this purpose disarticulate the other half of the thyroid from the cricoid cartilage, and
take care of the recurrent nerve which lies near the junction between the two. Fasten down the trachea and larynx with pins, and
draw the thyroid away from the cricoid cartilage. Now trace the
inferior laryngeal nerve over the side of the cricoid cartilage to
the muscles of the larynx and to the mucous membrane of the
pharynx. Afterwards the superior nerve is to be followed to the
mucous membrane of the interior of the larynx and to that of the
pharynx. Two communications are to be found between these
nerves ; one is beneath the thyroid cartilage, the other in the
mucous membrane of the pharynx. An artery accompanies each
nerve.
upper
a. The inferior laryngeal nerve (recurrent) , when about to enter
the larynx, furnishes backwards an offset to the mucous membrane of the pharynx, which joins with filaments from the
supplies laryngeal nerve. The nerve then passes beneath the ala of the thy- special roid cartilage, and ends in branches for the different special muscles
except of the larynx, except the crico- thyroideus. Its small muscular
muscles
one.
laryngeal nerve
current,
branches are easily followed, but that to the arytenoid muscle
passes beneath the crico- arytenoideus posticus. Beneath the
thyroid cartilage this nerve is joined by a long offset of the upper
laryngeal nerve.
Superior b. The superior laryngeal nerve pierces the thyro- hyoid ligament, and gives offsets to the mucous membrane covering the
back of the larynx ; it also furnishes a long branch beneath the
joins re- ala of the thyroid cartilage to communicate with the recurrent nerve. The trunk of the nerve then terminates in many branches
and ends for the supply of the mucous membrane. Some ofthese ascend in in mu- the aryteno-epiglottidean fold of that membrane to the epiglottis,
and to the root of the tongue. The others, which are the largest,
descend on the inner side of the ventricular pouch, and supply the
lining membrane of the larynx as low as the chorda vocalis. One
cous mem- brane.
HYOID BONE. 149
nerve of this set pierces the arytenoid muscle, and appears to
supply it.
VESSELS. -The arteries of the interior of the larynx are Arteries,
furnished from the superior and inferior thyroid trunks.
perior a. The laryngeal branch of the superior thyroid artery enters from suthe larynx with the superior laryngeal nerve, and divides like it thyroid ;
into ascending and descending branches ; some of these enter the
muscles, but the rest supply the mucous membrane of the epiglottis,
that of the root of the tongue, and of the interior of the larynx. It
anastomoses with the following artery both beneath the ala of the
thyroid cartilage, and in the mucous membrane of the pharynx.
ferior b. The laryngeal branch of the inferior thyroid artery ascends from inon the back of the cricoid cartilage, and supplies the mucous thyroid
membrane of the pharynx and the muscles of the larynx, like the
nerve. Some twigs, also, from the inferior thyroid artery perfo- two
rate the crico-thyroid membrane, and end in the mucous lining of sources.
the interior of the larynx at the lower part.
end dif- Veins.-The vein that accompanies the branch of artery from Veins
the superior thyroid joins the internal jugular or the superior ferently.
thyroid vein, whilst the vein corresponding to the other artery
opens into the plexus connected with the inferior thyroid veins
(p. 75. 114.).
SECTION XVII.
HYOID BONE, CARTILAGES AND LIGAMENTS OF THE LARYNX,
AND STRUCTURE OF THE TRACHEA.
tion.
Dissection. To expose the hyoid bone, the cartilages of the larynx, Dissecand the epiglottis, let the dissector take away the muscles and the mucous membrane. In the arytæno-epiglottidean fold of mucous membrane a small fibro- cartilaginous body (cuneiform cartilage) should be
sought.
bone. The hyoid bone (os hyoides) is situate between the larynx and Hyoid
the root of the tongue. Resembling the letter U, placed horizon- Form.
tally with the legs turned backwards, it offers for examination a
central part or body, and two side pieces or cornua.
thebone The body is flattened, and measures most in the vertical direc- Body of
tion. Convex in front, it presents an uneven surface for the attachment of muscles, whilst on the opposite aspect it is concave. To the upper border is attached the septum of the tongue.
L 3
150 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Side pieces large
and small.
There are four large
and some small carti- lages.
cartilage
is con- vex in front,
The cornua are two in number on each side (large and small) .
The large cornu continues the bone backwards, and is joined to
the body of the os hyoides by a surface covered with cartilage.
The surfaces of this cornu look somewhat upwards and downwards ;
and the size decreases from before backwards till it ends posteriorly
in a tubercle. The small cornu, or appendix, is directed upwards
from the point of union of the great cornu with the body, and is
joined bythe stylo- hyoid ligament. It is frequently cartilaginous.
CARTILAGES OF THE LARYNX. There are four large
cartilages in the larynx, which are concerned in the production of the voice, viz. the thyroid, the cricoid, and the two
arytenoid. In addition, there is the fibro-cartilaginous
epiglottis, together with some small rudimentary pieces in
the aryteno- epiglottidean fold of mucous membrane.
Thyroid The thyroid cartilage forms the upper part of the larynx, and
protects the vocal apparatus as with a shield. From the greater
width of the upper part of this cartilage the form of the larynx
somewhat resembles a funnel. The anterior part is prominent in
concave the middle line (pomum Adami) ; but the cartilage is concave be- behind. hind at the same part, and gives attachment to the epiglottis and
the thyro- arytenoid muscles and ligaments. The upper border is notched in the centre.
Formed of two halves,
The cartilage is formed of two square parts or halves, which are
united in the middle line. The inner surface of each half is
smooth, but the outer is marked by an oblique line, that extends
from a tubercle at the root of the upper cornu, nearly to the middle
of the lower border. Posteriorly the half of the cartilage has a
borders thick border, which terminates upwards and downwards in a
and cor rounded projection or cornu : of these two the upper cornu is the
longest ; but the lower cornu is thicker than the other, and articulates with the cricoid cartilage.
each having
nua.
Cricoid carti- lage.
Form.
Surfaces.
The cricoid cartilage is stronger than the thyroid, below which
it is placed, and encircles the cavity of the larynx. It is very
unequal in depth before and behind, the posterior part being three
times deeper than the anterior, something like a signet ring.
The outer surface is flat and rather square at the back of the
cartilage, and is marked by a median ridge, with two contiguous
lateral depressions ; and on the side of the cartilage is a slight
articular surface which receives the lower cornu of the thyroid
cartilage. The inner surface is smooth, and is covered by mucous
membrane.
CARTILAGES OF THE LARYNX. 151
per most
The lower border is nearly straight, and is united to the first Borders,
ring of the trachea by fibrous membrane. But the upper border the upis irregular in its outline ; for though it is straight posteriorly be- uneven.
tween the articular marks for the arytenoid cartilages, or in the
part corresponding to the deeper piece ofthe ring, in front of that
spot the border is sloped obliquely downwards to the middle line.
The cricoid cartilage is somewhat overlaid on the sides by the
thyroid cartilage.
noid car- The arytenoid cartilages are two in number, one on each side of Arytæthe middle line, and are placed on the upper border of the cricoid tilages.
cartilage, at the back of the larynx. Each cartilage is triangular Situain shape, and offers for examination a base, apex, and three sur- form.
faces.
tion and
The base has a slightly hollowed surface for articulation with Base.
the cricoid cartilage, and is elongated by means ofan anterior and a
posterior process ; the former gives attachment to the vocal cord,
and the latter receives the insertion of the crico-arytenoid
muscles. The apex is directed backwards and somewhat inwards, Apex.
and is surmounted by the cartilage of Santorini. The inner sur- Three face is flat and even, but the outer is rough and excavated. At
the posterior aspect the cartilage is concave and smooth.
surfaces.
Cartilages ofSantorini. — Attached to the apex of each arytenoid Two car- tilages of cartilage is a small conical cartilage (cornicula, capitula Santorini), Santowhich is bent inwards towards the one of the opposite side. The
arytæno-epiglottidean fold is connected with it.
rini.
neiform Cuneiform cartilages. -Two other very small fibro-cartilaginous bodies, Two cuone on each side, which are contained in the aryteno - epiglottidean folds, cartihave received this name. They are somewhat circular or conical in lages.
form, and are situate near the capitula of the arytenoid cartilages :
the situation of each in the fold of the mucous membrane is marked
by a slight projection.
tis. The epiglottis is a piece of fibro-cartilage that in form resembles Epiglot.
a leaf, with the stalk below, and the lamina or expanded part Form
above. Its position is behind the tongue, and in front of the and po
upper orifice of the larynx.
sition.
The anterior surface is bent forwards to the tongue, to which Surfaces.
it is connected by three folds of mucous membrane. The posterior surface is hollowed from side to side, but convex from above
down. To its sides are united the arytæno- epiglottidean folds of sides.
mucous membrane. The lower part is connected by a fibrous band Foot-
(thyro-epiglottidean ligament) to the posterior aspect of the
thyroid cartilage, near the notch in the upper border. The epiglottis is further connected to the hyoid bone and the root of the
stalk.
L 4
152 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
in it.
Glands tongue by strong bands of tissue. After the mucous membrane is
removed from the epiglottis, the fibro- cartilaginous structure is
seen to be perforated by numerous apertures that lodge muciparous glands.
Sup- posed gland.
Liga- ments of
rynx,
Between the epiglottis and the hyoid bone is a mass of yellowish fat,
which has been incorrectly named by some the epiglottidean gland.
LIGAMENTS OF THE LARYNX. —The larynx is connected
the la- by ligaments with the hyoid bone above and the trachea
below. Moreover, there are connecting fibres uniting together the cartilages, and between some of the cartilages
synovial membranes exist.
between os hy- oides and tra- chea.
Thyro- hyoid mem- brane.
Crico- tracheal mem- brane.
Between cricoid
Union ofthe larynx with the hyoid bone and the trachea. -Athin
loose membrane (thyro-hyoid) passes from the thyroid cartilage
to the hyoid bone, and a second membrane connects the cricoid
cartilage with the trachea.
a. The thyro-hyoid ligament is attached on the one part to the upper
border of the thyroid cartilage, and on the other to the upper border of
the hyoid bone, at the posterior aspect. Of some thickness in the centre,
it gradually becomes thinner towards the sides, and finally ends in a
rounded cord, between the extremity of the hyoid bone and the upper
cornu of the thyroid cartilage. The superior laryngeal nerve and
artery perforate this ligament, and a synovial membrane is placed
between it and the posterior surface of the hyoid bone.
b. The membrane joining the lower border of the cricoid cartilage to
the first ring of the trachea (crico-tracheal ligament), resembles the
bands that join one ring of the trachea to another.
Union of the cricoid and thyroid cartilages.
These cartilages
and thy are joined in the middle line in front by the crico-thyroid ligatilages ment, and on the side by a capsular ligament around the small roid carare
an an- terior
cornu of the thyroid cartilage.
a. The anterior crico-thyroid ligament or membrane is thick and
ligament strong in the centre, and is attached tothe contiguous margins of the carlages from which it is named. But on the sides the ligament is thin,
and leaving the lower border of the thyroid cartilage is continued upwards to the chorda vocalis. Some small apertures exist in this membrane for the passage of small arteries into the larynx. The ligament
is partly concealed by the crico-thyroid muscle.
and a
lateral joint.
b. The lateral crico- thyroid or capsular ligament surrounds the articular
surfaces between the side of the cricoid, and the lower cornu of the
thyroid cartilage. Its fibres are strongest behind. A synovial membrane lines the capsule.
STRUCTURE OF THE TRACHEA. 153
cricoid and aryArticulation between the cricoid and arytenoid cartilages. Between
This articulation allows of most movement, and the surfaces of the
cartilages which are in contact are retained by a capsule, and tænoid
possess a synovial sac.
sule and sac.
The capsular ligament is fixed to each cartilage around its articular is a capsurface, and one part ( posterior ligament) is strongest on the inner and
posterior aspects. A loose synovial membrane is present in the arti- culation.
arytæ- A kind of capsule with a synovial sac unites the apex of the Between
arytenoid cartilage with the hollowed base of the cartilage (capi- noid and
tulum) of Santorini. Sometimes these cartilages are blended lum.
together.
capitu.
thyroid The ligaments uniting the thyroid and arytenoid cartilages Between
(thyro-arytenoid) have been already seen in the interior of the andarylarynx (p. 147.).
tænoid.
gaments Ligaments of the epiglottis. -A band (thyro- epiglottidean) con- Two linects the lower part of the epiglottis to the posterior surface of the epithyroid cartilage, close to the excavation in the upper border. glottis.
Some fibrous and elastic tissue (hyo- epiglottidean ligament) likewise connects the front of the epiglottis to the hyoid bone.
tuents of STRUCTURE OF THE TRACHEA. The anterior part of the Constitrachea will be seen to be formed of a series of pieces of trachea.
cartilage (segments of rings), which are connected together
by fibrous tissue. The interval at the back of the tube,
between the cartilages, is closed by fibrous membrane, by
muscular fibres, and muciparous glands. And the tube is
lined by the mucous membrane, and a subjacent elastic
tissue.
-
lages.
rities
Cartilages. The pieces of cartilage vary in number from six- Cartiteen to twenty. Each forms an incomplete ring, which occupies Form.
about three fourths of a circle, and each is convex forwards,
forming the front and sides of the tube. At the extremities of the Peculia
trachea these cartilaginous pieces are least constant in size and
form ; for towards the larynx they increase in depth, and the
lowest cartilage is shaped like the letter V. At the extremes also
the cartilages may be slit at their ends, or may be blended together.
The cartilages are united by a fibrous tissue that is continued from are conone to another on both aspects, though in greatest quantity ex- fibrous
ternally, and is extended across the posterior part of the air tube.
Dissection. Remove the fibrous membrane and the muciparous glands Dissecfrom between the cartilages at the back of the trachea, and the muscular
tained in
tissue.
tion. 1
154 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Muscu- lar fibres close trachea behind.
Elastic tissue lines trachea.
Mucous mem- brane,
lium,
and glands.
fibres will be exposed. After the muscular fibres are examined, they
may be cut through to see the elastic tissue and the mucous membrane.
- Muscular fibres. — Between the ends of the cartilages is a continuous layer of transverse unstriped fibres, which are attached on
the sides to the truncated ends of the cartilages. By the one surface the fibres are in contact with the fibrous membrane and
the glands, and by the other with the next structure.
The elastic tissue forms a complete lining to the tracheal tube,
though at the posterior part, where the cartilages are deficient, it
is gathered into strong longitudinal folds. This layer is closely
connected with the mucous membrane.
The mucous membrane of the trachea lines the tube, and resembles that of the larynx, with which it is continuous, in being furepithe- nished with a columnar ciliated epithelium. Connected with this
membrane are numerous muciparous compound glands of variable
size. The largest set are found at the back of the trachea, in the
interval between the cartilages, where they are placed superficially
to and beneath the fibrous membrane of that part : their ducts
pass forwards between the muscular fibres to the surface of the
mucous membrane. Other smaller glands occupy the front and
sides of the trachea, being situated on and in the fibrous tissue
connecting the cartilaginous rings.
muscles
SECTION XVIII.
PREVERTEBRAL MUSCLES AND VERTEBRAL VESSELS.
Deep On the part of the spinal column that was laid aside after
of spine. the separation of the pharynx from it, the student should
examine the deep muscles on the front of the vertebræ.
Dissec- tion.
Longus colli.
-
Dissection. To expose these muscles, it is necessary to remove
the cellular membrane. The muscles are three in number on each
side, and are easily distinguished : the largest one, nearest the
middle line, is the longus colli ; the muscle external to this, which
reaches to the head, is the rectus capitis anticus major ; and the
small muscle, external to the last and close to the skull, the rectus
capitis anticus minor. The small rectus muscle is usually injured
in cutting through the basilar process of the occipital bone.
The LONGUS COLLI MUSCLE is situate on the side of the
bodies of the cervical and upper dorsal vertebræ, and is tenOrigin dinous and pointed above, but larger below. It consists of
PREVERTEBRAL MUSCLES AND VERTEBRAL VESSELS. 155
pieces.
tion.
two parts - internal and external. The internal part arises by two
by fleshy and tendinous processes from the bodies of the two
upper dorsal and two lower cervical vertebræ, and from the
intervening fibro-cartilages. This part of the muscle ascends, and being joined by the external piece, which takes
origin from the transverse processes of four cervical vertebræ
(sixth, fifth, fourth, and third), is inserted into the bodies of Inserthe four upper cervical vertebra. In contact with the an- Parts in
terior surface of this muscle is the pharynx. The inner with it .
border is at some distance inferiorly from the muscle of the
opposite side, but superiorly only the pointed anterior common ligament of the spine separates the two. The outer
border is contiguous to the scalenus, to the vertebral vessels,
and to the rectus capitis anticus major muscle.
contact
Rectus
Origin.
tion.
The RECTUS CAPITIS ANTICUS MAJOR is external to the pre- capitis
ceding muscle, and is largest at its upper end. Its origin is major.
bypointed tendinous slips from the anterior tubercles of the
transverse processes of four cervical vertebræ ( sixth, fifth,
fourth, and third), and the fibres ascend to be inserted into Inserthe basilar process of the occipital bone, in front of the fora- Connec<
men magnum. The anterior aspect of the muscle is covered
by the pharynx, and by the internal carotid artery and the
numerous nerves near the base of the skull. This muscle
partly conceals the following one.
tions.
capitis
is beprecedThe RECTUS CAPITIS ANTICUS MINOR is a small flat muscle, Rectus
that arises from the transverse process, and partly from the minor
anterior arch of the atlas, and ascends to be inserted into the neath
basilar process of the occipital bone, between the foramen ing.
magnum and the preceding muscle. The anterior division
of the suboccipital nerve lies between the borders of this
muscle and the rectus capitis lateralis.
tion.
Dissection. -The small intertransversales will come into view Dissecwhen the other muscles are removed from the front and back of the
transverse processes. By tracing towards the spine the anterior
division of one of the cervical nerves, the muscles will be readily
found, for they are placed on the sides of the nerve. After the
muscles and nerves have been examined, cut off the tips of the
transverse processes to lay bare the vertebral artery.
The INTERTRANSVERSE MUSCLES are slender fleshy slips Inter-
156 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
trans- verse that occupy the intervals between the transverse processes.
muscles. In the neck there are seven pair one for each space ; and Number and at- tach- ments.
---
the first pair is between the atlas and the axis, whilst the
last is between the last cervical and the first dorsal vertebra.
One set is attached to the anterior, and the other to the posterior tubercles of the transverse processes. Between the
muscles, except in the first two spaces, is the anterior division of a cervical nerve, and beneath the posterior muscle
Peculia is the other division of the same nerve. In the upper intertransverse space the posterior muscle is often wanting ; and,
in the lowest space, the muscle of the anterior set is smaller
than the others, or it may be absent.
rities.
nerves in
ramina
Cervical Exit of the cervical nerves from the spinal canal. - The
their fo- cervical nerves issue from the spinal canal through the intervertebral foramina with two exceptions, and bifurcate into
an anterior and a posterior trunk.
give
anterior
and pos- terior dia. The anterior division passes outwards between the intertransverse muscles, and joins the plexuses in the neck.
b. The posterior division turns to the back beneath the
vision. posterior intertransverse muscle, and the other muscles
attached to the posterior tubercles of the transverse processes,
lying between the articular processes of the vertebra.
nerves Firsttwo Thefirst two nerves leave the spinal canal above the posterior
arches ofthe first two vertebræ, and then divide into anterior and posterior trunks.
differ
in both anterior and
posterior divi- sions.
Verte- bral arthe fo.
ramina
a. Anterior division. The anterior part of the first or suboccipital
nerve has been examined (p. 108.) ; and the anterior division of the
second nerve, after perforating the membrane between the posterior
arches of the second and third vertebræ, is directed forwards, outside
the vertebral artery, and beneath the intertransverse muscle of the first space, to join the cervical plexus.
b. The posterior divisions of the first two nerves are described in the dissection of the back.
The vertebral artery has been seen at its origin in the neck
teryin (p. 65.), and its termination is described with the vessels of the
brain. Entering the foramen in the transverse process of the
of cervi- sixth cervical vertebra (usually) , the artery ascends vertically
tebræ. through the foramina in the transverse processes ; and having
passed through the aperture in the atlas, the vessel turns backwards on the posterior arch of that bone, and enters the skull
cal ver-
LIGAMENTS OF THE VERTEBRÆ. 157
tonerves.
through the foramen magnum, after piercing the ligament joining
the atlas and occipital bone. In its course through the foramina, Position
the artery lies in front of the anterior trunks of the cervical
nerves, except those of the first and second, the former of which
crosses on the inner, and the latter on the outer side of the vessel.
The vessel is accompanied by a vein and a plexus of nerves of the A vein
same name. In its course the artery furnishes small twigs to the
spinal canal and the contained cord.
and nerves are with it.
bral vein The vertebral vein commences by small radicles in the occiput Verteand the muscles of the back of the neck, and enters the aperture in
the transverse process of the atlas, where it sometimes receives a
vein through the posterior condyloid foramen of the occipital bone.
Accompanying the artery, the vein traverses the apertures in the ends in
transverse processes, and ends in the subclavian vein. In its course vian
it receives branches from the spinal veins, both internal and exter- Branchnal ; its other branches are described at p. 66.
subclaes.
nerves.
The vertebral plexus of nerves is derived from the inferior cer- Plexus of
vical ganglion of the sympathetic. The plexus surrounds the
artery, and communicates with the spinal nerves as high as the
third or fourth.
SECTION XIX.
LIGAMENTS OF THE VERTEBRÆ AND OF THE CLAVICLE.
On the remaining part of the spine the ligaments that connect the cervical vertebræ one to another, and to the occipital
bone, are to be examined.
tion .
Dissection. -Disarticulate the seventh cervical from the first Dissecdorsal vertebra, and remove altogether the muscles, vessels, nerves,
and cellular structure from the vertebræ. Then saw through the
occipital bone, so as to leave only an osseous ring bounding posteriorly the foramen magnum, and clean the ligaments between the
atlas and the occipital bone.
a verteThe COMMON LIGAMENTS attaching together the cervical Common ligavertebræ are the same as belong to the vertebræ in other ments of
parts of the spine, viz. an anterior and a posterior strong bra.
ligament, ligamentous bands between the lamina and spines
of the bones, and capsular ligaments and synovial membranes between the articulating processes, together with
158 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
These liga- ments describan inter- articular fibro-cartilage between the bodies of the
vertebræ.
These ligaments are first to be examined : their description is given with the ligaments of the spine, at the end of
ed else the dissection of the thorax. But in opening the spinal canal
to see the ligaments inside it, the arches of the three highest
vertebræ should be left untouched.
where.
Special liga- ments are found
exter- nally
SPECIAL LIGAMENTS unite the first two cervical vertebræ
one to another and to the occipital bone : some of these are
external to, and others within the spinal canal.
The ligaments outside the spinal canal are thin fibrous
between membranes that connect the arches of the first two vertebræ
vertebræ in front and behind, and the arch of the atlas with the occifirst two
and ocbone, cipital pital bone at the same aspects. Capsular ligaments surround
the articular surfaces of all these bones, which will be examined more conveniently after the spinal canal is opened.
viz.
posterior and a. Union ofthe atlas with the axis. — 1. The posterior ligament (atlo-axoid) is a thin loose membrane, which is attached
by the one margin to the posterior arch of the atlas, and by
the other to the arch of the axis. Below the superficial layer
anterior atlo-ax- are some deeper and stronger fibres. 2. The anterior liga- oid ;
and an- terior
ment unites the anterior parts of the first two vertebræ in the
same manner as the preceding ligament connects their posterior arches. It is thickest in the middle.
b. Union ofthe atlas with the occipital bone. - 1 . The
anterior ligament ( occipito-atloid) passes from the anterior
margin of the occipital bone, between the condyles, to the
anterior arch of the atlas. The middle part of the ligament,
which is fixed to the tubercle on the front of the atlas, is the
and pos- thickest. 2. The posterior ligament is fixed to the posterior
occipito- half of the foramen magnum (between the condyles), and to
the posterior arch of the atlas. It is thin, and is perforated
on each side by the vertebral artery and the posterior division of the suboccipital nerve.
terior
atloid .
Liga- mentsin.
between
The ligaments inside the spinal canal are peculiar in
ternally form, and assist to retain the skull in position during the
rotatory and nodding movements of the head. Between the
as below. occipital bone and the second vertebra are three strong ligaa central one, and two lateral or check ligaments ;
same bones
ments ---
LIGAMENTS OF THE FIRST TWO VERTEBRÆ, 159
and, moreover, the odontoid process of the axis is fixed against
the posterior aspect of the anterior arch of the atlas by a
strong transverse ligament.
tion .
Dissection. Supposing the laminæ of the cervical vertebræ to Dissecbe removed, except those of the first two bones, the posterior
arches of these two vertebræ are to be sawn through internal to
their articular processes. Afterwards the ring of the occipital
bone that bounds posteriorly the foramen magnum is to be taken
away. Lastly, the student should detach the tube of dura
mater from the interior of the spinal canal ; and on removing the
upper part of the posterior common ligament of the bodies of the
vertebræ, the central ligamentous band between the occipital bone
and the axis (occipito-axoid) will come into view.
-
skull and
thick
band.
a. Union of the occipital bone with the axis. 1. The Between
central ligament ( occipito-axoidean) is a rather thick band, axis is a
which is attached to the grooved or cranial aspect of the central
basilar process, and is connected with the posterior ligament
of the bodies of the vertebræ. From this spot it descends
over the odontoid process, and becoming narrower is inserted
into the transverse ligament of the atlas, and into the body
of the axis. Occasionally a bursa is found between the
transverse ligament of the atlas and the superficial fibres of
the occipito-axoidean ligament, which are continued to the
second vertebra.
-
tion.
Dissection. If the occipito-axoidean ligament is removed, the Dissecfollowing lateral or check ligaments are seen, together with the
transverse ligament.
lateral or
liga2. The odontoid or check ligaments are two strong bundles And two
of fibres, one on each side : each is attached by one end to check
the apex and side of the odontoid process, and by the ments,
other to a depression on the inner surface of the condyle of
the occipital bone. These ligaments are covered by the occipito-axoidean band, and diverge from a central point to the
sides. Between them there is oftentimes a band of fibres,
that connects the tip of the odontoid process to the basilar
part of the occipital bone.
―
odontoid b. Union ofthe atlas with the axis. The transverse liga- To fix
ment of the atlas is a flat strong band behind the odontoid process
process, which is attached on each side to a depression on the is a
there
160 DISSECTION OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
verse li- trans- inner part of the articular process of the atlas. This ligagament ment is thickest in the centre, where it projects above the
odontoid process, and is joined by the deep fibres of the
occipito - axoidean ligament. Its surface towards the cord is
concealed by the occipito-axoid ligament. This ligament
fixes firmly the odontoid process of the second vertebra
against the anterior arch of the atlas, confining it in a ring.
If the transverse and check ligaments are cut through, the
tip of the odontoid process will be seen to have two cartilaginous surfaces ; one in front where it touches the atlas,
the other at the opposite aspect, where it is in contact with
and two the transverse ligament. Two synovial membranes facilitate
the movements of the odontoid process, one being between
that piece of bone and the atlas, and the other between it
and the transverse ligament.
synovial mem- branes.
Capsular liga- ments and sy- novial memUnion of the articular surfaces.
- a. The articular surfaces of the occipital bone and atlas are surrounded by a
capsular ligament of scattered fibres, which is strongest exbranes ternally and in front. When the joint is opened, the condyle
articular of the occipital bone will be seen to look somewhat outwards,
surfaces . whilst the surface of the atlas has an opposite direction.
to the
Joint at sternal
clavicle.
A
loose synovial membrane is placed between the bones.
b. The articular surfaces of the first two vertebræ are
enclosed by a capsule, which is stronger in front than behind. On opening the joint, the surfaces of the bones in
contact will be seen to be almost horizontal. On each side
there is a separate loose synovial membrane.
STERNO-CLAVICULAR ARTICULATION. -The internal end
end of of the clavicle is received on a fibro-cartilage, and is retained in position by the following ligaments ; anterior and
posterior, with one to the first rib, and another between the
ends of the two clavicles.
Dissec- tion.
An an- terior,
Dissection. - For the examination of the ligaments in the
sterno-clavicular articulation, take the piece of the sternum that
was laid aside for that purpose. Remove the cellular membrane
from the several ligaments ; and should these have become dry,
they ought first to be moistened for a short time.
The anterior ligament is attached by a narrow point to
the head of the clavicle, and from that spot the fibres diverge
LIGAMENTS OF THE CLAVICLE. 161
in front of the interarticular cartilage, to be inserted before
the articular surface on the sternum.
terior,
The posterior ligament is less strongly marked than the pospreceding, but it has attachments behind the bones corresponding to those of the anterior in front of them, viz. to
the head of the clavicle and to the sternum. Like the anterior ligament it adheres to the fibro- cartilage.
clavicu- The interclavicular ligament extends above the sternum, interfrom the clavicle of one side to the corresponding bone oflar,
the other side. The fibres do not cross in a straight line,
but dip into the hollow between the clavicles, and are connected with the upper part of the sternum.
to-clavigament.
The costo-clavicular ligament is a short strong band of and cosoblique fibres that intervenes between the first rib and the cular liclavicle. Inferiorly it is fixed to the upper surface of the
cartilage of the first rib, and superiorly to the under surface
of the clavicle near its sternal end. The subclavius muscle
is in front of the ligament. Sometimes the clavicle touches
the rib, and is provided with an articular surface and a
synovial membrane at that spot.
The carti- interarticular fibro-cartilage will come into view by Fibrocutting the ligaments before described, and raising the cla- lage.
vicle. It is flat, and almost circular in form, but is thicker
at the circumference than the centre. By its upper surface
the cartilage is united to the head of the clavicle, which is
imbedded in it ; and by the opposite surface it is connected
to the cartilage of the first rib. The ligaments in front and
behind the articulation are united to the margins of the
fibro-cartilage. Sometimes there is an aperture in the centre
of this interarticular cartilage.
novial
branes.
Two synovial membranes are present in the articulation, Two syone being on each side of the fibro-cartilage. The sac be- memtween the sternum and the fibro- cartilage is looser than that
between the clavicle and the cartilage.
M
162
CHAPTER II.
DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
ofthe brain.
SECTION I.
MEMBRANES AND VESSELS.
Position DURING the examination of the membranes, the vessels, and
the nerves, the brain is to be placed upside down, resting in
the coil of a cloth, which supports it evenly.
Three menin- ges.
Dura mater.
Arach- noid mem- brane.
Parietal part.
MEMBRANES OF THE BRAIN.- The coverings of the brain
(meninges) are three in number, viz. dura mater, pia mater,
and arachnoid membrane. The dura mater is a firm,
fibrous investment that supports parts of the brain, and
serves as an inner lining to the bones. The pia mater is the
most internal, and is a vascular layer. And the arachnoid is
a thin serous sac, which is situate between the other two.
Besides enveloping the brain, these membranes are prolonged on the cord into the spinal canal, and will be noticed
in the dissection of that part. The description of the dura
mater will be found at p. 8.
The ARACHNOID is a thin serous membrane, which lines
the inner aspect of the dura mater, and is reflected over the
pia mater and the brain. Around the vessels and nerves intervening between the skull and the brain, the membrane
forms sheaths which extend a short distance into the several
apertures, and then become continuous with the parietal or
cranial portion. Like other serous membranes, it forms a
sac which contains a lubricating fluid ; and it consists of a
parietal and a visceral part.
The parietal part is inseparably united to the inner surface of the dura mater, giving to it a smooth and polished
aspect, and is continued in the same manner over the pieces
of that membrane that project between the different portions
of the brain.
MEMBRANES OF THE BRAIN. 163
part is
to brain,
The visceral part covers the encephalon loosely, especially Visceral
on the under surface, and beneath it there is a considerable notclose
interval (subarachnoid space). When it is traced over the
brain, the following is the disposition of the serous membrane. On the upper or convex surface of the brain the
membrane passes from one convolution to another, without
dipping into the intervening hollows ; but it lines the great
median fissure as low as the extent of the falx. It is said to
be continued posteriorly into the lateral ventricle. On the hollow
lower or under surface of the cerebral mass the arachnoid
covers the anterior lobes, and sinks into the median fissure :
but farther back there is a space between it and the brain. varies at
Still more posteriorly the serous membrane is closely connected to the pons and to the under surface of the cerebellum ;
but between the hemispheres of the little brain there is
another space beneath it, similar to that at the under part
of the cerebrum.
beneath,
spots ;
subnoid
The subarachnoid space, or the interval between the it is the
arachnoid membrane and the pia mater, is larger in one arachspot than another, and contains more or less fluid (cerebro- space.
spinal). In the fissure between the hemispheres, both of
the cerebrum and cerebellum, and at the middle of the
under part of the former, the subserous space is largest.
If the arachnoid covering is removed from the fissure between the hemispheres of the cerebellum, the student will
perceive the aperture of the fourth ventricle, by which the
cavity in the interior of the brain communicates with the
subserous space both of the encephalon and of the spinal
cord.
ter
brain ;
The PIA MATER, or the vascular covering of the brain, Pia maclosely invests the different parts of the cranial mass, and
dips into the fissures, as well as into the hollows between the
convolutions and the lamina. Besides covering the exterior sends pieces of the brain, it sends processes into the interior to supply into the
vessels to the walls of the enclosed spaces : thus, one penetrates into the cerebrum below the corpus callosum, and is
named velum interpositum ; and two vascular fringes project into the fourth ventricle, and are known as the choroid
plexuses of that ventricle.
M 2
164 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
it is a
net-work
vessels.
This membrane is a net-work of vessels, and is conof blood- structed chiefly out of the minute ramifications of the
arteries before they enter the substance of the brain ; the
intervals between the vessels being closed by cellular tissue,
so as to form a continuous membrane. From the under
surface of the pia mater proceed numerous fine vessels for
the nutrition of the brain.
Dissec- tion of
sels.
Dissection. -To expose the arteries, let the brain remain upside the ves- down, and let the arachnoid membrane be taken from the vessels
that are evident. Follow forwards the two arteries that lie in
the median fissure of the great brain ; next the artery that passes
outwards transversely across the brain ; and, lastly, a vessel that
bends backwards along the inner part of the half of the great
brain (cerebrum). One artery is seen ramifying on the upper surface (in the present position) of the cerebellum, and another is
to be followed to the under surface.
4
Outline ofcranial mass.
Upper part of spinal cord.
Pons Varolii
Before entering into the detail of the anatomy of the
arteries, it may be advisable to mention shortly the different
divisions of the brain, and the larger parts that are seen on
its under-surface.
The cranial or encephalic mass of the nervous system
consists of cerebrum or great brain, cerebellum or small
brain, and pons and medulla oblongata. Each of these parts
has the following situation and subdivisions : —
The medulla oblongata, or the upper end of the spinal
cord, lies in the groove between the halves of the small
brain, and is divided into two symmetrical parts by a
median fissure. To its sides and upper part some of the
cranial nerves are united.
The pons Varolii is situate in front of the medulla oblongata, and is marked along the middle by a groove, which
indicates its separation into two halves. In front of it are
two large processes that pass to the great brain (crura
and its cerebri) ; on each side it is united to the small brain by a
similar white mass (crus cerebelli ) ; and behind is the
enlarged upper part of the cord.
crura.
Cerebel- lum.
The cerebellum, or the small brain, is divided into two
halves by a median fissure, and each half will be subsequently
seen to be subdivided into lobes.
VESSELS OF THE BRAIN. 165
brum
great diThe cerebrum, or the large brain, is also divided into two Cerehalves, by a longitudinal fissure in the middle line. Each
half is further subdivided into anterior, middle, and posterior lobes. Between the anterior and the middle lobe is and its
the fissure of Sylvius, but the limit between the middle and visions.
the posterior is only a line corresponding to the anterior
part of the small brain. In the middle line of the cerebrum,
between the hemispheres and in front of the pons, are
several small bodies that will be afterwards enumerated.
-
of the ARTERIES OF THE BRAIN. The brain is supplied with Arteries
blood by the two vertebral and the two internal carotid brain.
arteries.
bral
basilar,
The vertebral artery is a branch of the subclavian artery, Verteand enters the spinal canal by piercing the membrane between the atlas and the occipital bone. Then ascending to ends in
the brain, round the side of the medulla oblongata, the artery
enters the skull through the foramen magnum, and is
blended with its fellow in one trunk (basilar) at the lower
border of the pons. As the vessel winds round the upper winds
part of the cord, it lies between the roots of the ninth and medulla.
suboccipital nerves ; but it is afterwards internal to the
ninth.
round
es Branches. -Between its entrance into the spinal canal Branchand its termination, each artery furnishes offsets to the
spinal cord, to the dura mater, and to the cerebellum.
cord,
1. The posterior spinal branch is of inconsiderable size, and arises of spinal
opposite the posterior part of the cord : it descends along the side of the cord, behind the nerves, anastomosing with its fellow, and with branches anterior
that enter by the intervertebral foramina.
and
2. The anterior spinal branch is as small as the preceding, and is an posteoffset opposite the front of the spinal cord. This small branch joins the
corresponding twig of the opposite side, and the resulting vessel is continued along the middle of the cord on its anterior aspect.
rior,
3. The posterior meningeal artery leaves the vertebral trunk opposite
the foramen magnum, and ramifies in the dura mater lining the fossæ
of the occipital bone.
ofdura mater.
of the 4. The inferior cerebellar artery (posterior) is distributed to the Branch
under surface of the cerebellum. Taking origin from the end of under
the vertebral or from the basilar artery, this branch winds back- partof
wards round the side of the medulla, between the pneumo-gastric
cerebel- lum.
M 3
166 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Basilar artery .
Extent and
situa- tion .
Branch- es :
Trans- verse to the pons
and spinal accessory nerves, to enter the median fissure of the
cerebellum. Directed onwards along the fissure, the artery reaches
the upper surface of the cerebellum, and there anastomoses with
the superior cerebellar artery. A branch of the artery ramifies
over the under surface of the cerebellum, and ends externally by
anastomosing with the upper cerebellar artery. As the vessel lies
by the side of the aperture of the fourth ventricle, it gives a small
offset to the choroid plexus of that cavity.
The basilar artery is the vessel resulting from the union
of the two vertebral arteries. It reaches from the lower to
the upper border of the pons, and ends at the last spot by
dividing into two branches (posterior cerebral) for the cerebrum. The vessel touches the basilar process of the occipital
bone (thence receiving its name), and corresponds to the
median groove of the pons. On each side of and almost
parallel to it is the sixth nerve.
Branches. Besides the terminal branches mentioned
above, the artery supplies transverse arteries to the pons
and to the under part of the cerebellum, and a large branch
to the upper surface of the cerebellum.
1. The transverse arteries of the pons are four or six small twigs, that
are named from their direction, and are distributed to the substance of
the pons. One of these gives an offset to the internal auditory meatus
along the seventh nerve. Resembling most this set of branches is the
and in- following artery, the inferior cerebellar (anterior) : this arises from the
basilar trunk, and is directed outwards to the under- surface of the cerebellum at the anterior part, on which it is distributed.
ferior ce- rebellar.
cerebel- lar.
Superior 2. The superior cerebellar artery is derived from the basilar so
near its termination, that it is often described as one of the final
branches of that vessel. Its destination is the upper aspect of the
cerebellum, to which it is directed backwards over the third nerve
and the crus cerebri, but parallel to the fourth nerve. On the
upper surface of the cerebellum the artery spreads out in branches,
and its ramifications anastomose with the vessel of the opposite
side, and with the inferior cerebellar artery. Some twigs of this
vessel enter the piece of the pia mater that projects into the posterior part of the cerebrum, viz. the velum interpositum.
cerebral artery;
Posterior 3. The posterior cerebral artery takes on each side a backward
course, similar at first to the preceding artery, but separated from it by the third nerve. The vessel is then inclined to the posterior
lobe of the cerebrum at its inner part, and divides into many
branches. Some of these supply the under part of the posterior
VESSELS OF THE BRAIN. 167
lobe, whilst others turn upwards both on the outer and inner
aspects of the back of the hemisphere, and anastomose with the
other cerebral arteries.
are Numerous small long branches leave the posterior cerebral artery its offsets
close to its origin, and enter the base of the brain between the crura
cerebri (posterior perforated spot). Soon afterwards the vessel is
joined by a small straight branch (posterior communicating) from the commuinternal carotid artery. Lastly, it furnishes a small choroid artery to nicating and chothe fold of pia mater that projects into the cerebrum : this small branch roid.
winds round the crus cerebri, and is transmitted between the crus and
the hemisphere of the cerebrum to the velum interpositum and the
choroid plexus.
-
brain
by ver- tebral
From the foregoing examination of the branches of the Part of
vertebral arteries and of the trunk (basilar) that continues supplied
them onwards, it appears that about half the encephalon
viz. the medulla oblongata, the pons, the cerebellum, and the
posterior third of the cerebrum -receives its blood through
those branches of the subclavian arteries.
arteries.
carotid The INTERNAL CAROTID ARTERY terminates in the brain Internal
by supplying branches to its remaining two thirds, or to the
anterior and middle lobes. Having passed through the
space of the cavernous sinus (p. 19. ), the vessel emerges on
the inner side of the anterior clinoid process, and divides at
the inner end of the fissure of Sylvius into anterior cerebral, ends in
middle cerebral, and posterior communicating arteries. At arteries.
the base of the brain the carotid artery lies between the
second and third nerves, but nearest the former.
cerebral
es.
Branches. In the skull the carotid artery supplies the Branchophthalmic artery, before it ends in the following terminal
branches of the cerebrum.
the
cerebral
inner part of hemi- sphere ;
nicating
1. The anterior cerebral artery supplies the inner part of the Anterior
cerebral hemisphere. The vessel of each side is directed forwards supplies
to the median fissure between the hemispheres ; and as the two
are about to enter it, they are united by a short thick artery,
anterior communicating. Each artery then runs forwards in the commufissure, and bends round the anterior part of the corpus collosum, artery
so as to be placed on its upper aspect in the natural state of the
brain. Still continuing backwards nearly to the posterior extremity ofthe hemisphere, the artery gives off numerous branches,
which anastomose with the other cerebral arteries.
M 4
168 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
its off- sets.
Middle cerebral artery
Near its commencement this artery furnishes many small branches
to the part of the brain contiguous to the inner end of the fissure of
Sylvius (anterior perforated space) ; and it distributes also some branches
to the under part of the anterior lobe.
2. The middle cerebral artery is the largest offset of the internal
carotid, and supplies the outer part of the hemisphere. Passing
outwards in the fissure of Sylvius, the artery divides in it into many
ends in large branches, that issue at the outer end, and spread over the
external aspect of the hemisphere of the cerebrum, inosculating
with the other two cerebral arteries at the front, the back, and the
upper part ofthe brain.
outer part of hemi- sphere.
Offsets.
rior comAt the inner end of the fissure of Sylvius numerous small branches
arise from the middle cerebral artery, and enter the cerebral substance
through the part called locus perforatus anticus.
Poste- 3. The posterior communicating artery is a small twig that is
municat- directed backwards parallel to the third nerve, and on its inner ing. side, to join the posterior cerebral artery near the pons.
Choroid 4. The choroid artery (anterior) is small in size, and arises either artery.
from the trunk of the carotid, or from the middle cerebral artery.
It passes backwards on the outer side of the preceding, and finds its way between the hemisphere and the crus cerebri to the choroid
plexus of the lateral ventricle.
Circle of Willis ;
vessels that take
in it,
Circle of Willis. —This term has been applied to the chain of
communications between the arteries at the base of the brain ; for
the vessels of the brain are united freely both on their own side
and across the middle line, giving rise to an arterial circle. On
each side this circle is formed by the trunk of the internal carotid,
a share giving forwards the anterior cerebral, and backwards the posterior
communicating artery. In front it is constructed by the converging anterior cerebral and the anterior communicating artery ;
and behind, by the bifurcation of the basilar artery into the posterior cerebral arteries. In the area of the circle lie the several
parts of the brain that correspond to the floor of the third venand the tricle. The complete inosculation between the cranial vessels in
the circle of Willis allows at all times a free circulation of blood
them . through the brain, even though a large vessel on one side should be
freeinos- culation between
Veins of the brain.
Dissec- tion.
obstructed.
The VEINS of the brain enter the sinuses of the dura
mater instead of uniting into trunks that are companions to
the arteries.
Dissection. —The pia mater and the vessels are now to be removed from the brain, and the origin of the cranial nerves to be
ORIGIN OF THE CRANIAL NERVES. 169
be taken
defined. Over the greater part of the cerebrum, the pons, and
the medulla, the pia mater is detached with tolerable facility
by using two pair of forceps ; but over the cerebellum the membrane adheres so closely that it will require some care to remove it
without tearing off the cortical layer of that part. In clearing out Care to
the fissure between the halves ofthe cerebellum on the under sur- in re- moving face, the membrane that bounds on each side the opening of the pia mafourth ventricle will probably be taken away. The student should ter.
therefore observe the position and size of that opening between
the back of the medulla oblongata and the inferior vermiform process. When the surface is clean, the brain is to be replaced in the
spirit till it is hardened.
SECTION II.
ORIGIN OF THE CRANIAL NERVES.
THE cranial nerves take origin from the encephalon, with Origin
one exception (spinal accessory), and leave the skull through
apertures therein.
rent and real.
The place at which a nerve appears on the surface of the is appabrain does not determine its origin ; for fibres or roots may
be traced deeply from the surface into the nervous substance. Each nerve has, therefore, an apparent and a real
origin in the encephalon.
cation The cranial nerves may be regarded either as nine or twelve Classifi
pairs, according to the mode of classifying them. Those writers
who take the smaller number include in one nerve all the trunks
contained in the same aperture of the skull : for instance, the
eighth nerve, which consists of three trunks in the foramen lacerum
jugulare. But those who enumerate twelve nerves consider each
distinct trunk issuing from the encephalon to constitute a separate
cranial nerve, whether it may be alone, or combined with others in
its foramen of exit. The designation of the several nerves may be and denumerical ; or their names may further be derived from the parts tion.
to which they are distributed, or from the function of the part
supplied by them.
signary nerv The FIRST or OLFACTORY NERVE is very soft and pulpy, Olfactobeing destitute of a neurilemma, and has both grey substance
and white fibres in its composition, like the cerebrum. It is
170 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
lies on anterior lobe,
forms olfactory bulb,
has external
internal and
middle root.
Deep origin.
Optic nerve,
ed tract,
a flat-looking band, wider at each end than in the middle,
which is lodged in a sulcus on the under aspect of the anterior lobe of the cerebrum, and is kept in position by the reflection of the arachnoid membrane over it. When the
nerve is raised from its sulcus it is prismatic in form, the
apex of the prism being directed downwards in this position. Anteriorly, the nerve swells into the olfactory bulb,
a greyish looking mass, that distributes nerves to the nose ;
and posteriorly it is connected to the cerebrum by three
roots of origin, external, internal, and middle.
The external or long root is a slender white band, which
passes along the outer part of the anterior perforated space,
and across the fissure of Sylvius, and disappears by sinking
into the substance of the middle lobe of the cerebrum .
The internal or short root is also white, and consists of
small fibres that come from the inner part of the anterior
lobe of the cerebrum.
The middle or grey root is connected with a conical elevation at the posterior part of the sulcus which lodges the
nerve.
Deep origin. The external root is said to be connected with the anterior commissure and the convolutions of the island of Reil ; the inner
root joins the front of the corpus callosum, or the white fibres of a convolution to be afterwards examined (gyrus fornicatus) ; and the middle
root encloses white fibres, which are found to reach the corpus striatum.
The SECOND or OPTIC NERVE is the largest of the cranial nerves, except the fifth, and appears as a flat band on
the crus cerebri ; anteriorly the nerves of opposite sides are
part call united in a commissure. The part of the nerve posterior
to the commissure is named optic tract, and is connected to
the crus cerebri ; but the part beyond the commissural
union is round and firm, being invested by a neurilemma,
and is called optic nerve. The destination of the nerve is
to the eye.
part,
nerve.
Origin from cere- brum.
The nerve takes origin from two of the corpora quadrigemina (nates and testis of one side), and from the optic
thalamus and the corpora geniculata ; but this attachment
will be afterwards seen. As the nerve reaches forwards to
the commissure, it is attached to the crus cerebri by its outer
ORIGIN OF THE CRANIAL NERVES. 171
or anterior edge ; and when it is placed in front of the tuber
cinereum, it receives other filaments from that body.
missure.
In the Situa- tion and
of the struc
The commissure (chiasma) of the optic nerves is some- Its comwhat of a square shape, and lies on the olivary eminence of
the sphenoid bone, within the circle of Willis. It is placed
in front of the tuber cinereum ; and passing beneath it, in
this position of the brain, is the thin lamina cinerea.
commissure there is a partial crossing of the fibres
nerves of opposite sides after this manner ; the outer fibres
of each nerve are continued straight to the eyeball of the
same side, but the inner fibres decussate, those of the right
nerve being continued to the left, and vice versa. Some
transverse fibres have been described at the front and back
ofthe commissure.
ture .
of third The THIRD NERVE, muscular nerve of the eyeball, is round Origin
and firm, and is attached to the inner aspect of the cerebral nerve is
peduncle, near the locus perforatus, and close in front of the
pons Varolii.
-
crus Deep origin. The fibres of the nerve separate as they pierce the deep in
peduncle, and enter the locus niger, as well as the bundles of longi- cerebri.
tudinal fibres on each aspect of that body. Some of the roots are said
to be traced to the pons Varolii, to the nates, and to the fibres of the
superior peduncle of the cerebellum .
from
lum.
The FOURTH or TROCHLEAR NERVE cannot be followed Origin'
of fourth backwards, at present, to its origin. It is the smallest of the nerve
cranial nerves, and arises from the valve of Vieussens, over cerebelthe fourth ventricle. The nerve appears between the cerebrum and the cerebellum, on the side ofthe crus cerebri, and
is then directed forwards to enter an aperture in the tentorium cerebelli , near the posterior clinoid process.
nerve This has two roots.
The FIFTH or TRIFACIAL NERVE is the largest cranial Fifth
nerve, and consists of two roots, large and small.
nerve resembles a spinal nerve, in possessing ganglionic and
aganglionic roots, the former giving sensory, and the latter
motor power, which are blended beyond the ganglion.
from The nerve is attached to the side of the pons Varolii, Origin
nearer the upper than the lower border. The small root is pons.
highest, and is separated from the other by two or three
of the transverse fibres of the pons. Both roots pass out-
172 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Deep origin uncer- tain.
Origin of sixth nerve.
Seventh nerve
parts.
wards through an aperture in the dura mater, above the
petrous part of the temporal bone.
Deep origin. -The small root is supposed to be connected with the
fibres of the pyramidal body. The large root may be traced through
the transverse fibres of the pons to the floor of the fourth ventricle,
where it is said to be connected with the fasciculus teres, or the prolongation of the lateral column of the spinal cord. Some anatomists
trace it to the lateral column in the medulla oblongata, behind the
olivary body.
The SIXTH NERVE, abducent nerve of the eyeball, arises
from the pyramidal body, close to the pons, and sometimes
from the lower part of the pons.
The SEVENTH CRANIAL NERVE (Willis) appears at the
has two lower border of the pons, where this is joined by the restiform body. It consists of two distinct trunks, facial and
auditory.
Origin ofthe a. The facial nerve ( portio dura, seventh nerve, Soemmerfacial . ring) is firm and round, and smaller than the auditory, internal to which it is placed. It springs from the anterior
part of the restiform body, close to the pons, and from the
lower border of the pons.
Small accesso- The facial nerve is united with a small accessory band of fibres
ry piece. intermediate between it and the auditory (Wrisberg) ; it is then
applied to the auditory nerve, and the two enter the internal
Audito- ry part.
Deep origin.
Eighth nerve
parts.
meatus.
b. The auditory nerve (portio mollis, eighth nerve, Soemmerring) arises in the floor of the fourth ventricle, and in
the restiform body.
- Deep origin. The facial nerve is connected with the restiform body,
and with an offset from the pyramidal and the olivary body ( olivary fasciculus). The auditory nerve arises from the restiform body, as
well as from the grey matter ofthe fourth ventricle, some roots coming
out of the median groove in that part ; whilst the intermediate part of Wrisberg passes deeply to the fibres of the lateral column of the
cord.
The EIGHTH CRANIAL NERVE (Willis) is placed along the
has three side of the medulla oblongata, being attached to the restiform body, and consists of three distinct trunks, glossopharyngeal, pneumo-gastric, and spinal accessory.
ofglosso- Origin a. The glosso-pharyngeal nerve (ninth nerve, Soemmerpharyn ring) is the smallest of the three, and is situate highest. Its geal,
ORIGIN OF THE CRANIAL NERVES. 173
apparent origin is by three or more fibrils from the inner
part of the restiform body, close to the facial nerve.
b. The pneumo-gastric or vagus (tenth nerve, Soemmer- vagus,
ring) is attached to the restiform body, below the glossopharyngeal nerve, by a series of filaments that are collected
into bundles, and are then united in one large flat band.
nal acpart,
c. The spinal accessory nerve (eleventh nerve, Soemmer- and spiring) is firm and round, like the third or the sixth nerve. It cessory
takes origin, by a number of fine filaments, from the lateral
surface of the cord, as low as the sixth cervical vertebra.
The nerve ascends along the cord between the ligamentum
dentatum and the posterior roots of the spinal nerves, with
the upper of which it is sometimes connected. It then
enters the skull by the foramen magnum, and receives filaments from the lower part of the restiform body, in a line
with the roots of the pneumo-gastric nerve.
verge in All three of the nerves converge to a spot below the crus all concerebelli, where they rest on a small lobe of the cerebellumthe skull.
(flocculus), and are then directed outwards to the foramen
lacerum jugulare (p. 18.).
origin
tain.
Deep origin.-According to Stilling each of these nerves takes origin The deep
from a special mass of grey matter (its nucleus) at the back of the uncermedulla oblongata. That of the glosso- pharyngeal is highest, and the one
of the pneumo-gastric next below ; both these form projections in the
floor of the fourth ventricle, near the lower part of the calamus scriptorius. The nucleus of the spinal accessory nerve is contained in the
medulla, lower down than the preceding.
nerve. The NINTH or HYPO-GLOSSAL NERVE of Willis (twelfth Ninth
nerve, Soemmerring) is placed on the front of the medulla
oblongata, and arises by a series of filaments from the sulcus
between the pyramidal and olivary bodies, in a line with the
anterior roots of the spinal nerves.
from The filaments of origin unite into two bundles, which Origin
separately pierce the dura mater, and do not become blended medulla .
together till they are outside the cranial aperture.
Deep origin. -Stilling traces the filaments of this nerve to a nucleus Deep origin.
in the floor ofthe fourth ventricle, which projects close to the calamus
scriptorius, and is internal to those of the glosso- pharyngeal and vagus
nerves.
174 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Position of the part
SECTION III.
MEDULLA OBLONGATA AND PONS VAROLII.
THE medulla oblongata and the pons are interposed between
the spinal cord and the brain, and in them the elements of
the cord are re-arranged and increased before entering the
cerebrum and the cerebellum.
Position. The brain is to remain in the position in which it was
placed during the examination of the nerves and the vessels. On
and di- a single brain the student may ascertain nearly all the anatomy of
rections . the parts composing the medulla and the pons ; but if he can proUpper part of
cord.
Situa- tion
cure a hardened specimen ofthe medulla and the pons united, and
another of a vertical section through these same bodies, his knowledge will be much more perfect.
The MEDULLA OBLONGATA is the upper dilated part of the
spinal spinal cord which is contained in the cranium. Its limit is
the lower border of the pons in one direction, and the level
of the upper margin of the atlas in the opposite direction.
This part of the cord is pyramidal in form, and measures
about one inch and a quarter in length, half an inch in
thickness, and three quarters of an inch in breadth at its
widest part.
and form.
Base.
Apex.
The larger part or the base of the medulla joins the pons,
the transverse fibres of the latter marking its limit ; and the
apex is blended with the cord at the spot before mentioned.
Surfaces. The anterior surface is irregularly convex, and is in contact
with the hollowed basilar process of the occipital bone. The
opposite surface is somewhat excavated superiorly, where
it forms the floor of the fourth ventricle, and rests in the
fissure between the halves of the cerebellum. On the posterior aspect there are not any cross fibres of the pons, as in
front, to indicate the extent of the medulla.
Division The medulla oblongata is divided into halves by a median
halves by fissure in front and behind. The fissures are continuous into
fissures.
with those along the cord, but their extent here is influenced by the difference before alluded to on the surfaces ; for
whilst the anterior one ceases at the pons in a dilated part
MEDULLA OBLONGATA. 175
nents of
(foramen cæcum), the posterior is prolonged behind the pons,
and forms the groove in the floor of the fourth ventricle.
Each half of the medulla is marked by the following projec- Compotions, which are situate from before backwards in the order each
now mentioned, viz. the anterior pyramid, the olivary body,
the restiform body, and, lastly, the posterior pyramid.
half
pyramid
internal,
The anterior pyramid is the most internal eminence, and Anterior
receives its name from its form and position. Situate on the is most
side of the median fissure, it is internal to the olivary body,
from which it is separated by a slight groove. Inferiorly,
the pyramid is continuous with the anterior column of the
cord, and internally it is connected with some decussating
fibres across the anterior median fissure (decussation of the and is
pyramids). Enlarging as it ascends, this body enters the internalpons, but, before disappearing beneath the transverse fibres, abres.
it is somewhat constricted and rounded.
joined
ly by
body
reach
The olivary body (corpus olivare) is the oval projection Olivary
between the anterior pyramid and the restiform body. A
groove separates it from both of those prominences, but the
one next the restiform body is the widest. This body is does not
shorter than the pyramid, and does not reach to the pons : pons.
its upper end is most prominent, and arching round the Some
lower end, or sometimes over the surface, are some white fibres .
fibres (arciform fibres).
arched
form The restiform body (restis, a rope) forms the largest pro- Restiminence on the half of the medulla oblongata, and cannot be body is the larg- seen satisfactorily except on a distinct piece. Cord-like in estpiece,
form, this body is posterior to the corpus olivare, and projects laterally, so as to give the width to the upper part of
the medulla oblongata. The restiform swelling is continuous
inferiorly with the posterior column of the spinal cord, and
superiorly it turns outwards to the cerebellum, of which it diverges
constitutes the inferior peduncle. Between the restiform bellum.
bodies, at the back of the medulla, is the space of the fourth
ventricle.
to cererior pyclose to
The posterior pyramid is a small slip behind the restiform Postebody, and is a prolongation of that part of the spinal cord ramid is
which is close to the posterior median fissure. By drawing posterior
forwards the medulla, or using a separate piece of hardened fissure.
median
176 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Fibres of the me- dulla.
Dissec- tion to trace the pyra- .mid.
anterior
tion
medulla, the pyramid will be seen to be slightly enlarged at
the apex ofthe fourth ventricle, where the restiform bodies
diverge, and then to ascend along the corpus restiforme,
gradually becoming indistinct on the surface.
STRUCTURE. - The elements of the spinal cord, viz. anterior, middle, and posterior columns, are continued into the
lower part of the medulla oblongata, where they can at first
be recognised. But they soon become mixed together, and
give rise to the different bodies above noticed.
Dissection. -― - To trace the fibres of the anterior pyramid, place the
handle of the scalpel in the anterior median fissure, and separate the
pyramids as low as their decussating fibres. Insert the instrument
again below those cross fibres, and forcibly turn outwards on both
sides the small part of the anterior column of the cord that remains
(for the cord has been cut across just below), so as to expose the source
of the decussating fibres.
Fibres of Each anterior pyramid receives fibres inferiorly from the anterior
pyramid. column of the cord of its own side, and internally from the lateral
column of the opposite half of the cord. The inner set of fibres
Deriva- have a deep origin, and as they come upwards to the surface, they
push outwards the inferior fibres prolonged from the anterior
column, and ascend internal to them. Moreover, the fibres of
the lateral columns being directed to opposite sides, cross one
another in the anterior median fissure of the spinal cord, forming
the decussation of the pyramids.
and dis- tribu- tion.
Olivary body
complete
In the pyramid the fibres are white and longitudinal, and are
collected into a bundle of a prismatic form. For the most part the
fibres enter the pons, but two offsets proceed from the outer side.
One is very small, and lying on the surface is directed below the
corpus olivare to the restiform body ; the other invests the olivary
body, and receiving a band therefrom, enters the pons as the olivary
fasciculus, or the fillet.
The olivary body, when it is sliced obliquely, is seen to consist of
a wavy yellowish line, surrounding a centre or nucleus of whitish
is an in- matter (corpus dentatum) . The zigzag bounding line forms a
sac open capsule or bag, with the dilated part towards the surface, and the behind. narrower part or neck, which is open, directed backwards. A
A band band of fibres issues from the nucleus by the aperture in the
posterior part of the capsule, and is united with the longitudinal
fibres (of the pyramid) that invest the corpus olivare, to form the
olivary fasciculus, or thefillet.
issues from it.
MEDULLA OBLONGATA AND PONS VAROLII. 177
tion of
and resDissection. For the purpose of seeing the arrangement of the fibres Dissecof the lateral column and of the restiform body, cut across the anterior lateral
pyramid, on the left side, between its decussation and the olivary body, anore
and raise the pyramid and that body together towards the pons. After- pieces.
wards detach the remaining part of the pyramid by dividing the fibres
it receives from the decussation.
fibres of cord
mixed in
The lateral column of the cord, soon after entering the medulla Lateral
oblongata, is divided into three sets of fibres, external, internal, and
middle. The external fibres are both superficial and deep, and
join the restiform body ; the internal offset enters the pyramid of aremuch
the opposite side ; whilst the middle fibres, the continuation of the medulla,
column, ascend beneath the olivary body, and leaving the surface and pass are directed backwards to the floor of the fourth ventricle in their
course to the cerebrum.
deeply.
tion of
formed
The decussation of the pyramids is formed by the internal Decussa
fibres of the lateral columns crossing one another in their course pyramids
to the pyramids of opposite sides. This interweaving of the by band
cross fibres occupies the anterior groove of the medulla oblongata, of fibres
about three quarters of an inch from the pons, and is about a columns.
quarter of an inch in length. In it will be found three or four
bundles of fibres from each side.
form
ters cere- bellum.
The restiform body receives inferiorly the posterior column of Restithe cord, except that small part that forms the posterior pyramid. body enSome accessory fibres come to it from the lateral column and the
anterior pyramid. Superiorly this body is continued altogether to
the cerebellum, and does not enter the pons.
rior py
enters
The posterior pyramid is the upper end of the posterior median Postecolumn of the cord . It is continued chiefly, if not altogether, to ramid
the cerebrum, by joining the fibres of the lateral column in the cere
floor ofthe fourth ventricle.
brum.
matter of The grey matter of the medulla oblongata is fused with the white Grey
fibres ; but this disposition will be afterwards referred to with the medulla.
anatomy of the fourth ventricle.
fibres. Arciform fibres. —Under this name are classed a few white Arciform
fibres that cross the longitudinal ones near the pons, and enter
the median fissure of the medulla. Oftentimes they cover a great
part of the olivary and pyramidal bodies, but usually they are seen
to form curves below the corpus olivare : hence the name used by
Santorini.
of me- Septum of the medulla. —If a hardened medulla oblongata is Septum
divided in the middle line, some septal fibres will be seen to pass dulla.
from before backwards, above the position of the decussation ofthe
pyramids : they appear to join the arciform fibres.
N
178 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Pons : The PONS, or ANNULAR PROTUBERANCE (pons Varolii, nodus encephali ), is situate above the medulla oblongata, and
position, between the hemispheres of the cerebellum, filling the hollow
form , in front of the tentorium cerebelli. It is nearly of a square
shape, though it is rather widest from side to side, and
surfaces, measures two inches in the last direction. The anterior
surface is grooved along the middle line, and is received into
the basilar hollow in the base of the skull. By the opposite surface the pons enters into the fourth ventricle, forming part of the floor of that space. The upper border is
longest and most curved, and arches over the cerebral
peduncles ; and the lower border overlays the prolongations
of the medulla oblongata. On each side is the crus cerebelli, whose fibres radiate over the surface.
and borders.
It is formed STRUCTURE.
-
- In the pons, transverse and longitudinal
by longi- fibres are combined : the transverse set are continuous with tudinal and the fibres of the crus cerebelli, and are interspersed with
much grey matter ; the longitudinal are prolonged from the
several constituent bodies of the medulla oblongata, except
the corpus restiforme.
trans- verse fibres.
Dissecexpose the fibres.
Dissection. -Divide the transverse fibres over the line of the
tionto pyramidal body of the left side, and turn them outwards to expose
the longitudinal fibres of the pyramid. Cut through in like manner
a second mass of transverse fibres which lie below the first set of
longitudinal ones, and the deep longitudinal fibres of the lateral
column of the cord come into view. Amongst this last set of
longitudinal fibres is the fillet of the corpus olivare, which the
dissector should trace upwards from that body. The superficial
fibres ofthe pons are seen on the side that is untouched.
The trans- verse fibres
The transverse fibres of the annular protuberance are
collected into two layers — a superficial and deep, which are
form a united in the middle line : they serve as commissural fibres
of the cerebellum, and are derived from its crus or the middle
peduncle.
superfi- cial and
deep layer.
a. The superficial set are mostly transverse, but some from the lower part of the crus ascend obliquely over the others to reach
the upper margin of the pons.
b. The deep layer is thickest, and contains much grey matter between the fibres.
THE CEREBRUM. 179
sets of
dinal
The longitudinal fibres consist of three sets, viz. one Three
from the anterior pyramidal body ; another from the lateral longituand the posterior median column of the cord ; and a third fibres
from the corpus olivare.
terior : a. The fibres of the anterior pyramid pass through the pons from anbetween the two sets of transverse fibres, but not as one mass, for pyramid
they are divided into a number of small bundles in their progress.
Much increased in number, at the upper border of the pons, the
fibres enter the crus cerebri, and give rise to that surface of the
peduncle which is now uppermost.
cord,
b. The ascending fibres of the lateral column of the cord are from la.
teral part altogether deeper than the commissural fibres of the pons, and are of spinal
mixed up with grey matter. More numerous than the preceding
set, these fibres project in the floor of the fourth ventricle, where
they form an eminence (fasciculus teres) ; and they are then continued upwards to the crus cerebri, of which they form the deeper
or cerebral part. In the pons these fibres have the offset of the and pos
olivary fasciculus added to them, and lower down they are joined pyramid
by the fibres of the posterior pyramidal body of the medulla
oblongata.
terior
olivary c. The olivary fasciculus (fillet) divides into two slips in the from pons. One passes backwards to the deeper part of the crus cerebri, body.
and ends beneath the testis (one of the corpora quadrigemina) .
The other is continued to the cerebrum with the fibres of the
lateral column.
of pons.
Septum. In the pons, as in the medulla oblongata, there are Septum
vertical or septal fibres between the halves, but only at the posterior part, for they are interrupted anteriorly by the union of the
transverse or commissural fibres.
SECTION IV.
THE CEREBRUM.
tion and
the cereTHE cerebrum or great brain is the largest division of the Situa
encephalon ; and it may be said to fill that part of the cavity form of
of the skull which is above a circular line carried through brum
the eyebrows and the occipital protuberance. Taking the
general form of the skull, the cerebrum is convex on the
upper aspect, and uneven on the lower aspect. It consists ofhas two
two hemispheres, which are placed side by side, and are spheres
hemiN 2
180 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
median parts.
joined by partly separated by a median or longitudinal fissure ; but
the hemispheres are united in the middle line by certain interior parts (commissures), also by connecting structures at
the under surface. Superiorly the surface of the hemisphere
is entire, but inferiorly it is divided into lobes.
Under surface
brum.
A. UNDER SURFACE, or BASE OF THE CEREBRUM.
-
By
of cere- the under part the cerebrum fits into the inequalities of the
base of the skull ; and on this aspect the separation into
hemispheres is not so complete as on the upper surface, for
the median fissure exists only in front and behind. The
following parts are found at the base of the brain : —
Division ofthe
sphere.
On the under surface of each hemisphere, about one third
hemi- from its front, is the fissure of Sylvius, which divides it into
two. The anterior part is the anterior lobe ; and the posterior large part is said to consist of middle and posterior
lobes, the latter reaching forwards as far as the front of the
cerebellum.
line.
-
Andparts In the middle line, in front of the pons, are the two large alongthe middle white masses the peduncles of the cerebrum (crura cerebri), one belonging to each hemisphere ; and between them
is a space perforated by vessels (locus perforatus posticus).
Outside the peduncle is the optic tract, and between it and
the inner part of the hemisphere is a fissure leading into the
lateral ventricle. Proceeding forwards in the middle line,
the student will find two white bodies like peas ( corpora
albicantia ) ; and in front of these is a greyish mass ( tuber
cinereum). From the tuber cinereum a conical reddish tube
(infundibulum) descends to the pituitary body, in the sella
Turcica of the sphenoid bone. Anterior to the same mass
(tuber cinereum) are the converging optic tracts, with their
commissure. Beneath the commissure of the optic nerves
is a thin greyish layer (lamina cinerea) ; and still farther
forwards is the anterior part of the great longitudinal
fissure between the hemispheres, with the white corpus callosum in the bottom of it. At the inner end of the fissure of
Sylvius is another spot perforated by vessels (locus perforatus anticus) .
BASE OF THE CEREBRUM. 181
of some
tions.
Parts of some special convolutions are now seen. One con- Parts
volution, that of the corpus callosum (gyrus fornicatus) , has its convoluanterior part in contact with the body from which it takes its
name ; and its posterior part is on the outer side of the crus
cerebri. Another is the convolution of the margin of the great
median fissure, which is exposed at its anterior part, where the
olfactory nerve is in contact with it. Athird large convolution
surrounds the fissure of Sylvius. Some other small convolutions
will be examined with the Sylvian fissure.
The several parts of the base of the brain are now to be
noticed more in detail.
lobes in
hemiLobes of the cerebrum. Usually there are three lobes Three
described in each hemisphere. The anterior lobe is triangu- each
lar in form, and the apex is turned backwards ; it is some- sphere;
what excavated on the under surface, and is in contact with anterior,
the orbital part of the frontal bone. The olfactory nerve
lies near the inner margin. The middle lobe is the most middle,
prominent of the three, and projects into the middle fossa of
the base of the skull. The fissure of Sylvius intervenes between it and the anterior lobe. The posterior lobe has no fis- postesure of separation between it and the middle one ; its extent
forwards is determined by the anterior or outer margin of
the cerebellum. This lobe is not in contact with the base of
the skull, but is supported on the tentorium cerebelli.
rior.
The fissure of Sylvius is directed outwards between the Fissure of Syl- anterior and middle lobes, and will be found to branch into vius
two parts, one of which passes before and the other behind
some small convolutions (island of Reil). At the inner extremity of the fissure is a narrowed part corresponding to a
subjacent band of white fibres connecting the two lobes
(fasciculus uncinatus) .
rounded Surrounding the cleft is the convolution of the Sylvian fissure, is surwhich is much bent as it makes the circuit ; it is joined internally by a conby the convolutions in the fissure, and externally by convolutions volution,
on the outer surface of the hemisphere of the cerebrum.
tains
convoluThe island of Reil consists of five or six small, short convolu- and contions, which lie in the Sylvian fissure, and are concealed by the other
anterior and middle lobes in the natural condition of the parts. tions.
These convolutions are connected with the large convolution
around the fissure.
N 3
182 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Crus cerebri
in the under part of hemi- sphere.
Peduncle ofthe cerebrum (crus cerebri) . This is a large,
is fixed white, stalk-like looking body, which reaches from the upper
border of the pons to the under part of the hemisphere of the
same side near its inner margin. Each is about three quarters of an inch long, and widens as it approaches the cerebrum. Crossing its outer surface is the optic tract ; and
between the crus of opposite sides is the interpeduncular
space, containing the locus perforatus, the corpora albicantia,
and the tuber cinereum.
Formed oflongi-
- Structure. The peduncle is formed by the longitudinal
tudinal fibres of the pons, which enclose grey matter between them.
fibres.
Dissec- tion.
Its sufibres
Dissection. -- To trace the fibres on the left side, cut across in the
pons the fibres continuous with the anterior pyramid, and raise and carry them forwards into the crus as far as the optic tract. In this
proceeding the mass of grey matter (locus niger) is exposed, and
beneath it is a second or deeper set of longitudinal fibres.
a. The superficial fibres which form the cranial or free part of
perficial the crus, are continued from the anterior pyramidal body. They
are longitudinal in direction, and coarse in texture, and are directed
upwards to the cerebrum. The portion of the crus which is composed of these fibres is called the fasciculated part, or the crust.
form crust ;
deep fibres b. The deeper fibres are also prolonged to the cerebrum. They
are derived from the lateral and posterior median columns of
the cord, and from the olivary fasciculus (p. 179.) , and are situate
beneath the grey matter (locus niger). Besides being deeper, they
are finer than the other set, and are interspersed with grey matter.
formteg- The deeper part of the crus, viz . that at the cerebral aspect, is constructed by these fibres, and is named tegmentum.
mentum .
Thegrey matter.
Locus perforac. The grey matter of the crus (locus niger) is nearer the inner
than the outer margin, and is convex towards the free surface, but
concave in the opposite direction.
The posterior perforated spot (pons Tarini ) is situate
tus. between the peduncles of the cerebrum ; it consists of greyish
matter, into which numerous vessels enter. This structure
forms part ofthe floor of the third ventricle.
Corpora albican .
tia
The corpora albicantia (corp. mamillaria) are two small,
white bodies, about the size of peas, which are formed in
greater part by the crus of the fornix (to be afterwards seen).
If one, say the left, is cut across, it will be found to contain
grey matter ; and grey matter also surrounds it.
BASE OF THE CEREBRUM. 183
cinefundibuThe tuber cinereum, or the mass of grey matter behind Tuber
the optic commissure, forms part of the floor of the third reum
ventricle, and is continuous with the grey substance in that
cavity. In front of it is the optic nerve, and from its centre
projects the following : -The infundibulum (funnel) is a and inconically-shaped tube that reaches to the upper part of the lum.
pituitary body. In the foetus this tube is open between the
third ventricle and the pituitary body, but in the adult it is
closed inferiorly. It consists of a layer of grey matter, surrounded by the pia mater, and lined by the membrane ofthe
third ventricle as far as it is pervious.
tary The pituitary body will be very imperfectly seen when it Pituiis removed from its resting-place : therefore it should be body.
sometimes examined in the base of the skull, by removing
the surrounding bone.
This body is situate in the sella Turcica, or the hollow ofthe
body of the sphenoid bone, and consists of two lobes, anterior and posterior. The anterior is the largest, and is concave behind, where it receives the posterior lobe. In the
adult this mass is firm and solid, but in the foetus it is hollow,
and opens into the third ventricle through the infundibulum.
Dissection. -To see the lamina cinerea and the anterior ter- Dissec- tion .
mination of the corpus callosum, the convolutions of the anterior
lobe of the cerebrum may be removed on the left side, where they
overlay those parts. The convolution in contact with the corpus
callosum (gyrus fornicatus) may be divided, and its ends turned
forwards and backwards.
lamina.
The lamina cinerea is a thin layer of grey matter that Grey
extends backwards to the tuber cinereum, from the anterior
termination of the corpus callosum. This structure closes
the anterior part of the third ventricle, and shuts out the
optic commissure from that space. Laterally it is continuous
with the anterior perforated spot. In consequence of its
great thinness, this structure is often broken through in removing the brain.
The corpus callosum callosum is seen to be bent in front, and then Corpus
to be extended horizontally backwards in the longitudinal
fissure nearly to the anterior commissure (within a quarter
of an inch), where it presents a well- marked concave margin,
N 4
184 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
feriorly
bands,
ends in- to which the lamina cinerea is joined. A white band, fillet,
in two or peduncle of the corpus callosum is continued onwards, on
each side, from the line of termination before alluded to, to
the anterior perforated spot. To the anterior bend of the
corpus callosum the term knee (genu) is applied, and the
and ex- prolonged part is called beak (rostrum). Laterally, the
terally corpus callosum reaches into the anterior lobe, bounding hemi- the lateral ventricle in the same direction, and an incision
through it would open that cavity.
tends lainto
sphere.
Its con- volution,
In contact with the surface of the corpus callosum is the convolution named gyrus fornicatus, which begins by a narrow part in
and that front of the anterior perforated spot. On the under part of the
of longi- anterior lobe, at its inner margin, is also seen the beginning of the
fissure. convolution of the margin of the longitudinal fissure. It contains
the olfactory nerve in a sulcus. The upper part of these convolutions will be afterwards seen.
tudinal
Locus perfora- tus anticus.
Position of brain to ex- amine upper part .
Cere<
brum is
Anterior perforated spot (locus perforatus anticus) is a
space near the inner end of the fissure of Sylvius, which is
situate between the anterior and middle lobes of the cerebrum, and in front of the optic tract. On the inner side it
is continuous with the lamina cinerea, and crossing it from
within outwards, is the fillet of the corpus callosum. This
space is grey on the surface, and corresponds to the corpus
striatum in the interior of the brain ; it is perforated by
the numerous vessels of that body.
Position ofthe part.
—Now the base of the cerebrum is
dissected, the brain should be turned over for the examination of the upper part. After the brain is turned, something should be placed beneath the anterior lobes, to raise
them to the same level as the posterior ; and a rolled cloth
should encircle the whole, to support the hemispheres.
B. UPPER SURFACE OF THE CEREBRUM. On the upper
convex surface, the cerebrum, taken as a whole, is oval in form, with
and di- the larger end backwards ; and is convex in its outline, corinto two. responding to the hollow of the skull. The median longituabove,
vided
dinal fissure only partly separates the mass into two portions
or hemispheres, for it is limited in the middle by the corpus
callosum extending from one hemisphere to another.
CONVOLUTIONS OF THE CEREBRUM. 185
Each hemisphere is smaller in front than behind. Its Each half
outer aspect is convex, but the inner is flat, and touches the
opposite hemisphere in front. On the upper part the surface
of the hemisphere is continuous, but on the under part it is
separated into two pieces by the large cleft before seen.
The superficies of the hemisphere is marked by tortuous emi- is
nences, having the appearance of a body bent and twisted in by con- different directions, similar to the small intestine ; the and pro- sulci.
jections on it are named convolutions (gyri), and the intervening depressions, sulci or anfractuosities.
-
marked
volutions
convolu- Convolutions. Of the numerous convolutions the student Chief
may notice the following : one of the corpus callosum, tions.
another of the margin of the longitudinal fissure, and others
of the outer surface of the hemisphere.
tion.
Dissection. —The upper part of each hemisphere having been already Disseccut off as low as the convolution of the corpus callosum, cut through
that convolution on the left side, and turn the ends forwards and backwards ; a white longitudinal band (covered band of Reil) is seen beneath
it. It is supposed that the top of one hemisphere has been kept for the
purpose of examining the convolutions.
lution of corpus callo sum ;
a. The convolution of the corpus callosum (gyrus fornicatus) ex- Convotends around the root of each hemisphere, except across the fissure
of Sylvius. It is narrow in front, and begins at the anterior perforated spot ; then courses round the corpus callosum and the crus
cerebri, and ends at the posterior part of the same spot. Whilst
lying on the inner surface of the hemisphere, it is joined by the
convolutions of that part. Beneath this convolution is a band of its fillet
fibres (covered band of Reil, fillet of the corpus callosum), which is connected in front and behind with the anterior perforated spot,
and gives offsets to other secondary convolutions in the longitudinal fissure.
or band.
lution of
dinal
b. The convolution ofthe margin of the longitudinal fissure takes Convo
a similar course with the preceding around the hemisphere, but it longitulies at the margin of the great longitudinal fissure, instead of being fissure.
placed deeply in it. Commencing at the anterior perforated spot,
where it forms the inner part of the anterior lobe, it is directed
back along the margin of the great fissure, and along the under
part of the hemisphere to the front of the middle lobe. This is
not so distinct as the preceding convolution.
lutions c. The convolutions of the outer surface of the hemisphere cross Convomore or less obliquely from the convolution of the margin of the outer
186 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
cere- part of longitudinal fissure to that of the fissure of Sylvius. The posterior
ones become most oblique and irregular. On opposite sides of the
brain these convolutions are not symmetrical.
brum .
A con- volution
and
Structure of the convolutions. —From the section now made into
has base the brain, it appears that each convolution is continuous with the
summit ; interior of the brain on the one side (base), and that it is free on
the surface of the brain on the other side, where it presents a
summit and lateral parts. Externally it consists of a layer of grey
cerebral substance (cortical layer), which is continuous over the
surface of the hemisphere ; and internally it is composed of a white
cerebral substance (medullary part), which is a prolongation from
the fibres of the interior.
is grey
outside
and white within.
Sulci.
The deepest where found.
Outline ofthe cere- brum
The sulci, or the intervals between the convolutions, vary
in size in different parts of the brain ; they are deepest
generally on the outer aspect of the hemisphere, where they
measure about an inch.
There is one of considerable depth on the inner surface of the
hemisphere, on a level with the corpus callosum, which projects
inwards beneath an eminence (hippocampus minor) in the floor of
the lateral ventricle. From it another sulcus is directed vertically
upwards to the convex part of the hemisphere.
C. INTERIOR OF THE CEREBRUM. - When viewed from the
outer surface, the cerebrum appears to be a solid mass, but
on making farther examination therein, it will be found to
enclose a large irregular space, which is subdivided by partitions into smaller cavities or ventricles. Further, each
compo- hemisphere is constructed of central or fundamental bodies,
of a convoluted exterior, and of certain connecting internal
pieces.
sition.
Funda- mental bodies.
The fundamental part of the hemisphere is formed by the
crus cerebri and by two masses of grey substance (corpus
striatum and optic thalamus), which are situate above the
crus, and project into the lateral ventricle : the two last
bodies are sometimes called ganglia of the brain, because the
fibres of the peduncle, whilst passing through them, are inCrust or creased in number. The constituent fibres of the crust, or
convoluted part of the hemisphere, may be said to begin inferiorly in the peduncle, and to spread out from that spot to
convo- Juted part
INTERIOR OF THE CEREBRUM. 187
mis- infold the central space before mentioned. And the con- and comnecting pieces, or fibres, which are named commissures, pass sures.
from hemisphere to hemisphere, across the middle line of the
brain, or connect together the parts of the same half of the
cerebrum : some of the commissural pieces serve as bounding
parts ofthe ventricles.
In conducting the dissection of the cerebrum, the student
will have to learn the situation and the boundaries of the
several cavities, to trace the fibres of the crus through the
ganglia of increase to the convolutions, and to examine the
commissures.
ovale
of the
sphere.
Internal character ofthe hemisphere above the ventricles.— Centrum
In the right hemisphere, which has been cut through above minus
the level of the convolution of the corpus callosum, the sur- hemiface displays a white central mass of an oval shape (centrum
ovale minus) that sends projections into the several convolutions. In a fresh brain, this surface is studded with drops
of blood from the divided vessels.
ovale When the hemispheres are sliced off to the level of the Centrum
corpus callosum, the white surface exposed is much larger, majus is deeper.
and is named larger oval centre (centrum ovale, Vieussens).
The white mass in each hemisphere is further seen to be
continuous across the middle line of the brain, where it is
connected by a narrowed part, corpus callosum.
callo- The corpus callosum reaches from the one hemisphere to Corpus
the other, and forms the roof of each lateral ventricle. Be- sum.
tween the hemispheres, this body is but of small extent, and
occupies the longitudinal fissure. Here it is about four Situainches in length, and somewhat arched from before back- wards ; it is also narrower in front than behind, and is nearer and
the anterior than the posterior part of the cerebrum.
tion
form.
surface On the upper surface of its free part the fibres are seen Upper
to be directed from the hemispheres to the middle line, the
middle ones being transverse, but those from the anterior and
posterior parts oblique. Along the middle is a mark (raphé), has
and close to it are two or more longitudinal white lines (nerves
of Lancisi). Still further out may be seen other longitu- longitudinal lines beneath the convolution covering this body. The fibres.
longitudinal fibres in the middle line are continued downtrans- verse and
dinal
188 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
part
wards anteriorly, and join the prolongation (fillet) to the
anterior perforated spot.
Anterior In front, the corpus callosum is bent to the base of the
bends brain, as before seen, and behind it ends in a thick roll,
which joins the fornix beneath.
down.
Dissec- tion.
Is thick- est at each end.
Under part.
Is the trans .
verse commis- sure.
Dissec- tion .
Five ventriin the brain.
Dissection. -In order to see the thickness of the corpus callosum, and the parts in contact with its under surface, the cut
already made through the corpus callosum into the ventricle is to
be extended forwards and backwards on the left side, as far as the
limits of the cavity. In cutting through that body, a thin membrane may be observed to line its under surface.
The corpus callosum is thicker at each end than at the
centre, because of the greater number of fibres collected in
a given space, and the posterior part is the thickest of all.
Connected with the under surface is the partition between
the ventricles (septum lucidum), and still posterior to that is
the fornix .
The corpus callosum is the chief commissural part of the
brain, and reaches laterally even to the convolutions, but its
fibres are not distinct far in the hemisphere.
Dissection. -Open the lateral ventricle in the opposite hemisphere, and remove as much of the corpus callosum and of the
white substance of the brain as may be necessary to see well the
cavity. A part of the ventricle dips down in the middle lobe of
the cerebrum towards the base of the brain, and to expose it, cut
outwards through the left hemisphere, following down the hollow.
VENTRICLES OF THE BRAIN. -The ventricular spaces of
cles are the interior of the cerebrum are four in number, viz. one
(lateral) in each hemisphere, another (third) in the middle
line of the brain, near the under surface, and another small
one (fifth) in the partition between the large ventricles of
the hemispheres. The fourth ventricle is situate between
the cerebellum and the posterior surfaces of the medulla
oblongata and pons.
Lateral ventri- cle.
The lateral ventricles are two in number, one in each
hemisphere ; they are separated in the middle line by a partition, and communicate by an aperture below that septum.
The interior is lined by a serous membrane.
LATERAL VENTRICLE. 189
and poEach is a narrow interval in the hemisphere. Each has Shape
something of the shape of the italic letter ƒ, and extends into sition ;
the anterior, posterior, and middle lobes of the cerebrum ; it
is described as consisting of a central part or body, and three
points or cornua.
cornua.
Of the cornua of the ventricle :-the anterior turns out- three
wards in the anterior lobe ; the posterior (digital cavity) is
much smaller in size, and is bent inwards in the posterior
lobe, towards the one of the opposite side ; and the inferior
cornu, beginning opposite the posterior fold of the corpus
callosum, descends in the middle lobe, and forms a curve like
the half-bent fore-finger, the concavity being turned inwards.
oftwo For the purpose of examining the boundaries, the ven- Consists
tricle may be divided into an upper or horizontal piece, and parts.
a lower or descending part.
horibodies
a. The upper or horizontal part reaches from the anterior One is
into the posterior lobe. Its roof is formed by the fibres of zontal.
the corpus callosum converging from the hemisphere. Its Its roof ;
floor is irregular in outline, and presents the following parts floor,
from before backwards : first, a small piece of the under and
part of the corpus callosum ; next a large grey, pear-shaped along it.
body (corpus striatum) ; then, behind this, another large
white projection (optic thalamus) ; and between these two
last bodies is a white line (tænia semicircularis). On the
surface of the optic thalamus is a vascular fold of the pia
mater (plexus choroides), together with the thin white edge
of the fornix. Close behind the optic thalamus is the beginning of a projection in the floor of the descending part
of the lateral ventricle, and in the posterior cornu is an elongated eminence (hippocampus minor) . The inner boundary Inner
of the ventricle ( septum ventriculorum) is a thin partition, dary.
which is named septum lucidum ; below the anterior part of
the partition, opposite the front of the optic thalamus, is Aperthe aperture of communication between the ventricles ( fora- tween.
men of Monro).
bounture bedescend- b. The lower or descending part of the ventricle winds The
beneath the optic thalamus, and therefore this body with the ing part ;
contiguous part of the hemisphere will form its roof. Inthe roof,
floor is a large curved, convex eminence, somewhat indented floor,
190 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
dies on
at the end (hippocampus major), with a thin white band
along its concave margin which is prolonged from the fornix.
and bo- External to the projection of the hippocampus is another
white eminence (pes accessorius, or eminentia collateralis).
In this part of the ventricle is also seen the plexus choroides
entering by a fissure internal to the hippocampus.
it.
lucidum ;
Septum The septum lucidum, or the thin partition between the
ventricles, is a translucent part of the cerebral matter which
position, intervenes between the corpus callosum and the fornix, along
form, the middle line. It is somewhat triangular in form, with the
larger end turned forwards, and the narrow or pointed part
surfaces, directed backwards. Its surfaces look to the lateral venborders, tricles. The upper border is attached to the under aspect of
the corpus callosum along the centre ; and the lower border
is joined in part to the middle of the fornix, but in front of
that body to the under or prolonged part of the corpus callosum. The septum consists of two layers, which enclose a
space (fifth ventricle), and each layer is formed of white substance, with an external coating of grey matter.
struc- ture.
Dissec- tion.
Fifth ven- tricle.
Dissec- tion .
Fornix ;
position and form .
Poste- rior and
Dissection. Cut through the part of the corpus callosum that
remains in the middle line, and raise forwards the anterior half by
detaching it from the septum lucidum. By this proceeding the
space of the fifth ventricle will come into view.
The ventricle of the septum (fifth ventricle) is found in
the anterior part, where the depth of the partition is greatest,
and like the septum that contains it, its largest part is in
front. A serous membrane lines the cavity. In the adult it
is distinct from the other ventricles, but in the fœtus it opens
inferiorly into the third, between the pillars of the fornix.
Dissection. Throw backwards the posterior part of the corpus
callosum by breaking through the connection between it and the
subjacent fornix. The septum lucidum is also to be detached from the front of the fornix.
Thefornix, or arch, is a horizontal white layer beneath
the corpus callosum, which is triangular in shape, the base
being turned backwards ; and it ends in two processes or
crura, both before and behind.
The posterior part of the fornix joins the corpus callosum,
LATERAL VENTRICLE. 191
part .
and sends off laterally a small riband-like band (tania hippocampi) along the concave margin of the hippocampus
major. The anterior part, or apex, is arched over the fora- anterior
men of Monro, opposite the front of the optic thalamus, and
ends in two processes or crura, which will be afterwards followed to the corpora albicantia and the optic thalami. To the Upper
upper surface, along the middle line, is attached the septum and borlucidum. Each border is free in the lateral ventricle, as it
rests on the optic thalamus, and along it lies the choroid
plexus.
surface
ders.
surface If the fornix is cut across near its front, the foramen of Under
Monro is opened, and the descending anterior pillars are seen.
When the posterior part is raised from the membrane that
supports it (velum interpositum), a triangular surface, which
is marked by transverse and longitudinal lines, is seen on the marked
under aspect, between the two offsets (taniæ hippocampi) ; lyra.
the surface which is so marked is called the lyra.
bythe
formed
bands.
It would be more correct to describe the fornix as consisting ofFornix
two bands, right and left, which are united for a certain distance of two
in the central part or body. Each band commencing in the optic
thalamus, passes above the foramen of Monro, and after forming
the body of the fornix is continued as a separate piece to the surface ofthe hippocampus.
aperture
lateral
Theforamen ofMonro is the aperture beneath the ante- This
rior part of the fornix, by which the lateral ventricles com- joins
municate with one another and with the third ventricle. venThe plexus choroides lies in it, and through it the serous
lining of the ventricles is continuous.
tricles.
- In floor of lateral
are
BODIES IN THE FLOOR OF THE LATERAL VENTRICLE.
The student will leave, for the present, the membrane on ventricle
which the fornix rests, and will examine on the left side the
different bodies that have been enumerated in the floor of
the lateral ventricle.
body in The corpus striatum ( superior ganglion of the cerebrum, striate
Gall) is the large grey body in the anterior part of the late- front ."
ral ventricle, which has received its name from the striated
appearance presented on a section being made through it.
Externally it corresponds to the island of Reil in the fissure
of Sylvius.
192 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Dissec- Dissection.
struc- ture.
To see the structure of the corpus striatum, the
tion of its student should make a longitudinal cut in it until certain white
fibres crossing it obliquely from within outwards are reached. The
knife should then be carried through this layer of white fibres until
another mass of grey substance, similar to the first, is arrived at.
Its form, The striate body now appears to be a conical mass ofgrey
matter of considerable thickness, which is surrounded mostly
bythe white substance of the hemisphere, only a part proposition ; jecting into the lateral ventricle. Its position is oblique with
respect to the middle line of the brain, for the anterior
part is near the septum of the ventricles, whilst the posterior
part is external to the optic thalamus. From the incision
is divided that has been made into the corpus striatum, white fibres will
parts by be seen to be directed through it in such a way as to divide large the mass of grey matter into two parts, one being situate in
the ventricle above the white fibres (intra-ventricular), and
the other outside the ventricular space, below those fibres
(extra-ventricular).
into two
white fibres .
Onepart in the ventri- cle,
the other outside that cavity.
Tania semicir- cularis
a. The intra- ventricular part of the striate body is pear- shaped,
and projects into the floor of the ventricle. The larger end is
directed forwards, but the opposite end is thin and pointed, and is
continued backwards, outside the optic thalamus, to the roof of the
descending cornu of the lateral ventricle. Numerous veins cover
this part of the corpus striatum .
b. The extra- ventricular part will be best seen afterwards by
sections made from the outer side or from below. It is oval in
form, but does not reach so far back as the other, and is bounded
inferiorly by a white capsule ; through it the anterior commissure
of the brain passes, as will be seen in a subsequent dissection.
The tania semicircularis is a thin white band of longitudinal fibres between the corpus striatum and the optic thalamus. In front, this band becomes broad, and joins the pillar
of the fornix ; and behind it is continued with the pointed
end of the corpus striatum into the white substance of the
ends in roof of the descending cornu of the lateral ventricle. Superficial to the anterior part of the tænia is a yellowish semitransparent layer (lamina cornea), and beneath this some
veins pass in their course to the veins of Galen.
inferior cornu.
Optic thalamus The optic thalamus is only partly exposed in this stage
LATERAL VENTRICLE. 193
of the dissection, and its examination may be omitted till
after the third ventricle has been learnt.
camp's
terior
The hippocampus minor (calcar avis) is pointed at its Hippoposterior extremity, and resembles a cock's spur as it lies in in posthe posterior cornu of the ventricle. On the surface it is cornu ;
covered by the medullary layer of the corpus callosum, and
when cut across it is found to be grey beneath, and to be how
produced by the extension inwards of the sulcus at the posterior part of the inner aspect of the hemisphere ( p. 186. ) .
formed.
campus
lower
The hippocampus major is the curved projection in the Hippofloor ofthe descending cornu of the lateral ventricle. Con- major in
vex on the surface that looks to the ventricle, this body is cornu
curved in the same direction as the cornu, and has its concavity turned inwards. The anterior extremity is the
largest, and presents two or three indentations, which give it has a large end
the appearance of the foot of an animal (pes hippocampi).
Along the inner or concave margin is the small band or and
tænia that is prolonged from the fornix ; and beneath that border.
band is a thin layer of grey matter with a notched border
(fascia dentata).
-
jagged
tion. Dissection. To examine more fully the hippocampus, cut across the Dissecparts ofthe corpus callosum and fornix that remain in the middle line,
and draw outwards the posterior lobe of the left hemisphere. When
the pia mater is removed from the inner side of the hippocampus, and
this projection is cut across, its structure is seen.
ture of
campus.
The hippocampus is covered on the surface by a medullary in- Strucvestment, in which the tænia, or the band of the fornix, ends. On hippothe opposite aspect this body is hollowed, and receives grey matter
from the surface of the brain. Along the free margin of the
hippocampus the grey matter projects, and gives rise to the notched
ridge, or the fascia dentata.
transfissure
Transverse fissure of the cerebrum. -By drawing the Great
separated hemisphere away from the central parts of the verse
cerebrum, viz. the crus cerebri and the optic thalamus, and
-by again replacing it, the dissector will understand the position and the boundaries of the great cleft at the posterior
part of the brain. This fissure is placed beneath the fornix is bein the middle line, and extends thence downwards on each fornix
side, between the hemisphere and the crus cerebri, into the pus calneath
and corlosum
194 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
and reaches
brain.
Pia mater
descending cornu. Through this great slit the pia mater
base of passes into the brain, forming the velum interpositum and
the plexus choroides. Where the pia mater projects into
enters it. the lateral ventricle beneath the edge of the fornix, the continuity of the serous membrane of that cavity is preserved
by its reflection over the vascular fold.
Parts in the
ofbrain.
PARTS IN THE MIDDLE LINE OF THE CEREBRUM. - The
middle student should now return to the examination of the parts
in the centre of the brain, viz. the fold of pia mater and its
vessels, the third ventricle, and the parts connected with it.
At the same time the optic thalamus is to be seen.
Velum,
orfold of pia mater,
is over third ven- tricle ;
its late- ral part
is the choroid
The velum interpositum is the central part of the fold of
pia mater that enters the brain by the great transverse
fissure. Triangular in shape, the membrane has the same
extent as the body of the fornix, and reaches in front to the
foramen of Monro. The upper surface is in contact with
the fornix, and vessels pass between the two ; but the lower
surface forms the roof of the third ventricle, and covers the
pineal body and a part of each optic thalamus. Along each
side is a vascular roll of the membrane (choroid plexus).
The choroid plexus is the red, somewhat round, and
plexus of fringed margin of the fold of pia mater in the interior of the
brain. Its lower part is larger than the upper, and each is
described as extending from the foramen of Monro to the
extremity of the descending cornu.
These bodies are supthe late- ral ven- tricle.
Vessels ofthe velum.
veins ;
posed to be enveloped by the lining membrane of the lateral
ventricle, and so excluded from the cavity of the serous
membrane. On its surface the choroid plexus is villous ;
and the villi are subdivided, and covered by a layer of
nucleated epithelium.
Vessels of the pia mater. · . - a. Some small arteries have been
already traced to the velum and the choroid plexus from the cereArteries; bral and cerebellar arteries (p. 166.) . These supply branches to
the surrounding cerebral substance. b . The veins of the choroid
plexus receive branches from the ventricle, and end in the following. Along the centre of the velum are two large veins, veins of
Galen, which begin at the foramen of Monro, by the union of veins
from the corpus striatum and the choroid plexus. Lying side by
side, these veins are usually united into one at the posterior part of
the velum, which opens into the straight sinus.
with those of Galen.
THIRD VENTRICLE. 195
-
tion.
Dissection. When the velum interpositum is raised and thrown Dissecbackwards, the third ventricle will be exposed. In reflecting the piece
of pia mater, the student must be careful of the pineal body, which will otherwise be detached. On the under-surface of the velum are the
choroid plexuses of the third ventricle.
choroid The choroid plexuses of the third ventricle are two fringed Other
bodies beneath the velum, which resemble those parts in the plexuses.
lateral ventricle.
ventricle The third ventricle is an interval between the optic tha- Third
lami, and reaches to the base of the brain. Its situation is
in the middle line of the cerebrum, below the level of the is near
other ventricles, with which it communicates. Its bound- brain.
aries and communications are mentioned below.
base of
The roof is formed by the velum interpositum and the Roof.
fornix. The floor is very oblique, so that the depth of the Floor.
cavity is greater in front than behind. Corresponding to
the floor are the parts at the base of the brain, which lie
between the crura cerebri and the anterior longitudinal
fissure, viz. locus perforatus, corpora albicantia, tuber cinereum, commissure of the optic nerves, and lamina cinerea.
On the sides of the cavity the optic thalami are situate.
In Parts on the front of the space are the descending pillars of the fornix, sides,
with part of the anterior commissure of the cerebrum in the in front ,
interval between them. Behind are the posterior commis- and be..
sure and the pineal body. Crossing the centre of the space
from one optic thalamus to another, is a band of grey matter
soft commissure.
hind.
into
ventriThis space communicates with the other ventricles of the Opening
brain in the following way : -In front it joins each lateral other
ventricle through the foramen of Monro, and opens into cles.
the fifth ventricle in the fœtus. Behind is an opening
into the fourth ventricle, beneath the posterior commissure,
which is named aqueduct of Sylvius. At the lower part, in
front, there is a depression opposite the infundibulum
(iter ad infundibulum), which is closed by the lining membrane. The serous membrane of the ventricle is continued
into the neighbouring cavities through the different apertures
of communication.
0 2
196 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
matter of
tricle.
Grey Grey matter ofthe ventricle. —At the lower part of each optic
the ven- thalamus, the grey matter of the ventricle envelops the crus of the
fornix, and ascends to the septum lucidum ; moreover, it forms the
soft commissure by extending from side to side. In the floor of
the cavity it also exists in abundance, entering into the corpora
albicantia, and uniting the structures that form the floor of the
third ventricle.
Anterior
sure :
The anterior commissure of the cerebrum is a round commis- bundle of white fibres, which passes through each corpus
form and striatum, and connects the opposite hemispheres. To see
it in one half of its extent, the student should make the
following dissection :
extent.
open corpus striatum .
-
To seeit, Dissection. On the side on which the corpus striatum is cut
into, follow the commissure into the interior of that body by scraping away the grey matter with the handle of the scalpel. The
commissure will be then seen to perforate the white fibres of the
corpus striatum, and to pass through the other mass of grey matter
(extra-ventricular) of the same body.
Position;
and course
Free only in the middle line, where it lies before the
pillars of the fornix, the anterior commissure perforates the
corpus striatum, passing in succession through the intraventricular grey part, the white fibres, and the extra- ventrito roof cular grey part. Lastly, the commissure pierces the white
matter bounding externally the corpus striatum, and ends
in the roof of the inferior cornu of the lateral ventricle.
of in- ferior cornu.
Poste- rior com- The posterior commissure of the cerebrum is smaller than
missure. the anterior, and is placed above the opening into the fourth
ventricle. Laterally it enters the substance of the optic
thalamus.
Thala- mus The thalamus opticus (inferior ganglion of the cerebrum)
opticus. is best seen on that side on which the inferior cornu of the
Form lateral ventricle is opened. It is a square-shaped body,
which forms part of the lateral and third ventricles, being
free where it enters into those cavities.
and po- sition.
Upper surface.
The upper surface projects in the floor of the lateral
ventricle, and is marked by a prominence in front (anterior
Under tubercle) near the tænia semicircularis. The under surface
forms part of the roof of the inferior cornu of the lateral
ventricle, and into it the crus cerebri is inserted. By the
part ;
CENTRAL BODIES OF THE CEREBRUM. 197
side,
side,
and posinner side this body enters into the third ventricle ; and Inner
along the upper part of this aspect is the peduncle of the
pineal body. On the outer side are the corpus striatum, and outer
the substance of the hemisphere. The anterior part looks anterior,
to the foramen of Monro. And the posterior part, which is terior
free in the inferior cornu of the lateral ventricle, presents
inferiorly two small roundish tubercles, internal and external geniculate bodies, with which the optic nerve is
connected.
parts.
The ofoptic origin of the optic nerve from the thalamus, and from Origin
the geniculate and quadrigeminal bodies, is best seen now.
nerve.
tion.
Dissection. Follow out now the origin of the fornix in the Dissecoptic thalamus. First cut through the anterior commissure and
the anterior part of the corpus callosum along the middle line ;
and separating the left hemisphere from the other, trace downwards
the crus ofthe fornix to the corpus albicans, and then upwards into
the optic thalamus.
fornix
thala- mus ;
forms
Anterior pillar ofthe fornix. —The fornix begins in the thalamus Origin of
opticus, near the tubercle on the upper surface. From this origin in optic
it descends in a curved direction to the corpus albicans, where it
makes a turn like half of the figure 8, giving a white envelope how
to the grey matter of that body. The crus then ascends with a corpus
bend forwards through the grey substance on the side of the optic
thalamus, and is joined by the fibres of the tænia semicircularis Joined
and peduncle of the pineal gland. Lastly, the crus is applied fibres.
to the like part of the opposite side to form the body of the fornix.
albicans.
by other
The pineal body and the corpora quadrigemina, which are
placed behind the third ventricle, should be next examined.
Dissection. - All the pia mater should be carefully removed Dissecfrom the surface of the quadrigeminal bodies, especially on the
left side, on which they are to be examined. The posterior lobe of
the hemisphere of the same side may be cut off.
tion.
gland ; The pineal gland (conarium) is a small conical body, Pineal
which is situate above the posterior commissure, and be- position,
tween the anterior pair of the corpora quadrigemina. In
shape like the cone of a fir, it is less than a quarter of an shape,
inch in length, and has the base or wider part turned forwards. It is connected to the optic thalami by two white
0 3
198 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
ment to thala- mus.
bands, one on each side -peduncles of the pineal body :
attach these begin at the base of the pineal gland, and extending
forwards along the inner part of the optic thalami, end by
joining the crura of the fornix. The base of the gland is
further connected by transverse white fibres with the posterior commissure.
Struc- ture.
Corpora quadriThis body is of a red colour and vascular, and encloses a cavity ;
in it is a viscid fluid, with some calcareous particles.
The corpora quadrigemina are four small bodies, which
gemina. are arranged in pairs, right and left, and are separated by
In pairs a median groove. Each pair is situate on the cerebral aspect side. of the peduncle of the cerebrum of the same side.
on each
one
joins thala- mus.
Anterior The anterior eminence (nates) is somewhat larger than
(nates) the posterior, from which it is separated by a slight depression ; it is oblong from before backwards, and sends forwards
a white band to join the optic thalamus and the optic nerve.
The posterior eminence (testis) is rounder in form and
joins whiter in colour than the preceding : it has also a lateral
white band, which is directed beneath the corpus geniculatum internum, blending with the optic tract and the thalamus opticus.
Poste- rior one
thala- mus.
Struc- ture and their bands.
Fillet of olivary body
These bodies are small masses of grey substance enveloped by
white, and are situate over the band of the fillet that forms the
roof of the aqueduct of Sylvius. They send processes to the optic
thalamus (brachia), which are accessory parts to the peduncular
fibres ofthe cerebrum.
Fillet of the olivary body. —If the upper margin of the cerebellum is pulled aside, a white band, about a quarter of an inch
wide, is seen to issue from the transverse fibres of the pons, and to passes be directed upwards to the corpora quadrigemina. This is the
corpora upper or commissural piece of the fillet (p. 179.) , which unites begemina. neath the corpora quadrigemina, over the Sylvian aqueduct, with
the similar part of the opposite side.
beneath
quadriThree sets of
cereSTRUCTURE OF THE CEREBRUM. - In each cerebral
fibres in hemisphere three principal sets of constituent fibres are
brum. recognised, viz. peduncular or diverging, and both transverse and longitudinal commissural.
Fibres of A. Peduncular fibres. ―― In the crus cerebri, or the root
cerebri of the cerebral hemisphere, there are two bundles of longi- crus
FIBRES OF THE CEREBRUM. 199
tudinal fibres, which are kept distinct by grey matter, and form hemi-the
are derived from different parts of the spinal cord ( p. 182.) . sphere.
From this source the hemisphere may be said to spring.
tion
striaDissection. To trace the fibres onwards beyond the crus Disseccerebri, expose them first in the corpus striatum by scraping away in the
the grey matter above them, and make this dissection on the side corpus
on which that body and the optic thalamus remain uncut. In this tum
proceeding the pecten of Reil comes into view, viz. grey matter
passing between the white fibres, and giving the appearance of the
teeth of a comb. On taking away the prolonged part of the
striate body, other fibres are seen issuing from the outer side of
the optic thalamus, and radiating to the posterior and inferior
lobes. Part of the upper surface of the optic thalamus, that at the and op- posterior end, may be taken away to expose the accessory bundle mus.
coming to the peduncular fibres from the cerebellum (its superior
peduncle) beneath the corpora quadrigemina.
tic thalain corpus striatum
lamus :
cessory
The peduncular fibres, in ascending to the cerebrum, have the Fibres of
following disposition in the striate body and the optic thalamus. peduncle
Those that form the free or fasciculated part of the peduncle pass andopthrough the middle of the striate body ; whilst those on the opposite tic thaaspect of the peduncle, which form its tegmentum, are transmitted
chiefly through the under part of the optic thalamus. In these
two ganglionic bodies the fibres are greatly increased in number ;
and in the optic thalamus, they receive accessory bundles from their acthe superior peduncle of the cerebellum, from the fillet of the bands.
olivary body, from one pair of the corpora quadrigemina, ' and
from the corpora geniculata. On escaping from the striate body In the
and the thalamus, the fibres radiate into the anterior, middle, and sphere
posterior parts of the cerebral hemisphere, forming the corona they exradiata. In the hemisphere the fibres are continued to the convo- convolu
lutions, but before reaching the circumference of the brain they
decussate with the converging fibres of the corpus callosum.
Their expansion in the hemisphere resembles a fan bent down in
front and behind, forming thus a layer which is concave on the
under side.
hemitend to
tions.
missural
verse
B. The transverse commissural fibres connect the hemi- Comspheres of the cerebrum across the middle line. These transfibres give rise to the great commissure (corpus callosum) , fibres,
and to the anterior and posterior commissures. All these
bodies have been already examined.
C. Longitudinal fibres. —Other connecting fibres pass Commis- sural 0 4
200 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
dinal longitu- from before backwards, uniting together parts of the same
fibres . hemisphere, and having mostly a circular arrangement.
Are found
and its acces- sory
The longitudinal fibres are collected chiefly in the following
in fornix different bands, viz. the fornix, the tænia semicircularis, and the
peduncles of the pineal body. Other longitudinal fibres may also
be enumerated on the upper and under surfaces of the corpus
and on, callosum, along the middle line, together with the band of the
convolution of the corpus callosum . All these last are connected
with the anterior perforated spot of the base of the brain.
parts ;
and under corpus callo- sum.
Optic thala- mus differs above and below.
Section ofcorpus
Structure of the optic thalamus. -On making sections of the
optic thalamus on the side on which it is entire (the left) , this body
will be found to consist of layers of grey and white substance at
the upper and inner parts ; but only of the medullary fibres (tegmentum) of the peduncle of the cerebrum at the lower and outer
parts.
Corpus striatum. - By slicing through the corona radiata on the
striatum right side, so as to expose the extra-ventricular part of the corpus
outside. striatum, the extent and form of that mass, and the situation of
the anterior commissure, will be apparent.
from .
Section of crus Crus cerebri. -A section may be made through the right pecerebri . duncle of the cerebrum, to see the disposition and the thickness of
the two layers of its longitudinal fibres, and the situation of the
locus niger between them.
Proceed- ing to
cereDissection. - Detach the remains of the cerebrum from the
prepare cerebellum, by carrying the knife through the optic thalamus,
bellum. and preserve in one piece the cerebellum with the corpora quadrigemina, the pons, and the medulla oblongata. Carefully remove all the pia mater from the fissure on the under surface
of the cerebellum, and separate the different parts in that fissure.
Let the handle of the scalpel be passed along a sulcus at the circumference of the cerebellum, between the upper and under
surfaces.
Form and
SECTION V.
THE CEREBELLUM.
THE cerebellum, little brain, is flattened from above downwards; it is widest from side to side, and measures in this
position direction about four inches. This part of the encephalon
bellum. is situate in the posterior fossa of the base of the skull,
of cere-
SURFACES OF THE CEREBELLUM. 201
sions.
beneath the tentorium cerebelli. Like the cerebrum, it is Dividivided into two hemispheres, the division being marked by
a notch at the posterior part, which receives the falx cerebelli, and by a wide groove along the under surface.
groove
upper
UPPER SURFACE. On the upper aspect the cerebellum No
is raised in the centre, but is sloped towards the circum- onthe
ference. There is not any median sulcus on this aspect, surface ;
but the halves are united by a central constricted part or halves
isthmus (superior vermiform process). Separating this sur- median
face from the under one is the horizontal fissure, which is
wide in front, and extends backwards from the pons to the
middle line of the cerebellum.
joined by
part.
Lamina and
arrangeThe surface of the cerebellum is marked by plates or
laminæ, instead of convolutions, which are notched on the their
sides, and form segments of circles arranged one within ment.
another, with their convexity directed backwards. On the
upper aspect the lamina pass from the one hemisphere to
the other, with only a slight bending forwards of the most
anterior in the superior vermiform process ; but on the under
aspect they join the sides of the different bodies in the
median fissure (commissures). Between the laminæ are sulci Sulci are
or fissures, which are lined by the pia mater, and reach to or deep.
different depths ; of these the shallower ones separate the
laminæ, but the deeper ones mark the lobes, and reach
downwards to the white substance of the interior.
and there the sulci are interrupted by cross laminæ.
shallow
Here
The UNDER SURFACE is convex, being received into the A fissure
fossæ of the skull, and is divided into hemispheres by a sent
median hollow (vallecula, or valley).
is prebelow,
called
tains verThe central depression, or the valley, receives the medulla which is
oblongata, and is wider at the middle than at either the valley,
anterior or the posterior part. In the bottom of the hollow and conis a mass (inferior vermiform process), corresponding to the miform
central part which connects the halves of the cerebellum
on the upper surface ; the two together constitute the general
commissure of the halves of the cerebellum.
process.
tuents of Entering into the constitution of the inferior vermiform process Constiare the following eminences, which will be easily separated from vermi-
202 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
form process :
Uvula,
band,
one another with the handle of the scalpel : -Most anteriorly is
a narrow body (uvula), which is named from its resemblance to
the same part in the throat ; it is longer from before backwards
than from side to side, and is divided into laminæ. Its anterior
nodule, projection into the fourth ventricle is named nodule, or laminated
tubercle ; and on its side is a ridge of grey matter, which is notched
furrowed on the surface (furrowed band) , and unites it with the almond- like
lobe of the hemisphere. Connected to the nodule is a thin white
velum, layer on each side (medullary velum) ; but this and the furrowed
band will be seen in a subsequent dissection. Behind the uvula
pyramid, is a tongue-shaped body (pyramid), which is elongated transversely, and is marked by transverse laminæ. Still farther back
are certain transverse pieces extending between the posterior
lobes ofthe hemispheres, of which they were considered by Reil to
be the commissures.
and com- mis- sures.
Seven lobes in
hemiLOBES OF THE HEMISPHERE. —Each hemisphere is sub- each divided into lobes, both on the upper and the under aspect ;
sphere, and issuing from the anterior part is a large leg-like process,
which is subdivided into three pieces, and connects the
cerebellum with other parts, viz. an upper peduncle to the
pedun- cerebrum, a middle one to the pons, and an inferior one to
the medulla oblongata.
and three
cles.
Two lobes on upper surface,
three on under
On the upper surface there are two lobes, but the sulcus
between them is not well marked. One is the anterior or
square lobe, which extends back as far as the vermiform process ; and the posterior reaches thence to the great horizontal fissure at the circumference.
On the under surface of the cerebellum, where the consurface, centric arrangement of the lamina prevails, there are three
lobes that are separated by sulci, but these are not more
distinct than on the upper surface :
viz.
biven- tral,
slender,
First, attached to the side of the pyramid, is the biventral
lobe. Next follows the slender lobe, which is connected with the
posterior part of the pyramid as well as with the other transverse
and pos- laminæ behind that body. And, lastly, comes the posterior lobe,
which joins the commissural lamina behind the pyramid in the
valley.
terior.
Two other Two other lobes appear between the biventral lobe and lobes in the medulla oblongata :
valley.
Amygda-
-
One of these is the amygdaloid lobe, which projects into the loid
INTERIOR OF THE CEREBELLUM. 203
valley opposite the uvula, and touches the medulla oblongata.
The other is a small pyramidal slip that is directed outwards over
the crus cerebelli (now the under surface is uppermost) , and is and flocnamedflocculus, or subpeduncular lobe.
―
culus.
tion.
Dissection. -To see the flocculus and the posterior medullary velum, Dissecslice off, on the left side, the biventral and slender lobes of the under surface, and evert the amygdaloid lobe. Passing from the tip of the uvula
to the flocculus is the thin white layer of the posterior velum, and beneath it a bit of paper may be put. The furrowed band on the side of
the uvula is now seen.
Flocculus and medullary velum. and
of floc- culus.
rior meThe position of the flocculus Position
to the crus cerebelli, and in front of the biventral lobe, has been
before mentioned. This body resembles the other lobes in struc- structure
ture, and may be considered a rudimentary lobe, for it is divided
on the surface into laminæ, and contains a white medullary centre
that furnishes offsets to those divisions. Passing from the flocculus Posteto the tip of the inferior vermiform process (nodule) is a thin dullary
white layer (velum), which serves as a commissure to the flocculi.
This white band is semilunar in form, with the anterior edge free, Form
and the posterior border fixed in front of the transverse fur- tachrowed band. In front of the nodule the pieces of opposite sides
are united, and form the posterior medullary velum.
velum .
and atments.
bellum is
ternally.
INTERIOR OF THE CEREBELLUM.-In the cerebellum there Cereis not any cavity or ventricle enclosed, for the space of the solid infourth ventricle is between the cerebellum and the medulla
oblongata. In the interior there is a large white centre,
like that of the cerebrum, which furnishes offsets to the
laminæ, and to other parts of the encephalon.
tion.
Dissection. -Turn upwards the superior aspect of the cere- Dissecbellum, and make an incision across the laminæ of the left hemisphere to see their structure. On the right lobe place the scalpel
in the horizontal fissure, and carry it inwards as far as the superior
vermiform process, so as to cut away all the laminar structure, and
expose the medullary substance with the contained corpus den- tatum.
mina has white in- side and grey outStructure ofthe lamina. —Each lamina consists of a white in- A laternal and a grey external substance. The white part is derived
from the central medullary mass, and divides like the branching of
a tree, until it ends in small lateral offsets that enter the sub- side .
divisions of the lamina. The stratum ofgrey matter that envelops
the white substance resembles the cortical covering of the convo-
204 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
Colla- teral white fibres.
White centre of cere- bellum .
gives
lutions of the cerebrum ; it consists of two layers, of which the
outer is grey, and the inner " dirty yellow."
Besides the white stalk of the lamina which is derived from the
central mass, there are other white fibres that pass from one
lamina to another.
MEDULLARY CENTRE. -
A large white mass occupies the
centre of the cerebellar hemisphere, and contains in its substance a dentate body. From its surface offsets are furoffsets, nished to the different laminæ, and from the anterior part
proceed three large processes or peduncles-superior, middle,
and inferior.
viz.
superior a. The superior peduncle (processus ad cerebrum) is
cle pedun- directed forwards towards the testis. It is rather flat in
fourth
shape, and forms part of the roof of the fourth ventricle.
Between the peduncles of opposite sides the valve of Vieusis above sens is situate. Continuous behind with the inferior vermiform process, its fibres receive an offset from the interior
of the corpus dentatum, and then pass beneath the pair of
the corpora quadrigemina of the same side, and beneath the
band of the fillet, to enter the optic thalamus.
ventri- cle.
Has valve of Vieus- sens
the two.
Between the superior peduncles is a thin, translucent,
white layer, the valve of Vieussens (velum medullare anbetween terius), which forms part of the roof of the fourth ventricle.
It is thin, and pointed anteriorly, but widens behind, and is
connected with the under part of the vermiform process.
Near the corpora quadrigemina the fourth nerve takes
origin from the upper aspect of the valve, the nerves of
opposite sides being united ; and near the lower part the
upper surface is marked by some grey transverse ridges.
Middle b. The middle peduncle (processus ad pontem) is commonly named crus cerebelli, and is the largest of the three
peduncular masses. Its fibres begin in the lateral part of
the cerebellum, and are directed forwards to the pons, of
which they form the greater part, and in which they unite
with the fibres of the peduncle of the opposite side. In
is the this peduncle are the commissural fibres of the cerebellum,
sure of for which they are supposed to perform the same office as
the corpus callosum does for the cerebrum.
pedun- cle
commiscerebel- lum.
Inferior pedun- c. The inferior peduncle, or the restiform body (processus cle..
FOURTH VENTRICLE. 205
ad medullam), passes downwards to the medulla oblongata.
Its fibres are connected chiefly with the lamina of the upper
surface of the cerebellum. It will be better seen when the
fourth ventricle is opened.
dentation and
The dentate body (corpus dentatum) is contained in the Corpus
white fibres of the cerebellum, and resembles in structure the tum.
corpus olivare of the medulla oblongata. This body measures situathree fourths of an inch from before backwards, and is
situate nearest the inner part of the white centre. It consists of a wavy, greyish-yellow stratum, which is so arranged strucas to form a small capsule, open at the anterior part, and
enclosing a nucleus of whitish matter. Through its aperture
issues a band of fibres from the nucleus to join the superior
peduncle.
-
ture.
tion . Dissection. Cut through the middle of the vermiform process Dissecfrom above, and separate the halves of the cerebellum, in order
that the structure of the central part, as well as the boundaries of
the fourth ventricle, may be observed.
form
is like
Structure ofthe vermiform process . —The vermiform processes of Vermithe cerebellum (upper and lower) are united in one central part, process
which connects together the hemispheres. Internally, the struc- other
ture is the same as the rest of the cerebellum, viz. a central white parts.
stalk with lateral branches for the lamina. Here the branching
appearance of a tree (arbor vitæ) is best seen, in consequence of
the stalks being longer and the laminæ more divided.
ventriand exThe FOURTH VENTRICLE is a space between the cerebellum Fourth
and the posterior aspect of the medulla oblongata and pons. cle.
It has the form of a lozenge, with the points placed upwards Form
and downwards. The upper angle reaches as high as the tent.
upper border of the pons ; and the lower, to a level with the
inferior part of the olivary body.
The roof of the space is somewhat arched, and is formed Roof.
by the valve of Vieussens, by the under part of the vermiform process, and lastly, by the reflection of the pia mater of
the spinal cord to the surface of the vermiform process.
it are,
The floor of the ventricle corresponds to the posterior Floor.
surfaces of the medulla oblongata and pons. Along its Parts in
centre is a median groove (calamus scriptorius), which is in calamus ,
a line with the posterior fissure of the spinal cord ; and at its
206 DISSECTION OF THE BRAIN.
lus teres,
white striæ .
―
lower end, near the swollen part of the posterior pyramid, is
a minute hole, the remains of the canal of the cord. On
each side of the groove is an elevation, which is grey and
little marked inferiorly, but becomes whiter and more profascicu- minent as it ascends. This eminence is the fasciculus teres,
and consists of the longitudinal fibres of the lateral tracts or
columns of the cord ascending to the crus cerebri ( p. 179.).
Crossing the floor, about the middle, are some white striæ
that issue from the median groove : one or two of these are
connected with the origin of the auditory nerve, but others
pass obliquely outwards. Below these transverse lines the
A slight surface is more irregular ; and on each side is an oblique
groove that extends a short distance from the middle line,
and points out three slight prominences on this part of the
floor : one being above the groove, another below it, and a
third at its outer termination. These eminences mark the
situation of masses of grey matter which are supposed by
Stilling to give origin to the eighth and ninth nerves.
fissure and three emi- nences .
Lateral boun- dary.
Open- ings of
tricle
serous
The lower half of the lozenge-shaped space of the ventricle
is bounded laterally by the restiform body diverging to the
cerebellum and by the posterior pyramid ; and the upper half
has the superior peduncle of the cerebellum as its limit on
the side. Along the line of union of the peduncle with
the floor is a linear mass of dark grey matter, into which one
or more of the oblique lines on the floor may sometimes be
seen to dip.
This ventricle communicates at the upper part with the
the ven- third ventricle by the Sylvian aqueduct ; and with the subarachnoid space of the cord and brain by an aperture in
the pia mater that intervenes between the medulla and the
and its cerebellum. The serous lining of the other ventricles is
lining prolonged into this by the aperture of communication with
the third ; and in this cavity, besides investing the ventricular surface, it forms laterally a pouch on the under surface
of the hemisphere beneath the eighth nerve.
Choroid In the fourth ventricle is a vascular fold, or a choroid
plexus, on each side, similar to the body of the same name
in the other ventricles. It is attached to the inner surface
of the membrane (pia mater), that closes the ventricle
plexus of the ca- vity.
GREY MATTER OF MEDULLA OBLONGATA. 207
between the medulla and the cerebellum, and it extends
upwards on the side. Its vessels are supplied by the
inferior cerebellar artery.
-
matter
dulla obdiffers
the cord.
Grey matter ofthe medulla oblongata. —In the medulla oblongata Grey
the grey matter of the cord is altered in its disposition, and is of meblended with the longitudinal fibres, except those of the anterior longata
pyramid. In the lower part of the floor of the fourth ventricle, the from
transverse or commissural part of the grey substance of the cord is that of
left exposed by the divergence of the posterior columns of the
cord from the middle line, and it is diffused and mixed with the
fibres of the fasciculus teres : where it is so exposed on the surface
of the ventricle, it is covered by a thin translucent layer of white
matter. Further, the posterior horn of the grey crescent in the
half ofthe cord forms a mass in the restiform body (grey tubercle
of Rolando), and is blended with the fibres of that body.
says it
for
and
According to Stilling there are special masses or nuclei of grey Stilling
matter in the medulla oblongata, with which the origins of the eighth forms
and ninth nerves are connected. These masses are placed at the lower nuclei
part of the floor of the fourth ventricle, where they form the three eighth
small eminences before alluded to (p. 206.). The external nucleus gives ninth
origin to the glosso- pharyngeal nerve, the internal one to the hypo- glossal, and the lowest eminence to the vagus nerve. Another mass for
the spinal accessory nerve is lower down, and is contained in the sub- stance of the cord.
nerves.
208 CHIEF ARTERIES OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
,neck gives toarta ofthe Arch
TABLE OF THE CHIEF ARTERIES OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
1. Superior thyroid
2. lingualHyoid branch laryngeal thyroid.
Hyoid branch dorsal lingual sublingual ranine.
Inferior palatine branch tonsillitic glandular submental
1. Common carotid -
3. facial inferior labial inferior ·
superior
4. occipital
5. posterior auricular ·
fl. External carotid.
6. ascending pharyngeal
7. temporal
8. internal maxillary
(1. Arteriæ receptaculi
2. ophthalmic
2. Internal carotid
1. Vertebral
3. anterior cerebral
·
4. anterior communicating 5. middle cerebral 6. posteriorcommunicating 7. choroid .
Anterior spinal posterior spinal inferior cerebellar posterior meningeal transverse basilar anterior inferior cerebellar superior cerebellar posterior cerebral.
coronary lateral nasal angular.
Meningeal branch posterior cervical.
Stylo- mastoid branch Auricular mastoid.
Pharyngeal branches meningeal.
auricular parotid articular transverse facial middle temporal anterior temporal posterior temporal.
Inferior dental middle meningeal muscular posterior dental infra-orbital spheno- palatine descending palatine vidian Lpterygo-palatine.
[Lachrymal supra-orbital central of the retina ciliary muscular ethmoidal palpebral frontal rl. Brachio- nasal.
cephalic
2. subcla- vian
2. left common carotid.
13. left subclavian .
3. thyroid axis
4. deep
2. internal mammary Inferior thyroid · Ascending cervical.
supra-scapular ·
transverse cervical cervical superior intercostal.
Supra- spinal { infra- spinal.
Superficial cervical {posterior scapular.
VEINS OF THE HEAD AND NECK. 209
TABLE OF THE CHIEF VEINS OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
[1. Lateral sinus
2. ascending pharyn- geal ·
[ Superior longitudinal sinus inferior longitudinal sinus straight sinus occipital sinuses ophthalmic vein superior petrosal Linferior petrosal.
Meningeal branches pharyngeal.
Superficial dorsal
Internal ju- gular
3. lingual - lingual ranine.
4. facial
Angular
inferior palpebral dorsal and lateral nasal veins
alveolar
superior coronary inferior buccal masseteric labial submental inferior palatine tonsillitic glandular.
Mastoid vein
Supra- orbital frontal palpebral nasal.
fAlveolar branches infra- orbital descending palatine spheno- palatine vidian.
5. occipital ·
cervical. is 6. superior thyroid Thyroid laryngeal.
Brachio-ce- phalic formed by the union of ·
subclavian -
7. middle thy- ⚫roid.
[ 1. Vertebral
2. external jugular ·
Spinal deep cervical ascending cervical.
1. Internal maxillary
2. temporal
Middle meningeal inferior dental deep temporal pterygoid masseteric .
Anterior posterior middle temporal parotid anterior auricular transverse facial .
3. anterior ju- gular.
4. superior in- tercostal of the right side.
P
Auricular 3. posterior auricular (stylo-mastoid.
4. branch ofthe inter- nal jugular
5. supra-scapular
6. transverse cervical
Supra-spinal infra- spinal.
Superficial cervical posterior scapular.
210 CRANIAL NERVES OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
TABLE OF THE CRANIAL NERVES OF THE HEAD AND NECK
to the 1. First or olfac- { Filaments tory nerve - nose.
2. Second or op- To the retina of the tic nerve - eye.
3. Third or mo- To the muscles of tor nerve of the eyeball - L
4. Fourth nerve.
the orbit.
(Meningeal branches and to the superior oblique muscle.
{ Meningeal.
lachrymal
Ophthalmic -
frontal
ophthalmic or len- ticular ganglion
nasal
( Connecting branches
branches of distri- bution
Orbital branch
branches to Meckel's
Lachrymal palpebral communicating.
(Supra- orbital supra-trochlear.
To lenticular gan- glion ciliary nerves infra- trochlear nasal.
To nasal of the fifth nerve to the third nerve to sympathetic.
Ciliary nerves.
Subcutaneous malar (temporal.
superior maxillary · ganglion posterior dental anterior dental infra- orbital.
Internal branches -
ascending 1
5. Fifth or tri- facial nerve Meckel's ganglion descending
posterior
Inferior maxillary
Nasal naso-palatine.
To the orbit.
Anterior posterior -
(external
Vidian
pharyngeal .
[ Deep temporal Small or muscular masseteric division
large or inferior di- vision
buccal pterygoid.
Auriculo- temporal
gustatory
Linferior dental
palatine.
Carotidbranch large petrosal nerve.
Communicat- ing articular, and to meatus parotid auricular temporal.
Branches mucous membrane
to
to sub-maxil- lary and sub- lingual gan- glia to hypoglossal to the tongue.
Mylo- hyoid labial Lincisor.
CRANIAL NERVES OF THE HEAD AND NECK. 211
5. Fifth or tri- facial nerve,
continued.
6. Sixth nerve -
7. Seventhnerve
8. Eighth nerve
TABLE OF THE CRANIAL NERVES- continued.
[Small petrosal, to Jacobson's nerve Connectingbranches to the fifth and
otic ganglion
Branches of distri- bution · -
sub-maxillary gan.
glion
Connectingbranches
branches of distri- bution -
sympathetic nerves.
Tothe tensor palati muscle nerve to the tensor tympani.
Το the gustatory,
chorda tympani,
and sympathetic nerves.
To the gland to the mucous mem- brane of the
To the external rec- tus muscle of the orbit.
mouth, and Whar- ton's duct.
Connecting branches
Portio dura -
Branches
portio mollis
To join auditory others to join Meckel's ganglion tympanic and sym- pathetic nerves the chorda tympani.
Posterior auricular digastric branch of stylo - hyoid branch distribution -
temporo- facial
cervico- facial
( To join the portio dura the nerve to the cochlea the nerve of the vestibule branches gives
Temporal malar infra-orbital .
Buccal supra-maxillary infra-maxillary.
To the common sac to the saccule to the semi- circular canals.
[Glosso- pharyngeal -
Connecting branches
Branches of distribution -
[To vagus tonecksympathetic in
Jacobson's nerve
to the facial nerve.
To carotid artery to the pharynx tonsillitic branches muscular Llingual.
Joins sympathetic large petrosal nerve the otic ganglion, and supplies tympanum .
P 2
212 CRANIAL NERVES OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
TABLE OF THE CRANIAL NERVES OF THE HEAD AND NECK.
Connecting branches
[To the spinal acces- sory glosso- pharyngeal sympathetic and auricular nerves to the hypoglossal to the spinal acces- sory.
[Pharyngeal nerve
3. Eighth nerve continued.
pneumo-gastric
9. Ninth or hy- poglossal nerve
spinal accessory
Connecting branches
Branches distributionof
-
·
superior laryngeal
Branches of distribution -
Connecting branches -
cardiac nerves
inferior laryngeal
To the pneumo-gas- tric tothecervical plexus.
Branches offto sterno- mastoideus distribution trapezius.
To the pneumo-gas- tric nerve to the sympathetic to the loop of the atlas.
[ Descendens nerve noni
thyro-hyoid nerve branches to the gus- tatory nerve to the lingual mus- cles and to the tongue.
External laryngeal to the ascending mucous descending mem- brane nerve to join the in- ferior laryngeal.
Cardiac œsophageal tracheal and
to inferior constric- tor and muscles of thelarynx to join superior la- ryngeal.
SPINAL AND SYMPATHETIC NERVES. 213
The ganglionic orsympathetic nerve has inthe neck
TABLE OF THE SPINAL AND SYMPATHETIC NERVES OF THE
HEAD AND NECK.
Anterior branches .
Spinal Nerves.
The first four form the CERVICAL PLEXUS,. which gives off -
The cervi- cal spinal nerves di- vide into
posterior branches -
The last four and first dorsal form the BRA.
CHIAL PLEXUS, which'
gives off
Are distributed to the muscles of the back,
and give off cutaneous nerves.
[ Superficial ascending
superficial descending
deep inter.
nal -
deep exter- nal ·
Branches above the clavicle ·
branches below
Small occipital nerve great auricular superficial cervical.
Supra-acromial supra- clavicular supra-sternal.
To the pneumo- gastric to the hypoglossal to the sympathetic to rectus major muscle phrenic nerve Inerves to the descendens noni.
To join the spinal accessory to the sterno- mastoideus to the trapezius to the levator anguli scapulæ.
The rhomboid nerve to the phrenic nerve supra-scapular nerve subclavian branch posterior thoracic or respira- tory to the scaleni muscles.
Are dissected with the upper limb.
Sympathetic Nerve.
Branch to Jacobson's nerve Carotid plexus which to the vidian gives in·
cavernous which branches 1. Superior cervical ganglion has -
Ascending branches,
which unite plexuses
2. Middle cervical ganglion
3. Inferior cervical
·
·
external branches
internal branches
lbranches to vessels
External branches
Linternal - ·
Anterior branches
external ganglion internal ·
-
plexus,
gives
to the sixth cranial nerve.
To the third cranial nerve to the fourth cranial nerve to the fifth and lenticular ganglion to the carotid artery and branches.
To join pneumo- gastric and hypoglossal nerves to the spinal nerves.
Pharyngeal branches { superficial cardiac nerve.
-{
Nervi molles.
To the spinal nerves.
Middle cardiac nerve to supply thyroid body and join the external laryngeal.
To the subclavian artery.
To the spinal nerves, form- ing vertebral plexus.
Inferior cardiac nerve.
P 3
214
CHAPTER III.
DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Direc- tion for
SECTION I.
THE AXILLA AND THE WALL OF THE THORAX.
THE parts included in Section 1. , viz. the wall of the thorax
the dis- and the axilla, are to be dissected within a fixed time, in order
that the examination of the chest may be undertaken.
section .
Position Position.
ofbody.
Marking of surArm- pit.
-
Whilst the body lies on the back, let the dissector raise the thorax to a convenient height by a block, and
carry the arm from the trunk, rotating it slightly outwards
at the same time. Before the dissection is begun, attention
should be given by the student to certain depressions on the
surface, and to the prominences of muscles, or of points
of bone.
-
Surface-marking. Between the arm and chest is the
face. hollow of the arm-pit, which contains the large vessels and
nerves of the limb. The extent of this hollow may be seen to
depend upon the position of the limb to the trunk ; for in
proportion as the arm is elevated, the boundaries are carried
upwards, and rendered tense, and the depth of the space is
diminished. The skin here is of a dark colour, and is furnished with hairs, and large sweat glands. If the arm is
forcibly raised whilst the fingers of one hand are placed in
the arm-pit, the head of the humerus may be recognised.
Shoul- der.
On the outer side of the limb is the prominence of the
shoulder, and immediately above it is an osseous arch, which
is formed internally by the clavicle, and externally by the
spine and acromion process of the scapula. Continued
downwards from about the middle of the clavicle, between
the pectoral and deltoid muscles, is a slight depression, in
which the coracoid process can be felt near the clavicle. A
THE WALL OF THE THORAX. 215
second groove is sometimes seen extending outwards from
the sternal end of the clavicle, between the clavicular and
sternal origins of the great pectoral muscle.
Along the front of the arm is the prominence of the biceps Arm.
muscle, and on each side of that muscle is a groove, which
subsides inferiorly in a depression in front of the elbow-joint.
The inner of the two grooves is the most marked, and corresponds to the position of the brachial vessels.
joint. If the elbow-joint is semiflexed the prominences of the Elbowouter and inner condyles of the humerus will be rendered
evident, especially that on the inner side of the limb. Below
the outer condyle, and separated from it by a slight interval,
is the projection of the head of the radius, which will be recognised by rotating this bone, the fingers at the same time
being placed over it. At the back of the articulation is the
prominence of the olecranon.
-
tion to Dissection. The dissection is to be begun by raising the skin Dissecfrom the side of the chest and from the arm- pit. The student is raise the
to make an incision along the middle of the sternum (its whole integulength) ; to extend the same along the clavicle for two thirds of
the length of that bone, and to continue it down the arm as low
as the fold of the arm-pit. From the xyphoid cartilage let two
other cuts be made : one should extend along the anterior fold of
the arm-pit till it nearly joins the first cut, and then across the inner part of the arm to the posterior fold of the axilla ; the
other is to pass horizontally outwards over the side of the chest,
as far back as to a level with the posterior fold of the arm- pit.
The two flaps now marked out should be reflected outwards, and
be left attached to the body, in order that they may be afterwards
used for the preservation of the part.
The subcutaneous fascia of the thorax resemble the same Fasciæ.
structures in other parts of the body ; but here the superficial
layer does not contain much fat. Beneath the first layer is
a deeper and stronger special fascia that closely invests the
muscles, and is continuous with the deep fascia of the arm.
It is thin on the side of the chest, but becomes much thicker
where it is stretched across the axilla. An incision through
it, over the armpit, will demonstrate its increased strength
in this situation, and its connections with the folds of the
axilla.
P 4
216 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Dissec- tion of
the chest.
Dissection. The cutaneous nerves of the side of the chest
cuta- are to be sought in the fat. Some of these (from the cervical
nervesof plexus) are found crossing the clavicle at the middle and at the
inner part ; others (anterior cutaneous of the thorax) appear
at the side of the sternum, one from each intercostal space ; and
others (lateral cutaneous of the thorax) will be found along the
side of the chest, about one inch below the anterior fold of the
axilla, there being one from each intercostal space except the first.
As soon as the last mentioned nerves appear they are divided
into an anterior and a posterior branch. In the two highest the
posterior branches are larger than the rest, and are to be followed
across the arm-pit, where a junction takes place with a branch
(nerve of Wrisberg) of the brachial plexus.
Descend- ing cu- The descending cutaneous nerves of the cervical plexus, that
taneous cross the clavicle, are distributed to the integuments over the
cervical pectoral muscle. The most internal branch ( sternal) lies near the
plexus. inner end of the bone, and reaches but a short distance below
nerves of
Cutane- ous
ofthe innerves.
it. Other branches, two or more in number, and of larger size
(clavicular), cross the centre of the clavicle, and extend to near
the lower border of the pectoralis major ; these join one or more
ofthe anterior cutaneous nerves of the thorax.
The cutaneous nerves of the thorax are derived from the
branches trunks of the intercostal nerves between the ribs. Of these
tercostal there are two sets : one, the lateral cutaneous nerves of the
thorax, arise from the trunks of the nerves about midway
between the spine and the sternum : the other set, the anterior cutaneous nerves of the thorax, are the terminations of
the same trunks at the middle line of the body.
Are in two rows.
One along middle line.
The other on side of chest.
These have
anterior and
The anterior cutaneous nerves are directed outwards in the integuments in the form of slender filaments. The offset of the
second nerve joins a cutaneous branch of the cervical plexus,
and the others below supply the mammary gland and the integuments. Small cutaneous branches of the internal mammary
vessels are found with these nerves.
The lateral cutaneous nerves divide immediately into an anterior
and a posterior branch. There is not usually any lateral cutaneous
nerve to the first intercostal trunk, and that of the second intercostal wants the anterior branch of bifurcation.
a. The anterior branches bend forwards over the pectoral muscle, and
furnish offsets to the mammary gland and the integuments. The
lowest also give twigs to the digitations of the external oblique muscle.
THE MAMMARY GLAND. 217
branch- b. The posterior branches are distributed to the integuments over the posterior
latissimus dorsi muscle and the back of the scapula. The branch of es.
the second intercostal nerve is larger than the rest, and perforating the One or
fascia of the axilla, supplies the integument of the arm, from which moreof
circumstance it is named intercosto-humeral. As it crosses the axilla it is reaches the arm.
divided into two or more pieces, and is connected to the nerve of Wrisberg by a filament of variable size. The branch of the third intercostal
also gives filaments to the arm- pit and the inner part of the arm.
this set
the The MAMMA, or the breast, is the gland for the secretion of Office of
the milk, and is situate on the front of the chest towards the breast.
lateral aspect.
dimenThe gland is hemispherical in form, though rather more Form and posiprominent on the inner side towards the lower part, and is tion ;
placed over the great pectoral muscle. Its dimensions and with its
weight vary greatly. In a breast that is not enlarged by sions
lactation, the mamma measures commonly about four inches
in each direction, extending longitudinally from the third
to the sixth or seventh rib, and transversely from the side of
the sternum to the axilla. Its depth is about one inch and
a half. The weight of the breast ranges from six to eight and
ounces. weight.
and form
nipple
areola.
Nearly in the centre of the gland (rather to the inner Position
side) is the conical or cylindrical projection of the nipple of the
(mamilla), which is slightly turned outwards. It is about
half an inch or rather more in length, and presents in the
centre a slight depression, where it is likewise rather redder.
Around the nipple is a coloured ring ( areola) about an inch and the
in width, whose tint is influenced by the complexion of the
body, and during life by the states of menstruation, preg- Colour is
nancy, and lactation. The skin both of the nipple and its
areola is provided with numerous papillæ and lubricating skin has
glands ; and on the surface are some tubercles marking the
position of the ducts of those glands.
altered.
glands.
ofthe In the male the mammary gland resembles that of the Breast
female in general form ; for it is prominent, though in a male.
much less degree, and it possesses a small nipple, which is
surrounded by an areola provided with hairs. Farther than
this the similitude does not hold, for the glandular or secretory structure is very imperfect.
Structure. --In its texture the mamma resembles those Struc- ture.
218 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Invest- ing cel- lular layer.
Texture and
compound glands that are formed by the vesicular extremities of branched ducts. During lactation the glandular mass
is of a reddish white colour, and consists of small vesicles,
which are united to form lobules and lobes. Connected with
each lobe is an excretory or lactiferous duct ; and the
whole is surrounded, and bound together by areolar tissue.
A cellular layer, containing fat, surrounds the gland, and penetrates into the interior, subdividing it into lobes. Some fibrous
septa fix the gland to the skin, and support it ; these are the
ligamenta suspensoria of Sir A. Cooper. In the ultimate structure of the gland, in the nipple, and in the areola, there is not any
fatty substance.
Vesicles, lobules, and lobes. — The little vesicles or cells in which
form of the most minute ducts begin are lenticular or rounded in shape,
the clesvesi- . and when filled with milk or mercury are just visible to the naked
The
eye, being about the size of a small pin- hole in paper. ~ ( Cooper. )
Each is surrounded externally by a close vascular network. A
collection of the vesicles around their duct forms the smallest
lobules divisions of the gland, viz . lobules or glandules, which vary in size
formed from a pin's head to a small tare. By the union of lobules the
lobes are produced, of which there are about twenty altogether,
and each is provided with a distinct duct.
are
vesi- cles,
and the lobes of lobules.
Lactiducts ;
The ducts issuing from the several lobes, about twenty in number,
ferous converge to the areola, where they swell into oblong dilatations or
receptacles (sacculi) of one-sixth to one-third of an inch in width.
Onwards from that spot the ducts become straight, and are continued through the nipple, nearly parallel to one another, and graopen on dually narrowing in size, to open on its summit by apertures
varying from the size of a bristle to that of a common pin. Like
other excretory ducts, the milk tubes consist of an external or
fibrous, and an internal or mucous coat ; they are sheathed also by
a scaly or pavement epithelium. In the nipple the ducts are surrounded by fibrous tissue.
end of nipple.
Struc- ture.
Small glands of skin.
Arteries of the gland
and veins
Some of the lubricating glands beneath the skin of the nipple and the
areola are ordinary sebaceous glands, but others are larger aggregate
glands that open in the tubercles before mentioned.
Bloodvessels, nerves, and lymphatics.—The arteries of the breast are
supplied by the axillary, internal mammary, and intercostal arteries,
and enter both surfaces of the organ. The vessels on the cutaneous
surface supply branches to the nipple, which pass from base to apex,
being nearly parallel. The veins, after issuing from the substance of
the breast, are thus disposed : -some form a plexus on the anterior
THE AXILLA. 219
erectile
aspect, and a circle around the areola, and end principally in the
axillary and internal mammary trunks ; but others enter one or more of
the intercostal veins, or ascend over the clavicle to join the veins of the
neck. In the nipple the veins have an arrangement like that of the form
arteries, the two forming the erectile structure of that part. The structure
nerves are supplied from the anterior and lateral cutaneous nerves ofin nip- ple the thorax, viz. those of the third, fourth, and fifth intercostal nerves. Nerves.
Thelymphatics pass either from the inner or the outer part of the gland : Lymphat the former side they accompany the branches of the internal mammary artery, and open into the anterior mediastinal glands, and on
the latter they reach the axillary glands.
atics .
muscle
arm- pit.
Dissection. · With the arm in the same position with respect to Dissec- ofpec- the trunk, the student is first to remove the fascia and the fat from toral
the surface of the great pectoral muscle. In this proceeding the
scalpel should be carried in the direction of the fibres, viz. from
the arm to the thorax, and the dissection may be begun either at
the upper or lower border of the muscle, according to the side of
the body. Afterwards the fascia and the fat are to be taken from
the arm-pit, but the numerous vessels, nerves, and glands contained
in the space are to be left uninjured. The task is best begun at and the
the outer part by removing the fascia from the large axillary vessels where they are about to quit the space and enter the arm :
following these upwards the student will arrive at the branches that
are directed towards the chest, viz. the long thoracic under cover
of the anterior boundary, and the circumflex and subscapular vessels and nerves on the posterior boundary of the axilla.
Some arterial twigs enter the axillary glands, and a few should be
traced out. In taking away the fascia of the posterior boundary
to follow the muscles to their insertion into the humerus, a small
nerve (internal cutaneous of the musculo- spiral) should be looked
for towards the great vessels.
tion and
the armThe AXILLA, or arm-pit, is the hollow between the arm Situaand the chest, and is limited in front and behind by a fold form of
containing muscles. This space is somewhat conical in pit.
form, having the apex upwards at the root of the neck, and
it is larger near the thorax than at the arm. Its boundaries
and contents are as follows : -
pectoral
bound it
The two pectoral muscles form the anterior boundary, but The
they take unequal shares in the construction of this part muscles
in consequence of the difference in their shape and size. in front,
For whilst the pectoralis major extends over the whole front
of the space, reaching from the clavicle to the lower edge of
220 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
and latissi- mus
the anterior fold, the pectoralis minor, which is but a narrow
muscle, corresponds only to the middle part or third of that
fold. In the posterior boundary are the latissimus dorsi
and teres major muscles, forming the lower edge of the fold ;
subsca- and higher up is the subscapularis muscle : this boundary
behind . reaches lower than the anterior, especially near the humerus, and the muscles constituting the lower margin project
beyond the level of the subscapularis.
teres and
pularis
the inner
outer sides.
Parts at On the inner side of the arm-pit are the first four ribs,
and with their corresponding intercostal muscles, and the part
of the serratus magnus that takes origin from them. On
the outer side the space has but small dimensions, and is
limited by the humerus, and by the biceps and coracobrachialis muscles.
Situa- tion of When the fore- finger is introduced into the space the
the apex apex of the hollow will be perceived to be situate between
the clavicle, the upper margin of the scapula, and the first
rib. But the base or widest part of the conically shaped interval is turned downwards, and is closed by the thick
aponeurosis that reaches from the anterior to the posterior
fold.
and base.
Contents of the space.
Position
In the arm-pit are contained the axillary vessels and the
brachial plexus, with their branches ; some branches of the
intercostal nerves ; together with lymphatic glands, and a
large quantity of loose cellular tissue and fat. The position
of all these with reference to the boundaries of the space is
to be carefully studied.
The large axillary vessels cross the space obliquely in
their course between the trunk and the upper limb. The
part of these vessels now exposed projects beyond the line
and con- of the anterior fold of the arm-pit, and is covered only by
of the the common superficial layers, viz. the skin, the fatty or
vessels. superficial fascia, and the deep fascia. Behind the vessels
nections
axillary
are the tendons of the latissimus and teres muscles. On
looking into the arm-pit from below the axillary vein is
seen to lie to the thoracic side of the artery, and to conceal
it. After the vein is drawn aside, the arterial trunk will be
found to lie amongst the large nerves of the upper limb,
having the median nerve to the outside ; the ulnar, the
THE AXILLA. 221
internal cutaneous, and the small nerve of Wrisberg to the
inner side ; and the musculo- spiral nerve behind it. This
part of the artery gives branches to the side of the chest
and to the shoulder. The vein, likewise, receives some
branches in this spot.
tion of
ofvessels
nerves
boundathe armThe several branches of vessels and nerves that are con- Situatained in the space have the undermentioned position with branches
respect to the boundaries. Close to the anterior fold, and and
rather concealed by it, the long thoracic artery extends to the on the
side of the chest ; and nearer the middle of the arm-pit is a ries of
small companion vein (external mammary). Extending along pit.
the posterior fold, within its lower margin, and in contact
withthe edge of the subscapularis muscle, are the subscapular
vessels and nerves ; and near the humeral end of the subscapularis the posterior circumflex vessels and nerve will
be found bending backwards beneath the large axillary
trunks. On the inner boundary, near the upper part, are a
few inconsiderable branches of the superior thoracic artery,
which ramify on the serratus muscle ; but so unimportant
are they that this part of the axillary space may be considered free from vessels in respect of any surgical operation. Lying on the surface of the serratus magnus muscle
is the external respiratory nerve of Bell ; and perforating
the inner boundary of the space are the lateral cutaneous
nerves of the thorax, two or more offsets of which are
directed across the axilla to the arm, and receive the name
intercosto-humeral.
tic
axilla
The lymphatic glands occupy principally the lower part of the Lymphaaxilla, and are nearer the chest than the arm. Commonly they glands of
are ten or twelve in number ; but in this particular, as well as in th
size, they vary much. By their lower ends the glands receive the
lymphatic vessels of the arm, the fore part of the thorax, the
mamma, and the posterior surface of the back ; and the efferent
ducts issuing from the upper end, unite to form a trunk that opens
in the neck into the lymphatic duct of the same side, or, it may be, end in
into the subclavian vein by a separate tube. Small vascular phatic
twigs of the branches of the axillary vessels are furnished to the
glands.
the lymduct.
The PECTORALIS MAJOR is a triangularly shaped muscle, ralis Pectowith its base at the thorax and its apex at the arm. It muscle.
222 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
from
and
Inser- tion into
merus.
Origin arises internally from the sternal half of the clavicle, from chest the cartilages of the true ribs except the last, and from the
clavicle. aponeurosis of the external oblique muscle of the abdomen.
From this wide origin the fibres take different directions :
those from the clavicle are directed obliquely downwards,
and those from the lower ribs upwards beneath the others,
and all end in a tendon which is inserted into the outer edge
the hu- of the bicipital groove of the humerus. This muscle bounds
the axilla anteriorly, and is connected to its fellow by a
fibrous prolongation in front of the sternum. Besides the
superficial structures and the mamma, the platysma covers
the pectoralis major close below the clavicle. A cellular
interval, which corresponds to the depression on the surface, separates the clavicular from the sternal attachment.
One border (upper) is in contact with the deltoid muscle,
and with the cephalic vein and a small artery ; and the lower
border forms the margin of the anterior fold of the axilla.
Parts covering it,
and along the borders.
Dissec- tion Dissection. - - After the division of the clavicular part of the
pectoralis major, seek a small branch of nerve and artery that parts be- enter its under surface. Remove with the handle of the knife
of the
neath pecto- ralis.
Tendon of inserpecto- ralis.
the fat that now comes into view above the border of the small
pectoral muscle, and a membranous sheath that contains the axillary vessels and nerves will be exposed ; also the cephalic vein will
be seen crossing inwards to the axillary vein. A branch of nerve
(anterior thoracic) and the acromial thoracic artery perforate this
tube of membrane. Follow the branches of the nerve and artery
to the pectoral muscles, and afterwards cut through the remaining
part ofthe pectoralis major about its centre, and throw inwards and
outwards the pieces. Dissect out next the insertion of the tendon
of the pectoralis into the humerus. The parts beneath the pec- toral muscle are now seen.
The tendon of insertion of the pectoralis major sends uption of wards one expansion over the bicipital groove to the head
of the humerus, another backwards to line the groove, and a
third to the fascia of the arm. At its attachment to the
bone it consists of two parts, anterior and posterior ; the
anterior receives the clavicular and upper sternal fibres, and
joins the tendon of the deltoid muscle ; and the posterior
gives attachment to the lower ascending fibres.
PECTORAL MUSCLES. 223 R
covered
muscle.
The great pectoral muscle covers the pectoralis minor, Parts
and above and below this muscle it forms alone the anterior by the
boundary of the axilla. Between the pectoralis minor and
the clavicle it conceals the subclavian muscle, the sheath
containing the axillary vessels, and the branches that perforate the sheath. Below the small pectoralis it lies on the
side of the chest, on the axillary vessels and nerves, and
near the humerus on the biceps and coraco- brachialis
muscles.
lis minor
from
into scations
The PECTORALIS MINOR resembles the preceding muscle Pectorain shape, and is extended like it from the thorax to the arm. arises
Its origin is connected by means of slips with the third, chest ;
fourth, and fifth ribs, external to their cartilages ; and its
insertion is attached to the upper surface of the coracoid inserted
process as far as the tip. This muscle is placed before the pula.
axillary space, and assists the pectoralis major in forming Connecthe middle part of the anterior boundary. In that position with
it conceals the axillary vessels and the accompanying nerves, around.
and some small nerves (anterior thoracic ) . Between its
upper border and the clavicle is an interval of a somewhat
triangular form. The lower border projects beyond the
pectoralis major close to the chest, and the long thoracic
artery lies along it. The tendon of insertion is united
with those of the coraco-brachialis and short head of the
biceps.
parts
coracoid
brane
subclaforms a
around
The costo-coracoid membrane, or ligament, receives this Costoname from its insertion on the one side into the rib, and on memthe other into the coracoid process of the scapula. Between
these points of attachment it is connected to the clavicle,
and covers the subclavius muscle. When traced downwards conceals
the membrane is found to descend around the axillary ves- vius , and
sels and nerves, to which it furnishes a sheath, and to end sheath
on those trunks beneath the small pectoral muscle ; but its vessels .
extent is not the same on all, for internally it reaches but a
very short distance on the axillary vein. This sheath
(axillary) resembles in its form and office the funnel- shaped
tube of membrane that surrounds the femoral vessels in the
upper part of the thigh. The front of the sheath is strongest strongnear the subclavius muscle, where it forms a strong band front.
est in
224 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Dissec- tion.
Subcla- vius
over the axillary vessels. The anterior part of the sheath
is perforated by the acromial thoracic artery and the anterior
thoracic nerve.
Dissection.
- Make a transverse incision in the costo- coracoid
membrane near the clavicle, and raise the lower part of the subclavius muscle to expose a process of the deep cervical fascia that
descends beneath the muscle to join that membrane. By this proceeding the subclavius muscle will be seen to be incased by fascia.
Afterwards pass the handle ofthe scalpel along the axillary artery,
and beneath the membrane that covers it, to make apparent the
sheath of the vessels. Finally, remove altogether the costo- coracoid
membrane both from the subclavius muscle and the axillary vessels and nerves.
The SUBCLAVIUS MUSCLE is thin and roundish in form, and
muscle is placed between the clavicle and the first rib. It arises by
a tendon from the cartilage of the first rib, in front of the is at- costo-clavicular ligament, and is inserted into the under surclavicle face of the clavicle for nearly the half of its length.
tached to
and first
the
The
rib. muscle overhangs the large vessels and nerves of the limb,
and is enclosed, as before said, in a sheath of fascia.
Axillary The AXILLARY ARTERY continues the subclavian vessel artery is onwards to the upper limb, and extends from the lower
border of the first rib to the lower border of the teres
major muscle. In its course through the axillary space, its
direction is dependant upon the position of the limb to the
archedin trunk ; for when the arm lies by the side of the body the
vessel is curved, its convexity being upwards, and in proportion as the limb is removed to a right angle with the
chest the artery becomes straight. In the upper part of
the axilla the vessel is deeply placed, but it becomes superHas fol- ficial as it approaches the arm. Its connections with surrounding parts are numerous, and the description of these
will be facilitated by dividing the extent of the artery
into three parts one above, one beneath, and one below
the small pectoral muscle.
axilla.
lowing connec- tions : -
above small a. Above the small pectoral muscle the artery is conpectoral tained in the sheath of the costo-coracoid membrane, with muscle, the axillary vein on its thoracic side, and the brachial
plexus of nerves on its acromial side, but separated from it
THE AXILLARY VESSELS. 225
by a cellular interval. In this part it is covered by the
clavicular portion of the great pectoral muscle, and the
cephalic vein crosses it. Behind it are the highest intercostal space and the first digitation of the serratus muscle,
together with a small nerve (external respiratory).
b that . Beneath the muscle the artery is surrounded by the beneath
large nervous cords of the plexus, which separate it from muscle,
the vein (still to the inner side) and from the surrounding
muscles. Superficial to the vessel is the pectoralis minor,
with part of the pectoralis major ; and behind it is the subscapular muscle.
yond it.
c. Beyond the pectoralis minor the artery is concealed and bein part by the lower border of the great pectoral muscle,
but thence to its termination it is covered only by the integuments and the fascia. Behind it will be found the
lower part of the subscapularis muscle and the tendons
of the latissimus and teres. To the outer side is the
coraco- brachialis muscle. Here the artery is still in the
midst of the large trunks of nerves into which the plexus
is resolved. Thus to the outer side is the median nerve, Position
with the external cutaneous for a short distance ; to the
inner side are the ulnar and internal cutaneous, with the
nerve of Wrisberg ; and behind are the musculo- spiral and
circumflex nerves, the latter extending only as far as the
border of the subscapular muscle. The axillary vein is still and
to the thoracic side of the artery.
of nerves
vein to it.
es are
to the
The branches of the axillary artery are furnished to the Branchwall of the thorax and to the shoulder. The thoracic supplied
branches are four in number ; of which two ( superior and thorax
acromial thoracic) arise from the artery above the pectoralis
minor, one ( alar thoracic ) beneath the muscle, and one
(long thoracic) at its lower border. Three branches are
supplied to the shoulder, viz. one subscapular and two cir- and the
cumflex ; the first springs opposite the edge of the muscle of der,
the same name, and the others wind round the neck of the
humerus.
shoulviz.
thoracic.
1. The superior thoracic branch is the highest offset ofthe artery, upper
and arises opposite the first intercostal space ; it is a small vessel,
Q
226 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Acro- mial tho- racic
plies thorax and shoul- der.
and ramifies on the side of the chest, anastomosing with the intercostal arteries.
2. The acromial thoracic branch is a short trunk on the front of
the artery, which appears in the interval between the pectoral and
is large, deltoid muscles. Its branches of division are directed either inand sup- wards to supply the two pectoral muscles, or outwards to the deltoid muscle. Moreover, the inner set give a few offsets to the
side ofthe chest, which anastomose with the intercostal and other
thoracic arteries ; while from the outer set, a small artery runs a
short distance with the cephalic vein. One or two small twigs
ascend from the trunk of the artery to the subclavius and deltoid
Inferior muscles ; and one branch (inferior acromial) perforates the deltoid
offset. muscle, and anastomoses on the acromion with a branch of the
suprascapular artery of the neck.
acromial
Alar thoracic 3. The alar thoracic branch is very inconstant as a distinct artery,
very ir- its place being supplied frequently by offsets of the subscapular regular. or long thoracic branches ; the artery is distributed to the glands
ofthe axillary space.
thoracic .
Long 4. The long thoracic branch (external mammary) is directed
along the border of the pectoralis minor to the side of the chest, on
which it extends to about the sixth intercostal space ; it supplies the
pectoral and serratus muscles, and anastomoses with the intercostal and thoracic arteries. In the female it gives branches to the
mammary gland.
Subsca- pular has 5. The subscapular branch courses with a nerve of the same
name along the subscapular muscle, as far as the lower angle of the
scapula, where it ends in branches for the serratus magnus and
the latissimus dorsi and teres muscles. Near its origin the artery
sends a considerable branch round the edge of the subscapular
adorsal muscle to the back of the scapula : this dorsal branch will be afterwards dissected. The subscapular artery is frequently combined
at its origin with other branches of the axillary, or with branches
of the brachial artery.
branch.
Two circum- flex .
Axillary vein,
6. The circumflex branches (anterior and posterior) arise near
the end of the axillary artery. One turns in front of and the other
behind the bone. They will be followed in the examination of
the arm.
The axillary vein is a continuation of the basilic vein of
the arm, and has the same extent and connections as the
extent axillary artery. It lies to the thoracic side of the artery,
nections. and receives thoracic and subscapular branches. Opposite
Branch the subscapular muscle it is joined externally by a large
and cones.
THE BRACHIAL PLEXUS. 227
vein, which is formed by the venæ comites of the brachial
artery ; and near the clavicle the cephalic vein opens into it.
-- tion of Dissection. In order to follow out the branches of the brachial Dissecplexus cut through the pectoralis minor near its insertion into the brachial plexus.
coracoid process, and turn it towards the chest, but without injuring the thoracic nerves in contact with it. Afterwards the
axillary vessels are to be cut across below the first rib, and to be
drawn down with hooks ; the thoracic branches of these vessels
may be removed. Lastly, remove the dense fascia from the large
nerves of the plexus.
tion
The BRACHIAL PLEXUS results from the union of the an- Nerves entering terior divisions of the first dorsal and the four lower cervical brachial plexus.
nerves ; and to it is added a fasciculus of the lowest nerve
in the cervical plexus. This interlacement of nerves is Its situaplaced partly in the neck and partly in the axilla, and divides
opposite the coracoid process into large trunks for the
supply of the limb. The part of the plexus above the
clavicle is described in the dissection of the head and neck
(p. 68.). The part below the clavicle has the same connec- and contions with the surrounding muscles as the axillary artery,
and has the following disposition : -
nections.
nerves
three
At first the plexus consists of two cords, which are external The
to the artery ; that nearest the vessel being formed by the last form
cervical and first dorsal nerves, and the other by the fifth, sixth, cords
and seventh cervical nerves. But a third cord is soon produced
by the union of two fasciculi (one from each of the others) ; so that lie
that beneath the small pectoral muscle the plexus consists of three the arlarge cords, one being to the outer side, one to the inner side, and
one behind the vessel.
around
tery,
the
branchThe branches of the plexus below the clavicle are fur- and give
nished to the muscles of the front of the chest, to some of several
the muscles of the scapula, to the latissimus dorsi, and to es, viz .
the arm. They arise from the several cords in the following
manner : -
outer,
The outer cord gives origin to one anterior thoracic branch, the from the
musculo-cutaneous trunk, and the outer head of the median nerve.
The inner cord produces a second anterior thoracic nerve, the inner,
inner head of the median, the internal cutaneous, the nerve of
Wrisberg, and the ulnar nerve.
and
Q 2
228 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
posterior cord .
The fol
The posterior cord furnishes the subscapular branches, and ends
in the circumflex and musculo- spiral nerves.
Only the thoracic and subscapular nerves are now exposed
are seen, to their termination ; the remaining nerves will be seen in lowing
viz.
two an- terior
the arm.
The anterior thoracic branches are two in number, outer
thoracic, and inner, with respect to the cords of the plexus.
outer
and inner.
Three subsca- pular ;
upper,
and
a. The outer nerve crosses inwards over the axillary artery to
the under surface of the great pectoral muscle in which it ends.
On the inner side of the vessel it communicates with the following
branch. b. The inner thoracic branch turns upwards between the
artery and vein, and after receiving the branch of junction from
the other, divides into many branches that enter the under surface
of the pectoralis minor. Some twigs enter the great pectoral muscle
by passing either through or above the border of the pectoralis
minor.
2. The subscapular nerves are three in number. Two
enter the subscapular muscle, and are named upper and
lower from their relative position ; and the third is the long
subscapular.
a. The upper branch is small, and enters the highest part of the
lower, subscapularis muscle. b. The lower subscapular branch (nerve of
the teres muscle) gives an offset to the lower part of the subscapular
long sub- muscle, and ends in the teres major. c. The long subscapular scapular.
nerve takes the course of the artery of the same name along the
posterior wall of the axilla, and ends in the latissimus dorsi
muscle.
Poste- rior tho- racic.
Latis- simus in
of the axilla.
Another small nerve, posterior thoracic (external respiratory,
Bell) is now seen on the surface of the serratus muscle. It arises
above the clavicle (p. 69.) , from the fifth and sixth cervical nerves,
and descends behind the axillary artery to be distributed to the
serratus magnus, entering that surface of the muscle which is
towards the axilla.
The LATISSIMUS DORSI MUSCLE can now be observed as it
the fold forms part of the posterior fold of the axilla. Arising from
the trunk of the body, and crossing the lower angle of the
scapula, the muscle ascends to be inserted by a tendon into
Disposi- the bottom of the bicipital groove. The fibres have a cross
arrangement in their course to the tendon of insertion ; for fibres. whilst those that are attached to the lower ribs ascend to
tion of its
THE WALL OF THE THORAX. 229
the upper edge of the tendon, those from the spines of
the dorsal vertebræ descend to its lower edge. Thus the
fibres produce a hollow or groove, which lodges the lower
border of the scapula and the teres major muscle.
Dissection. ―
tion of
ratus.
Cut across the nerves of the brachial plexus below Dissec
the first rib, and draw the arm from the trunk so as to separate the serthe scapula from the thorax. The serratus muscle, which is now
seen to pass from the chest to the base of the scapula, will be exposed by the removal of cellular structure.
A middle
muscle
ed to the
scapula,
fibres
form
parts.
The SERRATUS MAGNUS MUSCLE extends between the base Serratus
of the scapula and the thorax. It arises by eight or nine is attachpointed digitations from as many of the upper ribs ; and it ribs and
is inserted into the angles and the base of the scapula. From
the difference in the direction of its fibres, the muscle appears
to consist of three parts. The upper part is attached on the and its
one side to the first two ribs and to an aponeurotic arch seemto
between them ; and on the other side to an impression on the three
ventral surface of the upper angle of the scapula.
part, which is very thin, extends from the second, third, and
fourth ribs to the base of the shoulder bone. And a lower part,
which is the strongest, is connected internally with four ribs
(fifth, sixth, seventh, and eighth), digitating with processes
of origin ofthe external oblique muscle ; and externally it
is fixed into the rough surface of bone on the costal aspect
of the lower angle of the scapula. The muscle is applied Connecagainst the ribs and the intercostal muscles, and is partly the musconcealed by the pectoral muscles and the axillary vessels.
and nerves in the ordinary position of the arm, the scapula
and the subscapularis muscle are in contact with it.
tions of
cle.
of the Dissection. - Detach the processes of origin of the serratus Dissecfrom the ribs, and preserve some of the lateral cutaneous nerves interof the thorax. Take the cellular membrane from the external
layer of the intercostal muscles, and define a thin aponeurosis that
is continued forwards from it to the sternum.
costal muscles.
costal
are two
The INTERCOSTAL MUSCLES are named from their position Interbetween the ribs. Their number and their extent are deter- muscles
mined by the intercostal spaces ; and they consist of two layers in
layers in each space, whose fibres cross. Those of the ex- space.
each
Q 3
230 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Outer layer
ternal muscle pass downwards and forwards, and those of the
internal layer have an opposite direction.
The external muscle is fixed to the outer margins of
the ribs of the corresponding space, and consists of fleshy
is defi- and tendinous fibres. Posteriorly the fibres are continuous
teriorly ; in direction with those of the levatores costarum muscles cient anand anteriorly they cease near the cartilages of the ribs, but
a thin aponeurosis continues the muscle onwards to the sterjoins num. In the lower spaces, the external muscle is continuoblique ous in front with the fibres of the external oblique muscle of
the abdomen.
external
below.
Dissec- tion .
Inner layer of the muscles defi- cient poste- riorly ;
Dissection. Cut through the external layer in one of the
spaces, say the second, where it is widest, and take it away to bring
into view the internal intercostal muscle, which will be recognised
by the difference in the direction of the fibres. Far back between
the two, and close to the rib above, the intercostal nerve and artery
will be found. A branch of the nerve to the surface (lateral
cutaneous of the thorax) should be followed through the external
layer of muscle, and the trunk of the nerve should be traced forward in one or more spaces to the sternum and the surface of the
thorax.
The internal intercostal muscle is attached to the inner
border of the ribs bounding the intercostal space. It begins
at the sternum, and ceases near the angle of the ribs. One
surface is covered by the external muscle and by the intercostal vessels and nerve ; and the opposite surface is in contact with the pleura. In the lower spaces, corresponding to
the false ribs, the fibres of the inner layer are continuous
oblique with those of the internal oblique muscle of the abdomen.
below. The intercostal muscles are exposed in part, both in the disjoins internal
Dissec- tion of
mam- mary
section of the back and in that of the thorax.
Dissection. -To bring into view the triangularis sterni muscle
internal and the internal mammary vessels, take away on the right side of
the body the greater part of the cartilage of each true rib, except
vessels . the first and seventh, but leave these untouched for the advantage
of the dissection of the abdomen and of the head and neck. Small
branches of arteries to each intercostal space and to the surface of
the thorax, as well as the intercostal nerves, are to be preserved.
The surface of the triangularis sterni will be made apparent by
removing the cellular membrane from it.
THE WALL OF THE THORAX. 231
laris
thorax
The TRIANGULARIS STERNI is a thin muscle which is placed Trianguinside the cavity of the thorax. It arises from the side of sterni
the xyphoid cartilage and the side of the sternum ; and its
fibres are directed outwards, the upper being most oblique,
to be inserted into the cartilages of the true ribs, except the is in the
last two and the first, and into aponeurotic bands in the in- and attervals between the ribs. The muscle is covered by thethe ribs .
ribs and the internal intercostal muscles, and by the internal
mammary vessels and the intercostal nerves. It lies on the Connecpleura ; its lower fibres are contiguous to those of the transversalis abdominis.
tached to
tions.
mamis a
clavian ;
The internal mammary artery is a branch of the subclavian, and Internal
enters the thorax beneath the cartilage of the first rib. It is con- mary
tinued through the thorax beneath the cartilages of the ribs, lying branch
about half an inch from the sternum, as far as the interval between ofsubthe sixth and seventh ; here it gives externally a large muscular
branch (musculo- phrenic), and then passing beneath the seventh courses
rib, enters the sheath ofthe rectus muscle of the wall of the abdo- thorax to
men. In this course in the chest the artery lies on the pleura and abdothe triangularis sterni, and it is crossed by the intercostal nerves.
It is accompanied by two veins and by a chain of lymphatic
glands. The following branches take origin in the thorax : -
through
men.
Branch- es
1. A small branch (comes nervi phrenici) arises as soon as the artery ofphrenic enters the chest, and descends to the diaphragm along the phrenic nerve. nerve,
2. A few small mediastinal branches are distributed to the remains medias- tinal,
of the thymus gland, the pericardium, and the triangularis sterni
muscle.
3. Two anterior intercostal branches turn outwards in each space, inter- ;
costal,
one being placed on the border of each costal cartilage, and terminate and
by anastomosing with the aortic intercostal arteries.
4. Perforating branches, one or two for each space, pierce the inter- perfora- ting nal intercostal and pectoral muscles, and are distributed on the surface branch- with the intercostal nerves. The lower branches supply the mamma of
the female.
es.
culo- phrenic
5. The musculo-phrenic branch courses outwards beneath the carti- Mus- lages of the seventh and eighth ribs, and enters the wall of the abdo- men by perforating the diaphragm. It supplies anterior branches to branch.
the lower intercostal spaces, and its termination will be seen in the dis- section of the abdominal wall.
Two veins accompany the artery, but they join into one veins.
Q 4
232 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Inter- costal
trunk, which opens into the superior vena cava ; whilst on
the left side they join the left brachio- cephalic vein.
The intercostal nerves are seen only in the anterior part
nerves ; of their extent. They are the anterior trunks of the dorsal
nerves, and are placed between the layers of the intercostal
course, muscles. About midway between the spine and the sternum,
each gives off the lateral cutaneous nerve of the thorax.
Diminished in size, the trunk is continued onwards, at first
in, and afterwards beneath the internal intercostal muscle, as
termina- far as the side of the sternum, where it ends as the anterior
branch- cutaneous nerve of the thorax. The intercostal nerves supply
branches to the intercostal muscles, and to the triangularis
sterni.
tion, and
es.
Inter- costal
are with the nerves,
branch
The aortic intercostal arteries, whilst in the wall of the
arteries thorax, lie with the nerves between the strata of intercostal
muscles, and nearer the upper than the lower rib of the conand tained space. About the mid point of the intercostal space
into two. the artery bifurcates : one branch follows the line of the
upper rib, and the other descends to the lower rib : both
anastomose anteriorly with the intercostal branches of the
internal mammary artery. A small cutaneous offset accompanies the lateral cutaneous nerve of the thorax.
At this stage the thorax and back
sected.
The dissector of the upper limb now waits the appointed
time for the examination of the thorax. Afterwards the
are dis- body is to be turned for the dissection of the back, and the
student is to proceed with the parts marked for him in that
chapter. When the back is finished, the student is to detach
the limb from the trunk by sawing the clavicle about the
middle, and cutting through the soft parts connected with
the scapula.
tion of
SECTION II.
SCAPULAR MUSCLES, VESSELS, NERVES, AND LIGAMENTS.
Dissec- Dissection. WHEN the limb is separated from the trunk it is
muscles. to be placed with the subscapularis uppermost, and the different
muscles that have been dissected are to be traced to their insertion
into the scapula, a small part of each (about an inch) being left.
SCAPULAR MUSCLES. 233
The borders and the angles of the scapula have the fol- Muscles
lowing muscles attached to them : —
inserted
margins
scapula ;
The upper margin of the scapula has one muscle, the into the
omo-hyoid, attached to it. At its origin that muscle is about of the
half an inch wide, and is connected to the edge of the bone
behind the notch, but sometimes to the ligament (posterior
proper) which converts the notch into a foramen. The
lower margin, or costa, gives origin to the long head of
the triceps, and to some fibres of the teres major ; but
these statements will be verified in the progress of the dissection.
base ;
The base of the bone has many muscles inserted into it. into the
Between the superior angle and the spine, the levator anguli
scapulae is inserted . The rhomboideus minor is fixed to a part
of the bone opposite the spine, and the rhomboideus major
is inserted between the spine and the inferior angle : the
upper fibres of the last muscle often end in an aponeurotic
arch, which is connected to the bone by an expansion. Internal to these muscles, and inserted into the whole extent
of the base of the scapula, is the serratus magnus muscle.
angles
bone.
On the angles of the scapula the fibres of the serratus into the
magnus are collected in this way : the highest fibres are fixed of the
to the under surface of the upper angle, and the lower fibres
are inserted into an impression on that aspect of the lower
angle. On the outer surface of the inferior angle is the teres
major, which will be subsequently seen. The insertion
of the small pectoral muscle into the coracoid process may
likewise be now examined.
- tion.
Dissection. After the serratus is separated from the subsca- Dissecpularis, let the student observe a thin fascia that belongs to the last
muscle, and is fixed to the bone around its margins. Remove
this fascia and follow forwards the muscle to its insertion into the
humerus. Clean next the axillary vessels and nerves.
hollow of
The SUBSCAPULARIS MUSCLE, as the name expresses, is Subsca- pularis concealed by the scapula, when the limb is in its natural position. The muscle arises from all the concave surface of fills the
the ventral aspect of the scapula, being connected to the scapula ;
ridges of the bone by tendinous processes ; and is inserted is inby a tendon into the small tuberosity of the humerus, and into
serted
234 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
rus .
tions.
hume- by fleshy fibres into the neck of the bone below that process.
Connec- By one surface the muscle bounds the axilla, and is in contact with the axillary vessels and nerves, and the serratus
magnus. By the other, it rests against the scapula and the
shoulder joint. The lower border projects much beyond the
bone, and comes into contact with the latissimus dorsi and
the long head of the triceps : here it is contiguous to the teres
major. Along this border is the subscapular artery giving
backwards its dorsal branch.
Dissec- tion .
Small infraartery.
Dissection. Separate the subscapular muscle from the bone,
noticing the tendinous processes of origin, and observing that the
tendon of insertion is inseparably united with the capsule of the
shoulder joint. Between the tendon and the root of the coracoid
process is a bursa, which communicates with the shoulder joint.
A small arterial anastomosis on the ventral surface of the bone is
likewise to be dissected out.
The infrascapular artery, ramifying on the ventral surface of
scapular the scapula, is an offset of the dorsal branch of the subscapular
artery. It enters beneath the subscapular muscle, and forms an
anastomosis with small twigs of the supra- and posterior scapular
branches.
Dissec- tion of the shoul- der.
Cuta- neous nerves of the shoul- der.
Dissec- tion of
Dissection. – Turn over the scapula, and place a block between
it and the arm, which is of sufficient height to allow the shoulder
to be made prominent. Remove the skin from the prominence of
the shoulder, beginning in front, and seek some small cutaneous
nerves that lie in the fat. Some of these descend from above, and
others come to the surface about half way down the posterior
border ofthe deltoid muscle.
Branches of nerves, supra-acromial, descend to the surface of
the shoulder from the cervical plexus. A cutaneous branch of the
circumflex nerve turns forward from beneath the posterior border
of the deltoid, and supplies the integument covering the lower two
thirds of that muscle.
Dissection.
- Take the fascia from the deltoid muscle, its fibres
Beginning at the anterior edge of
carry the knife upwards and downdeltoid being made tense at the time.
muscle. the muscle, the dissector is to
wards in the direction of the fibres, in order to clean more easily
the coarse, rough, muscular fasciculi.
may be removed from the back of the
At the same time the fascia
scapula, so as to expose the
teres major and a part of the infraspinatus muscle.
Deltoid The DELTOID MUSCLE is triangular in form, and has its muscle.
SCAPULAR VESSELS. 235
tion .
base at the scapula and the clavicle, and its apex at the humerus. It arises from all the lower edge of the spine of the Origin.
scapula, from the acromion, and from the outer half or third
of the clavicle. Its fibres converge to a tendon, which is in- Inserserted into an impression on the outer surface of the humerus, about the middle. The anterior border is contiguous to Adjacent
the pectoralis major muscle and the cephalic vein ; and the
posterior rests on the infraspinatus and triceps muscles.
The origin of the muscle corresponds to the extent of the
attachment of the trapezius to the same bones, and the insertion has a fasciculus of the brachialis anticus on each side
of it.
-
parts.
tion to Dissection. - Cut across the deltoid near its origin, and throw Dissecit down as much as the circumflex vessels and nerve will permit. detach Take the cellular membrane from the vessels and the nerve ; also deltoid.
remove the remains of a bursa between the muscle and the head of
the humerus. The tendon of insertion may be seen to be united
with that of the pectoralis major.
covered
deltoid.
The deltoid conceals the head and the upper part of the Parts
humerus, and the parts of the teres minor, infraspinatus, by the
and supraspinatus muscles that are fixed to the great tuberosity of that bone. Below the head of the bone are the
circumflex vessels and nerve, and the upper part of the biceps
muscle ; and in front of the humerus is the coracoid process
with its muscles. A large bursa intervenes between the
convex head of the bone and the under surface of the deltoid
muscle.
-
tion of circum- flex ves- sels.
Dissection. Follow back the circumflex vessels and nerve, Dissecthrough a space between the humerus and the long head of the
triceps, to their origin from the axillary trunks. In taking the fat
from this space be careful of a branch of nerve to the teres minor
muscle. Arching backwards, in front of the neck of the humerus,
is the small anterior circumflex artery.
cumflex;
The circumflex arteries are the last branches of the axil- Two cirlary trunk, and arise near its termination. They are two arteries
in number, and are named anterior and posterior from their
position on the neck of the humerus.
and a. The anterior branch is a small artery that courses transversely anterior
outwards beneath the coraco-brachialis and biceps muscles, and
236 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
poste- rior.
One cir- cumflex nerve
has cuanastomoses in front of the humerus with branches of the posterior
circumflex. As it crosses the bicipital groove it gives off a branch
which ascends in that hollow to the articulation and the head of the
humerus.
b. The posterior circumflex artery is larger in size, and arises
opposite the border of the subscapular muscle. It winds backwards through a space between the humerus and the long head of
the triceps, and is chiefly distributed to the deltoid muscle, in which
it anastomoses with the acromial thoracic artery. Branches are
given from it to the head of the humerus and the shoulder joint,
and others anastomose with the anterior circumflex artery. It
supplies branches likewise to the teres minor and the long head
ofthe triceps.
The circumflex nerve, at its origin (p. 227.) , is placed beneath the axillary artery, and leaves the axilla by turning
round the border of the subscapular muscle, with the artery
of the same name. Behind the neck of the humerus the nerve
divides into two parts that supply the surrounding muscles,
the integuments, and the shoulder joint :
One branch of division turns forwards beneath the deltoid taneous, muscle nearly to the front, and ends in the muscle, with the excepmuscu- tion of one or two cutaneous filaments that pierce the fibres. The lar, and other gives a branch to the teres minor muscle, which is remarkable in having a gangliform swelling on it ; and this division, after
supplying the posterior part of the deltoid becomes cutaneous over
articular the muscle (p. 234.) . Before the circumflex nerve bifurcates it gives
es. an articular filament to the under part of the shoulder joint.
branchInfra- spinatus
arises from
that name ;
The INFRASPINATUS MUSCLE occupies the infraspinal
muscle fossa of the scapula, and extends to the head of the humerus. The muscle arises from all the infraspinal fossa of the
fossa of scapula, except at the neck of the bone; from the lower side
of the spine of that bone, and from the fascia that covers
the surface. Its fibres converge to a tendon, which is
inserted into the middle impression on the great tuberosity of the humerus, joining with the tendons of the suprais partly spinatus and teres minor muscles. The greater part of the
muscle is subcutaneous, and the fibres that arise from the
spine of the scapula overlay the others : the upper part is
concealed by the deltoid, and the lower end, by the latissimus
dorsi. The lower border is parallel to the teres minor, with
Inser- tion .
covered by del- toid.
Other
SCAPULAR MUSCLES. 237
tions . which it is sometimes united. The muscle lies on the sca- connecpula and the humero- scapular articulation.
minor is
of the
The TERES MINOR is a narrow fleshy slip which is often Teres
inseparably united with the preceding muscle, along whose on back
lower border it lies. It arises on the dorsum of the scapula, scapula.
from a surface between the inferior costa and the part of the
bone that gives origin to the infraspinatus muscle ; and it
is inserted by a tendon into the lowest of the three marks Inseron the great tuberosity of the humerus, and by fleshy fibres the
into the humerus below that spot. This muscle is partly
covered by the deltoid ; and it rests on the long head of the Parts
triceps and the shoulder joint. Underneath it the dorsal it.
branch of the subscapular artery turns.
tion with
former.
around
major
from
angle of
humeAt Adjacent
The TERES MAJOR muscle is extended from the inferior Teres
angle ofthe scapula to the humerus. Its origin is from the reaches
rough surface on the dorsum of the scapula near the infe- lower
rior angle, and from the inferior costa of the bone for some scapula
distance. The fibres end in a tendon which is inserted into to the
the inner edge of the bicipital groove of the humerus. This rus.
muscle forms part of the posterior fold of the axilla, and has
the axillary vessels and nerves on it near the humerus.
its origin it is covered by the latissimus dorsi .
border is contiguous to the subscapularis muscle, and the
lower is received into a hollow formed by the fibres of the
latissimus dorsi . Near the humerus the tendon of the muscle
lies behind that of the latissimus, and the two are separated
by a bursa : an expansion is sent from these tendons to the
fascia of the arm.
The upper muscles.
spaces
the
head of
triceps.
Anterior
Below the scapula (inferior costa) where the teres muscles Two
separate from one another, is a triangular interval, which between
is bounded in front by the shaft of the humerus, and above teres and
and below by the teres muscles. This space is divided the
into two by the long head of the triceps. Through the anterior part, which is of a quadrilateral shape, the posterior
circumflex artery and the circumflex nerve pass to the
outer side of the limb ; and through the posterior smaller
part, the dorsal branch of the subscapular artery turns to its
distribution.
and pos.
terior.
238 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Dissec- tion of Dissection. Examine next the special ligaments of the scapula
liga- and those uniting the clavicle with the scapula, in order that the
mentsof acromion process may be sawn through to expose the supra- vicle spinatus muscle. These ligaments will be recognised by removing
the cellular membrane in the spots now specified. One ligament
(coraco- clavicular) passes from the coracoid process to the under
part of the clavicle. A capsular ligament, connecting the outer
end of the clavicle with the acromion, will be seen by taking away
and sca- the fibres of the trapezius and deltoid muscles. Another strong
band ( coraco- acromial) passes transversely between the acromion
and the coracoid process ; and lastly a small fasciculus (posterior
proper ligament) will be found over the notch in the superior
pula.
Union of the clacosta.
LIGAMENTS OF THE CLAVICLE AND SCAPULA. The
vicle and clavicle is connected to the scapula by a distinct articulation with the acromion, and by a strong ligament (coracoclavicular) between it and the coracoid process.
scapula.
Coraco- clavicu- lar,
has a
The anThe coraco-clavicular ligament consists of two parts, each
having a different direction and designation. The posterior
conical part, called conoid from its shape, is fixed by its apex to the
posterior part of the coracoid process, and by its base to
the tubercle on the under surface of the clavicle.
terior part, trapezoid ligament, is external to the conoid
piece : it is connected inferiorly to the inner border of the
coracoid process, and superiorly to the line on the under surface of the clavicle, extending towards the outer end of the
bone. The two parts of the ligament are united posteriorly,
but are separated by an interval in front.
and a
square piece.
Joint with the acro- mion,
and inbands,
fibroAcromio-clavicular articulation. - The articular surfaces
of the clavicle and acromion process of the scapula, are retained in contact by some scattered fibres, which form a kind
superior of capsule for the joint. Some of the fibres are thicker above
ferior and below, constituting a superior and an inferior ligament.
An inter-articularfibro-cartilage is generally found between carti- the bones at the upper part of the joint ; but sometimes it
forms a complete interarticular septum. If the fibro- carand sy- tilage is perfect, there are two synovial membranes ; if it is
imperfect, there is only one present in the joint. The joint
should be opened to see the cartilage and the synovial
membrane.
lage,
novial sac.
SCAPULAR LIGAMENTS. 239
ments of The SPECIAL LIGAMENTS of the scapula are two in num- Ligaber, anterior and posterior, and extend from one part to scapula.
another of the bone.
rior and a. The posterior ligament is a round fasciculus of fibres Posteacross the notch in the upper costa of the scapula. By one
end it is attached to the base of the coracoid process, and
by the other to the costa behind the notch. It converts
the notch into a foramen, through which the suprascapular
nerve passes.
b. The anterior ligament extends transversely between anterior.
the acromion and the coracoid process. Externally it is inserted by a pointed process into the front of the acromion ;
and internally it widens, and is attached to the outer border
of the coracoid process. This ligament overhangs the This is
shoulder joint ; it usually consists of two thick bands, an- of two
terior and posterior, with a thin intervening part.
-
A
formed
tion.
pieces.
Dissection. Saw through the acromion process, and remove it Dissecwith the outer end of the clavicle. The supraspinatus muscle
will come into view on the removal of a strong fascia that covers it.
name ;
The SUPRASPINATUS MUSCLE has the same form as the Supra- spinatus hollow of the bone that it fills. It arises from all the sur- fills the hollow
face of bone in the supraspinal fossa of the scapula, except of that
near the neck ; from the upper side of the spine of that
bone, and from the fascia covering the surface. Its fibres
end in a tendon that crosses over the shoulder joint, and is
inserted into the upper impression on the great tuberosity of is inthe humerus. The muscle is concealed by the trapezius and into huthe acromion process ; and it rests upon the scapula, the Connecshoulder joint, and the suprascapular vessels and nerve.
An expansion from the tendon joins the insertion of the
infraspinatus.
serted
merus.
tions.
tion of Dissection. Separate the supra and infraspinatus muscles from Dissecthe bone to trace the vessels and nerves. In the supraspinal fossa supra- scapular will be seen the suprascapular vessels and nerve, which are to be vessels.
followed beneath the acromion to the infraspinal fossa. Entering
the infraspinal fossa, beneath the teres minor muscle, is the dorsal branch of the subscapular artery. The anastomosis between
the vessels is to be cleaned.
43
240 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Supra- scapular artery
The suprascapular artery is derived from the subclavian trunk,
and is one of the branches into which the thyroid axis subdivides (p. 66.) . After a course in the neck it crosses over the
ligament of the superior costa, and enters beneath the supraspinatus muscle. It now furnishes a supraspinal branch for the
supply of that muscle, the bone, and the shoulder joint ; and it ends
in the infraspinal fossa, where it furnishes offsets to the infrain infra- spinatus muscle and the scapula, and anastomoses with the posterior scapular and the dorsal branch of the subscapular artery.
gives a
supra- spinal branch,
and ends
spinatus.
Vein.
Supranerve
cular
The companion vein of the suprascapular artery joins the
external jugular vein.
The suprascapular nerve is a branch of the brachial plexus scapular (p. 69.). When it reaches the costa of the scapula, it enters the
has mus- supraspinal fossa beneath the posterior proper ligament. In that
branches fossa it supplies two branches to the supraspinatus ; and the
tery, nerve is then continued, beneath a fibrous band, to the infraspiand ar- natus muscle, in which it ends. The nerve gives some articular
filaments to the shoulder joint, and other offsets to the scapula.
like articular.
Dorsal branch of subartery .
The dorsal branch of the subscapular artery turns backwards
below the inferior costa of the scapula, through the posterior of
scapular the two spaces between the teres muscles. Entering the infraspinal
fossa, beneath the teres minor, it supplies that muscle and the infra-spinatus, and anastomoses with the ending of the suprascapular
artery. This artery sends a branch on the dorsum of the scapula,
between the teres muscles, towards the inferior angle of that
bone, where it anastomoses with the posterior scapular artery.
the skin .
SECTION III.
THE ARM.
Position, Dissection. — FOR the dissection of the anterior part of the arm
and inci- let the limb lie flat with the front uppermost. Make then an incisions in sion in the skin, along the centre of the biceps, as far as two inches
below the elbow joint. At the termination of this first cut make
a second, half round the fore- arm, and raise the skin from the front
and back of the arm. The fat or the superficial fascia, which
contains the cutaneous vessels and nerves, comes into view on the
removal of the skin. Between the skin and the prominence ofthe
olecranon is a large bursa.
Seek superfi- cial veins.
Seek now the cutaneous veins in the fat. These vessels are
very numerous below the bend of the elbow, and issue from beneath the integument. In the centre of the fore-arm is the
median vein, which bifurcates rather below the elbow. Exter-
FRONT OF THE ARM. 241
nal to this is a small vein (radial) ; and internal to it are the anterior and posterior ulnar veins coming from the front and back of the fore-arm. In the arm these veins are united into two ; one
(basilic) is to be followed along the inner border of the biceps,
and the other (cephalic) along the outer side of the muscle.
cutane- ous nerves
inner
the
Next expose and trace onwards the cutaneous nerves. On the Trace
onter side ofthe arm, about its middle, are the external cutaneous
branches (two in number) of the musculo-spiral ; and in the outer of outer
bicipital groove, in front of the elbow or rather below it, is the side
cutaneous part of the musculo- cutaneous nerve. On the inner and
part of the limb the nerves of the surface are more numerous. side of
Taking the basilic vein as a guide, the internal cutaneous nerve of limb.
the fore-arm will be found by its side, about the middle of the arm ;
and rather external to this nerve is a small cutaneous offset from it,
which pierces the fascia higher up. Behind the internal cutaneous,
in the lower third of the arm, is the small nerve of Wrisberg ; and
in the upper third are the small nerves that have been already
exposed in the dissection of the axilla, viz. the intercosto- humeral
and internal cutaneous of the musculo- spiral.
ficial fat.
The superficial fascia is thicker in front of the elbow Superthan in the other parts of the arm. Here it may be divided
into two layers, which enclose the superficial vessels and
lymphatics.
―
taneous CUTANEOUS VEINS. The position and the connections The cuof the several superficial veins in front of the elbow are to veins are
be attentively noted by the dissector, because the operation
ofvenesection is commonly practised on one of them.
vein ;
branches
The median vein of the fore-arm divides into two branches median
(internal and external) , rather below the bend of the elbow,
and at its point of division it is joined by a branch from a
deep vein. The internal branch (median basilic) crosses to its two
the inner border of the biceps, and unites with the ulnar of diviveins to form the basilic vein of the inner side of the arm.
The external branch (median cephalic) is usually longer than
the other, and by its union with the radial vein gives rise to
the cephalic vein.
sion.
vein on
side of
The basilic vein, commencing near the inner condyle of Basilic
the humerus in the manner before said, ascends near the inner
inner border of the biceps muscle to the middle of the arm, the arm.
where it passes beneath the deep fascia, and becomes the
R
242 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Cephalic vein at
side of
and conof mephalic,
and of
axillary vein. In this course it lies over, or to the inner side
of the brachial artery.
it.
The cephalic vein is chiefly derived from the external
outer branch of the median, for the radial vein is oftentimes very
the arm. small. It is continued to the shoulder along the outer side
of the biceps, and sinks between the deltoid and pectoral
muscles to open into the axillary vein, near the clavicle.
Position Branches ofthe median vein. — The median cephalic vein
nections is directed obliquely outwards, and lies over the hollow bedian ce- tween the biceps, and the outer mass of muscles of the forearm . Beneath it is the musculo-cutaneous nerve. This
vein is altogether removed from the brachial artery, and is
generally smaller than the median basilic vein. If opened with
a lancet, it does not yield much blood in consequence of its
sinking between the muscles, and the inability to compress
The median basilic vein is usually more horizontal
dian ba- in direction than the preceding, and crosses the brachial
artery in its course to the inner side of the arm. It is larger
than the corresponding vein of the outer side of the arm,
and is firmly supported by the fascia beneath. Branches of
the internal cutaneous nerve lie beneath it, and some small
twigs of the same nerve are generally placed over it. Only
the aponeurosis of the arm, strengthened by fibres from the
tendon of the biceps, intervenes between the vein and the
brachial vessels. The median basilic is the vein commonly
selected for the operation of bloodletting, by reason of its
this size and superficial position, and the facility with which it
may be compressed. But from the close proximity of the
vein to the brachial vessels, the spot chosen for venesection
should not be immediately over the line of the artery.
the me-`
silic vein.
Vene- section is prac- tised in
branch.
Super- ficial
tics.
The superficial lymphatics of the arm lie for the most part along
lympha- the basilic vein, and open into the glands of the axilla. A few
lymphatics accompany also the cephalic vein, and passing between
the pectoral and deltoid muscles, end as the others in the axillary
glands. A lymphatic gland is commonly found as low as the
elbow, where it lies in front ofthe inner condyle of the humerus.
The su perficial nerves
CUTANEOUS NERVES. The superficial nerves of the arm
appear on the inner and outer sides, and spread therefrom
FRONT OF THE ARM. 243
rived
brachial
except
to cover the circumference of the limb. All with one ex- are deception (intercosto-humeral) are derived from the brachial from
plexus, either as distinct branches, or as offsets of other plexus,
branches. On the outer side of the limb are branches of the one.
musculo-spiral and musculo-cutaneous nerves ; and on the
inner side are two internal cutaneous nerves (large and
small), a third from the musculo- spiral, together with the
intercosto-humeral nerve.
-
ternal
of musspiral,
EXTERNAL CUTANEOUS NERVES. - The external cutaneous Two exbranches of the musculo - spiral nerve are two in number. The upper cutaone turns forwards with the cephalic vein, and reaches to the front nous of the elbow, supplying the anterior part of the arm. The lower culopierces the fascia somewhat lower down, viz. about the middle of
the outer surface of the arm, and after supplying some cutaneous
filaments to that part of the limb, is continued to the fore- arm.
The cutaneous part of the musculo- cutaneous nerve pierces the and one
fascia in front of the elbow, and at the outer side of the tendon of culo- cuthe biceps muscle. It lies beneath the median cephalic vein, and
divides into branches for the fore- arm.
of mustaneous.
cutabrachial
INTERNAL CUTANEOUS NERVES. -The larger internal cutaneous Two ianerve perforates the fascia in two parts, or as one trunk that termal
divides almost directly into two. The external division lies be- neous of
neath the median basilic vein, and is directed to the front of the plexus.
fore-arm ; but the internal branch winds to the back of the fore- Large
arm, over the prominence of the inner condyle of the humerus.
A cutaneous offset of this nerve pierces the fascia near the axilla, and
reaches as far, or nearly as far as the elbow : it supplies the integuments over the inner part of the biceps muscle.
small.
The small internal cutaneous nerve (Wrisberg) appears below the and
preceding, and extends to the interval between the olecranon and
the inner condyle of the humerus, where it ends in filaments over
the back of the olecranon. The nerve gives offsets to the posterior
surface of the lower third of the arm, and joins above the elbow
the inner division of the larger internal cutaneous nerve.
The internal cutaneous branch of the musculo- spiral nerve, after Cutait becomes subcutaneous (in the upper third) , winds to the back of musculo- neous of
the arm, and extends nearly as far as the olecranon.
spiral.
humeral.
The intercosto-humeral branch of the second intercostal nerve Inter
(p. 217.) perforates the fascia near the axilla, and furnishes fila- costoments to the inner side and posterior surface of the arm, in the
upper half. But the size, and even the distribution of the nerve,
R 2
244 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Deep fascia of
will depend upon the extent and development of the small internal
cutaneous and the offset of the musculo- spiral nerve.
The aponeurosis of the arm is a white shining membrane
the arm that envelops the limb, and sends inwards processes between
the muscles. Over the biceps muscle it is thinner than
elsewhere. At certain points it receives accessory fibres
from the subjacent tendons : thus in front of the elbow
is an offset from the tendon of the biceps, and near the
axilla the tendons of the pectoralis major, latissimus dorsi,
and teres, send prolongations to the fascia. At the upper
part of the limb the fascia is continuous with that of the
axilla, and is prolonged over the deltoid and pectoral muscles
to the scapula and the clavicle. Inferiorly it is continued to
muscu- the fore-arm, and is connected to the prominences of bone
around the elbow joint, especially to the condyloid ridges of
the humerus. Its attachments to those lines of the humerus
give rise to the two intermuscular septa of the arm.
forms interlar septa .
Dissec- tion of Dissection. -
Replace the skin on the back of the arm until the
front is dissected. The limb is to be raised by means of a small cles. block beneath the scapula, and its inner surface is to be placed the musPosition ofthe muscles ofthe arm .
Biceps
towards the dissector. Tie then the vessels and nerves to the
coracoid process, and fix the scapula in such a position as to
render tense the muscles. Make an incision through the aponeurosis, along the centre of the arm, and remove it on the outer side
as far as the line of the humerus leading to the outer condyle, but
on the inner side rather farther back than the corresponding line,
so as to expose part of the triceps muscle. Carry the knife in the
direction of the fibres of the biceps muscle, and be careful not to
displace the brachial artery and the nerves that are with it.
Muscles on the front of the arm. The most prominent
muscle along the centre of the arm is the biceps ; and lying
to its inner side, for about half way down, is the coracobrachialis muscle. The brachialis anticus muscle is beneath
the biceps. Some muscles of the fore-arm are connected to
the outer and inner condyles of the humerus, as well as to
the line above the outer condyle.
The BICEPS MUSCLE forms the prominence observable on has a the front of the arm. It is wider at the middle than at short and long head. either end, and the upper part of the muscle consists of two
FRONT OF THE ARM. 245
from the
into raex- dius.
Parts by covering
pieces or heads of different lengths. The short head arises Origin
from the apex of the coracoid process in common with the scapula.
coraco-brachialis muscle ; and the long head, which is tendinous, is attached to the upper part of the glenoid cavity of
the scapula. About the middle of the arm, these two parts
become blended in one fleshy mass, which is somewhat flattened, and is inserted by a tendon into the radius behind the Insertion
tubercle. The muscle is superficial except at the
tremities. At its upper part the biceps is concealed
the pectoralis major and deltoid muscles, and at the lower
part the tendon dips into the hollow in front of the elbow,
after having given an offset to the fascia of the arm.
neath the biceps are the brachialis anticus muscle, the musculo-cutaneous nerve, and the upper part of the humerus.
The inner border is the guide to the brachial artery, below Inner
the middle of the humerus, but above that spot the coraco- guide to
brachialis muscle intervenes between it and the vessel. The tery.
connection of the long head of the biceps with the shoulder
joint, and the insertion of the muscle into the radius will be
afterwards dissected.
Be- and be- neath it.
border is
the arbrachia- lis is named
attachtions of
The CORACO-BRACHIALIS is a muscle of a roundish form, Coracoand is named from its bony attachments. Its origin is fleshy
from the tip of the coracoid process, and its insertion is con- from the
nected with a rough surface on the inner side of the hume- ments.
rus, about opposite the attachment of the deltoid muscle on
the opposite side. Part of the muscle is beneath the pecto- Connecralis major, and forms a prominence in the axilla, but the rest suris superficial, except at the insertion . Perforating it is the ing
musculo-cutaneous nerve, and on the tendon of insertion the
brachial artery lies. Along the inner border is the large
artery of the limb with its nerves. The coraco-brachialis
conceals the subscapular muscle, the anterior circumflex
artery, and the tendons of the latissimus and teres.
roundparts.
artery
to elbow.
The BRACHIAL ARTERY is a continuation of the axillary Brachial
trunk, and supplies vessels to the upper limb. It begins at extends
the lower border of the teres major muscle, and ends rather
below the bend of the elbow in branches ( radial and ulnar)
for the fore-arm.
In the upper part of its extent the vessel is internal to the Position to bone,
R 3
246 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
tuation in the limb.
tions
muscles and fasciæ,
and si- humerus, but afterwards it is in front of that bone ; and its
situation is indicated on the surface by the depression along
the inner border of the biceps and coraco-brachialis muscles.
Connec- In its course the brachial artery is superficial, and is covered
with only by the integuments and the deep fascia, except at the
bend of the elbow, where it is crossed by the median basilic
vein and the prolongation from the tendon of the biceps.
To the outer side of the vessel are the coraco-brachialis and
biceps muscles, the latter somewhat overlapping it in the
lower part of the arm. Posteriorly, the artery is in contact
with the following muscles : thus, whilst it is inside the humerus it rests on the long head of the triceps and on the
inner head of the same muscle ; but when the vessel is placed
in front of the bone, it lies on the insertion of the coracobrachialis and on the brachialis anticus.
with vessels
nerves.
Venæ comites lie on the sides of the artery, encircling
it with branches ; and the basilic vein is over the line of the
artery in the lower half of the arm, but separated from it by
and with fascia. The nerves in relation with the artery are the following :-The internal cutaneous is in contact with the
vessel until it has perforated the fascia about the middle of the arm. The ulnar nerve lies to the inner side as far as
the insertion of the coraco-brachialis muscle ; and the musculo- spiral is behind the artery for a distance of about two
inches. The median nerve is close to the artery in all its
course, but alters its position in this way -as low as the
insertion of the coraco-brachialis the nerve is on the outer
side, but it then crosses obliquely either over or under the
artery, and is placed internal to that vessel about two inches
above the elbow joint.
Its branches are,
superior profun- da,
Branches spring both externally and internally from the
brachial artery. Those on the outer side are muscular, and
supply the coraco -brachialis and biceps ; those on the inner
side are named superior and inferior profunda, anastomotic,
and nutritious arteries.
1. The superior profunda branch is larger than the others, and
leaves the artery near the lower border of the tendon of the teres
major ; it winds backwards with the musculo-spiral nerve to the
triceps muscle, and will be dissected with the back of the arm.
FRONT OF THE ARM. 247
funda,
2. The inferior profunda branch arises opposite the coraco- inferior
brachialis muscle, and accompanies the ulnar nerve to the interval Prod
between the olecranon and the inner condyle of the humerus. In
the spot mentioned it anastomoses with the posterior ulnar recurrent and anastomotic branches, and supplies the triceps. It often
arises in common with the superior profunda artery.
of the 3. The nutritious artery is given off near the preceding branch, nutrient
and enters the nutrient canal about the middle of the humerus, bone,
to be distributed to the osseous substance and the membrane lining
the medullary canal.
4. The anastomotic branch arises from one to two inches above andanas- tomotic.
the elbow, and its course is transversely inwards through the intermuscular septum to the hollow between the olecranon and the
inner condyle of the humerus. Here the artery inosculates with
the inferior profunda and the posterior ulnar recurrent branch,
and gives some branches to the triceps muscle, —one forming an
arch across the back of the humerus, with a branch of the superior profunda, near the articulation of the elbow. The anastomotic branch likewise sends an offset in front of the elbow joint,
which joins with the anterior ulnar recurrent, and supplies the
pronator teres muscle.
The end in brachial veins are placed along the artery, one on Veins
each side, and have branches of communication across that the axillary .
vessel ; they receive small veins corresponding to the branches
of the arteries. Superiorly they join the axillary vein near
the subscapular muscle.
tions in Peculiarities of the brachial artery. —In the lower half of the arm the Deviabrachial trunk may leave the inner border of the biceps muscle, and be position,
directed along the inner intermuscular septum, with the median nerve, to
the inner condyle of the humerus. In that case the vessel gains its usual
position in front of the elbow by passing beneath or through some fibres of the pronator teres. Its division into the arteries of the fore- division,
arm may take place at any point between the axilla and the common
one at the elbow. In a high division the resulting arteries lie usually close
together, but one (the ulnar, or the trunk common to the ulnar and the
interosseous) may sometimes deviate to the inner side with the median
nerve, like the trunk of the brachial artery. In addition, the brachial parts covering artery may be covered by a slip of muscular fibres of either the biceps the
or brachialis anticus. Occasionally there are long slender vessels ( " vasa and its
aberrantia") which connect the brachial trunk with the radial or the
ulnar artery ofthe fore-arm.
vessel
branch- es .
R 4
248 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Median nerve in The median nerve arises from the brachial plexus by two
the arm roots, one from the outer, and the other from the inner cord is with the ar- tery ;
of the plexus (p. 227.). Commencing on the outer side of
the humeral artery, the nerve crosses over or under the
vessel about the middle of the arm, and is found on the inner
has not side a little above the elbow. It does not give any branch
branch in the arm, but there may be a fasciculus connecting it with the musculo-cutaneous nerve. Its connections with muscles
are the same as those of the artery.
any
in the arm .
Ulnar nerve
its direc- tion.
The ulnar nerve is derived from the inner cord of the
changes brachial plexus, and lies close to the inner side of the axillary, and of the brachial artery as far as the insertion of the
coraco-brachialis. In the remainder of the arm it is directed
inwards through the inner intermuscular septum, and then
descends, almost surrounded by the muscular fibres of the
triceps, to the interval between the olecranon and the inner
condyle. There is not any branch given from this nerve
till it reaches the elbow joint, but a branch to the triceps
muscle from the musculo-spiral accompanies it in the lower
part of its course.
Is with out
branch as far as the elbow.
Internal cutanerve
the
The internal cutaneous nerve is to be studied in that small
neous part of its extent which is beneath the fascia of the limb.
beneath Arising from the inner cord of the plexus, it is at first infascia. ternal, and then becomes superficial to the artery of the
limb as far as the middle of the arm, where it divides into
two branches that perforate the investing fascia (p. 243.).
Near the axilla it furnishes the small cutaneous offset to the
integuments of the arm, which pierces the fascia higher than
the trunk of the nerve (p. 243.).
Wris- berg
Nerve of The small internal cutaneous nerve ( nerve of Wrisberg *)
arises with the preceding, and is concealed at first by the
axillary vein. It is directed inwards, either beneath or
through the vein, and joins with the intercosto-humeral
nerve Afterwards it lies along the inner part of the arm, .
* An account of the discovery and distribution of this nerve is given by Klint. See a paper in Ludwig's " Scriptores Nevrologici Minores," tom. iii. " De Nervis Brachii. "
FRONT OF THE ARM. 249
as far as the middle, where it perforates the fascia to end in beneath
the integument (p. 243. ).
the fascia.
lo-cutanerve in
The musculo-cutaneous nerve (nerv. perforans, Casserii) Musculeaves the outer cord of the plexus at the lower border neous
of the pectoralis minor. It perforates directly the coraco- the arm.
brachialis, and is directed obliquely to the outer side of the
arm, between the biceps and the brachialis anticus muscle.
Near the elbow the continuation of the nerve has been seen
to become a cutaneous nerve of the fore-arm.
cular
es.
This nerve furnishes branches to the muscles in front of the Its mushumerus, viz. to the coraco- brachialis, as it passes through the branchfibres, and to the biceps and coraco- brachialis muscles, where it
lies between them. Before perforating the coraco- brachialis, the
nerve gives a separate twig to that muscle and the short head of
the biceps ; and sometimes there is a large branch of communication with the median nerve after it pierces the muscle.
www.com tion. Dissection. Cut through the tendon of the biceps near the Dissecelbow, turn upwards the muscle, and remove any cellular membrane that may obscure the brachialis anticus muscle beneath.
The extent laterally of this last muscle should be defined ; when
this is done, the brachialis will be found to reach the intermuscular
septum only on the outer side.
lis antition.
The BRACHIALIS ANTICUS covers the lower half of the Brachiafront of the humerus, and arises from all that surface of the cus.
bone below the insertion of the deltoid muscle, except near Origin.
the elbow joint, and slightly at the outer side : moreover, it
receives fibres from the inner intermuscular septum and
from the capsule of the joint. The fleshy fibres converge to
a tendon, which is inserted into the ulna before the coronoid Inserprocess. This muscle is concealed by the biceps, the brachial
artery, and the median and musculo- cutaneous nerves ; and
it lies on the humerus and the articulation of the elbow. Its Position
origin embraces by two parts the attachment of the deltoid, elbow
and its insertion is placed between two corresponding fleshy'
pieces of the flexor profundus digitorum. The inner border and contouches the intermuscular septum ; but the outer border is
separated from the septum on that side by two muscles of
the fore-arm (supinator longus and extensor carpi radialis
over the
joint,
nections.
250 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Dissec- tion of
of the arm .
longior), and on it lies the musculo- spiral nerve. The tendon
of insertion is to be seen in the dissection of the fore-arm.
Dissection. -For the dissection of the back of the arm turn over
the back the limb, and raise it to a semi-flexed position by means of a block
of moderate thickness, beneath the elbow. Fasten also the scapula
with hooks, in order that the muscular fibres may be rendered
tense. Then the detached skin being thrown aside, make a central incision in the fascia to a little below the elbow, and raise it
with the subfascial cellular membrane from the surface of the
large triceps muscle.
Triceps muscle
three heads.
of midhead,
and of inner head.
The
The TRICEPS is the only muscle at the back of the arm.
has It is divided superiorly into three parts, and it is described
as arising by three heads, -inner, outer, and middle.
Origin middle piece, or head, is the longest, and has a tendinous
dle head, origin from the lower part of the glenoid cavity of the scapula, and from the contiguous part (about an inch) of the
inferior costa of that bone, where it is connected with the
of outer capsule of the shoulder joint. The external head reaches
from the outer condyle of the humerus to the insertion
of the teres minor muscle, and is attached to the outer
part of the posterior surface of the humerus as well as to
the intermuscular septum of the same side. The internal
head arises from the contiguous intermuscular septum,
and from the inner part of the posterior aspect of the bone,
between the condyle and the insertion of the teres major
into the bicipital groove. From these heads of origin the
fibres are directed to the common tendon of insertion at
the lower part, which is fixed into the end of the olecranon, and gives an expansion to the aponeurosis of the foreTo reach the tendon the muscular fibres have different inclinations : those of the middle head are directed vertically , but those from the sides of the muscle pass inwards or
downwards to the sides and the under part of the tendon.
Connec- The triceps muscle is superficial , except at the upper part,
the where it is overlapped by the deltoid muscle . It lies on the
humerus, concealing the musculo- spiral nerve, the superior
profunda vessels, and the articulation of the elbow. On the
sides the muscle is united to the intermuscular septa, and
Inser tion.
Direc- tion ofthe fibres.
tions of
muscle.
arm .
BACK OF THE ARM. 251
the lower fibres of the outer head are continuous with the
anconeus muscle. A bursa intervenes between the tendon
and the end of the olecranon process of the ulna.
termussepta
to ridges
merus.
The intermuscular septa are processes of fibrous structure Two incontinuous with the investing aponeurosis of the arm, which cular
are fixed to the ridges leading to the condyles of the humerus : they intervene between the muscles on the front and attached
back of the lower half of the arm, and give attachment to the ofhu
fleshy fibres. The internal is the strongest, and reaches as An inner
high as the coraco - brachialis muscle, from which it receives and
some tendinous fibres. The brachialis anticus is attached
to it in front, and the triceps behind ; and the ulnar nerve
and the inferior profunda and anastomotic arteries pierce it.
The external septum is thinner, and is placed between the outer.
triceps, and the muscles of the fore-arm that arise above the
condyle ofthe humerus : it is pierced by the musculo- spiral
nerve.
-
tion of
and
Dissection. To follow the superior profunda artery and the Dissecmusculo-spiral nerve, cut across the middle head of the triceps vessels
over their situation, and remove any cellular membrane that may nerve.
obscure them. Next divide the triceps muscle in its whole length ,
and along the line of union of the outer with the middle head, to
trace the branches of the nerve and artery that descend to the
olecranon and to the anconeus muscle. The trunks of the vessel
and nerve may afterwards be followed beneath the outer head of
the triceps to the front of the humerus.
profunda
hind the
rus.
The superior profunda branch of the brachial artery Superior
(p. 246.) is the chief, vessel for the supply of the triceps artery
muscle. Accompanying the musculo- spiral nerve, it turns
to the back of the humerus in the interval between the lies be.
inner and outer heads of the triceps. In this position the humeartery supplies large muscular branches, and is then continued onwards beneath the external head of the triceps to
the outer part of the arm, where it divides into its terminal
twigs one of these courses on the nerve to the front of the
elbow joint, anastomosing with the recurrent radial artery ;
but others continue to the elbow along the intermuscular
septum, and join the interosseous recurrent artery.
252 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Supplies triceps,
and
The muscular offsets of the vessel descend to the olecranon, supplying the triceps, and communicating with the other branches of
circle forms a the brachial, viz. inferior profunda and anastomotic, as well as around joint.
Mus- culonerve winds behind
with the recurrent branches of the arteries of the fore-arm. One
offset deserves especial notice ; it accompanies a distinct branch of
the musculo-spiral nerve, and ends in the anconeus muscle in the
interval between the olecranon and the outer condyle of the humerus.
The musculo-spiral nerve arises from the posterior cord
spiral of the brachial plexus, of which it is the largest trunk. At
first the nerve is successively behind, and close to the
humerus axillary and brachial arteries, but it soon leaves the last
vessel, and winds with the profunda artery from the inner
to the outer part of the arm, beneath the triceps muscle.
to outer At the outer aspect of the limb it is continued between the
the arm. brachialis anticus and supinator longus muscles to the external condyle of the humerus, in front of which it divides
into the radial and posterior interosseous nerves. In this
Branch- extent the nerve gives muscular branches, and cutaneous
nerves to both the inner and outer parts of the arm.
side of
es .
Internal cuta- neous branch.
Branch- es to the
1. The internal cutaneous branch is of small size, and arises in
the axillary space, in common with the branch to the inner head of
the triceps ; it is directed across the posterior boundary of the
axillary space to the inner side of the arm, where it becomes
cutaneous in the upper third (p. 243.) .
2. The muscular branches of the triceps are numerous, and suptriceps, ply all the three heads. One slender offset, that is distributed to
the inner head, arises in common with the preceding cutaneous
branch, and lies close to the ulnar nerve, till it enters the muscular fibres at the lower third of the arm. And a long slender branch,
that appears as if it ended in the triceps, can be followed downbrachi wards to the anconeus muscle. On the outer part of the limb
muscles the musculo-spiral nerve supplies the brachialis anticus and two
muscles of the fore- arm — supinator longus and extensor carpi radialis longior.
alis and
of fore- arm .
Two external cuta- neous.
Dissec- tion of the
-
3. The external cutaneous branches are two in number : they
perforate the outer head of the triceps at its attachment to the
humerus, and are distributed in the integument (p. 243.) .
Dissection. -
-Now the dissection of the arm is completed as far
as the elbow, it will be advisable to examine next the shoulder
SHOULDER JOINT. 253
joint.
joint. To expose the capsule of the joint and a thickened band shoulder
on its front, it will be necessary to detach from it the tendons of
the subscapularis, supra- and infraspinatus, and teres minor, and
to remove the cellular membrane.
SHOULDER JOINT. The articulation of the shoulder has Shoulder joint ;
great extent of movement, and the bones entering into its
formation are but slightly bound together by ligamentous
bands ; for on the removal of the muscles, one articular surface drops from the other with great readiness. The joint how
is formed between the head of the humerus and the glenoid
fossa of the scapula, these parts being enclosed in a fibrous
capsule. A ligamentous band ( glenoid ligament) deepens
the shallow cavity for the reception of the humerus.
formed.
ligaments .
The capsular ligament surrounds the articular ends of the Capsular
bones, and receives some fibres from the contiguous tendons. ment.
By the upper part it is fixed around the neck of the scapula,
and is connected with the middle head of the triceps. By Attachthe lower part the ligament is attached to the humerus close
to the hemispherical articular surface ; and its continuity is
interrupted between the tuberosities of the bone by the tendon of the biceps muscle. Below the coracoid process, and
on the inner side, is an aperture in the capsule through
which the synovial membrane of the joint projects beneath
the tendon of the subscapularis. The following muscles Muscles
surround the articulation. Superiorly are the tendons of
the supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and teres minor ; inferiorly,
the capsule is only partly covered by the subscapularis ; and
internally, it is well supported by the same muscle.
-
around.
Acces- sory On the front of the capsule is a thickish band of fibres,
the coraco- humeral or accessory ligament, which starts from band.
the base of the coracoid process of the scapula, and ends in the
great tuberosity of the humerus.
tion.
Dissection. -Open the articulation by cutting through the Disseccapsule near the scapula. When this is done, the attachment of
the capsule to the bones, the glenoid ligament, and the tendon of
the biceps will be fully seen.
The tendon of the biceps muscle arches over the head of ofTendon the
the humerus, and serves the purpose of a ligament in re- biceps.
254 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Glenoid liga- ment.
Synovial mem- brane.
straining the upward movements of that bone. It is attached
to the upper part of the glenoid fossa of the scapula, and is
connected on each side with the glenoid ligament. As it is
directed outwards, it becomes round, and is received into the
groove between the tuberosities of the humerus, in which it
is confined by a prolongation from the tendon of the pectoralis
major muscle.
The glenoid ligament is a firm, fibrous band that surrounds the fossa of the same name, deepening it for the
reception of the head of the humerus. It is about two lines
deep, and is connected with the sides of the tendon of the
biceps : some of its fibres are fixed to the edge of the
glenoid fossa.
The synovial membrane lines the articular surfaces of the
bones, and is continued from the one to the other along the
fibrous capsule. At the aperture in the capsule, on the inner
side of the joint, a prolongation is continued beneath the subscapularis muscle. The membrane is further reflected around
the tendon of the biceps, and lines the bicipital groove of the
humerus.
SECTION IV.
THE FRONT OF THE FORE-ARM.
Position Position.
of the limb.
Surface of the fore- arm .
-
PLACE the limb with the palm of the hand
uppermost, and proceed to examine the marking of the surface, and the projections of bone.
-
Surface-marking. On the anterior aspect of the forearm are two depressions, corresponding to the position of the
vessels. The external one is placed over the radial artery,
and inclines towards the middle of the fore-arm as it approaches the elbow. The internal one is evident only beyond
the middle of the fore-arm, and points out the part of the
ulnar artery that is uncovered by muscle. The bones (radius
and ulna) are sufficiently near the surface to be traced in
their whole length : each ends below in a point, the styloid
process, that of the radius being the lowest. The articula-
THE FRONT OF THE FORE- ARM. 255
tion of the wrist is about an inch above the transverse markings that separate the hand from the fore-arm.
ofpalm
hand.
In the palm of the hand are seen two lateral projections, Surface
of which the external one is formed by the muscles of the of the
thumb, and the internal one by the muscles of the little
finger. Between the projections is a hollow which is pointed
towards the wrist. The superficial palmar arch of arteries
extends forwards a little way into the hollow, and its position
may be found by a line drawn across the palm from the root
of the thumb, when this is placed at a right angle to the hand.
Two transverse lines are seen in the palm ; and the anterior
one serves to direct to the line of the articulations between
the metacarpus and the phalanges, which is about a quarter
of an inch in front of that mark, when the fingers are
extended.
of the Transverse lines are seen on both aspects of the joints of Surface
the thumb and the fingers. The lines on the palmar surface fingers .
of the fingers are used to point out the articulations of the
phalanges. Thus the joint between the metacarpal phalanx
and the next will be found about a line in front of the last
of the transverse grooves marking that spot ; whilst the articulation between the two last phalanges is situate about a
line in front of the corresponding groove on the finger.
-
tion to remove the skin.
Dissection. With the position of the limb still the same, make Dissecan incision through the skin along the middle of the front of the
fore-arm as far as the wrist, and at its termination at this spot
unite it with a transverse one. Now reflect carefully the skin
from the front and the back of the fore-arm, without injuring the
numerous superficial vessels and nerves that are beneath. The
skin should next be taken from the back of the hand, by prolonging the ends of the transverse cut along the margins of the hand
as far as the knuckles. A finger might also have the integument
removed from it, in order to trace the nerves to the end.
superfisels and nerves.
Next follow in the fat the superficial vessels and nerves. Along Seek the
the inner side of the fore-arm are the ulnar veins, with the con- cial vestinuation ofthe internal cutaneous nerve ; and near the wrist there
is occasionally a small offset from the ulnar nerve. On the outer
side are the radial vein and the superficial part of the musculo- cutaneous nerve. Close to the hand, and in the middle of the
fore- arm, is the small palmar branch of the median nerve. At the
256 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Subcu- taneous
the foreback ofthe fore- arm the external cutaneous branch of the musculospiral nerve is distributed, and offsets turn to this aspect from the
nerves in front. On the posterior part of the hand is an arch of
superficial veins ; and the radial nerve and a branch of the ulnar
nerve ramify on the back of the hand and fingers.
CUTANEOUS VEINS. ―- The superficial veins of the foreveins of arm are named median, radial, and ulnar, from their position
arm are in the limb. They commence in the hand, chiefly at the
dorsal aspect, where they form an arch, and are continued
along the fore-arm to end in the basilic and cephalic veins
of the arm.
Arch on the hand.
radial ;
ulnar ;
On the back of the hand is a superficial arch of veins, more or
less perfect, which receives the posterior or superficial digital
veins. At the sides, the arch terminates in the radial and ulnar
veins of the fore-arm.
The radial vein begins by the union of some small veins from
the back of the thumb with the outer part of the arch before mentioned. It is then continued along the fore- arm, at first behind,
and then along the outer border as far as the elbow, where it gives
rise to the cephalic vein by joining the outer branch of the median
vein (median cephalic) .
The ulnar veins are anterior and posterior, and occupy the front
two sets, and the back of the fore- arm. The anterior arises near the wrist, anterior
terior ;
by the junction of small veins from the hand and fore-arm, and
runs on the inner part of the fore- arm to the elbow ; it forms the
basilic vein by uniting with the inner branch of the median vein
and pos- (median basilic) . The posterior ulnar vein is situate on the back
of the limb. It commences at the hand, by the union of a large
vein (" vena salvatella ") from the back of the little finger with the
offset of the venous arch ; it is then continued along the back of
the fore-arm, nearly to the elbow, and bends forwards to open into
the anterior ulnar vein.
median. The median vein commences on the front of the arm, near the
wrist, by small branches, which are derived from the palmar
surface of the hand ; and it is directed along the centre of the forearm nearly to the elbow. Here the vein divides into external and
internal branches (median basilic and median cephalic) , which
unite, as before seen, with the radial and ulnar veins. At its point
of bifurcation the median vein receives a communicating branch
from a deep vein.
THE FRONT OF THE FORE-ARM. 257
- In the fore-arm the superficial Super- ficial
fore-arm
CUTANEOUS NERVES.
nerves are the continuation of the cutaneous nerves of the nerves of
arm, viz. the large internal cutaneous nerve on the inner
part, and the two external cutaneous nerves, derived from
the musculo-spiral and musculo- cutaneous, on the outer part.
Occasionally there is a small offset of the ulnar nerve in the
fore-arm. On the back of the hand is the termination ofthe and
radial nerve, together with a branch of the ulnar nerve.
back of hand are
The cuta- internal cutaneous nerve was seen in a previous dissection internal
(p. 243.) to be divided into two parts. The anterior branch neous
extends on the front of the fore- arm as far as the wrist, and supplies the integument onthe inner part of the anterior aspect. Near
the wrist it communicates sometimes with a cutaneous offset from
the ulnar nerve. The posterior branch continues along the back
of the fore-arm (ulnar side) to rather below the middle.
lo or ex
cuta..
The cutaneous part of the musculo- cutaneous nerve is continued muscufrom the arm, and courses along the radial border of the fore- arm ternal
as far as the ball of the thumb, on which it terminates in cutaneous ;
neous offsets. Near the wrist the nerve is placed over the radial
artery, and some twigs pierce the fascia to ramify on the vessel.
Alittle above the middle of the fore- arm the nerve gives backwards
to the integument on the posterior aspect a branch that reaches
nearly to the wrist, and communicates with the radial nerve as
well as with the following cutaneous nerve.
cutanemuscuThe external cutaneous branch of the musculo- spiral nerve, after external
passing the elbow, turns to the posterior aspect of the fore-arm, ous of
and reaches as far as the wrist. Near its termination it joins the lo-spiral.
preceding cutaneous nerve.
of Ending ofthe It radial
The radial nerve is distributed to the integument of the back
the hand and to that of the thumb and the next two fingers.
becomes cutaneous at the outer border of the fore- arm in the
lower third, and after giving backwards some filaments to the
posterior aspect of the limb, divides into two branches.
nerve
nal and
branch;
a. One (external) is joined by the musculo-cutaneous nerve, and is by exterdistributed to the radial border and the ball of the thumb. b. The other internal
branch (internal) supplies the remaining side of the thumb, both sides of
the next two fingers, and half the ring finger ; so that the radial nerve
supplies the same number of digital nerves on the dorsal aspect as the
median furnishes on the palmar aspect. This division of the radial which supply nerve is joined by the musculo- cutaneous and ulnar nerves ; and the the inoffset, which is distributed to the contiguous sides of the ring and gers.
S
258 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Termi- nation.
Branch of ulnar
back of
middle fingers, is joined by a twig from the dorsal branch of the ulnar nerve.
On the sides of the fingers each dorsal digital nerve is united with an
offset from the digital nerve of the palmar aspect, and extends to the
tip of the finger.
The dorsal branch of the ulnar nerve furnishes branches to the
nerve to rest ofthe fingers and to the back of the hand. Appearing by the
hand and styloid process of the ulna, the nerve joins in an arch across the
back of the hand with an offset from the radial nerve, and is then
fingers. distributed to both sides of the little finger, and to the contiguous
Deep fascia of
arm .
front.
back of the limb.
side of the ring finger : moreover, it communicates with the
branch of the radial nerve that supplies the space between the
ring and middle fingers. The ulnar nerve supplies digital branches
to the same number of fingers on both surfaces (palmar and
dorsal).
The aponeurosis of the fore-arm is continuous with a
the fore- similar investment of the arm, and surrounds the muscles in
a sheath. It is of a pearly white colour, and is formed of
fibres that cross obliquely, constituting a membrane which is
thicker behind than before, and is stronger nearthe elbow than
On the towards the hand. Near the elbow it receives fibres from the
tendons of the biceps, brachialis anticus, and the muscles
attached to the inner condyle of the humerus. At the wrist
the fascia joins the anterior annular ligament ; and near this
band, the tendon of the palmaris longus pierces the fascia,
Onthe and receives a sheath from it. On the back of the fore- arm,
the aponeurosis is connected to the margins of the ulna,
leaving the upper part of that bone subcutaneous ; and it
receives some fibres from the tendon of the triceps.
the wrist it is thickened by transverse fibres, and gives rise
to the posterior annular ligament ; and on the back of the
hand and fingers the fascia becomes very thin and cellular. Horizontal processes are sent downwards from the
aponeurosis to separate the superficial and deep layers of
muscles both on the front and on the back of the forearm ; and longitudinal white bands indicate the position
of the different intermuscular processes, which separate one
muscle from another, and give origin to the muscular
⚫ fibres.
Inter- muscu- lar pieces.
Behind
THE FRONT OF THE FORE-ARM. 259
away
nerves,
sels.
Dissection. -Replace the skin on the back of the hand and the Take
fore-arm, in order that the parts that are exposed may not become fascia,
dry. Taking, first, the dissection of the anterior aspect of the and veslimb, let the student divide the aponeurosis along the front of the
fore- arm as far as the wrist, and take it away with the cutaneous
vessels and nerves, except the small cutaneous offsets of the median
and ulnar nerves near the wrist. In cleaning the muscles, it will
be impossible to remove the aponeurosis from them at the upper
part of the fore-arm without detaching the muscular fibres.
After the aponeurosis is removed, the termination of the brachial Vessels
artery will be observed to lie in some fat in a hollow in front of seen.
the elbow, between two masses of muscles, —one arising from the
inner, and the other from the outer condyle of the humerus. Two
large arteries are also exposed ; one (radial) lies along the radial
border of the fore- arm, the other (ulnar) is superficial only in the
lower half of the fore- arm, and at the ulnar side.
then
anterior Next expose the anterior annular ligament of the wrist which Define
arches over the tendons passing from the fore- arm to the hand. annular
This structure is at some little depth from the surface, and it may ment.
ligabe necessary to take away more of the skin to make it apparent,
but in so doing care must be taken of the small branches of the
median and ulnar nerves to the palm of the hand. The ulnar
artery and nerve pass over the ligament, and will serve as a guide to it.
-
in front
elbow.
Hollow infront of the elbow. Between the inner and the Hollow
outer mass of the muscles, in front of the bend of the elbow, of the
is a hollow which resembles that of the popliteal space in the
leg. This interval is somewhat triangular in shape, and the
wider part is towards the humerus. On the outer side it
is bounded by the supinator longus muscle, and on the inner
side by the pronator teres. The aponeurosis of the limb is
stretched over the space ; and the bones of the arm covered
by the brachialis anticus muscle form the deep boundary.
In this hollow are contained the termination of the bra- Contents
chial artery, the median nerve, the musculo- spiral nerve, the space
tendon of the biceps muscle, and some cellular membrane ;
these several parts have the following relative position in
the space. The tendon of the biceps is directed towards and their position the outer boundary to reach the radius, into which it is in- to one
serted ; and the musculo-spiral nerve is close to the outer
of the
another.
8 2
260 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Superfi- cial
has five
side, being partly concealed by the supinator longus muscle.
The brachial vessels and the median nerve occupy nearly
the centre of the space, the nerve being internal ; but as
the artery is inclining to the outer, and the nerve to the
inner part of the limb, they are soon distant from one another about half an inch. In this space the brachial artery
divides into two trunks -radial and ulnar.
Muscles on the front of the fore-arm. The muscles on
layer the anterior and inner parts of the fore-arm are divided into
muscles. a superficial and a deep layer. In the superficial layer there
are five muscles, which are fixed to the inner condyle of
the humerus, and have the undermentioned position from the
outer to the inner side ; pronator radii teres, flexor carpi
radialis, palmaris longus, flexor carpi ulnaris, which are on
the same level ; and deeper and larger than any of these is
the flexor sublimis digitorum. The deep layer will be met
with in a future dissection.
Pronator teres.
Inser- tion.
The PRONATOR RADII TERES arises from the inner condyle
of the humerus by a tendon common to the muscles of the
Origin . superficial layer ; from the inner part of the coronoid process by a second tendinous slip ; from the fascia, and from the
intermuscular septum between it and the next muscle. It is
inserted by a rather flat tendon into an impression on the
outer surface of the radius, about the middle of the bone.
The muscle is superficial, except at its insertion, where it is
crossed by the radial artery, and concealed by the supinator longus of the outer set of muscles. The outer border
constitutes one boundary of the triangular space in front of
the elbow, and the inner border is contiguous to the flexor
Connec- carpi radialis. By gently separating the muscle from the
rest, it will be found to conceal the brachialis anticus, the
flexor sublimis digitorum, the ulnar artery, and the median
nerve. The second small head of origin is directed inwards
between the artery and the nerve.
tions.
flexor of the wrist
Radial The FLEXOR CARPI RADIALIS takes its origin from the
common tendon, from the aponeurosis of the fore-arm, and
from the intermuscular septum on each side. The fleshy
fibres end in a tendon about the middle ofthe fore-arm, which
passes through a groove in the os trapezium, and is inserted
THE FRONT OF THE FORE-ARM. 261
ficial ;
into the base of the metacarpal bone of the index finger.
This muscle rests chiefly on the flexor sublimis digitorum, is superbut near its origin it is in contact with the ulnar artery and
the median nerve ; and at the lower part of the fore- arm it
lies over the flexor longus pollicis, a muscle of the deep
layer. As low as the middle of the fore-arm the muscle cor- is the
responds externally to the pronator teres, and below that the ra
point to the radial artery, to which its tendon is taken as the tery.
guide. The ulnar border is at first in contact with the palmaris longus muscle, and lastly with the median nerve for
about two inches above the wrist.
guide to
dial arpalmar The PALMARIS LONGUS is often absent, or presents great Long
irregularity in the proportion between its fleshy and tendin- muscle
ous parts. Its origin is like that of the preceding muscle, viz.
from the common tendon, the fascia, and the intermuscular
septa ; and its long thin tendon is continued through the lies over
centre of the fore- arm, and over the annular ligament to end ligain the palmar fascia. The palmaris is situate between the and ends
flexor carpi radialis and flexor carpi ulnaris muscles, and of palm.
rests on the flexor sublimis digitorum.
annular
ment,
in fascia
Flexor carpi ulnaris.
Origin.
into pisibone.
The FLEXOR CARPI ULNARIS arises from the inner condyle
of the humerus, from the inner side of the olecranon, and
from an aponeurosis, which is fixed to the ridge of the ulna,
between the internal and external surfaces. The fibres of
origin reaching nearly to the wrist are continued downwards
or obliquely forwards to a tendon which occupies the anterior
aspect ofthe muscle in its lower half, and is inserted into the Insertion
pisiform bone, an offset being given to the annular ligament form
and to the muscles of the little finger. One surface of the
muscle is in contact with the fascia ; and its tendon is the
guide to the ulnar artery, being readily felt through the
skin. To its radial side are the palmaris and flexor digi- Adjacent
torum sublimis muscles, but below the middle of the forearm the ulnar artery and nerve are in relation with it .
When the attachment to the inner condyle is divided, and the
subjacent parts cleaned, the muscle will be seen to conceal
the flexor digitorum sublimis and flexor profundus, the ulnar
nerve, and the ulnar vessels in part. Between the attachparts .
s 3
262 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Course and exthe ra- dial ar- tery.
ments to the condyle and the olecranon the ulnar nerve enters
the fore-arm.
The RADIAL ARTERY is one of the divisions of the brachial
tent of trunk, and extends along the outer side of the fore-arm to
the end of the radius ; it then winds backwards below the
end of that bone, and finally enters the palm of the hand
through the first interosseous space. In consequence of this
circuitous course the anatomy of the artery will be found in
three different dissections ; viz. the front of the fore-arm, the
back of the wrist, and the palm of the hand.
Situa- tion in
arm .
In thefront of thefore- arm.-In this part of the limb the
the fore- course of the artery will be marked on the surface by a line
drawn from the centre of the hollow of the elbow to the
styloid process of the radius. This vessel is smaller than
the ulnar artery, though it appears to be the continuation of
the brachial trunk.
Connec- tions with parts
on the sides,
In all its extent the radial artery is quite superficial, being
covered only by the common tegumentary investments and the
Dverit, deep fascia, and near the wrist it can be felt pulsating during
life. Its connections with the surrounding muscles and the
radius are these : in the upper half of the fore-arm the artery is
placed between the fleshy bellies of the supinator longus externally and the pronator teres internally, the former somewhat overlapping it ; but below that point the vessel lies in
a hollow between the tendons of the supinator longus and
behind, flexor carpi radialis muscles. At first the vessel is on the
inner side of the radius, but afterwards it lies over that bone
and the muscles that are successively attached to it, viz. the
fleshy supinator brevis, the tendon of the pronator teres, the
thin radial origin of the flexor sublimis, some muscles of the
deep layer, viz. flexor pollicis longus and pronator quadratus,
and lastly on the end of the radius. The usual venæ comites
are found on the sides of the artery.
the outer side of, though not in contact with the vessel, in
the upper two-thirds of the fore-arm, or until it passes
beneath the tendon of the supinator longus.
and with the radius.
Veins and nerve with it.
BranchThe radial nerve is on
Branches. The radial artery furnishes in the fore-arm
muscu- many unnamed muscular and nutrient branches to the sures both
lar and
THE FRONT OF THE FORE-ARM. 263
rounding parts ; and three named branches, viz. recurrent anastoradial, superficial volar, and anterior carpal.
motic.
recur- 1. The radial recurrent is the first branch of the artery, and Radial
supplies for the most part the muscles of the outer side of the fore- rent.
arm. Its course is almost transverse to the supinator longus
muscle, beneath which it terminates in muscular branches. One
branch ascends beneath the supinator, to anastomose with the
superior profunda branch of the brachial artery.
cial volar.
2. The superficial volar branch usually arises near the lower Superfiend of the radius, but its exact place of origin is uncertain. It is
directed to the palm of the hand, across the mass of muscle in the
ball of the thumb, and it either ends in those muscles, or joins the
superficial palmar arch.
3. The anterior carpal branch is very inconsiderable in size, and Anterior carpal.
will be seen in the examination of the deep layer of muscles.
Arising rather above the lower end of the radius, this artery passes
transversely beneath the muscles to anastomose with a similar
branch from the ulnar artery. From the arch thus formed at the
lower border of the pronator quadratus muscle offsets are given to the carpus.
tions in Peculiarities of the radial artery. —The origin of the artery is often Varia
carried upwards in the arm, from the usual place even to the axilla ; the oribut in one instance (Quain) it was noticed three inches belowthe elbow gin
joint, and in that case a vas aberrans connected it with the axillary
artery. When the radial artery has the high unusual origin, its course and
in the arm is close to the brachial artery, along the edge of the biceps the
muscle ; but in passing the bend of the elbow it may be subcutaneous,
and therefore mistaken for a vein in venesection. In the fore-arm it
may likewise be subcutaneous, and superficial to the supinator longus
muscle.
course of
radial.
es .
The vasa aberrantia, or long slender branches of the axillary or Connect- ing brachial trunks, generally open into the radial artery. In cases of branchhigh origin ofthe radial, there is sometimes a connecting branch at the
bend of the elbow, between that irregular vessel and the trunk in the
place ofthe brachial artery.
tion .
Dissection. - Cut through the origin of the flexor carpi radialis Dissecand palmaris longus, near the inner condyle of the humerus, and
turn these muscles to one side. Small branches of the ulnar
artery and median nerve will be seen to enter the under surface of the muscles. For the present, the pronator teres may be
left uncut. The remaining muscle of the superficial layer (flexor
sublimis digitorum) is now exposed in the fore- arm.
8 4
264 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Superfi- cial
fingers .
The FLEXOR DIGITORUM SUBLIMIS vel PERFORATUS is the
flexor of largest of the muscles of the superficial layer, and is named
from its position with reference to another flexor in the deep
Origin. layer of muscles. It arises from the inner condyle of the
humerus, from the intermuscular septa, in common with the
preceding muscles, and from the internal lateral ligament ; it
also takes origin from the bones of the fore-arm, viz. from the
inner part of the coronoid process of the ulna, and from the
oblique line on the radius as far as two inches below the insertion of the pronator teres. Rather below the middle of the
fore-arm the muscle ends in four tendons, which are continued
across the hand to be inserted into the middle phalanges
of the fingers, after being perforated by the tendons of the
deep flexor. The flexor sublimis is concealed by the other
bydeep muscles of the superficial layer, and the radial vessels lie on
Connec- the attachment to the radius. Along the inner border is
with the flexor carpi ulnaris with the ulnar vessels and nerve.
around. The tendons of the muscle are arranged in pairs before they
Inser- tion .
Its ten- dons pierced
flexor.
tions
parts
Ulnar artery
ends in palm of hand.
Connec- tions in the upper
enter beneath the annular ligament of the wrist ; those of
the middle and ring fingers being anterior, and those of the
index and the little finger posterior in position. When the
coronoid and condyloid attachments are divided, the muscle
is seen to cover two flexors of the deep layer (flexor digit.
profundus and flexor pollicis), the median nerve, and the
upper part of the ulnar artery.
The ULNAR ARTERY is the larger branch of bifurcation of
the brachial trunk, and is directed along the inner side of
the fore- arm to the palm of the hand, where it forms the
superficial palmar arch.
In the fore-arm the vessel has an arched direction, and its
depth from the surface varies in the first and last parts
of its course. In the upper half of the fore-arm the artery
is inclined obliquely inwards between the superficial and
deep layers of muscles, and is covered by the former, viz.
pronator teres, flexor sublimis, palmaris longus, and flexor
carpi radialis. But below the spot mentioned the vessel is
half of quite superficial between the tendons of the flexor sublimis
and flexor carpi ulnaris, and is concealed only by the common integuments and the proper fascia of the limb, though
and lower
the fore- arm .
THE FRONT OF THE FORE-ARM. 265
the flexor ulnaris somewhat overlays it, and serves as theguide
to its position. Beneath the artery will be found first the
brachialis anticus for a short distance, and afterwards the
flexor profundus.
of veins
nerves.
The two companion veins are situate on the sides of the Position
artery. The median nerve lies to the inner side of the vessel and
for about an inch, but afterwards crosses over the artery to
gain the outer side. About the middle of the fore-arm, the
ulnar nerve approaches the artery, and continues thence
on the inner side. A small branch of the ulnar nerve descends on the lower part of the artery in its course to the
palm of the hand.
on the
ligaOn the annular ligament of the wrist, the artery lies close Position
to the pisiform bone, and is crossed by a band of fibres pro- annular
longed from the tendon of the flexor carpi ulnaris to that ment.
ligament. The ulnar nerve still accompanies the vessel,
having the same position, viz. on the inner side.
branches Branches.-The greater number of the collateral branches Its
of the artery are distributed to the muscles. But the besides
branches which are named are the following :-
muscu- lar are
1. The and anterior ulnar recurrent branch arises generally in com- anterior
mon with the next, and turns upwards on the brachialis anticus
muscle, to inosculate with the small anastomotic artery beneath
the pronator radii teres. It gives offsets to the contiguous
muscles.
recur- 2. The posterior ulnar recurrent branch, of larger size than the posterior
anterior, is directed inwards beneath the flexor sublimis muscle to rent,
the interval between the inner condyle and the olecranon. Here
it passes with the ulnar nerve between the attachments of the
flexor carpi ulnaris, and joins the ramifications of the inferior
profunda and anastomotic arteries on the inner side ofthe elbow
joint. Some of its offsets enter the muscles, and others supply the articulation and the ulnar nerve.
osseous,
3. The interosseous branch is a short, thick trunk, about an inch interlong, that is directed backwards towards the interosseous membrane, and divides into anterior and posterior interosseous arteries :
these branches will be afterwards followed.
carpal, 4. The metacarpal branch arises from the artery near the lower metaend of the ulna, and turns back along the metacarpal bone of the
little finger, ofwhich it forms a dorsal branch.
266 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
and carpal.
The ori- gin
5. The carpal branches (anterior and posterior) ramify on the
front and back of the carpus, on which they anastomose with corresponding offsets of the radial artery, forming arches across the wrist.
Peculiarities ofthe ulnar artery. — The place of origin has a tendency
to approach the trunk of the body, and it may therefore be changed to
the axilla, or to any point along the arm. Once the origin was found
below the elbow. (Quain. ) Its position in the fore-arm, when the vessel
is irregular, is more frequently changed than that of the radial under
similar conditions. Commonly, in the instances of high origin, the
ulnar artery is superficial to the flexor muscles at the bend of the
tery may elbow, but beneath the aponeurosis of the fore-arm, though sometimes it
is subcutaneous with the superficial veins.
and course of the arvary .
Ulnar nerve in
arm .
The ULNAR NERVE enters the fore-arm between the attachthe fore- ments of the flexor carpi ulnaris to the olecranon and
inner condyle of the humerus. Under cover of that muscle
the nerve reaches the ulnar artery about the middle (in
length) of the fore- arm, and is then continued on the inner
side of the vessel to the hand. On the annular ligament the
nerve is rather posterior to the artery. In the fore- arm it
furnishes articular, muscular, and cutaneous branches as
below :-
Its branches are
to elbow joint,
twomus- cles of
arm ,
cutane-
------
1. Articular nerves. —In the interval between the olecranon and
the inner condyle, the ulnar nerve gives slender filaments to the
articulation against which it lies.
2. Muscular branches. It furnishes offsets to two muscles of
fore- the fore-arm, viz. flexor carpi ulnaris and flexor profundus. One
branch enters the upper part of the flexor carpi ulnaris, and another supplies the inner half of the flexor profundus digitorum.
3. Cutaneous nerve ofthe fore-arm and hand. —About the middle
of the fore- arm a small cutaneous branch (palmar) arises from the
of palm nerve, and continues on the ulnar artery, sending twigs around it,
to end in the integuments of the palm of the hand. Sometimes a
cutaneous offset of it perforates the aponeurosis of the fore- arm,
and joins the internal cutaneous nerve.
ous branch
ofhand,
cuta- neous nerve of
4. The dorsal cutaneous nerve of the hand arises about two inches
above the end of the ulna, and passes obliquely backwards beneath
back of the flexor carpi ulnaris muscle : it finally perforates the aponeurosis of the limb, and is lost on the back of the hand and the
fingers (see p. 258.).
hand.
THE FRONT OF THE FORE-ARM. 267
nerve
tween
layers of
The MEDIAN NERVE leaves the hollow of the elbow between Median
the heads of origin of the pronator teres, and takes the middle
line of the fore-arm in its course to the hand. It is placed lies bebeneath the flexor sublimis as low as two inches from the thetwo
annular ligament, but it then becomes superficial along the muscles .
outer border of the tendons of this muscle. Lastly the nerve
dips beneath the annular ligament to enter the palm of the
hand, where it is distributed. This is the muscular nerve of
the front of the fore-arm, and it furnishes cutaneous offsets
only to the hand.
the musexcept
1. Muscular offsets leave the trunk of the nerve near the elbow, Supplies
and are distributed to all the muscles of the superficial layer in cles ,
front ofthe fore- arm, except the flexor carpi ulnaris, and to a part one and
(outer half) of one muscle of the deep layer, the flexor profundus
digitorum.
a half,
2. The anterior interosseous nerve. -By means of this nerve, in both layers.
the remaining muscles of the deep layer are supplied. It accompanies the anterior interosseous artery, and will be dissected with that vessel.
neous 3. The cutaneous palmar branch arises at the lower part of the A cutafore-arm ; it pierces the fascia near the annular ligament, and branch
crosses the ligament to reach the palm of the hand.
to palm ofhand.
nerve in
arm,
The RADIAL NERVE is one of the branches of division of Radial
the musculo-spiral in front of the outer condyle of the humerus. This nerve is placed along the outer border of the fore- the forearm, under cover of the supinator longus, and on the outer
side of the radial artery till within three inches of the wrist,
where it becomes cutaneous at the posterior part of the tendon of the supinator. On the surface it divides into two ends on
branches which are distributed on the dorsum of the hand, the hand.
and on the thumb and the next two fingers (p. 257). No
offset is furnished by the part of the nerve beneath the
aponeurosis.
back of
tion of Dissection. -To examine the deep layer of muscles it will be Dissecnecessary to draw well over to the radial side of the fore-arm the deep layer of pronator teres and flexor sublimis muscles ; or, if it is thought muscles.
necessary, these muscles may be divided. The cellular tissue is to
be taken from the muscular fibres, and the anterior interosseous
vessels and nerve which lie on the interosseous membrane, and are
concealed by the muscles, are to be traced out.
268 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Three muscles in the deep layer.
Deep flexor of
Deep layer ofmuscles. — Only three muscles are present
in this layer. One lies on the ulna, and is the deep flexor
of the fingers ; another covers the radius, the long flexor
of the thumb ; and the third is the pronator, which is beneath the other two, near the lower end of the bones.
-
The FLEXOR DIGITORUM PROFUNDUS vel PERFORANS arises
fingers. from the anterior and inner surfaces of the ulna for threeOrigin. fourths of the length of the bone, from the inner half of the
interosseous ligament, from the inner part of the olecranon,
tached to
Parts
it.
and from an aponeurosis common to this muscle and the flexor
Is at- carpi ulnaris. The muscle has a thick fleshy belly, and ends
last pha- in four tendons, which are not separate above the annular langes. ligament, and whose destination is the last phalanges of the
around fingers. The cutaneous surface of the muscle is in contact
with the ulnar nerve and vessels, the superficial flexor of
the fingers, and the flexor carpi ulnaris ; and the deep surface rests on the ulna and the pronator quadratus muscle.
The outer border touches the flexor pollicis longus and the
anterior interosseous vessels and nerve ; and the inner is
connected by the aponeurosis to the posterior margin of the ulna.
Long flexor ofthumb.
The
The FLEXOR LONGUS POLLICIS arises from the anterior
surface of the radius as low as the pronator quadratus, from
Origin, the outer part of the interosseous membrane, and by a round
distinct slip from the coronoid process of the ulna.
fleshy fibres descend to a tendon, which is continued beneath
the annular ligament to be inserted into the last phalanx of
the thumb. On the cutaneous surface of the muscle is the
flexor sublimis, together with the radial vessels for a short
and be- distance inferiorly ; and the muscle lies on the radius and neath it. the pronator quadratus. To the inner side is the flexor
profundus digitorum.
Inser- tion .
Parts above
quadralower end of bones of
Pronator The PRONATOR QUADRATUS is a flat muscle, and occupies
tus is on the front of the bones of the fore- arm in their lower fourth.
The muscle arises from the anterior and inner parts of the
fore arm ulna, where it is somewhat the widest, and is inserted into
is deep the fore part of the radius for about two inches. The
anterior surface is covered by the tendons of the flexor
muscles of the fingers, and by the radial artery ; and the
in posi- tion.
THE PALM OF THE HAND. 269
posterior surface rests on the radius and ulna with their
intervening membrane, and on the interosseous vessels and
nerve.
inter- The anterior interosseous artery (p. 265. ) is continued on Anterior
the front of the interosseous membrane, between or in the osseous artery.
fibres of the deep flexor muscles, till it reaches the aperture
below that membrane. At this spot the artery turns from
the front to the back of the fore-arm, and descends to the
posterior aspect of the carpus, where it ends by anastomosing
with the posterior carpal arteries.
―
branches
muscuBranches. Numerous offsets are given to the contiguous Its
muscles. One long branch (median) accompanies the median chiefly
nerve, supplying it, and either ends in the flexor sublimis, or lar.
extends beneath the annular ligament to the hand. About the
middle of the fore- arm the nutrient arteries ofthe bones arise from
the artery. Where it is about to turn backwards, it furnishes
twigs to the pronator quadratus, and one branch is continued beneath that muscle to anastomose with the anterior carpal arteries.
interosnerve
The anterior interosseous nerve is derived from the median Anterior
(p. 267.), and accompanies the artery of the same name to the seous
pronator quadratus muscle, on the under surface of which it ends in
ends. Some lateral branches are distributed by it to the tor.
deep flexor muscles.
pronaDissection.
-
SECTION V.
THE PALM OF THE HAND.
tion.
neous
-PLACE the palm of the hand upwards, and raise the Dissecskin from it by means of two incisions. One is to be carried along Seek the
the centre ofthe hand from the wrist to the fingers, and the other cutais to be made from side to side at the termination of the first. nerves.
In raising the inner flap, the small palmaris brevis muscle will
be recognised at the inner margin of the hand, near the wrist.
In the fat will be found the ramifications of the small branches
(palmar) of the median and ulnar nerves.
Take away now the fat from the small palmar muscle and Define the pal- strong palmar fascia, and be careful not to destroy a thin trans- mar fas
verse band of tissue (transverse ligament) that passes across the cia.
270 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
roots of the fingers. When cleaning the fat from the palmar fascia
the dissector will observe the digital vessels and nerves, especially
those of the inner side of the little finger and outer side of the
index finger, which appear farther back than the rest, and are
most likely to be injured. Lastly, remove the skin and the fat
and ex- from the thumb and the fingers, so as to expose the sheaths of the
sheaths. tendons with the collateral vessels and nerves.
pose
Two cu- taneous
nerves.
One of median,
Cutaneous palmar nerves. - Two named cutaneous nerves
palmar ramify in the palm of the hand. a. One of these is an offset of the
median nerve (p. 267.) , and crosses the annular ligament : it
extends to about the middle of the palm, and is connected with the
branch of the ulnar nerve. A few filaments of this nerve are
furnished to the ball of the thumb. b . The other palmar branch
is an offset of the ulnar nerve : it has been already traced on the
ulnar artery to the hand, and it may now be followed to its distribution in the palm.
other of ulnar nerve.
Some unnamed twigs.
Palmaris brevis is
taneous,
in the skin.
Some unnamed twigs are also furnished to the integument from
both the median and ulnar nerves in the hand.
The PALMARIS BREVIS is a small subcutaneous muscle,
subcu- about an inch wide, whose fibres are collected into separate
and ends bundles. It is attached on the one side to the palmar aponeurosis and the annular ligament, and its fibres are directed
inwards to join the skin at the inner border of the hand.
This muscle lies over the ulnar artery and nerve. After it
has been examined, it may be thrown inwards.
Palmar fascia.
Its cen- tral part!
The palmar fascia, or aponeurosis, consists of a central and two lateral parts ; but the latter, which cover the
muscles of the thumb and little finger, are so thin as not
to require separate notice.
The central part is a strong, white, shining layer, which is
pointed at the wrist, but expanded towards the fingers,
where it covers nearly the whole width of the hand. Posteriorly, this part of the fascia receives the tendon of the
palmaris longus, and is connected to the annular ligament ;
ends in a and anteriorly it ends in four processes, which are continued
each forwards, one for each finger, to join the sheaths of the
tendons. At the point of separation of the processes one
from another, are placed some transverse fibres, which arch
over the lumbricalis muscle and the digital artery and
nerve that appear at this spot. A few superficial fibres are
piece for
finger.
THE PALM OF THE HAND. 271
prolonged from the four divisions before mentioned, to the
integument at the cleft of the fingers, and to the transverse
ligament.
tion .
Dissection. To follow a process of the fascia to its junction Dissecwith the sheath of the tendons, remove its superficial fibres, and
inserting the knife beneath it, opposite the head of the metacarpal
bone, divide it longitudinally.
of t
fascia.
Each process of the fascia will be now seen to send down- Ending
wards an offset on each side of the tendons, which is fixed to pieces of
the ligament connecting together the ends of the metacarpal
bones, as well as to the borders of the bone for a short
distance.
ment of
gers.
The transverse ligament of the fingers is a thin fibrous Ligaband, which stretches across the roots of the fingers, and is the fincontained in the fold of skin limiting the clefts between
them. Beneath it the digital nerves and vessels are continued onwards to their termination.
ofthe
thickSheath of the flexor tendons. —Along each finger the Sheath
flexor tendons are retained in position against the phalanges tendons
by a fibrous sheath. Opposite the middle of each of the two varies in
nearest phalanges, the sheath is formed by a strong fibrous ness.
band, which is almost cartilaginous in hardness ; but opposite the joints of the fingers it consists only of scattered
fibres, that form a thin membrane. When the sheath is Has a
synovial
opened, it will be found to be lined by a synovial membrane sac.
that lubricates the tendons.
tion. Dissection. —Take away the palmar fascia and the thinner parts Dissecof the sheaths of the tendons opposite the joints of the fingers.
The palmar arch of arteries and the median and ulnar nerves now
come into view.
After cross- Superfi cial pal- PALMAR PART OF THE ULNAR ARTERY.
ing the annular ligament, the ulnar artery is directed out- mararch.
wards in the palm of the hand towards the muscles of the
thumb, where it communicates with the radial artery through
the superficial volar branch and the arteria radialis indicis .
The part of the artery that lies across the hand is named
the superficial palmar arch. Its direction is arched to- Position
wards the fingers, and its position in the palm would be handand
in the
272 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
tions.
nearly marked by a line across the hand from the centre of
the cleft between the thumb and the index finger. The
connec- arch is quite superficial, and is covered only by the integuments and the palmar fascia, except at the inner border of
the hand, where the palmaris brevis muscle overlays it.
Beneath it are the flexor tendons and the branches of the
ulnar and median nerves.
Branch es are
tojoin the deep arch.
Four digital
es.
In the hand.
Branches. From the convexity of the arch proceed the
digital arteries, and from the concavity, some small offsets
to the palm of the hand. A small branch (profunda) arises
as soon as the artery enters the hand.
1. The communicating (profunda) branch is of very small size,
and passes downwards with a branch of the ulnar nerve, between
the abductor and short flexor muscles of the little finger, to inosculate with the deep palmar arch of the radial artery.
2. The digital branches are four in number, and supply both
branch- sides of the three inner fingers and one side of the index finger.
The branch of the inner side of the hand and little finger is undivided in its course ; but the others correspond to the three inner
interosseous spaces, and bifurcate anteriorly to supply the contiguous sides of the above said fingers. In the hand these branches
are accompanied by the digital nerves, which they sometimes
pierce. Near the root of the fingers each receives a communicating branch from the arteries of the deep arch ; but the branch
for the inner side of the little finger has its communicating branch
about the middle of the hand.
Termisides of
gers.
From the point of bifurcation the branches extend along the sides of
nationon the fingers, accompanied by the digital nerves, and on the last phalanx
the fin- the vessels of opposite sides unite in an arch, from whose convexity
offsets proceed to supply the papillæ of the tip of the finger, as well as
the pulp beneath the nail. Lateral branches are also furnished to the
finger and the sheath of the tendons ; and some small twigs are supplied to the phalangeal articulations from a small arterial arch on the
bone, close behind each joint.
Ulnar nerve in PALMAR PART OF THE ULNAR NERVE. The ulnar nerve
the hand divides on the annular ligament or near it, into a superficial
and a deep branch, which are distributed to one finger and a
half, and to some of the muscles of the hand.
has a
deep and The deep branch accompanies the profunda artery to the
muscles, and will be subsequently dissected with that vessel.
THE PALM OF THE HAND. 273
cial part.
The superficial branch furnishes an offset to the palmaris superfibrevis muscle, and some filaments to the integument of the
inner part of the hand, and then ends in two digital nerves
for the supply of both sides of the little finger and half the
next.
ends in
gital
The more internal nerve is undivided, like the corresponding The last
artery. The other is directed to the cleft between the ring and two dilittle fingers, where it bifurcates for the supply of their opposed nerves.
sides. In the palm of the hand this last branch is connected with for little finger a digital branch of the median nerve. Along the sides of the and half
fingers the digital branches have the same anatomy as those of the median nerve.
-
next.
nerve in
and
PALMAR PART OF THE MEDIAN NERVE. As soon as Median
the median nerve has reached the palm of the hand beneath the hand supplies
the annular ligament, it becomes enlarged and somewhat muscles
flattened, and is divided into two nearly equal parts. From fingers .
these divisions the digital nerves to the thumb and to the
remaining two fingers and a half are derived. The more
external of the two parts furnishes likewise a small muscular branch to the ball of the thumb. The trunk of the
nerve and its branches are covered in the hand by the palmar
fascia ; and they rest on the tendons of the flexor muscles.
to the The branch to the muscles of the thumb supplies the outer half of Branch
the short flexor, and ends in the abductor and opponens pollicis muscles.
muscles.
nerves
and
The digital nerves are five in number : three of them for the Digital
sides of the thumb and the radial side of the fore-finger, are un- are five,
divided, and are furnished by the external division of the trunk of supply
the median ; the other two spring from the inner division of that thumb
nerve, and are bifurcated to supply the opposed sides of the fingers,
middle and fore, and the middle and ring fingers.
and two
and a
half.
two,
Thefirst two nerves belong to the thumb, one being on each side, and First
the most external communicates with branches of the radial nerve.
The third is directed to the radial side of the index finger, and gives a third,
branch to the most external lumbrical muscle. The fourth furnishes a fourth,
nerve to the second lumbrical muscle, and divides to supply the contiguous sides of the fore and middle fingers. The fifth, like the fourth, fifth.
is distributed by two branches to the opposed sides of the middle and
ring fingers it receives a branch of junction from the ulnar nerve.
On the sides of the fingers the nerves are superficial to the arteries, Termi
T
274 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
nation on the sides of the fin- gers.
Dissec- tion of deep tendons.
Tendons of superflexor
in the hand.
and reach to the last phalanx, where they end in filaments for the pulp of the front of the finger, and for the skin beneath the nail. In their
course forwards, the nerves supply chiefly tegumentary branches : one
of these is directed backwards by the side of the metacarpal phalanx,
and after uniting with the digital nerve on the back of the finger, is
continued to the dorsum of the last phalanx.
Dissection. -Cut through the ulnar artery below the origin of
the profunda branch, and having divided also the small superficial
volar branch (of the radial) , throw forwards the arch to the
fingers. Divide next the ulnar and median nerves below the
annular ligament, and turn them forwards. Finally, make a longitudinal incision through the centre of the annular ligament, without injuring the small muscles that arise from it, and turn the
pieces of the ligament to the sides. The tendons of the flexor
muscles can now be followed to their termination, and the sheaths
of the fingers may be opened for the purpose of observing their
insertion.
Tendons of the flexor sublimis. -Beneath the annular
ficial ligament, the tendons of the flexor sublimis are superficial
to those of the deep flexor ; and the four tendons are nearly
on the same level, instead of being arranged in pairs as in
the fore-arm. Crossing the palm of the hand, the tendons
enter the sheaths of the fingers, and are inserted by two
processes into the margins of the middle phalanx, about the
When first entering the digital sheath, the tendon
of the flexor sublimis conceals that of the flexor profundus ;
Are slit but near the front of the first phalanx it is slit for the passage ofthe tendon of the latter muscle.
Inser- tion.
for the deep flexor.
Dissec- tion .
Tendons ofdeep flexor
centre.
Dissection. Cut through the flexor sublimis muscle above the
wrist, and throw its tendons towards the fingers.
Tendons ofthe flexor profundus. -At the lower border of
the annular ligament the tendinous mass of the flexor profundus is divided into four pieces ; but in the fore- arm only
one tendon (that of the fore- finger) is distinct from the rest.
cross the From the ligament the four tendons are directed through
the hand to the fingers. At the root of the finger each enters
the digital sheath with a tendon of the flexor sublimis, and
to their having passed through that tendon, is inserted into the base
of the last phalanx.
hand
inser.
tion.
THE PALM OF THE HAND. 275
sac surtendons.
In the hand the tendons of the deep flexor give attach- Synovial
ment to the small lumbrical muscles. Beneath the annular rounds
ligament the tendons of the deep and superficial flexor are
surrounded by a large and loose synovial membrane, which
projects upwards into the fore- arm, and downwards to the
hand.
cal musattached
flexor
phalanx .
ence in
The LUMBRICALES MUSCLES are four small fleshy slips Lumbrithat are connected with the tendons of the deep flexor. They cles are
arise from the outer side of the tendons, near the annular to deep
ligament, and keeping on the same side of the tendons are
inserted into an aponeurotic expansion on the dorsal aspect
of the first or carpal phalanx. These muscles are concealed and first
for the most part by the tendons and vessels that have been
removed ; but they are subcutaneous between the processes of Differthe palmar fascia. The outer two arise from single tendons, origin .
but each of the others is connected with two tendons.
Tendon ofthe flexor pollicis longus. —Beneath the an- Tendon
nular ligament this tendon is external to those of the flexor flexor of
profundus ; it then turns outwards between the heads of the
flexor brevis pollicis, and is inserted into the last phalanx to its inof the thumb. A separate synovial membrane surrounds
it, and is prolonged into the sheath that binds it to the
phalanges.
-
oflong
thumb
sertion.
tion of
and little
Dissection. After dividing the flexor profundus above the Dissecwrist, throw it and the lumbricales muscles towards the fingers, muscles
but preserve two small nerves that enter the two inner muscles. of thumb
By the removal of the tendons the deep palmar arch of the radial finger.
artery and the interossei muscles come into view. The dissector
is next to prepare the small muscles of the ball of the thumb and
of the little finger. Some care is necessary in order to make a
satisfactory separation of the different small muscles : those of the
little finger are most easily dissected .
-
muscles
ball of
thumb,
Short muscles ofthe thumb. - These are four in number, Four
and are named from their action on the thumb. The most in the
superficial is the abductor pollicis ; and beneath it is the the
opponens pollicis, which is fixed to the whole length of theviz.
metacarpal bone. To the inner side of the last is the short
flexor ; and the wide muscle coming from the second metacarpal bone is the adductor of the thumb.
T 2
276 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Abduc- tor.
The ABDUCTOR POLLICIS is thin and narrow, and is superficial to the rest. It arises from the annular ligament and
Attach- the os trapezium, and is inserted into the base of the first
phalanx of the thumb, some fibres also joining the extensor
tendon on the dorsum of the bone. The muscle is subments.
Is the most su- perficial . cutaneous, and rests on the opponens pollicis.
Dissec- tion .
Oppo- nens is
fixed to the meDissection. Cut through the abductor, and the opponens pollicis will be seen. To separate the opponens from the short flexor
on the inner side, the student should begin near the farther end of
the metacarpal bone, where there is usually a cellular interval.
The OPPONENS POLLICIS arises from the annular ligament
and the os trapezium, and is inserted into the whole length
tacarpal of the metacarpal bone of the thumb. This muscle is partly
concealed by the preceding, though it is larger and projects on
each side. Along its inner border is the flexor brevis pollicis.
bone,
and is beneath former.
Flexor brevis
two
and is inserted
The FLEXOR BREVIS POLLICIS consists of two parts (inner
and outer), and is the largest of the short muscles of the
arises by thumb. The outer part or head arises from the annular
heads, ligament and the ridge of the os trapezium ; whilst the inner
head arises from the os trapezoides, and from the os magnum and the base of the third metacarpal bone. The heads
are soon blended in one mass that is inserted by two parts
into the sides of the base of the first phalanx of the thumb, —
the inner piece being united with the adductor, and the
outer with the abductor pollicis. A sesamoid bone is connected with each lateral piece of insertion. The tendon
deepin of the long flexor lies on this muscle, occupying the interval between its processes of insertion ; and the deep
palmar arch comes from beneath it.
by two heads.
It is
the hand.
Adduc- tor crosses from
metacarThe ADDUCTOR POLLICIS is pointed at the thumb, and
wide at the opposite end. Its origin is fixed to the lower
third two thirds of the metacarpal bone ofthe middle finger, on the
pal bone, anterior aspect ; and its insertion is attached, with that of the
short flexor, to the inner side ofthe first phalanx ofthe thumb.
is by the The cutaneous surface is in contact with the tendons of the
flexor profundus and their lumbrical muscles ; and the deep
surface lies over (in this position) the abductor indicis in
deep in the first interosseous space, and on the second and third
metacarpal bones and the intervening muscles.
side of the short flexor,
and
thehand.
THE PALM OF THE HAND. 277
-
three Short muscles ofthe little finger. There are commonly Two or
two muscles in the ball of the little finger, —an abductor muscles
and an adductor. Sometimes there is a short flexor muscle finger.
between the other two.
to little
ductor
most exThe ABDUCTOR MINIMI DIGITI is the most internal of the An abshort muscles. It arises from the pisiform bone and the
tendon of the flexor carpi ulnaris, and is inserted into the is the
base ofthe first phalanx of the little finger, but an offset is ternal.
sent to the extensor tendon on the back of the phalanx.
The palmaris brevis partly conceals the muscle.
brevis is
sent.
The FLEXOR BREVIS MINIMI DIGITI appears to be only a Flexor
part of the abductor. Placed at the radial border of the often abpreceding muscle, it takes origin fromthe unciform bone and
the annular ligament, and is inserted with the abductor into
the first phalanx . It lies on the adductor, and near its origin Is on the
it is separated from the abductor muscle by the deep branch side of
of both the ulnar artery and nerve. ding.
inner
precenens
to meThe ADDUCTOR vel OPPONENS DIGITI MINIMI resembles Oppothe opponens pollicis in being inserted all the length of the
metacarpal bone. Its origin is attached to the unciform
bone and the annular ligament, and the insertion is fixed is fixed
into the anterior aspect of the metacarpal bone of the little tacarpal
finger. It is partly overlaid by the preceding muscles ; Isthe
and beneath it the deep branches of the ulnar artery and ternal.
nerve pass.
bone.
most intion of
arch and
Dissection. -Detach the inner head of the flexor brevis pollicis Dissecat its origin, and seek the radial artery which here enters the palm deep
of the hand between the first two metacarpal bones. Clean the
deep palmar arch, and dissect out at the same time the offsets of
the deep branch of the ulnar nerve. A fascia which covers the interinterossei muscles is to be removed after the dissector has observed muscles.
its connection with the transverse ligament that unites the heads
of the metacarpal bones.
-
ossei
artery in RADIAL ARTERY IN THE HAND. The radial artery Radial
enters the palm of the hand at the first interosseous space, hand
between the heads of the abductor indicis muscle ; and
after furnishing one branch to the thumb and another to the
index finger, turns across the hand towards its ulnar side,
thus forming the deep palmar arch.
T 3
278 . DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
forms deep arch
lies near
bones
The deep palmar arch extends from the first interosseous
space to the base of the metacarpal bone of the little finger,
where it joins the communicating (profunda) branch of the
which ulnar artery. In its course across the hand, the radial
carpal artery forms the arch, whose convexity is directed forwards,
and whose position is nearer the carpal bones, and more posterior than that of the superficial arch. Having a deep
position in the hand, the arch lies on the metacarpal bones
and the interossei muscles ; but is covered by the long flexor
all mus- tendons, and in part by the inner head of the flexor brevis
Branch- pollicis. The branches of the deep palmar arch are the
arch. following : -
and be- neath
cles.
es of the
Recur- rent.
Perfo- rating.
Inter- Osseous.
Other branches
a. Recurrent branches pass from the concavity ofthe arch to the
front of the carpus, supplying the bones, and anastomosing with the
other carpal arteries. b. Three perforating arteries pierce the
interossei muscles to anastomose with the interosseous arteries on
the back of the hand. c. Usually there are three palmar interosseous arteries, which occupy the three inner spaces between the
metacarpal bones, and terminate by joining the digital branches of
the superficial palmar arch at the clefts of the fingers : these
branches supply the interosseous muscles, and vary much in their
size and distribution.
Branches of the radial artery. ――-As soon as the radial
of radial. artery enters the hand, it gives off the large artery of the
thumb, and the digital branch of the index finger.
Digital artery The large artery of the thumb (art. princeps pollicis) runs along
the metacarpal bone of the thumb between the abductor indicis
thumb. and the flexor brevis pollicis, to reach the interval between the
ofthe
Digital artery of
processes of insertion of the last muscle. Here the artery divides
into the two collateral digital branches of the thumb, which unite
in an arch on the last phalanx, as in the fingers. The distribution
of these is the same as that of the arteries of the superficial arch.
The digital branch of the index finger (art. radialis indicis) is the fore- directed over the abductor indicis, and beneath the short flexor finger.
and the adductor pollicis to the radial side of the fore-finger. At the lower border of the abductor indicis this branch is connected
by an offset with the superficial arch ; and at the end of the finger
it unites with the digital branch furnished to the opposite side by the ulnar artery.
THE PALM OF THE HAND. 279
branch
nerve.
The deep branch of the ulnar nervé in the hand accom- Deep
panies the deep palmar arch of the radial artery as far as of ulnar
the muscles of the thumb, and terminates in branches to
the adductor pollicis, the inner head of the short flexor, and
the abductor indicis.
lar off- Branches. Near its origin the nerve furnishes branches to the Muscumuscles of the little finger. In the palm it gives a branch to each sets.
palmar and dorsal interosseous muscle of the three inner spaces ;
and the branches of the inner two palmar interossei supply twigs
to the inner two lumbrical muscles.
ment of
metacarbones.
The transverse metacarpal ligament connects together the Ligaheads of the metacarpal bones. Its cutaneous surface is heads of
hollowed where the flexor tendons cross it ; and beneath it pal
the interossei muscles pass to their insertion. To the posterior border is united the fascia that covers the interossei
muscles. This ligament should be taken away to see the
interossei muscles.
inter- The INTEROSSEI MUSCLES are so named from their posi- Seven
tion between the metacarpal bones, and are seven in number. ossei muscles,
Two muscles occupy each space, except the first, in which
there is only one, and they are inserted into the first phalanx
of each finger. All these small muscles are evident in the divided
palm of the hand, but some project more than the others, palmar
giving rise to the distinction of palmar and dorsal in- sal .
'terossei.
into
and dorgin of
sal sets.
The palmar muscles are three in number, and are smaller than Number
the dorsal set, although they project most into the palm. Undi- and orivided at the posterior part, they arise from the palmar surface of palmar
the metacarpal bones of the fingers on which they act, viz. those of
the fore, ring, and little fingers. The dorsal interossei extend far- and dor.
ther back than the palmar set, and arise by a double head from
the lateral surfaces of the two metacarpal bones, between which
they lie. The dorsal muscles are thus allotted to the fingers : two
belong to the middle finger, one to the fore, and one to the ring
finger. The first muscle of this set is noticed separately below,
under the name abductor indicis.
mon in- Both sets of muscles have a similar termination. Thus the Comfibres end in a tendon which is inserted into the side of the first sertion
or carpal phalanx, and sends an expansion to join the aponeurotic
covering of that phalanx. But the side of the phalanx to which
ofboth
T 4
280 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
insertion Special each muscle is directed, will be remembered by a reference to its
of each action. Thus the palmar set draw towards the middle finger the
muscle. other three fingers, and are so attached as to produce that result.
But the dorsal set abduct the fore and ring fingers from the middle
finger ; and the two muscles that are connected with the middle
finger will carry this to the right and left of a line passing through its centre.
First dorsal
seous
distinct
The abductor indicis, or the first dorsal interosseous muscle,
interos- arises from the whole of the metacarpal bone of the index
finger, and from half that of the thumb ; and is inserted into
is a large the radial side of the first phalanx of the fore-finger. By
muscle the palmar surface the muscle is in contact with the adductor and flexor brevis pollicis ; and by the opposite surperfo- face it is subcutaneous. The radial artery perforates it to
radial enter the palm.
rated by
artery.
Dissec- tion .
Annular ligament
ofwrist.
Dissection. -Take away the small muscles of the thumb and
little finger from the annular ligament, and trace the attachments
of the ligament to the carpal bones on each side. Afterwards put
together the ends of the cut ligament.
The anterior annular ligament is a firm ligamentous
of front band that arches over the flexor tendons of the fingers. It
is attached externally to the front of the os scaphoides and
the ridge of the os trapezium, and internally to the unciform
and pisiform bones. By its upper border it is connected
with the aponeurosis of the fore-arm, and by its lower border
with the palmar fascia. On the cutaneous surface lie the
palmaris longus and the ulnar artery and nerve.
Dissec- tion .
Insertion of ten- don of flexor carpi radialis.
Insertion
Dissection.- Next follow the tendon ofthe flexor carpi radialis
to its insertion, and dissect out more fully the attachment of the
biceps and brachialis anticus muscles to the bones of the fore- arm.
The tendon ofthe flexor carpi radialis, in passing from
the fore-arm to the hand, lies in the groove in the os
trapezium, between the attachments of the annular ligament.
Here it is bound down by a fibrous sheath, which continues
to its insertion into the base of the metacarpal bone of the
index finger.
The insertion of the brachialis anticus takes place by a
chialis broad, thick tendon into the anterior part of the coronoid ofbraanticus.
THE BACK OF THE FORE-ARM. 281
process of the ulna. If the muscle is cut across, its origin
from the articulation of the elbow will come into view.
-
tion of
biceps
Insertion of the biceps. The tendon of the biceps is Inser
inserted behind the tubercle of the radius, and a bursa is the
found between it and the bone. Near its attachment the tendon.
tendon changes the direction of its surfaces ; the anterior
surface becoming external, and vice versa. The supinator
brevis muscle partly surrounds the insertion.
SECTION VI.
THE BACK OF THE FORE-ARM.
the
Dissection. -TURN over the limb, and place a small block be- Take away the neath the wrist. Remove the fascia and the cutaneous nerves and superfi- cial ves- vessels from the muscles of the fore-arm, and from the tendons on sels and
the back of the hand ; but leave untouched a thickened band of fascia.
fascia (posterior annular ligament) opposite the carpus. If the
integument has not been taken from the fingers, let the dissector
proceed to remove it, in order that the tendons may be traced to
the ends of the fingers. The several muscles should be separated
from one another at their origin, especially the radial extensors of the wrist.
ligament
the
The posterior annular ligament consists of the aponeu- Annular
rosis of the fore-arm, which is thickened by the addition of behind
some transverse fibres opposite the lower ends of the bones wrist.
of the fore-arm. This ligamentous band is connected at the
outer part to the radius, and at the inner to the pisiform
bone. It confines the extensor tendons, and sends downwards processes which are fixed to the bones, forming
sheaths for those tendons.
layers of
cial has
Muscles of the back of the fore-arm.— Here the muscles Two
are arranged in a superficial and deep layer, like those of muscles.
the front of the fore-arm. The superficial layer is com- Superfiposed of seven muscles, which arise mostly by a common seven
tendon from the outer condyle of the humerus, and have the viz.
undermentioned position one to another. Proceeding from
without inwards, the student will find successively the long
supinator, two radial extensors of the wrist (long and short),
muscles,
282 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Supi- nator
from
serted
the common extensor of the fingers, the extensor of the
little finger, and lastly the ulnar extensor of the wrist. One
other small muscle near the elbow is the anconeus.
The SUPINATOR RADII LONGUS is contained partly in the
longus arm and partly in the fore-arm, and limits on the outer side
arises the hollow in front of the elbow. The muscle arises from
humerus the outer part of the humerus along two thirds of the line
leading to the outer condyle, and from the front of the external intermuscular septum . The fleshy fibres end in a
tendon above the middle of the fore- arm, by means of which
and is in- the muscle is inserted into the base of the styloid process of
into the radius. In the arm the margins of the supinator are
directed forwards and backwards, but in the fore-arm the
muscle is flattened over the others, and its edges have an
Is super- opposite direction . Near its insertion the supinator is
crossed by two extensors of the thumb. Along its inner
hollow border, below the elbow, is the radial artery ; and above the
joint it is in contact with the brachialis anticus. Beneath
this muscle are found the extensors of the wrist, the radial
nerve, and the radius.
radius.
ficial, and forms part of
in front of the elbow.
Exten- sor carpi longus is nearly
as the
The EXTENSOR CARPI RADIALIS LONGIOR arises from the
lower third of the outer condyloid ridge of the humerus,
as long and from the front of the contiguous intermuscular septum.
prece- The muscle descends on the short radial extensor ; and its ding.
tendon passes beneath the extensors of the thumb, and
through the annular ligament, to be inserted into the base of
the metacarpal bone of the index finger. Along its outer
border is the radial nerve.
Inser- tion .
Exten- sor carpi
is conthe fore- arm .
The EXTENSOR CARPI RADIALIS BREVIOR arises from the
brevis outer condyle of the humerus by a tendon common to it and
tained in the three following muscles, viz. the common extensor of
the fingers, the extensor of the little finger, and the ulnar
extensor of the wrist : it also takes origin from aponeuroses on its under and inner sides. The tendon of the
muscle is closely connected with the preceding, and after
passing with it through the same compartment of the annular ligament, is inserted into the base of the metacarpal
into me bone of the middle finger. Concealed by the two preceding
bone. muscles, this extensor rests on the radius and on some of
Inser- tion
tacarpal
THE BACK OF THE FORE-ARM. 283
common the muscles attached to it ; that is to say, on the supinator Has a
brevis, the pronator teres, and the extensor ossis metacarpi origin
pollicis. Along the inner side is the common extensor of three
the fingers, and the extensors of the thumb come between ing.
the two.
arm.
with
followextensor
the foreThe EXTENSOR COMMUNIS DIGITORUM is single at its origin, Common
but is divided inferiorly into four tendons. It arises from muscle.
the common tendon, from aponeurotic septa between it and Origin in
the muscles around, and from the aponeurosis of the fore- arm.
Near the lower part of the fore- arm the muscle ends
in three tendons, which pass through a compartment of the
annular ligament with the indicator muscle. Escaping from
the ligament, the most internal tendon divides into two, and
all four are directed along the back of the hand , to their
insertion into the two last phalanges of the fingers.
tion of
dons
pha.
On the back of the fingers the tendons have the following Inserdisposition : -Opposite the metacarpo-phalangeal articula- the tention each tendon sends down lateral bands to join the cap- into the
sule ; and on the dorsum of the first phalanx it forms an langes.
expansion with the tendons of the lumbricales and interossei muscles. At the anterior part of the first phalanx this
tendinous expansion is divided into three parts : the central
one is fixed into the base of the second phalanx, whilst the
lateral pieces unite at the front of the second phalanx, and
are inserted into the last. On the fore and little fingers the
expansion is joined by their special tendons.
tions of
cle.
This muscle is placed between the extensors of the wrist Connecand little finger, and conceals the deep extensors. The tendon the musof the ring finger is united by an oblique band with each
collateral tendon, so as to prevent the raising of that finger
if the other fingers are closed.
sor of
finger.
The EXTENSOR MINIMI DIGITI is the most slender muscle on Extenthe back of the fore-arm, and appears to be but a part oflittle
the common extensor. Its origin is in common with that of Common
the extensor communis, but it passes through a distinct origin
sheath ofthe annular ligament ; and its tendon, which is split
into two directly afterwards, ends by joining the common ten and terdinous expansion on the first phalanx of the little finger.
mina- tion.
The EXTENSOR CARPI ULNARIS MUSCLE arises from the Exten.
284 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
ulnaris.
sor carpi common tendon, from the posterior border of the ulna below
the anconeus muscle ( about the middle third), and from the
Origin. aponeurosis of the fore-arm. The tendon of the muscle becomes free from fleshy fibres near the annular ligament, and
passes through a separate sheath in that structure to be
inserted into the base of the metacarpal bone of the little
finger. Beneath this extensor is the deep layer of muscles
mostin with part of the ulna. On the outer side is the extensor of
the little finger.
Inser- tion.
Is the
ternal muscle.
Anco- neus has
a dis- tinct origin
The ANCONEUS is a small triangular muscle near the
elbow joint, which arises from the outer condyle of the
humerus by a tendon distinct from and posterior to the
common tendon of origin of the other muscles. From this
and in- origin the fibres diverge to their insertion into the olecranon,
sertion ;
and into the impression near it on the posterior surface of
is close the ulna. The upper fibres are contiguous to the lowest of
triceps. the triceps muscle ; and beneath the anconeus are the supinator brevis muscle and the recurrent interosseous vessels.
to the
Dissec- tion of deep layer of muscles
Dissection. - Detach the extensor communis, extensor minimi
digiti, and extensor carpi ulnaris from their origin, and turn them
aside. Small branches of the posterior interosseous nerve and
artery, which will be seen entering the muscles, may be divided.
Take away the cellular membrane from the muscles and from the
and in- ramifications of the posterior interosseous artery and nerve.
teros- seous vessels and nerve.
Five musc'es
deep layer,
viz.
A
slender part of the nerve, that sinks beneath one muscle (extensor
of the second phalanx of the thumb) , about the middle of the
fore-arm, should be taken care of. The separation between the
small muscles of the thumb, especially between the two highest, is
not always very distinct.
- Deep layer of muscles. In this layer there are five
in the small muscles, viz. one supinator of the fore-arm and four
special extensor muscles of the thumb and fore-finger. The
highest muscle, that partly surrounds the upper end of the
radius, is the supinator brevis. Below this are three extensors of the thumb in the following order-one of the metacarpal bone, one of the first, and one of the second phalanx.
On the ulna the indicator muscle is placed.
Exten- sor me- The EXTENSOR OSSIS METACARPI POLLICIS is the largest of
tacarpi the extensor muscles of the thumb, and is sometimes united pollicis
THE BACK OF THE FORE-ARM. 285
wide
ment.
tion.
with the supinator brevis. It arises from the posterior has a
surfaces of the radius and ulna, for about three inches below attachthe supinator, and from the intervening interosseous membrane. The tendon of the muscle is directed outwards over
the radial extensors of the wrist, and through the outer
compartment in the annular ligament, to be inserted into Inserthe base of the metacarpal bone of the thumb. The muscle
is at first concealed by the common extensor of the fingers ;
but it becomes cutaneous between the last muscle and the The muscle is extensors of the wrist, about two inches above the end of at first deep,
the radius. Opposite the carpus the radial artery winds but afterbackwards beneath its tendon. Between the contiguous superborders of this muscle and the supinator brevis, the posterior
interosseous artery appears.
wards
ficial.
sor of
lanx of
small
and lies
The EXTENSOR PRIMI INTERNODII POLLICIS is the smallest Extenmuscle of the deep layer, and its tendon is closely connected first phawith that of the preceding extensor. Its origin is about an thumb
inch in extent on the radius and the interosseous membrane, has a
close below the attachment of the preceding muscle. Its origin,
fibres end in a tendon which passes with the extensor of the with premetacarpal bone through the same space in the annular
ligament, and is inserted into the carpal end of the first Inserphalanx of the thumb. With respect to surrounding parts, the
this muscle has the same connections as the previous one.
ceding.
tion into
thumb.
sor of
in the
ligaThe EXTENSOR SECUNDI INTERNODII POLLICIS arises from Extenthe ulna, its middle third, and from the interosseous mem- second phalanx brane. Its tendon of insertion, after passing through alies alone
sheath in the annular ligament distinct from that of the annular
other two extensor muscles, is directed along the dorsum of ment.
the thumb to be fixed to the base of the last phalanx. It is Insercovered by the same muscles as the other two extensors of
the thumb, but it becomes superficial nearer the lower end Is lower
of the radius. Below the annular ligament its tendon precedcrosses the radial artery, and the tendons of the extensors of
the wrist.
tion.
than the
ing two.
cator The EXTENSOR INDICIS (indicator muscle) arises from the Indimiddle part of the ulna, and slightly from the lower part of muscle.
the interosseous membrane. Near the annular ligament Origin.
the tendon becomes free from muscular fibres, and passing It is ap-
286 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
common exten- sor,
and inplied to through the ligament with the common extensor of the
fingers, is applied to the external tendon of that muscle,
and becomes blended with it in the expansion on the first
phalanx of the fore-finger. Until this muscle has passed
the ligament it is covered by the superficial layer, but afterwards it is subfascial.
serted with it .
Dissec- tion of supi- nator
Dissection. For the complete display of the supinator brevis,
it will be necessary to detach the anconeus from the external conbrevis. dyle of the humerus, and to cut through the supinator longus and
the radial extensors of the wrist. Afterwards, the student is to
follow forwards its fibres to their insertion into the radius, and to
remove that part of the origin of the flexor profundus digitorum,
which lies on the outer side of the insertion of the brachialis
anticus.
Origin of short
tor ;
and in- sertion
into the
The SUPINATOR BREVIS arises from the orbicular ligasupina- ment of the radius and from the external lateral ligament
of the elbow joint ; from a depression below the small sigmoid cavity of the ulna, and from the external margin of the
last bone for about two inches. From this origin the fibres
pass outwards, and are inserted into the upper third of the
radius, as far forwards as the tubercle and the oblique line
on it. This supinator is altogether concealed at the posterior and external aspects of the limb by the muscles of the
superficial layer, and anteriorly the radial artery and nerve
and con- lie over it. The lower border is contiguous to the extensor ossis metacarpi pollicis, only the posterior interosseous
artery intervening. Through the substance of the muscle
the posterior interosseous nerve winds to the back of the
limb.
radius.
Over- lying
tiguous parts.
Poste- rior in- teros- seous artery
The posterior interosseous artery is an offset from the
common interosseous artery (p. 265.), and reaches the back
of the fore-arm above the interosseous ligament. Passing
between the contiguous borders of the supinator brevis and
extensor ossis metacarpi, the artery descends between the
the two superficial and deep layer of muscles nearly to the wrist,
layers of
muscles. where it ends by anastomosing with the carpal and anterior interosseous arteries. It furnishes many muscular
offsets, and the following recurrent branch :
is be- tween
-
THE BACK OF THE FORE-ARM. 287
current The recurrent branch springs from the artery near its commence- Its rement, and ascends through some fibres of the supinator, but be- branch.
neath the anconeus, to supply the elbow joint, and to anastomose
with a long branch of the superior profunda artery in the last
named muscle.
seous nerve.
to musThe posterior interosseous nerve takes its origin from Interosthe musculo-spiral trunk in front of the outer condyle of
the humerus, and winds backwards through the fibres of the
supinator brevis. Escaped from the supinator, the nerve Position
is placed between the superficial and deep layers of the cles."
muscles as far as the middle of the fore-arm. Much reduced
in size at this spot, it sinks beneath the extensor of the
second phalanx of the thumb, and runs on the interosseous
membrane to the back of the carpus. Finally, the nerve Termienlarges beneath the tendons of the extensor communis
digitorum, and terminates in filaments to the ligaments and
the articulations of the carpus.
-
nation on back of the carpus,
Muscular branches. This nerve furnishes branches to all the Its mus- cular off.. muscles of the deep layer ; and to those of the superficial layer, sets .
except the anconeus, the supinator longus, and the extensor carpi
radialis longior.
-
artery on
wrist.
tions
RADIAL ARTERY AT THE WRIST. At the wrist the Radial
radial artery winds below the end of the radius to the back back of
of the carpus, and enters the palm of the hand at the first
interosseous space, between the heads of origin of the first
dorsal interosseous muscle. At first the vessel lies deeply Connecon the external lateral ligament of the wrist joint, and is with
beneath the extensor tendons of the metacarpal bone and around.
first phalanx of the thumb ; but afterwards it is more
superficial, and is crossed by the tendon of the extensor of
the second phalanx of the thumb. Offsets of the external
cutaneous nerve twine around the artery. Its branches are Branchnumerous, but inconsiderable in size.
parts
es are small.
of car.
pus.
a. The dorsal carpal branch passes transversely beneath the To back
extensor tendons, and forms an arch with the corresponding offset
of the ulnar artery. From this arch branches descend to the third
and fourth interosseous spaces, constituting the dorsal interosseous
arteries.
288 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Meta- b. The metacarpal or first dorsal interosseous branch reaches the
branch. space between the second and third metacarpal bones, and anas- carpal
Dorsal arteries of the thumb
and fore.
finger.
Sheaths ofthe
ligasix.
from
inwards.
tomoses, like the corresponding arteries of the other spaces, with a
perforating branch of the deep palmar arch. Finally, it is continued to the cleft of the fingers, where it ends by joining the
digital artery of the superficial palmar arch, and giving small
dorsal branches to the index and middle fingers.
c. Two small dorsal arteries of the thumb arise opposite the metacarpal bone of the thumb, along which they extend, one on each
border, to be distributed on its posterior aspect.
d. The dorsal branch of the index finger is distributed on the
radial edge of the metacarpal bone of the finger.
The different compartments of the annular ligament may
annular now be more completely examined by dividing the sheaths
ment are of the ligament over the different tendons passing beneath.
There are six different spaces, which are lubricated by
Position synovial membranes. The most external one lodges the
without two first extensors of the thumb ; the next is a large hollow
for the two radial extensors of the wrist ; and a very small
space for the extensor of the second phalanx of the thumb
follows on the ulnar side. Still to the inner side is the
common sheath for the extensor of the fingers and that of
the fore-finger ; but there is a separate internal compartment
for the extensor of the little finger. And internal to all is
the space for the extensor carpi ulnaris. The last muscle
grooves the ulna, but all the others lie in hollows in the
radius in the order mentioned above.
Bones grooved bythe tendons.
To see Dissection. -- If the supinator brevis is divided by a vertical
tor bre- incision, and raised from the radius, its attachment will be better supinavis ,
interos- seous nerve,
and in- terossei
seen.
Cut through the tendons of the extensor of the fingers and indicator muscle at the wrist, and follow the posterior interosseous
nerve, as well as the offsets from its gangliform enlargement.
Clean also the dorsal aspect of the posterior interossei muscles
muscles. of the hand, and observe their double origin, and their central
tendon of insertion into the side, and on the dorsum of the phalanges. The posterior perforating arteries appear between the
heads of origin of these muscles.
LIGAMENTS OF THE ELBOW. 289
SECTION VII.
LIGAMENTS OF THE ELBOW, WRIST, AND HAND.
FOR the examination of the remaining articulations of the
limb, the student should moisten the ligaments that have
become dry.
Dissection. -
tion of
elbow
To make the necessary dissection of the ligaments Dissecof the elbow joint, take away the brachialis anticus from the front the
of the joint, and the triceps from the back of it ; detach also the joint.
muscles from the outer and inner condyles, as well as the supinator
brevis and flexor profundus. By means of a little cleaning, the
four ligaments — anterior, posterior, and two lateral — will come
into view. Afterwards the muscles may be removed from the
interosseous membrane of the fore-arm, both on the anterior and
posterior aspects.
- -
elbow
THE ELBOW JOINT. -In this articulation the lower end of Bones forming the humerus is received into the hollow of the ulna, so as to the
constitute a hinge-joint ; and the upper end of the radius joint.
likewise forms a part of the joint. Where the bones touch, The ligathe surfaces are covered with cartilage, and their articular are
ends are kept in place by the following ligaments : —
ments
lateral.
The external lateral ligament is a roundish fasciculus, External
which is attached by its upper end to the outer condyle of
the humerus, and by its lower end to the orbicular ligament
around the head of the radius. A few of the posterior fibres
pass backwards to the upper part of the external margin of the ulna.
lateral
attachThe internal lateral ligament is triangular in shape : it is Internal
pointed at its upper end, and is connected to the inner is wide.
condyle of the humerus. The fibres diverge as they descend,
and are inserted thus : -The anterior ones, which are the Inferior
strongest, are fixed to the inner edge of the coronoid pro- ments.
cess ; the posterior are attached to the inner side of the
olecranon ; whilst the middle fibres join a transverse ligamentous band between the olecranon and the coronoid process. The ulnar nerve is in contact with this ligament ;
U
A notch
290 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
on inner and some vessels enter the joint by an aperture beneath the side of thejoint. transverse band.
Anterior ligament The anterior ligament is very thin, and its fibres are
is thin. separated by intervals containing fat. By its upper margin
the ligament is inserted into the front of the humerus, and
by its lower margin into the anterior part of the coronoid
process and the orbicular ligament. The brachialis anticus
muscle arises from the ligament, and conceals it.
Poste rior ligament is weakest.
Dissec- tion.
Synovial memThe posterior ligament is thinner than the anterior, and is
completely covered by the triceps muscle. Superiorly it is
attached to the humerus above the fossa for the olecranon,
and inferiorly it is inserted into the olecranon. Some fibres
are transverse between the margins of the fossa before
mentioned.
Dissection. -Open the joint by an incision across the front, near
the humerus, and disarticulate the bones, in order that the
synovial membrane, and the form of the articular surfaces, may be
seen.
The synovial membrane covers the articular ends of the
brane. bones, and can be traced from one to another along the
inner surface of the connecting ligaments. It projects between the head of the radius and the orbicular ligament,
and between the head of that bone and the small sigmoid
cavity.
Lower end of
merus.
One surradius,
Articular surfaces of the bones. The humerus presents
the hu- inferiorly two distinct articular surfaces for the bones of the
fore-arm. The one for the radius is on the outer side, and face for consists of a rounded eminence on the front of the bone,
which is covered with cartilage only on the anterior aspect :
between it and the surface that corresponds to the ulna
another is a slight hollow. The surface in contact with the ulna is
limited internally and externally by a prominent ridge, and
is hollowed out in the centre like a pulley (trochlea) : the
external ridge corresponds to the interval between the heads
also for of the radius and ulna. On the front of the humerus, above
process, the articular surface, is a depression that receives the
and ole- coronoid process during flexure of the joint ; and on the
for the ulna ;
coronoid
cranon.
posterior aspect is a large fossa for the reception of the olecranon in extension of the fore-arm.
LIGAMENTS OF THE ELBOW. 291
the uln a. On the end of the ulna there is a large excavation ( sig- End of
moid cavity), which is narrow in the centre, but expanded in
front and behind. A slightly raised line extends from front
to back across the cavity, and is received into the hollow of
the trochlea of the humerus.
the The end of the radius presents a circular depression, with End of
a raised margin ; and when it touches the humerus during radius.
the bent state of the joint, the hollow receives the eminence,
and the rim fits into the depression of that bone.
-
is joined UNION OF THE RADIUS AND ULNA. The radius is con- Radius
nected with the ulna, both at the upper and lower ends, by to ulna.
means of distinct ligaments and a synovial membrane ; and
the shafts of the bones are also united by an interosseous
ligament.
Here the head of the At the upper Upper radio-ulnar articulation.
radius is received into the small sigmoid cavity of the ulna, end by
and is kept in place by the following ligamentous band.
lar ligathe head
The annular or orbicular ligament is a strong fasciculus orbicuof fibres, about a quarter of an inch wide, which is placed ment
over the prominence of the head of the radius, and is
attached to the anterior and posterior edges of the small
sigmoid cavity of the ulna. Its upper border is connected around
with the ligaments of the elbow joint, and the lower is ap- of the
plied to the neck of the radius. The radius moves freely in
the socket formed by the ligament and the cavity of the ulna.
The synovial membrane is but a prolongation of that and sylining the elbow joint ; it projects between the neck of the memradius and the lower margin of the annular ligament.
bone,
novial
brane.
joined in
middle
osseous mem- brane.
The interosseous membrane is a thin aponeurotic layer, Radius is
which is attached to the contiguous margins of the radius the
and ulna, so as to form a septum between the muscles on the by interfront and back of the fore- arm. Superiorly the membrane
is wanting for a short space, and through the interval the
posterior interosseous vessels pass backwards. Some small This is
apertures exist in it for the passage of vessels ; and the above.
largest of these is about two inches from the lower margin,
through which the anterior interosseous artery turns to the
back of the wrist. The membrane gives attachment to the
deficient
U 2
292 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
by round liga- ment.
The lower end after.
Dissec- tion.
Bones forming wrist
united by
external lateral,
lateral,
deep muscles. Most of its fibres are directed obliquely inwards towards the ulna, though a few on the posterior surface
have an opposite direction.
The round ligament is a slender band above the interosseous membrane, whose fibres have a direction opposite to
those of the membrane. By one end it is fixed to the front
of the coronoid process, and by the other it is inserted into
the radius below the tubercle. This ligament divides the
space above the interosseous membrane into two parts.
The lower radio- ulnar articulation cannot be seen till after
the examination of the wrist joint.
Dissection. -To see the ligaments of the wrist joint, remove the
tendons and the annular ligament from both its front and back.
Then clean away carefully the cellular membrane and the small
vessels from the surface of the ligaments.
THE WRIST JOINT. The lower end of the radius and
the first row of the carpal bones enter into the wrist joint ;
and four ligaments maintain the bones in contact, viz. anterior
and posterior, and two lateral. The ulna is shut out from
this articulation by means of a piece of cartilage.
The external lateral ligament is a short band that intervenes between the styloid process of the radius and the upper
part of the scaphoid bone.
internal The internal lateral ligament is smaller than the external,
but is longer than it. It is attached by one end to the styloid process of the ulna, and by the other to the rough,
upper part of the cuneiform bone. Some of the anterior
fibres are continued to the pisiform bone.
anterior and
postement.
The anterior ligament takes origin from the ends of the
radius and ulna, and is inserted into the anterior aspect of
the first row of carpal bones, except the os pisiforme.
The posterior ligament is membranous, like the anterior,
rior liga- and its fibres are directed downwards and inwards. Superiorly it is attached to the lower ends of the radius and ulna,
and inferiorly it is fixed after the manner of the anterior
ligament, to the first row of carpal bones, on their posterior
aspect.
LIGAMENTS OF THE WRIST. 293
Dissection. - Open the articulation by a transverse incision Dissecthrough the posterior ligament near the bones of the carpus.
tion .
Articular of ra- surfaces. —The end of the radius and the fibro- Surface
cartilage uniting it with the ulna form an arch for the re- dius.
ception of the carpal bones ; and the surface of the radius
is divided by a prominent line into an external triangular,
and an internal square impression. The three bones of of first
the first carpal row constitute a convex eminence, which is carpal
received into the hollow before mentioned ; the scaphoid
bone corresponding to the external mark of the radius, the
semilunar bone to its square impression, and the cuneiform
bone touching the triangular fibro-cartilage.
row of
bones.
The sac.
synovial membrane covers the surface of the radius Synovial
and the fibro-cartilage, and is reflected along the ligaments
to the bones of the carpus. This membrane sometimes joins
that lining the lower radio-ulnar articulation, by means of an
aperture in the fibro- cartilage separating the two.
LOWER RADIO- ULNAR ARTICULATION. In this articula- Lower ends of
and ulna tion the convexity of the end of the ulna is received into a radius
concavity on the radius ; an arrangement just the opposite joined by
to that which exists between the upper ends of the bones.
Thechief bond of union between the bones is a strong fibrocartilage ; but a kind of capsule, consisting of scattered capsule.
fibres, surrounds loosely the end of the ulna.
gular
cartiments
The triangular fibro-cartilage is placed transversely be- trianneath the end of the ulna, and is thickest at its margins and fibroapex. By its base the cartilage is fixed to the ridge which lage.
separates the carpal from the ulnar articulating surface of Attachthe radius ; and by its apex, to the depression at the root
of the styloid process of the ulna. Its margins are united and conwith the contiguous anterior and posterior ligaments of the
wrist joint ; and its surfaces are covered by two distinct
synovial membranes, viz. those of the wrist and lower
radio-ulnar articulation. Occasionally it is perforated by
an aperture.
nections.
The synovial membrane ( membrana sacciformis ) covers Synovia
U 3
294 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
mem- brane.
Dissec- tion .
Bones are joined into two rows.
How first row
ed.
ligathe upper surface of the triangular cartilage, and the part
of the ulna in contact with it, and ascends between the radius
and the ulna, covering their articular surfaces. This membrane is very loose, from which circumstance it has received
its name.
Dissection. - To see the articulations of the carpal bones, take
away all the tendons from the hand, and clean carefully the surface
of the connecting ligamentous bands. To the pisiform bone there
are distinct ligaments. At the same time, the ligamentous bands
uniting the metacarpal with the carpal bones, and with one another, should be dissected .
UNION OF THE CARPAL BONES. -The several bones of the
carpus are united into two rows by dorsal, palmar, and interosseous bands ; and the two rows are connected together by
separate ligaments.
Bones of the first row. The os semilunare is united
is form- to the contiguous bones, viz. the scaphoid and cuneiform,
by a dorsal and a palmar transverse band, as well as by a
Separate strong interosseous ligament to each. The pisiform bone is
ments of articulated to the front of the unciform bone by a dis- pisiform bone. tinct capsule and a synovial membrane ; and it has further
two special ligaments, -one being attached to the process of
the unciform bone, and the other to the base of the fifth
metacarpal bone.
Second row is The bones ofthe second row are connected together in the
like first. same way as those of the first row, viz. by a dorsal and a
palmar band of fibres from one bone to another.
The two rows are
Between
the os magnum and the bone on each side (unciform and
trapezoid) is an interosseous ligament.
One row with another. - The two rows of carpal bones
joined by are connected by an anterior and posterior, and two lateral
ligaments.
anterior, The anterior ligament consists of irregular fibres, and
intervenes between the two rows on the palmar aspect. The
poste- posterior ligament, which is stronger, and the greater number of whose fibres are transverse, has a corresponding
attachment on the dorsal aspect of the bones. Of the lateral
rior,
and
LIGAMENTS OF THE HAND. 295
liga- ligaments, the external is the strongest, and extends between lateral
the os trapezium and the scaphoid bone, whilst the internal ments.
ligament passes between the cuneiform and unciform bones.
Dissection. -Divide the lateral and posterior ligaments, and Dissecseparate one row of bones from another, to see the articular
surfaces.
tion .
of each
contact.
novial
brane for
carpal
Articular surfaces. —The first row of carpal bones forms Surface
an arch, whose hollow is turned towards the other row.
In row in
the second row, the bones present a condyloid projection,
which is received into the arch before mentioned.
One synovial membrane serves for the articular surfaces One sy.
of all the carpal bones, except that of the pisiform, with memthe unciform bone. Lining the articular surfaces of the all the
joint between the two rows of carpal bones, the membrane bones,
sends upwards and downwards prolongations between the
individual bones. The offsets upwards are two, and sometimes they open into the synovial membrane of the wrist
joint ; but the offsets in the opposite direction are three, and and four
are continued to the articulations between the four inner meta- carpal.
metacarpal and the carpal bones.
inner
carpal
joined
bases
UNION OF THE METACARPAL BONES. -The metacarpal Metabones of the four fingers are connected at their bases by the bones are
following ligaments : -Superficial dorsal and palmar fasci- bytheir
culi of fibres pass from one bone to that next it ; and those
in the palm are the strongest. Besides, there are short
interosseous bands between the contiguous rough surfaces of
the bones.
At their anterior extremities the metacarpal bones are and theirby
bound together by the transverse ligament, which has been heads,
examined in the dissection of the hand (p. 279.).
between
and me.
UNION BETWEEN THE METACARPAL AND CARPAL BONES. Joint
-The metacarpal bones of the fingers are articulated with carpal
the carpal bones after one plan, and have a common synovial tacarpal
membrane ; but that of the thumb has a separate capsule
and synovial membrane.
bones ;
the a. The metacarpal bone of the thumb articulates with the that of
os trapezium, and the ends of the bones are encased in a thumb ,
U 4
296 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
separate articular ligament. The joint is supplied with a
synovial membrane, which is simple in its arrangement.
those of b. The metacarpal bones of the fingers receive longitufingers dinal bands from the carpal bones on both aspects, thus :
other
through dorsal
and palmar bands.
Dissec- tion.
Surface ofthe
the bones.
-
The dorsal ligaments are two to each of the four metacarpal bones, except that of the little finger. The bands
to the metacarpal bone of the fore finger come from the
os trapezium and os trapezoides ; those to the third bone
are from the os magnum and os trapezoides ; those to the
bone of the ring finger from the os magnum and os unciforme ; and to the fifth metacarpal bone there is but one
band from the unciform bone. The palmar ligaments are
weaker than the dorsal, and do not exist on the metacarpal
bones of the fore and little finger. To the metacarpal bone
of the middle finger there are two bands-one from the os magnum and the other from the os unciforme ; and to that of
the ring finger only one ligament passes from the unciform
bone. On the inner side of the metacarpal bone of the ring
finger is an interosseous or lateral band, which comes from
the os magnum and os unciforme.
- Dissection. – Open the articulation between the metacarpus and
carpus on the posterior aspect of the hand, to see the articulating surfaces of the bones.
Articular surfaces. -The metacarpal bone of the foreends of finger presents a hollowed articular surface, which receives
the prominence of the os trapezoides, and articulates laterally with the os trapezium and os magnum. That of the
middle finger articulates with the os magnum. But the
metacarpal bones of the ring and little finger are opposed to
the unciform bone, and do not reach so far back as the other
two.
Inter- Osseous On forcibly separating the carpal bones from one another,
liga- their strong interosseous ligaments will appear, viz. one on ments of carpal each side of the os semilunare in the first row, and on each
and me side of the os magnum in the second row. The interosseous
ligaments between the bases of the metacarpal bones may
likewise be exposed by detaching one from another. Where
the metacarpal bones touch they are covered by articular
tacarpal bones
LIGAMENTS OF THE HAND. 297
cartilage, and the surfaces are lined by prolongations of
the same synovial membrane, that serves for their articulation with the carpus.
tion . Dissection. -Remove, now, the tendons and the tendinous ex- Dissecpansion from the joint between the head of the metacarpal bone
and the first phalanx of the finger. A lateral ligament on each
side, and an inferior thick band will be readily exposed. Another
joint may be opened to see the articular surfaces. The same dissection may be made for the articulations between the phalanges of
the finger.
-
and
UNION BETWEEN THE METACARPAL BONES AND THE FIRST Meta- carpal PHALANGES. In these joints the convex head of the meta- bones
carpal bone is received into the glenoid fossa of the phalanx, phaand the two are retained in contact by the extensor and
flexor tendons, and by the following ligaments :-
langes,
ligaligaThe lateral ligaments are the same on both sides of the Lateral
joint. Each is triangular in form, and is attached by its ments.
upper part to the tubercle on the side of the head of the
metacarpal bone, but it ends below by being inserted into
the side of the phalanx, and into the inferior ligament. The
inferior ligament is a longitudinal band, which is fixed Inferior
firmly to the phalanx, but loosely to the metacarpal bone. ment.
It is almost cartilaginous in consistence, and is grooved for the
flexor tendon to its sides are attached the lateral ligaments.
Covering the upper part of the joint is the extensor tendon,
which serves as a superior ligament, and sends down an expansion on each side of the joint. The synovial membrane Synovial is a simple shut sac, which lines the interior of the joint. brane.
In the articulation of the thumb two sesamoid bones are Joint of
connected with the inferior ligament, and receive most of
the fibres of the lateral ligaments.
memthumb.
the pha- UNION OF THE PHALANGES. The ligaments of the first Joints of
joint are the same as those in the metacarpo-phalangeal arti- langes
culation, viz. two lateral and an inferior.
have
and The lateral ligaments are triangular in form ; and each is lateral
connected by its apex to the side of the phalanx near the
anterior part, and by its base, to the inferior ligament. The inferior
inferior ligament has the same mode of attachment between ment.
liga-
298 DISSECTION OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Surface of the bones.
the extremities of the bones as in the metacarpo-phalangeal joint, but it is not so strong in this articulation. There
is a simple synovial membrane present in the joint.
The articulation of the second with the last phalanx is like
the preceding joint, both in the number and disposition of
its ligaments, and in the surfaces of the bones ; but all the
articular parts are much less strongly marked.
Articular surfaces. The anterior end of each phalanx
is marked by a pulley-like surface, and is received into a
transversely hollowed fossa on the contiguous one ; and the
posterior end of the phalanx is provided with a crest to fit
into the central depression of the opposite articular surface.
CHIEF ARTERIES OF THE UPPER LIMB. 299
TABLE OF THE CHIEF ARTERIES OF THE UPPER LIMB.
The sub.
clavian is continued in the arm by
Superior thoracic
acromial thoracic Muscular inferior acromial humeral thoracic.
long thoracic 1. Axillary artery alar thoracic
subscapular Dorsal artery muscular.
Infra-sca- pular.
anterior circumflex
2. brachial artery ·
posterior circumflex.
To coraco- brachialis
superior profunda
nutritious
inferior profunda
anastomotic muscular.
Recurrent
Muscular to triceps and anconeus anastomotic.
s Muscular to triceps anastomotic.
niuscular superficial volar posterior carpal anterior carpal 3. radial ar- metacarpal tery dorsal of the thumb ofthe index finger princeps pollicis radialis indicis
[deep arch Recurrent perforating interosseous communicating.
Anterior recurrent
posterior recurrent Anterior Nutritious interosseous muscular.
posterior Recurrent muscular. 4. ulnar ar- muscular tery dorsal of the hand, or Dorsal carpal metacarpal
anterior carpal
superficial arch
metacarpal or interosseous.
(Communicating four digital branches cutaneous muscular.
300 VEINS OF THE UPPER LIMB.
Subclavian vein re- ceives the following veins ofthe arm .
TABLE OF THE VEINS OF THE UPPER LIMB.
1. Axillary vein
Basilic
anterior circumflex posterior circumflex subscapular brachial veins alar thoracic long thoracic acromial thoracic superior thoracic
cephalic
Salvatella and dorsal arch anterior ulnar cutaneous posterior ulnar cutaneous median basilic.
Thoracic branches dorsal branch SInfrasca- pular.
[ Cephalic of the thumb and the dorsal arch cutaneous radial veins median cephalic cutaneous ofthe arm.
2. brachial vein
Anastomotic muscular inferior profunda nutritious superior profunda.
(Deep arch
radialis indicis magna pollicis dorsal ofindex finger dorsal ofthumb 3. radial vein metacarpal carpal superficial volar communicating to cutaneRecurrent interosseous perforating.
ous radial muscular [recurrent.
Superficial arch
metacarpal carpal communicating to ulnar cutaneous
Communicating to the deep arch digital .
4. ulnar vein muscular
Anterior {Nutritious interosseous muscular.
posterior Recurrent muscular posterior recurrent carpal.
anterior recurrent.
SPINAL NERVES OF THE UPPER LIMB. 301
TABLE OF THE SPINAL NERVES OF THE UPPER LIMB.
BRACHIAL PLEXUS gives off below the clavicle ·
Anterior thoracic A ·
subscapular
circumflex
nerve of Wrisberg.
internal cutaneous
musculo-cutaneous
median
ulnar
musculo- spiral
{Superficial deep.
Superior inferior Llong.
Articular cutaneous to teres minor to deltoid.
Small cutaneous anterior of fore- arm posterior of fore-arm .
To coraco-brachialis biceps and brachialis anticus cutaneous external of fore- arm larticular to carpus.
To pronator teres to muscles of fore-arm , ex- cept flexor ulnaris and part of profundus anterior interosseous cutaneous palmar to muscles of thumb in part five digital branches.
Articular to elbow to flexor carpi ulnaris to flexor profundus in part cutaneous branch of fore- arm and palm dorsal cutaneous of the hand
superficial palmar division
deep palmar nerve.
Internal cutaneous to triceps and anconeus external cutaneous to supinator and extensor radialis longus
posterior interosseous
radial
·
Communicating two digital branches.
Muscular -{articular.
Cutaneous of back of thumb, and of first two fingers and half the next.
302
CHAPTER IV.
DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
ments of
Situa- tion.
SECTION I.
CAVITY OF THE THORAX.
Ele- THE thorax is formed by the spinal column, by the ribs and
thorax. their muscles, and by the sternum. It is situate between the
upper limbs and above the abdominal division of the body.
In it are contained the lungs, the heart and its great vessels,
together with the parts that pass through the cavity to the
stomach and the diaphragm, or in the opposite direction to
the neck.
Con- tents.
Dissec- tion to open thorax .
Sternum to be kept.
Form of the
Dissection. - When the parts that cover the thorax in front
have been removed, and the structures in the parietes examined,
the cavity is to be opened by the removal of the sternum and the
anterior part of the wall . To make a sufficient opening into the
thorax, saw through the sternum opposite the interval between the
first two ribs, and between the insertion of the cartilages of the
fifth and sixth ribs. After detaching the lining membrane (pleura)
from the inner surface of the chest, cut through all the true ribs,
except the first and last, as far back as the student can conveniently reach. The loose sternum and ribs are to be taken
away, by dividing the intercostal muscles in the first and sixth
spaces. When the bag of the pleura is opened, and the internal
mammary artery cut across, the cavity and the contents of the
thorax will be exposed.
The sternum and the cartilages of the ribs will be hereafter
required for the examination of the ligaments.
Form and boundaries of the thorax.
-
The cavity of the
thorax. thorax is conical in form, and appears, now the lungs are
collapsed, to be only partly filled by the contained viscera ;
but during life, when the lungs are expanded in respiration,
the whole of the space is occupied by those organs.
CAVITY OF THE THORAX. 303
the
neck.
The apex of the cavity is placed upwards at the root of Apex of
the neck, and is wider from side to side than from before cavity
backwards. It is bounded behind by the first dorsal verte- is at the
bra, in front by the sternum, and on each side by the first
rib. Through the space, thus enclosed, pass the trachea and Parts passing the oesophagus, with the great vessels of the head, neck, and through
upper limbs, some nerves of the chest, and the thoracic duct.
All these will be afterwards fully seen.
it.
below, The base of the thorax is also widest transversely, and is Base is
sloped very obliquely from before backwards. The hard
parts around consist of the end of the sternum in front, the
last dorsal vertebra behind, and the ribs below the seventh
on each side. Attached along the line of the base just corrementioned is the diaphragm, which separates the cavities of to dia- phragm .
the abdomen and thorax.
sponding
and The anterior boundary is about half the extent of the pos- Anterior
terior, and is formed by the sternum, the front of the ribs,
and the intercostal muscles ; whilst the posterior part is con- posterior
structed by the spinal column, the back of the ribs, and their
interposed muscles.
wall.
chest inby state
and diaThe width of the thorax is increased during inspiration by size of
the elevation and separation of the ribs ; but the greatest fluenced
alteration in the capacity is occasioned by the condition of the of ribs
diaphragm. During expiration the diaphragm ascends to a phragm,
level with the fourth intercostal space, and during inspiration it descends so as to become almost flat. Naturally, the
height to which the muscle reaches is greater on the right
than on the left side. From the yielding nature of this par- and by
tition between the chest and the abdomen, it is evident that the abthe capacity of the former cavity may be diminished by the and its
presence of fluid in the abdomen, or by the enlargement of
the abdominal viscera.
state of
domen
viscera .
THE PLEURE.
the The pleuræ are two serous membranes, one on each side sac of
of the spine, which are reflected around the lungs in the pleura.
cavity of the thorax, and facilitate the movement of those
organs in respiration.
304 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Form.
tion in
Outer surface.
Each pleura is a sac of a conical form, whose apex projects
into the neck above the first rib, and whose base is in conDisposi tact with the diaphragm. Surrounding the lung, and lining
thorax. the interior of one half of the chest, the serous membrane
consists of a parietal part (pleura costalis), and of a visceral
part (pleura pulmonalis). The outer surface is rough, and
is connected to the lung and the wall of the chest by cellular membrane, but the inner surface is smooth and secerning. The interior of the sac of one side does not communicate with the cavity of that of the opposite side, though the
bags of the pleuræ approach one another in the middle line,
forming a partition (mediastinum) between the two sides of
Inner surface.
Differ- ence in sac of right
the chest.
There are some differences in the shape and the extent of the
two pleural bags. On the right side the bag is shorter and wider
than on the left side, and projects higher into the neck. On the
and left left side the sac is narrowed by the projection of the heart
against it.
side .
The sac is con- The continuity of the bag of the pleura over the lung, and
tinuous along the wall of the chest, may be proved by tracing it
circularly from a given point to the same, in the following
over lung.
The con- tinuity is here traced.
Along middle of
sacs form
manner : -
Supposing the membrane to be followed outwards from the sternum, it may be traced on the walls of the chest as far as the spinal
column ; here it is directed forwards to the root of the lung, and is
reflected over that organ, covering both aspects, and connecting
together its different lobules. From the lung the pleura may be
seen to course over the side of the pericardium to the sternum.
Above the root of the lung the serous membrane forms a circle
without deflection ; and below the root it gives rise to a thin fold
(ligamentum latum pulmonis) , which intervenes between the lung
and the side of the pericardium.
The mediastinum. -Where the pleural bags approach one
chest the another in the middle line, they form, as before said, a para parti- tition, or mediastinum, between the right and left halves of
the thoracic cavity. This septum is not straight between
the sternum and the vertebral column, but is deflected in the
centre by the heart and the great vessels, so as to give
tion.
CONNECTIONS OF THE LUNG. 305
occasion for describing it as consisting of two parts, one in
front of, and one behind the heart.
septum
of the
a space
a. The part infront of the heart (anterior mediastinum) extends Part of
from the back of the sternum to the pericardium, and is formed on in front
each side by the pleural bag. As the pleuræ of opposite sides are heart
not in contact, a space is left between them behind the sternum, encloses
which is narrowed about the middle, and is directed to the left of hourside below. In the upper part of the space are the remains of the
thymus gland and the origin of the sternal muscles of the neck ;
and in the lower part is some cellular tissue, together with the
triangularis sterni muscle of the left side.
glass shape.
behind
closes a
space.
b. The part behind the heart (posterior mediastinum) intervenes Part
between the spinal column and the back of the pericardium and heart enthe roots of the lungs. Its lateral boundaries are the pleural bags, larger
which are separated by a larger interpleural space than in the part
of the mediastinum in front of the heart. Ifthe pleura is divided
behind the lung on the right side, the extent of the space will be
seen. In this space are contained the different parts that enter or Thecon.
leave the thoracic cavity, viz. the aorta, the vena azygos, and the the
thoracic duct, together with the œsophagus and its nerves, the
trachea, the splanchnic nerves at the lower part, and some lymphatic glands.
tents of
space .
the root Dissection. -Take away the pleura and the fat from the side of Clean
the pericardium, and from the front and back of the root of the of the lung, without injuring the vessels. In this dissection the phrenic lung.
artery and nerve will be exposed in front of the root, together with
a small plexus of nerves (anterior pulmonary) , which is best seen
on the left side. Behind the root of the lung is the large vagus
nerve. For the present, the arch of the aorta and the small nerves
on it may be left untouched.
CONNECTIONS OF THE LUNG.
The lungs are two in number, and are contained in the Number
cavity of the thorax, one on each side of the spinal column.
In these organs the changes in the air and blood during and use.
respiration take place.
The lung is of a conical form, and is covered by the bag Form.
of the pleura. It presents for examination a base and apex,
two borders, two surfaces, lobes, and fissures, together with
X
306 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Base touches dia- phragm .
a root composed of the vessels and the nerves entering the
organ.
The base of the lung is somewhat hollowed, and is moulded
on the convexity of the diaphragm. Following the shape of
that muscle, it is sloped obliquely from before backwards,
and in consequence reaches much lower at the posterior
Apex is than at the anterior part. The apex is rounded, and projects above the first rib, where it lies beneath the anterior
scalenus muscle and the subclavian artery.
in the neck.
edge is
notched.
Anterior The anterior edge or border is thin and oblique, is often
thin and notched, and overlays the pericardium. On the left side
this edge is excavated opposite the apex of the heart. In
the right lung two fissures are seen in this border, but in
Poste- the left lung there is only one. The posterior border is
is thick. longer than the anterior, and projects inferiorly between the
ribs and the diaphragm ; it is thick and vertical, and is received into the hollow by the side of the spinal column.
rior edge
External surface.
On the outer aspect the lung is convex, and is in contact
with the wall of the thorax . A large cleft divides this surface into two parts, lobes of the lung, and on the right side
Internal there is a second smaller fissure . The inner surface is flat surface when compared with the outer, and is marked by the following inequalities : - Altogether in front, is the hollow corresponding to the heart, which is greatest on the left lung ;
gives at- behind this, but nearer the posterior than the anterior
ment to border, is a fissure about three inches long (hilum pulmonis),
the root. which receives the vessels forming the root of the lung.
tachDivision into Each lung is divided into two parts or lobes by an oblique
lobes. fissure, that begins near the apex and ends in the anterior
Left has border near the base. From the form of the lung and the two, direction of the fissure, the lower lobe is necessarily the
and the largest. In the right lung a second horizontal fissure is
right three lobes.
Differ- ence in form and size ofthe lungs.
directed forwards from the middle of the oblique one to the
anterior border, and cuts off a small triangular part, or a
third lobe, from the upper lobe. Occasionally there may be
found a trace of the third lobe in the left lung.
Besides the difference in the number of lobes, the right
lung is larger and heavier, and is wider and more hollowed
out at the base than the left, but it is shorter by an inch.
THE PERICARDIUM. 307
The increased length and the narrowness of the left lung are
due to the absence below of any large projecting body like
the liver, and to the direction of the heart to the left more
than to the right side.
lung.
tion.
tions.
Root ofthe lung. —The vessels of the lung entering the Root of
fissure on the inner surface are bound together by the
pleura and cellular membrane, giving rise to a foot- stalk or
root, which fixes the lung to the heart and the trachea.
The root is situate about midway between the base and situaapex, and about a third of the breadth of the inner surface
from the posterior border of the lung. In front of the root, Connec
on both sides, are the phrenic nerve and the anterior pulmonic plexus, but anterior to the right root is the descending
cava. Behind, on both sides, is the posterior pulmonic
plexus ; and on the left side there is, in addition, the descending aorta. Above, on the right side, is the vena azygos,
and on the left side the arch of the aorta. Below each root
is the fold of pleura called ligamentum latum pulmonis.
-
tuents of
root ;
In the root of the lung are found the vessels connected Constiwith the function of respiration, viz. a division of the air the
tube (bronchus), a branch of the pulmonary artery, and two
pulmonary veins ; together with small nutritive bronchial
arteries and veins, and some nerves and lymphatics. These
different parts have a special position to one another, thus : -
relative On both sides, the bronchus is most posterior, the pul- their
monary veins most anterior, and the pulmonary artery be- position .
tween the other two. In the direction from above downwards, the position on the right side is, bronchus, pulmonary artery, and pulmonary veins ; but on the left side.
there is a slight difference, owing to the bronchus and artery
having changed places ; consequently the relative position
will there be, artery, bronchus, and veins. This difference
in the two sides may be accounted for by the fact of the left
division of the air tube being lower than the right one.
THE PERICARDIUM.
The bag that contains the heart is named the pericar- situadium. It is situate in the middle of the thorax, in the tion .
x 2
308 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Clean vessels
small nerves crossing
aorta.
interval between the pleuræof opposite sides, where they
approach to form the mediastinum. Before proceeding with
the anatomy of this sac, the following dissection should be
undertaken : -
Dissection. -Supposing the surface of the pericardium to be
of heart already cleaned, the student should next expose the large arteries and seek and veins connected with the heart. He should afterwards seek
carefully the following nerves, crossing the arch of the aorta : —
arch of the nerve most to the left, and the largest, is the vagus ; to
the right of the vagus, and next largest in size, is the phrenic
nerve. Between the two preceding, and close to the coats of the
artery, are the two following small nerves : the left superficial
cardiac nerve of the sympathetic, and the cardiac branch of the
left vagus ; ofthe two, the last is smallest, and to the right.
Dissect superfi- cial plexus
The two cardiac nerves of the vagus and sympathetic are to be
followed onwards to a small plexus (superficial cardiac) in the
in arch concavity of the aorta. An offset of the plexus is to be traced
ofaorta. downwards between the pulmonary artery and the aorta, towards
Connec- tions of
cardium .
the anterior coronary artery of the heart ; and another prolongation will be found coming forwards by the side of the arterial
duct, from the deep cardiac plexus, to join the superficial plexus.
When the pericardium is opened, the nerves will be followed on
the heart, but their dissection is difficult, and will require some
care. Oftentimes these small nerves are destroyed in injecting the
body.
The pericardium is larger than the viscus it contains, and
the peri- projects more towards the left than the right side of the
chest. Somewhat conical in form, the wider part of the bag
is turned towards the diaphragm, and the narrower part upwards towards the large vessels of the heart. Laterally,
the pericardium is covered by the pleura, and the phrenic
nerve and vessels lie in contact with it. Its anterior and
posterior surfaces correspond to the spaces contained in the
mediastinum. This envelope of the heart consists of afibrous
structure, which is lined internally by a serous membrane.
Fibro- serous case.
Fibrous part gives sheaths to ves- sels.
Joins dia- phragm.
a. The fibrous part surrounds the heart entirely, and
gives prolongations to the vessels that pierce it. Of these
different sheaths that on the aorta is the strongest. Inferiorly, it is united by fibres to the central tendon of the
diaphragm, to the left of the middle line, only about an inch
THE HEART. 309
struc.. extending to the right of that line. This membrane is Its
thickest at the upper part, and is formed of fibres that cross ture.
in different directions, many being longitudinal. When the
pericardium is cut open, the serous lining will be visible.
layer b. The serous layer lines the interior of the fibrous peri- Serous
cardium, and is reflected over the surface of the heart. lines fibrous,
Like other serous membranes, the arachnoid for example, it
has a parietal and a visceral part. Lining the interior of
the fibrous layer, to which it gives the shining appearance,
the membrane is then conducted to the surface of the heart by and
the different vessels. As it is reflected on the aorta and the surface
pulmonary artery, it contains those vessels in one tube, not
passing between their contiguous surfaces ; and at the pos- Pecuterior part of the pericardium it forms a pouch between the in its
pulmonary veins of opposite sides. The cavity of the serous tions.
sac is lubricated by a thin fluid.
covers
of heart.
liarities
reflecThe vessels of the pericardium are derived from the in- Vessels.
ternal mammary, the bronchial, the oesophageal, and the
phrenic arteries.
THE HEART AND LARGE VESSELS.
hollow
centre of
The heart is a hollow muscular body, which is divided This
into compartments by septa. It is the chief agent in the body is
propulsion of the blood through the body, and is also the circulacentre of the vascular system, for into it all the veins enter,
and from it the arteries issue.
tion.
When the heart is distended, its form is somewhat conical, Form.
with the oval wider part directed upwards and to the right,
and the rounded apex turned downwards and to the left side
of the chest. Rather flattened from before backwards, the surheart presents two surfaces and borders.
The anterior borders.
surface is slightly convex, whilst the posterior is nearly flat.
The left border is thick and round, but the right is thin and
less firm.
faces and
In size it varies greatly, and in general the heart of the Size.
woman is smaller than that of the man. The measurements
may be said to be commonly four inches and three quarters
in length, three inches and a-half in width, and two inches
and a-half in thickness.
X 3
310 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
The heart is
into four
two auricles,
ventri- cles,
On the surface of the heart are certain grooves, indicatory
divided of its divisions into different compartments. Thus passing
cavities, circularly round the heart, nearer the base than the apex, is
a groove which marks the division into two parts, auricular
and ventricular. The auricular part is placed at the base of
the heart, and is subdivided into two cavities (right and
and two left) by a median partition. In like manner the ventricular
portion is parted into right and left ventricles by a septum.
The situation of the median partition between the auricles
and ventricles is recognised by a longitudinal sulcus on the
surface. But it will be seen that this sulcus does not occupy
the mid space either on the anterior or the posterior aspect
of the heart, but is nearer the left border in front, and
the right border behind, so that most of the anterior surface
of the heart is formed by the right cavities (auricle and ventricle), and the greater part of the posterior surface by the
corresponding left cavities.
by par- titions corre- sponding to the grooves on sur- face.
Situa- tion of
wall of chest .
Occupying the middle line of the chest, the heart projects
heart to also to the left side ; and it may be said to reach one inch or
one inch and a-half to the right of the centre of the sternum,
and three inches to three inches and a-half to the left of that
line. Its position to the axis of the body is oblique from
right to left, with the left border upwards, and the right
border downwards. The apex is opposite the space between
the cartilages of the fifth and sixth ribs of the left side,
"two inches below the nipple, and one on its sternal side."
and ar- The aperture of one of the large arteries of its base (pulmonary) is beneath the cartilage of the third rib of the left
side, close to the sternum ; and the opening of the other
artery (aorta) is between the cartilages of the third and
fourth ribs of the same side, also close to the sternum . *
Situa- tion of apex
terial open.
ings.
The heart is The heart is a double organ, and consists of two similar
double halves, right and left. In each half are two cavities, an auricle and a ventricle, which communicate, and are provided
* The position of the several parts of the heart with respect to the
wall of the chest is given more fully and somewhat differently by Mr.
Sibson in his Papers in the twelfth volume of the Transactions ofthe
Provincial Med. and Surg. Association.
THE HEART. 311
half
an auvenwith special vessels for the entrance and exit of the blood. each
The right half receives black blood by the systemic veins, having
and sends the same through the lungs by means of the pul- ricle and
monary artery ; but the left half is supplied with red blood tricle.
from the lungs through the pulmonary veins, and distributes
its contents over the body through the canal of the aorta.
tion o
auricles.
The Veins join
The auricles are two, as before said ( right and left), and are Situaplaced at the base of the heart behind the aorta and the the
pulmonary artery. They receive their appellation from the
resemblance that the tips or appendices projecting forwards
on the sides of the arteries bear to a dog's ears.
auricles are much thinner than the ventricles, and are reci- these
pients of blood from large veins. Of the two, the right is
rather the larger and more anterior ; it is joined by the
upper and the lower cava, and by the veins of the substance
of the heart. The left cavity receives the two pulmonary Left.
veins on each side.
cavities.
Right.
tricles
nicate the with ar- teries .
right
The ventricles constitute the fleshy part of the heart, and Thevenare thicker than the auricles, below which they lie. Two commuin number, like the auricles, each has an opening into
auricle of its own side, by which it receives blood, and another opening into an artery, by which the blood is transmitted from the cavity. Their unequal extent on the aspects
of the heart has been before alluded to : thus the right ven- The
tricle forms the right thin border, and the greater part of the
anterior surface, and is prolonged upwards on the left side
into the pulmonary artery. The left ventricle enters alone The
into the apex, the left border, and most of the posterior
aspect of the heart : with this cavity the aorta is connected.
Dissection. Before opening the heart, the vessels for the nutri- Dissect
tion of its substance ( coronary arteries) should be dissected on the
surface, together with the small nerves that accompany them.
The small vessels appear on the sides of the pulmonary artery, and
occupy the grooves on the surface of the heart, where they are
surrounded by fat ; one branches over the right, and the other
over the left side. With the anterior artery is a plexus of nerves,
which is to be followed upwards to the superficial cardiac plexus ;
with the remaining artery is another plexus.
coro- nary ves sels and nerves.
The coronary arteries are two small vessels that are so Two
X 4
312 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
arteries named from their course around the heart. They are the ofthe heart,
viz.
right coro- nary,
coronary
first branches of the aorta, and arise close above the semilunar valves. One is distributed on the right and the other
on the left side of the heart.
a. The right coronary branch appears on the right side of the
pulmonary artery, and is directed onwards in the depression
between the right auricle and ventricle, to the posterior aspect of
the heart, where it anastomoses with a similar circular offset from
the left coronary artery. In this course branches are distributed
upwards and downwards to the right half of the heart. Two of
these are of larger size than the rest : one runs on the anterior
aspect of the right ventricle towards its free margin ; the other descends on the back of the heart, along the septum between the
ventricles, and anastomoses towards the apex with the left coronary
artery.
left b. The left coronary branch is inclined behind the pulmonary
artery. artery to the left side of that vessel, then in the groove between
the left auricle and ventricle to the back of the heart, on which part
it anastomoses with the right coronary branch. Like the preceding
artery, it furnishes offsets to the substance of the auricle and ventricle. The largest of these descends in the anterior sulcus, over
the partition of the ventricles, towards the apex of the heart, and
communicates with the descending branch of the right coronary
artery at the back ofthe heart.
the heart.
Veins of The veins of the substance of the heart (cardiac) are not
the same in number, nor have they the same distribution
as the arteries. For the most part they are united into
one large trunk (great cardiac), which opens into the right
auricle.
Large cardiac vein is single
and opens into back of right auricle.
a. The great cardiac or coronary vein begins near the apex of
the heart in the substance of the ventricles, both before and behind, but its principal root lies on the left part of the anterior
aspect of the heart, over the septum between the ventricles. From
this origin, in front, the vessel turns to the back of the heart in
the sulcus between the left auricle and ventricle, and opens into
the under part of the right auricle. It receives collateral branches
in its course, and one of these, which is larger than the rest (middle
cardiac vein), is placed over the septum of the ventricles at the back of the heart.
NERVES OF THE HEART. 313
anterior b. Some small anterior cardiac veins on the anterior part of the small
right ventricle open separately, by one or more trunks, into the cardiac
lower part of the right auricle. Similar small veins exist over the
right auricle and the back of the right ventricle.
veins .
cardiac .
c. A third set of veins (veins of Thebesius, venæ minimæ) lie Smallest
in the substance of the heart these are noticed in the description
of the right auricle.
- nerves.
Cardiac nerves. The nerves for the supply of the heart Cardiac
are derived from a large plexus (cardiac) around the roots of
the aorta and pulmonary arteries. Part of this plexus is
superficial to the pulmonary artery, and part beneath ; and
from each an offset is sent with a coronary artery. Only
the superficial part is now exposed.
ficial The small superficial cardiac plexus is placed by the side of the Superductus arteriosus, and below the arch of the aorta. The nerves plexus
that join it are the left superficial cardiac nerve of the sympathetic, and the small cardiac branch of the left vagus ( p. 106.),
and a considerable bundle of nerves comes forward to it from the
deep cardiac plexus. A small ganglionic mass is sometimes seen
in the plexus. Inferiorly, the plexus ends in nerves to the heart ends in
that accompany the right coronary artery. A few filaments pass coroon the left division of the pulmonary artery to the front of the nary.
root ofthe lung of the same side.
anterior
plexus a. The anterior or right coronary plexus passes downwards from Anterior
the plexus above described, to reach the right coronary artery, and of
receives near the heart a communication from the deep cardiac
plexus.
heart.
rior b. The posterior or left plexus is derived from the deep cardiac Posteplexus, as will be subsequently seen, and accompanies the left plexus.
coronary artery to the heart.
pany the On the heart the nerves at first surround the arteries, but they Accomsoon leave the vessels, and becoming smaller by subdivision, are arteries.
lost in the muscular substance of the ventricles.
cavities The CAVITIES OF THE HEART should be examined in the Four
order in which the current of the blood passes through of the
them, viz. right auricle and ventricle, and left auricle and
ventricle.
-
heart.
tion to Dissection. To open the right auricle, make an incision in it Dissec
near the free border, and from the superior cava nearly to the inferior cava ; from the centre of that incision carry the knife across open right auricle.
314 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
the anterior part to the auricula. By means of these cuts an
opening will be made of sufficient size ; and on raising the flaps
with hooks, the shape of the cavity will be seen after the removal
of the coagulated blood it contains. The heart should not be
removed from the body to examine its interior.
Form of The cavity of the right auricle is of an irregular form,
auricle. though when seen from the right side, with the flaps held up
right
Its base
apex.
;
as above directed, it has somewhat the appearance of a cone,
with the base to the right and the apex to the left. In its
description it will be necessary to speak also of an anterior
and a posterior wall or part.
The base or wider part of the cavity projects on the right
side, and at its extremities are the openings of the superior
and the inferior cava. Between these vessels the cavity projects somewhat, and presents a slight elevation in some bodies
(tubercle of Lower). The apex is prolonged downwards towards the junction of the auricle with the ventricle, and in
it is the large opening into the right ventricular cavity.
Anterior The anterior wall is thin and loose, and near its upper
presents part is an opening leading into the pouch of the appendix auricula. or auricula, which will admit the tip of the little finger.
wall
Poste- rior wall
ed by
fossa ovalis.
Around, and in the interior of the appendix, are fleshy bands
(musculi pectinati), which cross in different directions, forming a network that contrasts with the general smoothness of
the auricle.
The posterior wall corresponds for the most part to the
is mark- septum between the auricles . On it, nearer the inferior than
the superior cava, is a large oval depression, fossa ovalis,
which is the remains of an opening in the fetus between the
auricles. Inferiorly the fossa merges into the opening of the
inferior cava. In the adult, a thin semitransparent partition
closes the opening, but there is oftentimes a small oblique
aperture at the upper part. Around the upper three fourths
of the fossa is an elevated band of muscular fibre (annulus
Annulus seu isthmus Vieussenii) , which is most prominent above and
on the inner side, and gradually subsides inferiorly. Altogether at the lower part of the posterior wall, between the
opening into the ventricle and that of the inferior cava,
is the small aperture of the large coronary vein. Other
of Vieus- sens.
CAVITIES OF THE HEART. 315
tures of small apertures are seen scattered over the surface : some lead Aperonly into depressions, but others are the mouths of the veins cardiac
of the substance of the heart (venæ cordis minima) , and are
named foramina Thebesii.
veins.
of chief
tures.
cava.
cava
vided
Eustavalve.
The chief apertures in the auricle have been said to be those Valves
of the two cavæ, of the coronary vein, and of the ventricle. aperAll these, except that of the superior cava, have some kind
of valve. The opening of the superior cava is in the front of Superior
the auricle, and its direction is downwards and somewhat
forwards. The inferior cava opens into the lowest part of Inferior
the auricle near the septum, and is directed inwards and is probackwards to the fossa ovalis. In front of the last opening is with
a thin fold of the lining membrane of the cavity, the Eusta- chian
chian valve, which is a remnant of a structure that is much
larger in the fetus. This valve, in its perfect state, is semilunar in form, the convex margin being attached to the wall
of the vein, and the other being free in the cavity of the
auricle. Its surfaces are directed forwards and backwards.
In size, the valve surpasses the width of the vein, its extremities reaching, therefore, the surface of the auricle, and
the left end is connected with the annulus or rim of the fossa
ovalis. The free margin of the valve is often reticular. The Coroaperture of the coronary vein in the lower part of the auricle vein.
is closed by a thin fold of the lining membrane - valve of
Thebesius. The auriculo- ventricular opening will be seen, in Auriexamining the right ventricle, to be provided with valves, ventriwhich prevent regurgitation into the auricular cavity.
In the adult there is but one current of blood in the right Course
auricle towards the ventricle ; but in the fetus there are two ; in auone of pure, and the other of impure blood, which cross one adult,
another. The placental or pure blood entering by the in- and in
ferior cava, is directed by the Eustachian valve chiefly into
the left auricle, through the opening in the septum (foramen
ovale) ; whilst the current of systemic blood, of the superior
cava, flows downwards in front of the other to the right
ventricle.
nary
culocular opening.
ofblood
ricle in
the fetus.
right Dissection.-Seizing the right ventricle, pass the scalpel through To open
it below the opening from the auricle, and bring out the knife near ventrithe apex of the heart, without injuring the septum ventriculorum.
cle.
316 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Cavity of right
cle.
A flap is thus formed, like the letter V, of the anterior part of the
ventricle. In the examination of the cavity of the right ventricle,
the flap and the apex of the heart should be raised separately
with hooks, so that the space may be looked into from below.
The cavity ofthe right ventricle is triangular in form, and
ventri has the base turned upwards to the auricle of the same side.
The point of the cavity reaches the right border of the heart,
Base and at a little distance from the apex. At its base the ventricle
ings. is sloped to the right, and is perforated by two apertures ;
Apex.
its openand
one of these, on the right, leading into the auricle, is the right
auriculo-ventricular opening ; the other on the left, and much
higher, is the mouth of the pulmonary artery. The part of
the cavity which communicates with the pulmonary artery is
funnel- shaped (infundibulum, conus arteriosus).
Anterior The anterior wall, or the loose part of the ventricle, is
comparatively thin, and forms most of the anterior aspect
posterior of the ventricular part of the heart. The posterior boundary corresponds in greatest part to the septum between the
ventricles, and is of considerable thickness.
wall.
ofthe
uneven.
On it there are
sets of
columns.
Interior Over the greater part of the cavity the surface is irregucavity is lar, and is marked by projecting fleshy bands of muscular
fibres (columnæ carneæ), but near the aperture of the pulmonary artery the wall becomes smooth. The fleshy columns
are of various sizes, and have three different dispositions in
three the cavity. Some merely form a prominence in the ventricle,
fleshy as on the septum. Others are attached at each end, but
free in the middle (trabecula carneae). And a third set,
which are fewer in number, and much the largest, project
into the cavity, and form rounded bundles (musculi papillares), which give attachment by their free ends to the little
cords of the valve of the auriculo-ventricular opening.
Opening The auriculo- ventricular orifice is situate in the base of
auricle the ventricle near the right, or the free border of the heart,
ventricle and is larger than the corresponding aperture of the left side
from the
to the
of the heart. It is oval from side to side, and its shape is
maintained by a strong fibrous band that surrounds it. Prolonged from the circumference of the opening is a thin
membranous valve, which projects into the cavity of the
ventricle, and is serrated or divided into points at its free
CAVITIES OF THE HEART. 317
ed bythe
valve.
ment of
parts by
nous
margin ; and to its lower or free margin are attached small is guardtendinous cords (chorda tendineæ) that unite it to the mus- tricuspid
cular bundles of the ventricle. From a difference in the
moveableness of parts of the valve, and from the mode of
attachment of the tendinous cords, the valve has been
divided into three parts, and named tricuspid. One slip or Attachtongue (anterior ) is next the front of the ventricle, and is the three
fixed to the fleshy columns of that part. Another (posterior) tendiis contiguous to the septum ventriculorum, and is very short. cords.
Whilst the remaining tongue (left) is the largest and most
moveable, and lies between the apertures into the auricle
and pulmonary artery ; the borders ofthis piece are turned
forwards and backwards, and receive the tendinous cords
by which it is fixed on the one side to the upper part of
the septum, and on the other to the front of the ventricle.
The tricuspid valve is constructed of the lining membrane of Its structhe heart, which encloses bands of fibrous tissue derived
from the circumference of the auriculo-ventricular opening.
During the contraction of the ventricle the valve is raised by and use.
the blood, so as to close the opening into the auricle, but the
farther protrusion of it into the latter cavity is arrested by
the small tendinous cords.
ture
ofpulartery
three
lunar
their atThe mouth of the pulmonary artery will be seen whenthe Mouth
incision in the anterior wall of the ventricle is prolonged monary
upwards into it. It is situate on the left of the opening into
the auricle, and into it the left or funnel- shaped part of the
right ventricle (infundibulum) is prolonged. In its interior has
are three semilunar or sigmoid valves. Each valve is semiattached to the side of the vessel by its convex border, and valves ;
is free in the cavity by the opposite border, in which there tachis a slight, thickened, and projecting part (corpus Arantii). ment,
The valves are formed by fibrous tissue, covered by the struclining membrane of the vessel. The use of these little and use.
valves is obvious, viz. to give free passage to fluid in one
direction, or to close the area of the vessel. Whilst the
blood is entering the artery, the valves are placed against the
wall ; but when the vessel acts on the contained blood, the
valves are thrown towards the centre of the cavity, and prevent the return of the circulating fluid into the ventricle.
ture,
318 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
To open left au- ricle.
Shape of cavity of
ricle .
Dissection. - To open the cavity of the left auricle, raise the
apex of the heart, and make a cut across the posterior surface from the right to the left pulmonary veins. Another incision should be
made into the auricula. The apex of the heart must necessarily
be kept raised during the examination of this auricle.
The cavity of the left auricle is smaller than that of the
left au- right side, which it nearly resembles. Irregularly conical in
shape, the wider part is turned to the spinal column, where
it receives the pulmonary veins, and the narrower part opens
inferiorly into the left ventricle.
On an- terior
auricu- la.
On the anterior wall is the aperture of the pouch of the
wall is auricula, which is narrower than on the right side. In the
interior of the pouch, as well as around the entrance, are the
fleshy fibres (musculi pectinati) , which resemble those before seen in the other auricle.
On pos- terior,
of fora- men ovale.
On the right side, or on the part of the wall correspondremnant ing to the septum auricularum, is a superficial fossa, or the
remains of the oval aperture through that partition. This
impression in the left auricle is above the fossa ovalis in
the right cavity, because in the fetus the aperture of communication between the two was an oblique canal through
the septum.
Open- ings of the au- ricle are,
The apertures of the auricle are the four pulmonary veins,
two on each side, together with the opening of communicaone into' tion with the left ventricle. The mouths of the two pulmo- ventricle
and four nary veins on each side are pulmoveins.
close to one another ; those of
nary the right lung open into the extreme right of the auricle near
the septum, and those of the left lung enter the opposite
part of the cavity, near the auricula. These veins are not
provided with valves. The aperture into the ventricle will
be afterwards seen to have a large and complicated valve, as
on the right side, to guard it.
Current In the adult, the blood enters this cavity by the pulmonary
of adult , veins, and passes to the left ventricle by the large inferior
in fetus . opening between the two. In the fetus, however, the lungs
in
How to
are impervious to the air and the circulating fluid ; and the
left side of the heart receives its pure blood from the right
auricle through the aperture in the septum (foramen ovale).
Dissection.-Open the left ventricle by an incision along the an-
CAVITIES OF THE HEART. 319
ventri- terior and posterior surfaces near the septum, but without cutting open left
so far upwards as to reach the auricle. On raising the triangular vent
flap, the interior of the cavity will be seen.
The cavity of the left ventricle is more conical in shape left Formven-of
than that of the opposite ventricle, and on a transverse tricle.
section of the heart it appears almost circular.
with its
The apex of the cavity reaches into the apex of the heart, Apex.
for the fibres of the left ventricle alone form this part. The Base
base is turned towards the auricle, and is sloped slightly openfrom right to left, or in a direction opposite to that of the
right ventricle. In this part are the openings into the
aorta and the left auricle.
ings.
The walls of this ventricle are thickest, and the anterior walls.
boundary is formed by the septum ventriculorum.
surface
fleshy
very
Like the right ventricle, its surface is irregular, in conse- Inner
quence of the projections of the fleshy columns (carneæ has
columnæ), but near the great artery ( aorta) that leads from columns,
the cavity the surface is smooth. Here are seen the same but some
three sets of fleshy columns as in the right ventricle, but large.
the set that project into the cavity and receive the small
tendinous bands of the valve are the most marked : of these
muscular projections (musculi papillares ) two are generally
larger than the rest, and are attached to the wall of the
ventricle near the septum .
riculolar aperForm
size .
valve
The aperture of the left auricle is placed on the left of the Left auorifice of the aorta, and close to it, only a thin fibrous band ventricu
intervening between the two. This opening is smaller than ture.
the corresponding aperture of the right side, and like it is
longest in the transverse direction. It is furnished with a It has
membranous valve that projects into the ventricle, but is a large
stronger and of greater length than the tricuspid, and has
also firmer and more tendinous cords. Attached to a fibrous
ring around the aperture, the valve is divided below into
two instead of three pieces, and from its fancied resemblance
to a mitre it has been called mitral valve. One tongue ofnamed
the valve intervenes between the auricular and aortic openings, being attached above to the band in that position, and
is larger and looser than the other or posterior division.
The margins of the pieces of the valve are turned forwards Pieces of
mitral.
320 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
the valve.
Use.
Aortic opening ;
and
and backwards, and into their edges are inserted the tendinous
cords that attach the valve to the muscular bundles (musc.
papillares). The use and action of the mitral valve during
the contraction of the ventricle are altogether similar to the
action and use of the tricuspid valve.
The opening of the aorta is somewhat on a higher level
than that of the auricle, and is next the septum of the venposition tricles. By slitting the side of the vessel without cutting
form. the pulmonary artery, its aperture will be found to be round,
and rather smaller than that of the pulmonary artery, beIs guard- neath which it lies. In its interior are three semilunar or ed by three sigmoid valves, which are larger and stronger than the
valves. analogous parts in the pulmonary artery, but have the same
sigmoid
Relative position of the aper.
the heart.
structure, attachment, and function. The projection in the
centre of each valve (corpus s. nodulus Arantii) is also
better marked. Opposite each valve the coat of the aorta
is swollen out, and presents a little hollow on the inner side
(sinus of Valsalva). Above the free margin of two of the
small valves are the apertures of the coronary arteries.
Two openings have been seen in each ventricle, one of
the auricle of its own side of the heart, and one of an artery.
tures of The apertures of the arteries ( aorta and pulmonary) are
nearest the septum ; and as the two vessels were originally
formed from one tube, they are close together, the pulmonary
artery being the more anterior of the two. The aperture of
communication with the auricle is next the side of the heart
(the right in the one case, and the left in the other), and is
posterior to the position of the arteries that issue from the
fore part of the ventricles. The relative position of the
openings from right to left will therefore be, first, right
auriculo-ventricular opening ; then that of the pulmonary
artery ; next the mouth of the aorta ; and, lastly, the left
auriculo-ventricular aperture.
From right to left.
Struc- ture of the heart is
STRUCTURE. The heart is composed of a mass of muscular fibres, and of certain fibrous rings which serve as fixed
fibrous points for their attachment. These structures must be
cular. studied on the heart of the ox or sheep, in which the fibres
have been hardened and separated by boiling.
and musbrous The fibrous structure forms rings around the auriculo-
STRUCTURE OF THE HEART. 321
ventricular and arterial orifices, and sends prolongations
into the valves connected with those openings.
rings
auriculo
a. The auriculo- ventricular rings give attachment to the mus- forms
cular fibres both of the auricles and ventricles, as well as to the around
framework of fibrous tissue in the tricuspid and mitral valves. ventriThese rings are distinct from the circles around the arterial open- openings, except at the right part of the left auriculo-ventricular ings,
opening, where the auricular and the arterial rings are blended.
cular
around
openlast the
valves
b. An arterial ring surrounds each large artery ( aorta and pul- and
monary), fixing those vessels, and giving attachment to the muscu- arterial
lar fibres and the semilunar valves. Each is a circular band, with ings.
an uninterrupted margin towards the ventricle, and a toothed or
wavy margin towards the artery. This last margin has three To these
notches, which are filled by corresponding projections ofthe artery, sigmoid
and give attachment to the sigmoid valves along their semilunar
edges.
The artery is connected with the ring of fibrous tissue in the and midfollowing manner :-The middle coat presents three projecting of the
convex pieces that are received into and connected with the are
notches of the fibrous ring ; and the union between the two is
further strengthened externally by the pericardium, and internally
by the endocardium.
dle coat
artery
fixed.
lar subheart
is dis- tinct in auricles
The muscular substance forms concentric bands of fibres, Muscuwhich are arranged mostly in a circular or spiral direction, stance of
and enclose the different cardiac cavities. In the wall of the
auricles the fibres are quite distinct from those in the ventricles, though both sets are attached to the fibrous rings of and venthe cardiac orifices, as to a common point of origin or insertion. The fibres belong to the involuntary class of
muscles, and yet they are marked with transverse striæ.
tricles.
tion in
ricles ,
a. In the wall of the auricles the fibres are mostly transverse, Disposi
and are best marked at the lower part, though they form here but the aua thin layer ; some of these fibres dip into the septum between the
auricular cavities. Besides this set, there are annular fibres around where
the appendages of the auricles and the openings of the different trans- they are
verse,
veins. Lastly, a few oblique fibres pass upwards over the auricles, annular,
but are attached below, both in front and behind, to the fibrous and obrings surrounding the auriculo- ventricular orifices.
lique.
ventri- b. In the wall of the ventricles the fibres are disposed in layers. In the
which pass spirally downwards from the base towards the smaller cles they
Y
322 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
pass from part of the heart, where they make a sudden bend, and are rebase to flected upwards with a straighter direction and a deeper position,
apex.
The fibres of
tricles are
to form the inner surface of the ventricular cavity. To allow of
this turning inwards of the fibres, the deepest layers extend the
shortest distance from the base of the ventricle. Each ventricle
the ven- has, for the most part, its own formative fibres, which assist in
constructing the septum between the cavities ; but some bands are
mostly concerned in the production of the wall of both ventricles on the
anterior aspect of the heart, and especially near the base of the
ventricles, where the fibres are nearly circular in direction, and
but some cross the posterior interventricular groove. When these interto both. communicating fibres are divided, the ventricles may be detached from one another. *
separate,
common
Lining Endocardium. - Lining the interior of the cavities of the
brane of heart is a thin membrane, which is continuous on the one memthe heart
forms
hand with the lining of the veins, and on the other with
that of the arteries. This membrane is so named in opposition to the external investment or pericardium. Where the
the in- membrane passes from the auricle to the ventricle, or from terior by Covering the ventricle to the artery, it forms duplicatures or valves,
tissue. in which fibrous tissue is enclosed. In the ventricle it also
folds in
fibrous
Vessels of base
heart
covers the tendinous cords of the valves and the projecting
muscular bundles. The thickness of the membrane is less
in the auricles than in the ventricles.
GREAT VESSELS OF THE HEART. ―- The arteries that take
of the origin from the heart are the pulmonary artery and the
aorta. The large veins entering the heart besides the coronary, which have been examined, are the superior and
inferior cava, and the pulmonary veins.
The pul monary artery
The PULMONARY ARTERY is a short thick trunk that conveys the dark or impure blood from the right side of the
heart to the lungs. From its origin in the right ventricle,
the vessel is directed upwards on the left of the aorta,
is a and at a distance of an inch and a-half or two inches from
trunk, its origin, divides into two branches, of nearly equal size,
short
* For fuller detail concerning the structure of the heart, the student
may refer to the articles " Heart " and " Fibres of the Heart," in the
Cyclopædia of Anatomy and Physiology.
GREAT VESSELS OF THE HEART. 323
vides
for the
tions
for the lungs. Near the bifurcation of the artery is a small and diligamentous cord (ligamentum ductûs arteriosi), which is into two
the remnant of the arterial duct, and passes from the left lungs.
branch to the arch of the aorta. The trunk of the pul- Connec
monary artery is contained in the pericardium, and beneath
it is the beginning of the aorta, together with the left
auricle. On each side are the coronary artery and the
auricula.
branch is The right branch is longer than the left, and in its course Right
to the lung it lies beneath the aorta and the vena cava supe- longest.
rior, and rests on the bronchus, or division of the air tube.
As it passes outwards, the vessel is above the level of the
right auricle of the heart. At the lung the artery divides
into three primary branches, one for each lobe, which enter
the pulmonic substance.
branch. The left branch is rather smaller than the right, and is Left
directed in front of the descending aorta and the left bronchus
to the fissure of the root of the lung, where it divides into
two branches that are distributed to the lobes.
the bi- As the right and left branches of the pulmonary artery Space at
pass outwards they cross the divisions of the air tube, and furcaenclose therewith a lozenge-shaped space, which contains
some bronchial glands.
tion.
tion of
tery in
In the fetus the part of the pulmonary artery which is now Condiligamentous is the continuation of the trunk of the vessel, and is the arlarger than either branch to the lung. At that period the part the
above referred to receives the name arterial canal or duct (ductus fetus.
arteriosus, Botalli) , and opens into the aorta rather beyond the
origin from the arch of the last great vessel of the head and neck.
As the lungs do not purify the circulating fluid before birth, the
blood of the pulmonary artery is passed into the aorta below the
attachment of the vessels of the head and neck, in order that it
may be transmitted to the placenta ; but after birth the function
of the lungs is established, and the current of blood is directed
into the pulmonary arteries instead of the arterial duct ; and this
last channel becomes gradually smaller until it is quite obliterated.
great The AORTA is the great systemic vessel that conveys the This
blood from the heart to the different parts of the body. Com- vessel
mencing near the front of the chest, the vessel first arches
extends
Y 2
324 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
chest
domen.
through backwards to reach the spinal column, on which it afterwards
and ab- takes its position in its extent through the chest and abdomen. In the thorax, the vessel is divided into two partsarch of the aorta, and the descending or thoracic aorta.
Its first part is
tent:
Arch ofthe aorta. From its origin in the left ventricle,
arched, opposite the junction of the cartilage of the fourth rib of the
left side with the sternum, the aorta is directed to the right,
as high as the upper edge of the cartilage of the second rib
The ex- on the opposite margin of the sternum. Here the arterial
trunk turns backwards to reach the left side of the body of
the second dorsal vertebra. And lastly, after the length of
one vertebra, it becomes descending aorta, viz. at the lower
border of the body of the third dorsal vertebra. The arch
thus formed has its convexity upwards and to the right, and
from it the large vessels for the supply of the upper part of
and di- the body take their origin. For the purpose of reducing to
order the numerous connections of this portion of the aorta,
the arch is divided into three parts- ascending, transverse,
and descending.
visions of the arch.
First part :
nections.
a. The first or ascending part is about two inches in
length, or slightly more, and crosses behind the sternum, and
length very near that bone. It reaches as high as the cartilage of
and con- the second rib, and is contained nearly altogether in the pericardium. At first the pulmonary artery is superficial to the
origin of the aorta ; but as these vessels take different directions, the aorta is soon uncovered, and remains so to its
termination. On the right side is the descending cava, and
on the left, the pulmonary artery. Behind it is the right
division of the pulmonary artery. Near the heart the vessel
bulges opposite each semilunar valve (sinuses of the aorta),
and it is sometimes dilated along the right side (great sinus
of the aorta). The two coronary arteries arise close to the
swellings above alluded to.
Gives origin to coronary
Second part is trans- verse.
arteries . b. The second or transverse part also crosses behind the
sternum, and rests upon the trachea above its bifurcation, as
well as over the oesophagus. Lying in front of the artery
are the pneumogastric, phrenic, and superficial cardiac nerves ;
and the first nerve sends backwards its recurrent branch beneath the aorta. Along the upper border is the left innomiConnec- tions.
Gives
ARCH OF THE AORTA. 325
large nate vein, and from this border arise the threegreat vessels of origin to
the head and the upper limbs. To the lower border, near vessels.
the termination of the transverse part, the remains of the
arterial duct is attached.
part is
vessels.
c. The third or descending part of the arch is very short, Third]
and lies against the third dorsal vertebra and the fibro-car- without
tilage between it and the second vertebra ; it is covered by
the left pleura.
conthe arch.
In the concavity of the arch of the aorta are contained the Parts
left auricle of the heart, the root of the left lung, the branch- tained in
ing of the pulmonary artery with its arterial duct, and the
left recurrent nerve. Deeper than these parts, will be found
the oesophagus and the thoracic duct, with some lymphatic
glands.
branches
arch :
nary,
The branches of the arch of the aorta are five in number, Five
two from the ascending, and three from the transverse part. of the
The two first are the coronary arteries of the heart, which two
have been already noticed (p. 312.). The other three are much coro
larger in size, and supply the head, the neck, and the upper
limbs. First on the right is the large trunk of the innomi- innonate artery, close to it is the left carotid, and last is the left carotid,
subclavian, which is distant a small space from the preceding subclavessel.
minate,
vian.
arities. Peculiarities. -The exceptions to the usual condition of the Peculiarch of the aorta, that the student may expect to find, concern the
height or direction of the arch, and the position and number of its
branches.
and The arch reaches commonly to about an inch from the upper part of Height
the sternum, but it may ascend nearly to the top of that bone, or stop
an inch and a half or more from it.
tion of Sometimes the aorta is arched over the root ofthe right instead of the direcleft lung, as in birds, and is directed afterwards to its usual place on the
the spinal column, without any other change in the body. Or, all the arch.
viscera of the cavities of the thorax and abdomen may be transposed,
the arch of the aorta sharing the general disturbance in position.
primary
The large branches of the neck may have their usual origin (the Position
highest part of the arch) moved more to the right ; or their distance ofthe
from one another may be increased or diminished. When there is branchtransposition of the arch there is likewise transposition of the branches,
the innominate artery going to the left side, and the carotid and subes .
Y 3
326 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Their number may be reduced to two,
or into four,
clavian vessels of the right side having separate attachments to the arch.
The branches of the arch may likewise be altered in number as well
as in position. The most frequent change is the reduction of the
arteries to two, as when the left carotid arises from the innominate
artery. But the number may be increased to four by the absence of
creased the innominate trunk, and the separate origin of the right carotid and
subclavian arteries from the arch. In this last case the right subclavian varies in its position, though commonly it is attached to the
arch of the aorta, to the left of the rest. Lastly, there may be five or
six primary trunks from the arch, as instanced by the origin from it
of the internal and external carotids, in consequence of absence of the
trunk common to the two, on one or both sides.
five, or six.
Second- ary
es.
Some smaller or secondary arteries take origin occasionally from the
branch- arch. The most frequent example of this peculiarity is seen in the
origin of the vertebral artery, between either the left carotid and subclavian trunks, or beyond them. Occasionally a thyroid artery (lowest
thyroid), or the internal mammary, will be seen to spring from the arch of the aorta.
Inno- minate artery
The innominate artery (brachio- cephalic) is the largest
branch of the transverse part of the arch, and arises first in
ends in the direction from right to left. It is a thick trunk, about
and sub- one inch and a half in length, which ascends to the right clavian. beneath the sternum, and divides into right carotid and
carotid
subclavian arteries opposite the articulation between the
sternum and the clavicle. The artery is crossed by the left
innominate vein, and is covered by the upper piece of the
sternum, and by the origin of the sterno-hyoid and thyLength roid muscles. At first the innominate artery rests on the nections. trachea, but as it ascends it lies on the right of the air tube .
On its right side is the right innominate vein, with the
phrenic nerve. No lateral branch arises from this artery
in the ordinary condition of the vessel.
and conLength may be Peculiarities. The length of the artery may exceed two inches, or
altered, it may measure only one inch or less : in these different states the place
orthy of bifurcation will be altered, being in one case beyond, and in the other
below the level of the upper border of the clavicle. A branch to the
thyroid body (art. thyroidea ima), or to the thymic body, or to the root
roid branch may arise
from it. ofthe lung, may arise from the innominate artery.
Left coinmon Left common carotid artery in the thorax. —The common
carotid carotid artery of the left side of the neck springs from the arch
BRANCHES OF THE AORTA. 327
arises of the aorta, whilst the vessel of the right side begins at artery
the bifurcation of the innominate artery, opposite the sterno- from
clavicular articulation ; and it is longer than the right by aorta.
the distance between the arch and the top of the sternum.
arch of
tions in
rax.
In the thorax, the artery ascends obliquely to the left Connec
sterno-clavicular articulation, crossing beneath the left inno- the tho~
minate vein, and being placed behind the first piece of the
sternum with the attachment of the laryngeal muscles, and
the remains of the thymus gland. In that course the subclavian trunk lies at first on the trachea, but it afterwards
crosses to the left of that tube, and lies over the œsophagus
and the thoracic duct. To its outer side is the left pneumogastric nerve, with one or more cardiac branches of the sympathetic nerve. In the neck, the connections of the vessels
of opposite sides are the same (p. 71.) .
-
liarities Peculiarities. The most frequent change in the vessel concerns its Pecuorigin. Thus, this artery is sometimes united with the innominate artery ; or, should the innominate artery be absent, the common carotids, origin .
right and left, arise usually by one trunk. It seldom changes its relative position with respect to the other branches of the arch.
clavian The left subclavian artery arises from the arch ofthe aorta, Left sub
and ascends to the lower part of the neck through the upper artery.
aperture of the thorax. Beyond the first rib the vessels of
opposite sides are alike (p. 63. ).
and conin the
so- thorax.
The left subclavian trunk is directed almost vertically from Course
the arch of the aorta to the inner margin of the first rib. nections
In the thorax the vessel lies deeply, resting first on the
phagus, and then on the side of the vertebral column, in front
of the longus colli muscle ; and it is covered by the left
pleural bag in all its extent. On its inner side are the
trachea and the oesophagus, with the thoracic duct. Somewhat anterior to the level of the artery, though running in
the same direction, is the vagus nerve, with some of the cardiac nerves.
may
Peculiarities. -The left subclavian is subjected less frequently than
the other branches of the arch to variations from its ordinary arrange
ment. Sometimes it arises in common with the left carotid, or it
take origin, though rarely, from a dilatation connected with the remains of the arterial duct. It has been before said that, where there
Varia tions in its origin not fre quent.
Y 4
328 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Right subclais transposition of the viscera, the left subclavian and carotid arise from
an innominate trunk ; but this is not a constant rule, for the subclavian,
in such a condition of the vessels, may be the last on the arch, and
cross the front of the spinal column to take its place in the neck.
In some instances the right subclavian arises from the arch ofthe
aorta, and when this peculiarity exists, the vessel may be placed first,
second, or third, though most frequently it is last on the arch. To reach
from the the inner margin of the first rib ofthe right side, when it is last on the
vian may arise
arch.
arch (most to the left), the artery is directed between the esophagus
and the vertebral column, or it may be, as in one case, between the trachea and the œsophagus. The right subclavian may also be connected
with the pouch, or the pervious part of the ductus arteriosus, in the
same way as the left subclavian. (See Quain, p. 159. )
Veins of VEINS OF THE HEART.
the heart are
superior cava ;
which is formed
minate;
These are, as before said, the
superior and the inferior cava, which are the great systemic
veins that return impure blood to the right auricle ; and the
pulmonary veins, that open into the left auricle, and convey
to it pure blood from the lungs.
The superior or descending cava is formed by the union
of the right and left innominate veins, and conveys to the
by inno- heart the blood of the head, neck, upper limbs, and thorax.
veins Its origin is on the right side of the arch of the aorta, opposite the interval between the cartilages of the first two ribs.
From that spot the large vein descends to the pericardium,
perforates the fibrous layer of that bag, about one inch and
a half above the heart, and ends in the right auricle. On its
outer aspect, the vein is covered by the right pleura, and the
phrenic nerve is in contact with it. On the inner side is
the ascending part of the arch of the aorta. Behind the vein
is the right branch of the pulmonary artery.
ends in heart.
Its branch- es.
Inno- minate veins are
When the cava is about to perforate the pericardium it is
joined by the large azygos vein of the thorax. Higher than
this spot it receives small veins from the pericardium, and
the parts in the mediastinal space ; and commonly the right
internal mammary vein opens into it.
The innominate veins are united inferiorly in the trunk of
the descending cava : they are two in number, right and left,
and each is formed behind the inner end of the clavicle by the
union of the subclavian and internal jugular veins of one
side of the neck. The trunks differ in length, direction, and
formed. in their connections with the surrounding parts.
right and left.
How
VEINS OF THE HEART. 329
an inch
half
a. The right vein is about one inch and a half long, and Right,
descends vertically, on the right side of the innominate artery, and a
to its junction with the vein of the opposite side. On the long ,
outer aspect the pleura covers it, and along it the phrenic
nerveis placed.
three
in direcb. The left vein is twice or three times as long as the right, left,
and is directed obliquely downwards above the level of the times as long and arch of the aorta, to join the superior cava. Between its oblique
origin and termination the vein crosses behind the sternum, tion.
and the remains of the thymus gland ; and it lies on the three
large branches of the aortic arch, as well as on the several
nerves that descend over the arch.
branch- The branches of these veins are not the same on the two Their
sides. Into the right vein the inferior thyroid branch of the es.
same side opens, and occasionally the right internal mammary vein ends in it. The left innominate vein is joined by
the left inferior thyroid, by the internal mammary of the
same side, by the left superior intercostal, and by some
small thymic and pericardiac veins.
Peculiarities. -Sometimes the innominate veins are not united into Some- times one, but remain separate, and have distinct openings in the right au- they
ricle. When such a variety exists, the right vein takes the course of open se parately the upper cava, whilst the left vein descends on the left side of the into the heart.
heart, and opens into the right auricle through the large coronary vein.
A cross branch is found connecting the two above the heart.
cava.
The inferior or ascending cava enters the right auricle Inferior
as soon as it has pierced the diaphragm. No branches open
into the vein in the thorax. The anatomy of this vein is given
with the vessels of the abdomen.
pulmon❤
veins .
The pulmonary veins are two on each side ; they issue Four
from the fissure of the root of the lung, and end in theary
left auricle ; their position to the other vessels of the root
has been noticed at p. 307.
veins The right veins are longer than the left, and lie beneath Right
the right auricle of the heart. The superior one receives longest.
its roots from the upper and middle pulmonic lobes, and the
inferior vein is formed by branches of the lower lobe.
The left veins cross in front of the descending aorta, and Left.
spring one from each lobe of the lung.
330 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Their number varies.
Peculiarities. The number of these veins may be altered ; first, by
the union of the veins of the left side into one ; and, secondly, by the
want ofunion on the right side, from which three trunks result, corresponding to three lobes. But other peculiarities may be found as to
number, for six or seven veins have been observed taking both sides
together, and a bronchial vein has been found opening into one of the left veins.
Nerves of the
NERVES OF THE THORAX.
The viscera of the thorax are supplied by the pneumothorax. gastric and the sympathetic nerves.
Some other nerves (intercostal) are contained in the wall
To trace the
of the thorax, and will
be afterwards dissected. In the cavity of the thorax is the
phrenic nerve, coursing through it to the diaphragm.
Dissection. The phrenic nerve is sufficiently exposed for its
nerves, examination, but the student should trace the vagus nerve on particu- larly each side through the cavity of the thorax. Follow the vagus on vagus. both sides, behind the root of the lung, and seek some filaments
Phrenic nerve is
from the
of the gangliated cord of the sympathetic, which come forwards to
it. In front of the root the nerve supplies a few pulmonary filaments, especially on the left side. From the root of the lung
pursue the vagus along the œsophagus, by raising the lung and
removing the pleura.
The PHRENIC NERVE (internal respiratory) is a muscular
derived branch of the cervical plexus to the diaphragm (p. 70. ), and
cervical passes through the thorax to its distribution. In its course plexus, through the thorax, it lies in front of the root of the lung and
along the side of the pericardium, with a small companion
and artery. When near the diaphragm each is divided into
through branches that perforate the muscle, and are distributed on its passes
thorax to the under surface. The nerves of opposite sides differ in length,
phragm. and in their connections above the root of the lung.
diaRight nerve above root of lung.
Left nerve
a. The right nerve is deeper at first in its position, and
is also shorter and straighter than the left. As it enters
the chest the nerve crosses behind the subclavian vein, but
in front of the internal mammary artery ; and it lies afterwards along the right side of the innominate vein and
superior cava till it reaches the front of the root of the lung.
b. The left nerve has the same position to vessels as the
NERVES OF THE THORAX. 331
root,
right when entering the cavity, but it is directed in front ofabove
the arch of the aorta to the root of the lung ; and, lastly, it
makes a curve around the projecting heart. Before reaching is longer
the arch of the aorta, the nerve is external to the left common right.
carotid artery, and crosses the left vagus from without
inwards, so as to be internal to that nerve on the arch.
than
offsets.
Branches. - Some small filaments are furnished from the phrenic Some
nerve to the pericardium ; and occasionally the nerve is joined near
the upper part by a twig from the branch of nerve of the subclavius
muscle.
-
mamartery
Internal mammary artery. A small part of this artery, which Internal
furnishes a branch to the diaphragm, has not yet been noticed. mary
This part intervenes between the entrance of the artery into the
chest (p. 66.) , and its course through the cavity along the side of
the sternum (p. 231.) . Lying beneath the first rib thevessel winds winds
round the phrenic nerve and the innominate vein to reach the
side ofthe sternum. It gives the following offset : -
round aperture of tho- rax,
The superior phrenic branch (comes nervi phrenici) is a very slender and gives phrenic artery that accompanies the phrenic nerve to the diaphragm, and branch.
is distributed to that muscle, anastomosing therein with the other
arteries from the aorta, and the musculo- phrenic branch of the
internal mammary.
nerve
thorax
sponds on both sides be low root
The PNEUMO-GASTRIC NERVE is one of the three trunks Vagus
composing the eighth cranial nerve ( p. 172.). Like the inthe
phrenic nerve, each passes through the thorax in its course correfrom the neck to the abdomen. In the lower part of the
thorax the nerves resemble one another in their course, for
they pass behind the root of the lung, each on its own side, and
along the œsophagus to the stomach. But above the root of
the lung, the right and left nerves differ as much as the
phrenic. Each supplies branches to the viscera, viz. to the
heart, the lungs, and the gullet.
oflung.
the root
lung,
a. The right nerve is posterior to the left in position. As Right
the nerve appears in the thorax, it lies between the sub- bove
clavian vein and artery, and sends backwards a recurrent of the
branch round the latter. At first it is directed obliquely
backwards, over the side of the trachea, to the interval between that tube and the oesophagus ; and thus supported,
the nerve reaches the posterior , aspect of the root of the
332 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
and on lung, where it forms the posterior pulmonary plexus.
the back ofthe œsophaΤπο
large offsets are continued to the œsophagus from the plexus,
gus be- and unite near the diaphragm into one trunk, which lies
behind the gullet, and passes along it to the posterior surface
of the stomach.
low root.
Left nerve above the root ofthe lung,
b. The left nerve enters the thorax behind the left innominate vein, and to the outer side of the left common carotid
artery. Lying between the left subclavian and common
carotid arteries, the nerve courses over the arch of the
aorta, and beneath the root of the lung, and forms there a
and on larger plexus than on the right side. From the pulmonic
plexus one or two branches pass to the front of the œsophagus. gus, and join with the corresponding branches of the right
nerve in a plexus on that tube. Finally, the divisions of the
nerve are collected into one trunk, which is continued on the
front ofthe œsophagus to the anterior part of the stomach.
the front of the œsophaBranch- The branches of the pneumo-gastric nerve in the thorax es are, are the following : -
recur- rent la- ryngeal in the thorax ;
cardiac branch1. The recurrent or inferior laryngeal nerve is the first branch in the thorax. Arising on the right side on a level with the subclavian artery, and on the left at the lower border of the arch of
the aorta, the nerve bends backwards to the trachea, along which
it ascends to the larynx. On each side this branch is freely
connected with the cardiac branches of the sympathetic nerve,
especially on the left side beneath the arch of the aorta.
2. Cardiac branches (thoracic).—Besides the cardiac branches
es in the furnished by the vagus in the neck, there are other offsets in front
thorax; of the trachea to communicate with the cardiac plexus. These
branches come from the trunk of nerve on the right side, but they
are supplied by the recurrent nerve on the left side.
lower cardiac branch ofthe neck ;
Pulmon- ary
The termination of the lower cervical cardiac branch of each
nerve (p. 106.) may now be seen.
The branch of the right vagus
lies by the side of the innominate artery, and joins a cardiac nerve
ofthe sympathetic ; but the branch of the left vagus crosses over
the arch of the aorta, and ends in the superficial cardiac plexus.
3. Pulmonary branches. -There are two sets of branches for the
branch- lung, one to the anterior and the other to the posterior aspect of the root.
es .
anterior.
Small a. The anterior branches are two or three in number, and of
small size, and communicating with filaments of the sympathetic
NERVES OF THE THORAX. 333
on the pulmonary artery, form the anterior pulmonary plexus.
These nerves are best seen on the left side.
postea plexus.
b. The posterior branches are the largest and much the most Large
numerous, and are obtained by the splitting of the trunk of the rior
nerve after it has become flattened. Forming a plexiform arrange- form
ment (posterior pulmonary plexus) behind the root of the lung,
these nerves are joined by filaments from the third and fourth
ganglia of the knotted cord of the sympathetic, and are conveyed
into the interior of the lung on the divisions of the air tube.
4. Esophageal branches are furnished to the gullet all along the so- phageal thorax, but in greatest abundance in the lower half. Below the branches
root of the lung the branches of the pneumo-gastric nerves surround the œsophagus with a network, which has been named plexus form a
gulæ.
plexus.
the symin thoSYMPATHETIC NERVE. -In the thorax the sympathetic Part of
nerve consists, as in the abdomen, of a knotted cord along pathetic
each side of the spinal column, which communicates with the rax conspinal nerves and of a large prevertebral or cardiac plexus,
which distributes branches to the viscera, viz. to the heart
and the lungs.
sists of
central
plexus.
The gangliated cord will be exposed in a future stage of a gangli- the dissection, after the heart and the lungs are removed. cord,
The cardiac plexus lies at the base of the heart, around and a
the great bloodvessels. A part of this network, the super- cardiac
ficial cardiac plexus, has been already described (p. 313.) .
The remaining part, or the deep cardiac plexus, will be
exposed beneath the arch of the aorta by the following dissection : -
-
tion of
plexus.
Dissection. The cardiac plexus has been interfered with by Dissecthe previous examination of the heart, but by following the the
directions now given the student will obtain a knowledge of the
disposition of the nerves, and will be able to make a complete dissection of them when the opportunity offers.
Cut across the arch of the aorta with care, close above the pul- To find the right monary artery, and draw the arch well over to the left side : next part.
divide the descending cava, above the entrance of the vena azygos,
and throw down the lower part. By the removal of some cellular membrane and lymphatic glands, the right part of the plexus,
in which the cardiac branches of the sympathetic and pneumo-gastric nerves of the right side are united, will be found in front of
334 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
To ex- pose the
the trachea, above the right branch of the pulmonary artery. The
offsets to the heart should be followed downwards on the trunk of
the pulmonary artery, and those to the lung should be traced
along the branch of the artery.
To expose the part of the plexus into which the branches of the
left part. sympathetic and vagus nerves of the left side of the body enter,
cut through the arch a second time, to the left of the junction of
the ligamentum arteriosum with it, and divide that ligament, so as
to allow the transverse part of the arch to be turned upwards with
the great vessels attached to it. The lymphatic glands and the
cellular tissue are to be cleared away as on the opposite side to
expose the nerves. Afterwards follow downwards the nerves
to the heart, chiefly to the posterior coronary plexus.
Nerves entering
cardiac
In the deep cardiac plexus are united the several cardiac
the deep nerves derived from the ganglia of the sympathetic in the
plexus. neck, except the highest nerve of the left side ; together with
all the cardiac branches of the vagus nerve both in the neck
and the chest, with the exception of the lowest cervical carIts situ diac branch of the left side. This large centre is situate
between the trachea and the arch of the aorta, above the
branches of the pulmonary artery ; and from it nerves are
is form- furnished to the heart and the lungs. The several nerves
parts, entering the plexus are not intermingled in a ganglionic
and left. mass in front of the trachea, but those of the right side
ation ;
ed oftwo
right
Right part how
es are distri- buted to the heart
unite together on the same side of the trachea, and those of
the left half of the neck have a like disposition on their
side ofthe air tube.
a. The right part of the plexus is above the right branch of the
formed. pulmonary artery, and receives the nerves of the right side, viz.
the cardiac nerves of the sympathetic in the neck, the cardiac
branches of the trunk of the vagus, both in the neck and chest,
Branch- and the cardiac offsets of its recurrent branch. The branches of
this part of the plexus are distributed mostly to the right side of
the heart. From its lower end cardiac nerves pass downwards before
and behind the right branch of the pulmonary artery. Those in
front ofthat vessel run on the trunk of the pulmonary artery nearly
to the heart, where they send a few twigs behind the vessel, to join
bythe the plexus on the posterior coronary artery ; and, lastly, they anterior coronary appear between the aorta and the pulmonary artery, to end in the
plexus. anterior coronary plexus (p. 313.) . The other nerves, those that
THE AIR TUBE. 335
to root are behind the branch of the pulmonary artery, supply the right A fewgo
auricle of the heart. Offsets are also sent laterally on the branch of lung.
of that artery to the nerves ofthe root of the lung.
part ;
nerves enter- ing it.
descend
b. The left half of the plexus is close to the ligamentum arterio- Left
şum, and rather on the left of the trachea. In it are collected the
cardiac nerves of the sympathetic cord of the left side of the neck,
except the highest, which goes to the superficial cardiac plexus ;
also the numerous and large branches of the left recurrent nerve
of the vagus. Nerves descend from it around the left branch of Offsets
the pulmonary artery to the trunk of that vessel, on which they to left
are continued to the heart ; and after supplying nerves to the left coronary plexus
auricle, they terminate in the bundle of nerves of the posterior
coronary plexus (p. 313.). A considerable offset is directed for- and to
wards by the side of the ligamentum arteriosum, to join the super- lung.
ficial cardiac plexus ; and some nerves reach the pulmonary plexus
by passing along the branch of the artery to the lung.
root of
from the
The cardiac branches of the gangliated cord of the sym- Other cardiac
pathetic nerve in the neck ( p. 110.) are now seen at their nerves
termination in the thorax. The nerves enter the chest on neck.
each side, over or beneath the subclavian artery, and join
in the deep cardiac plexus, with one exception (left superficial cardiac).
on the
side
a. On the right side. -Though usually three in number, there Three
may be but two cardiac nerves on this side, for the highest, or right
superficial nerve is sometimes blended with one of the other two. enter
The middle and inferior nerves pass beneath the subclavian artery deep
to the right half of the deep cardiac plexus. All three communicate with the branches of the recurrent laryngeal nerve of the
vagus at the root of the neck, or in the upper part of the thorax,
as well as with one another.
plexus.
on left ;
enters
b. On the left side the superficial or highest cardiac nerve passes Three
for the most part over the arch of the aorta, and ends in the one
superficial cardiac plexus, but it may give a branch beneath the super- arch to the deep plexus. Only one other large nerve may be seen ficial,
entering the left side of the deep cardiac plexus, for oftentimes the deep
middle cardiac throws itself into the lower cardiac nerve.
others
plexus.
-
THE TRACHEA AND THE LUNG.
Dissection. To expose the bronchi, or the divisions of the air To extube in the root of the lung, it will be necessary to remove the trachea pose the
336 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
divi- sions.
and its pulmonary artery and its branches, together with the pulmonary
veins. When the transverse part of the arch of the aorta, which
has been already cut through, is turned to one side, the dissector
will be able to clear away the bronchial glands, the nerves, and
the cellular membrane from the part of the trachea in the thorax,
and from its branches of bifurcation.
Trachea
lies in the neck,
The TRACHEA, or the air tube, reaches from the larynx to
the lungs, and lies on the front of the spinal column. The
tube begins at the lower part of the larynx, opposite the
fifth cervical vertebra, and ends at the third dorsal vertebra
and in by dividing into two pieces (bronchi), one for each lung.
thorax, Its connections in the neck are described at p. 115., and its
ends in structure at p. 153. The part in the thorax remains to be
the
where it
bronchi.
Its con- nections in the thorax .
Bronchi lie in the
studied.
In the thorax the trachea is situate with the great vessels
between the pleural bags. There it is covered by the arch
of the aorta, by the innominate and left carotid arteries, and
by the cardiac plexus of nerves ; and superficial to the last
arteries is the left innominate vein. Behind the air tube is
the œsophagus, which is slightly inclined to the left near
the arch of the aorta. On the right side is the vagus, together with the innominate artery, for a short distance, after
it has passed over the trachea ; and on the left side is the
vagus with its recurrent branch.
The divisions of the air tube, or the bronchi, are conroots of tained in the root of the lung, where they are surrounded
lungs ; by vessels, glands, and nerves. Near the lung each is
the
divided into as many primary branches as there are lobes to
that organ. Their position behind the other pulmonary
vessels has been described at page 307, but the peculiarities
are like of each are now to be noticed. In their structure and form
trachea the bronchi resemble the windpipe, for they are round and
cartilaginous in front, but flat, and muscular and membranous
behind.
the
in form .
The right differs from the left branch
The right branch is about an inch in length, and is larger
than the left ; it passes outwards almost horizontally on a
level with the fourth dorsal vertebra, and is placed above
in the right pulmonary artery : the vena azygos arches over it.
length,
The left branch is about two inches long. It is directed
CHARACTERS OF THE LUNG. 337
and con.
obliquely downwards through the arch of the aorta, and joins
the root of the left lung, at a spot a vertebra lower than on
the opposite side. In this course the tube lies on the course,
œsophagus and the thoracic duct, and on the descending nections.
aorta ; it is at first below the level of the corresponding
pulmonary artery.
the
examine
Dissection. Remove the lungs from the body by cutting Remove
through the vessels of the root. Take away, next, the remains of lungs to
the heart and pericardium, after dividing the inferior cava and them.
detaching the pericardium from the surface of the diaphragm.
Whilst doing this, some care should be taken by the dissector not
to injure the parts contained in the interpleural space in front
of the spine. After the lungs are detached, their characters and
structure may be examined.
is
ed by
PHYSICAL CHARACTERS OF THE LUNG. The surface of Surface
the lung is smooth and shining, because of the pleural in- smooth ;
vestment. Through the serous covering the mass of the is marklung may be seen to be divided by cellular septa and by lobules
dark spots, or sometimes lines, into small irregularly sized
pieces or lobules. On looking closely at the pulmonary
substance, especially at a thin margin, the texture will be and
perceived to be spongy, or composed of minute cells.
small cells.
varies
age.
The tint of the lung varies with age. In infancy the Colour
colour is a pale red ; but in the adult the texture becomes with
greyish in colour, and presents here and there dark grey
spots or lines, whose colour deepens with increasing age,
and becomes even black in old people. From the position accidenof the body after death the colour of the posterior border lour.
may be of a bluish black shade.
tal coTo ence the touch the lung is soft and yielding, and on cutting Consist
into it the pulmonary substance will be found to be porous
and spongy ; but the lung which is deprived of its air by
pressure has a tough leathery feel. In the ordinary condition of the lung slight pressure with the thumb and
finger drives the air from its containing cells through the
pulmonary structure, and produces the noise known as crepitation. If the lung contains serum, a frothy red fluid will and elas- ticity of run out on a section being made. The texture of the lung the pulis very elastic ; this elasticity causing the organ both to texture.
Z
monary
338 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Specific gravity,
and weight of the lung.
Follow bronchi
the lung.
diminish greatly when the thorax is opened, and to expel
air that may be blown into it.
The specific gravity of the lung varies with the conditions of dilatation and collapse, or of infiltration with fluid.
When the pulmonary tissue is free from fluid and filled
with air it floats in water, but when it is quite deprived of
air it is slightly heavier than water, and sinks in that fluid.
The weight of the lung is influenced greatly by the quantity
of fluid or other material contained in its texture ; ordinarily
it varies from eighteen to twenty-one ounces, and the right
lung is about two ounces heavier than the left. In the
male the lungs are larger, and slightly heavier than in the
female.
Dissection. -By tracing the large branches of the bronchi and
and ves- the bloodvessels and nerves into the lung, their mode of branching
sel into will be apparent ; and by inflating a part of the lung, the cellular
structure may be seen. But the arrangement of the different
vessels will not be ascertained without minute injection, and the
use of a microscope.
Outline of the
ofthe lung.
STRUCTURE OF THE LUNG. - The spongy pulmonary
elements structure consists of minute cells, in which the smallest
branches of the air tube terminate ; and the mass of the
lung is formed by the aggregation of the cells into small
groups or lobules, and into larger masses or lobes. Each
lobule is distinct from the surrounding ones, and is furnished
with its air tube and nerves, and with its own set of vessels
necessary for both its function and nutrition. The con.
stituents of the lung are united by a serous covering, which
is prolonged continuously over the surface, and by a subserous cellular coat, which penetrates into the mass, subdividing it into pieces. These several parts are examined
more in detail below.
Serous and
rous
Serous and subserous coverings. -The coat derived from the
pleura is thin and transparent, and forms an entire capsule for the subse- lung, except at the root, where the vessels enter. The subserous cellular layer contains fibres of elastic tissue, and not only
tovers the surface, but extends into the interior, establishing the
division of the mass into lobules : where it separates the lobules
it is named interlobular cellular tissue, and is there free from fat.
cover- ings.
STRUCTURE OF THE LUNG. 339
on air
The air cells are the little sacs or dilatations in which the Form of the air smallest branches of the air tube terminate. They are polyhedral cells ;
in form, except on the surface, adapting themselves thereby to
the neighbouring cells, and are distinct one from another, save
through the channel of the air passage. The cells are clustered position
around the smallest divisions of the air tubes, and are situate tubes.
both along the sides and at the extremity of the tube, with which
they communicate by large orifices. In size, these small cells vary Size.
from tooth of an inch across, but they are larger on the
surface and at the edges than in the deeper parts of the lung.
The cell wall is formed by scattered fibres of elastic tissue, and is Struclined by a transparent mucous membrane possessing scaly epithelium. Beneath the mucous lining is a network of the pulmonary
vessels.
-
ture.
how Lobules and lobes. - A lobule is a cluster of air cells around Lobules
the terminal divisions of a lobular branch of the air tube. Vary- formed.
ing in size and shape, each lobule is invested by cellular tissue,
and possesses its own branch of the air tube, as well as distinct
branches of vessels and nerves. The larger masses of the lung, Lobes.
viz. lobes, are produced by the aggregation of lobules.
sions'
bronchi
Bronchial divisions in the lung. — When a bronchus is followed Diviinto the pulmonary structure, it is found to divide generally in a of the
binary order, and to diminish in size at each subdivision, until one in the
offset appertains to a lobule, of which it forms the lobular bronchial lung
tube. In the lobule, again, the tube still subdivides, according to
the size, until the final ramifications have but a diameter of to
th of an inch. When this last degree of diminution is arrived till they
at, the tubes give origin to the air cells, as explained above.
end in cells.
ence in
small
ture
In the larger bronchial branches the constituent parts are the Differsame as in the trachea, only they are somewhat differently large and
arranged ; but in the smallest divisions, and in the air cells, mesin
some of the common structures are absent. Further, the larger strucbronchial divisions in the lung are round instead of being hemi- and in
spherical, as in the trachea ; but the smallest (from which the cells form.
spring) are irregular in shape, appearing to be spaces amongst
the cells rather than tubes with continuous walls.
tuents of
the lung.
The modifications which the elementary pieces of the air tube Constiundergo in the bronchial divisions and in the air cells are the the air
following :-The pieces of cartilage, which are circularly arranged tubing
in the trachea, become broken up in the bronchial divisions, and
scattered over the wall as irregular fragments. Becoming thinner Pieces of
and smaller as the subdivision of the air tube proceeds, they at lage.
last disappear, and are absent from the terminal branches. The
cartiz 2
340 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
and elas- tic tis- sue.
Mus- cular
Fibrous fibrous and elastic tissues of the bronchial tubes are continued
even to the air cells, but in the small cell- bearing branches, the
bundles of elastic tissue are diffused, and the two textures, much
diminished in strength, are blended together to form the parietal
structure. Some fibres of the elastic tissue are continued to the
air cells. The muscular fibres of the back of the trachea are diffused over the surface of the bronchial divisions, and extend along
the air tube beyond the limit of the pieces of cartilage, but they
Mucous cease where the cells begin to be formed. The mucous membrane
becomes thinner as it extends onwards along the air tube, and is
finally continued to the cells, where it is transparent. Its ciliated
columnar epithelium is changed for scaly or pavemental in the
finest bronchial divisions, and in the air cells.
fibres.
mem- brane.
Vessels of the lung are func- tional
Vessels ofthe lung ― . Two sets of vessels are furnished to the
lung, one being concerned in its function, the other in its nutrition. The vessels that convey blood to the lung to be aerated, or
nutrient, that carry the same away after it has been subjected to the
respiratory process, are named pulmonary ; whilst the vessels connected with the nutrition of the structure are called bronchial.
and
viz.
pulmo- nary artery
and vein ;
and bron- chial artery
and vein.
Nerves.
a. The pulmonary artery, after entering the lung, divides like the
bronchus which it accompanies ; and its last branches are furnished to
the lobules. In the lobule the arterial branch is minutely subdivided
and its ramifications end in a capillary network in the wall of the air
cells, beneath the mucous lining. The vascular circle around one cell
communicates with the contiguous ones. The pulmonary veins begin in
the arterial network before mentioned, and the twigs issuing from the
several lobules are united in larger tubes, that accompany the arteries
from the lung. Although the small lobular branches of the arteries remain separate from one another, the corresponding veins anastomose
together.
b. The bronchial arteries enter the lung on the air tube, and supply
offsets to those tubes and the contiguous bronchial glands, to the large
bloodvessels, and to the interlobular cellular tissue of the lung. The
bronchial vein begins by roots corresponding to the branches of the
artery, except the smallest divisions of the air tubes, the capillaries
of which communicate with the pulmonary vessels- most probably
the arteries.
Nerves and lymphatics. —The lung receives nerves from the vagus and
the sympathetic, and the offsets follow the divisions of the air tube.
The lymphatics of the lung are both superficial and deep, and enter phatics. the bronchial glands at the root of the lung.
Lym-
THE THORACIC AORTA. 341
PARTS IN FRONT OF THE SPINE AND THE CORD OF THE
SYMPATHETIC.
In front of the spinal column are the several parts
enumerated as lying in the interpleural space of the posterior
part of the mediastinum, viz. the aorta, vena azygos, thoracic
duct, and œsophagus.
tion of
above menDissection. First find the small thoracic duct near the dia- Dissecphragm, and on the right of the aorta, by cutting through the the parts
pleura that covers it. This slender vessel may be injected with
tallow. Afterwards clear away the cellular membrane from the tioned .
different parts before mentioned, and follow upwards the thoracic
duct beneath the arch of the aorta, till it leaves the upper aperture of the thorax. A small azygos vein, on the left of the aorta,
should likewise be dissected. Raise the pleura from the inner
surface of the ribs, and the gangliated cord of the sympathetic
nerve will be seen lying along the side of the spinal column over
the heads of the ribs. Branches should be followed outwards from
the ganglia to the intercostal nerves, and other branches should be
traced over the bodies of the vertebræ to form the three trunks of
the splanchnic nerves.
cic aorta. The THORACIC AORTA is the part of the great systemic Thoravessel which is above the diaphragm. Its extent is from Extent,
the lower border of the third dorsal vertebra (the left side),
where the arch ceases, to the front of the last dorsal vertebra. Contained in the interpleural space, in front of the course,
spine, the vessel is rather arched in its course, lying at its
upper part on the left, but at its lower part in front of the
spine, so that the curve resulting therefrom has its convexity turned to the left. In all its length the aorta is and concovered by the left pleura ; and in front of it is the root of
the left lung with the pericardium. To its right side are
the oesophagus and the thoracic duct, but near the diaphragm
the former is placed over the aorta. Beneath the vessel are
the vertebræ and the smaller azygos vein.
nection.
The branches of the vessel are distributed to the sur- Branchrounding parts, and are named from their destination, viz.
es.
z 3
342 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Arteries of the lung.
One right,
two left.
Distri- bution.
Vein of thelung.
Pericar- dial
bronchial, pericardial, oesophageal, mediastinal, and intercostal.
1. The bronchial arteries supply the structure of the lungs, and
arise from the front of the aorta, but their number and place of
origin are liable to vary.
a. The artery of the right lung arises either in common with
one of the left bronchial arteries ( superior) , or from the first intercostal artery of the right side.
b. For the left lung there are two arteries (superior and inferior), that arise from the aorta at a distance one from another.
These vessels adhere to the posterior part of the bronchial
tubes, and so enter the interior of the lung, in which they ramify ;
they give some twigs to the bronchial glands and the œsophagus.
Bronchial veins. One vein issues from the root of each lung,
to end in the following manner :-the right vein joins the larger
azygos vein, and the left ends in the superior intercostal vein of the same side.
2. The pericardial branches are some irregular twigs that are
branch- furnished to the posterior part of the cardiac covering.
es.
Esobranch- es.
3. Esophageal branches arise at different parts of the aorta, and
phageal are four or five in number. Ramifying in the structure of the
gullet, these vessels anastomose with one another ; above, they
communicate with branches of the inferior thyroid artery near the
larynx, and below with twigs of the coronary artery of the
stomach.
Medias- 4. Small mediastinal branches (posterior) supply the cellular
tissue and the glands in the posterior part of the interpleural space.
tinal branch- es.
Inter- costal arteries.
Direc- tion to
tercostal
5. The intercostal arteries are commonly ten or nine in number
on each side, and are furnished to the same number of the lower
Number, intercostal spaces. To the other one or two upper spaces branches
are supplied from the intercostal artery of the subclavian trunk.
These small vessels arise from the posterior part of the aorta, and the in- run outwards on the vertebræ, and beneath the cord of the sympaspaces. thetic nerve, to the intercostal spaces, where each divides into an
anterior and a posterior branch. In this course the upper branches
are somewhat oblique, and the lower ones transverse. As the Right, aorta lies on the left of the spine, the right branches are the longest
and pass beneath the œsophagus, the thoracic duct, and the vena
azygos major ; they supply many twigs to the bodies of the vertebræ on which they lie.
longest.
The an- terior a. The anterior branch is the continuation of the common trunk in
branch direction and size. At first the artery lies in the centre of the inter-
THE AZYGOS VEINS. 343
intercos- costal space, beneath the pleura and a fascia prolonged backwards from occupies
the internal intercostal muscle, resting here on the external intercos- tal space
tal layer of muscle. But it ascends to the lower border of the rib
above, near the angle, and then continues onwards between the intercostal strata nearly to the anterior third of the space, where it ends in
two branches that anastomose with the intercostal arteries of the internal mammary (p. 232. ). Accompanying the artery are the intercostal with
nerve and vein, the vein being commonly highest, the nerve lowest, and and vein.
the artery between the two ; but in the upper spaces the nerve is at
first above the artery, though it soon takes its place below that vessel.
Branches are furnished to the layers of intercostal muscles and to the Offsets.
ribs about the centre (from front to back) of the intercostal space a
superficial twig accompanies the cutaneous nerve.
:
nerve
moses. The upper artery of the set anastomoses with the superior intercostal Anastobranch ofthe subclavian artery, and the lower ones enter the abdominal
wall below the true ribs, and anastomose in it with the arteries of that
part.
rior
turns to
b. The posterior branch turns backwards between the vertebra and Postethe ascending costo- transverse ligament, and is distributed in the back. branch
As it passes by the intervertebral foramen it furnishes a small spinal the
branch to the vertebræ and the spinal cord. ( See VESSELS OF THE back.
SPINAL CORD. )
costal The intercostal vein closely resembles the artery in its course and Interbranching. Near the head of the rib it receives a contributing tal vein
dorsal branch, and then joins the azygos vein.
interartery
rived
The superior intercostal artery of the subclavian trunk is re- Superior
ferred to in the dissection of the neck (p. 67.) . Descending costal
over the neck of the first rib, external to the ganglion of the sym- is depathetic, the artery supplies a branch to the first intercostal space : From
continuing to the second space, which it may supply in like man- vian.
ner, it ends by anastomosing with the upper aortic intercostal Supplies
branch. Each intercostal branch from it divides into an anterior one or
and posterior branch of distribution like the aortic arteries.
subclatwo spaces.
vein
on the
and on
The vein corresponding to the artery is differently disposed on The
the two sides. On the right side it opens into the subclavian
vein. On the left side the superior intercostal vein is formed by right
branches of the two or three highest spaces ; it is joined by the left side.
left bronchial vein, and ends in the left innominate vein, after crossing the arch of the aorta.
azygos The prevertebral or azygos veins are two in number, Two
large and small, and receive branches corresponding to veins.
the offsets furnished by the thoracic aorta. Moreover, by z 4
344 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
left,
abdo- men,
means of the larger vein, the inferior cava communicates
with the superior, so that blood may reach the heart from
the lower part of the body even if the lower cava should be
obliterated .
Small, or a. The smaller or left azygos vein (inferior) begins in
the abdomen, in the lumbar veins of the left side of the
begins in vertebral column. Having entered the thorax along with
the aorta, or through the crus of the diaphragm, the vein
ascends on the left of the aorta as high as the seventh or
eighth dorsal vertebra, and then crosses beneath that vessel
and the thoracic duct to end in the larger or right vein.
Branch- It receives the four or five lower intercostal veins of the left
side, and some œsophageal and mediastinal veins.
ends in larger azygos.
es
There may be
vein.
Most frequently there is a second left azygos vein (superior
another Breschet ) , which is formed by the veins of the spaces between the
azygos superior intercostal vein and the highest branch of the smal
azygos vein. Receiving three or four branches, the trunk either
joins the lower azygos, or crosses the spine to open separately into
the larger vein.
Large or right azygos is on right side of spine,
b. The larger or right azygos vein begins in the lumbar
veins on the right side of the spine, and its origin is described with the vessels of the abdomen. It enters the
thorax through the aortic opening of the diaphragm, and
ascends over the right intercostal arteries and the bodies of
the vertebræ, lying on the right side of the thoracic duct.
and joins Opposite the third intercostal space the vein arches forwards
above the root of the right lung, to join the superior cavɛ
as this vessel enters the pericardium.
superior cava.
Branching it.
In this vein are collected the intercostal veins of the right side
esjoin- below the upper two spaces ; some of the veins of the left side of
the thorax, through the left azygos veins ; some œsophageal, mediastinal, and vertebral veins ; and the right bronchial vein. This
vessel is not provided with valves, so that the intraspinal and
intercostal veins may be injected through it.
Eso- phagus The ESOPHAGUS is a hollow muscular tube which exis partly tends from the pharynx to the stomach. The cervical part in neck of the tube is described at page 115., and the thoracic part
is now to be examined.
and Entering the thorax rather to the left of the middle line,
THE ESOPHAGUS. 345
the
where it lies in
the
to pass
diacovering
neath it,
the gullet is directed inwards beneath the arch of the aorta, partly in
and reaches the centre of the spine about the fourth or fifth thorax,
dorsal vertebra. From that spot it is continued through the
interpleural space superficial to the other parts therein, and front of
on the right of the aorta ; but at the lower part of the spine,
thorax, the gullet is again inclined to the left, over the through
aorta, to gain the œsophageal opening of the diaphragm. phragm.
As far as the arch of the aorta the oesophagus lies beneath Parts
the trachea, though it is inclined somewhat to the left of the and beair tube, and is covered by the origin of the subclavian
artery. Beyond the arch it is crossed by the left bronchus,
and is beneath the pericardium, which conceals it down to
the diaphragm. At the upper part of the thorax the
œsophagus will be found to rest on the longus colli muscle
and the vertebræ, but below the arch of the aorta it is
separated from the spine by the intercostal vessels, and
lastly it lies on the lower part of the aorta. Being partly
covered by the pleura on each side, the tube lies between sides.
the aorta and the vena azygos, below the arch, the former
being to the left. Below the situation of the bronchus the
pneumo-gastric nerves surround the oesophagus with their
branches, and above the same spot the thoracic duct will be
found to the left of the tube.
-
and on the
Structure. If a piece of the middle of the gullet is coats Threeare
removed and distended with cotton wool, it will be found in it .
to consist of a muscular, a cellular, and a mucous coat.
a cular . The muscular coat is thick and strong, and consists of two Amuslayers of fibres, the external being longitudinal, and the internal coat
circular in direction, like the muscular tunic of the other parts of
the alimentary tube. At the upper part of the œsophagus the fibres
are red, and have the striped character ; but below they are paler,
and are mostly of the unstriped kind.
nal lon- The external layer is formed of parallel longitudinal fibres, which of exterform an entire covering, and end below on the stomach. The fibres gitudinal
begin by longitudinal bands opposite the cricoid cartilage (p . 125.) .
ternal The internal layer of circular fibres is continuous above with and inthe fibres of the pharynx ; these are more oblique at the middle circular than at either end of the oesophagus.
fibres.
coat.
b. The cellular layer lies between the muscular and mucous Cellular
coats, and attaches one to the other loosely.
346 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Mucous coat.
Some glands.
In the thorax,
atic glands and duct.
c. The mucous coat or lining will be seen on cutting open the
tube to be pale in colour, and of some thickness. It is very loosely
connected with the muscular coat, and is thrown into longitudinal folds when the œsophagus is contracted. Lining the interior
is a layer of scaly epithelium, and the surface is studded here and
there with minute papillæ.
Some small compound glands (œsophageal) are found at the
lower part of the gullet.
LYMPHATICS OF THE THORAX. In the thorax there are
lymph lymphatic vessels both of the wall and of the viscera, which
enter collections of glands in certain positions, and end in
either the one or the other of the two lymphatic ducts.
Besides these the large thoracic duct traverses the thorax
in its course from the abdomen to the neck.
Several sets of
into which the lymphcollect- ed.
a. Lymphatic glands. -Along the course of the internal mamglands, mary artery is a chain of sternal or mediastinal glands, which receive lymphatics from the front of the chest, the thymus gland,
the pericardium, and the upper surfaces of the diaphragm and
atics are liver. On each side ofthe spine, near the heads of the ribs as well
as between the intercostal muscles, is a set of intercostal glands that
receive the lymphatics of the posterior wall ofthe thorax. At the
root of and along the trachea are numerous bronchial glands,
through which the lymphatics of the lung pass. And beneath the
arch of the aorta are a few cardiac glands, which receive the
lymphatics of the heart. Along the side of the aorta and the
œsophagus is a chain of œsophageal glands, which are joined by
the lymphatics of the œsophagus, and communicate with those of
the lungs.
Thoracic
the aband ends
1
b. The thoracic duct is the great channel by which the duct lymphatic and lacteal fluid of the lower half of the body and
begins in the left part of the upper half is conveyed to the blood. The
domen duct begins in the abdomen in an enlargement (chyli rein neck. ceptaculum), and ends in the left subclavian vein of the
neck. It is from eighteen to twenty inches in length, and
is contained in the thorax, except at its origin and termiConnec- nation ; and it has the undermentioned connections. Entering the cavity to the right side of the aorta and through
the same opening, the duct ascends on the right of that
tions in the thorax .
CORD OF THE SYMPATHETIC. 347
described (p. 113. ), to open
vessel, between it and the vena azygos, as high as the arch.
Opposite the second dorsal vertebra the duct passes beneath
the arch of the aorta and the left subclavian artery, and is
applied to the left side of the oesophagus, which conducts
it to the neck. Lastly, at the lower part of the neck, the
duct arches outwards, as before
into the left subclavian vein. In its course the tube is Maybe
oftentimes divided in two, which unite again ; and near its
termination it is generally branched in the same way. It is Is furprovided with valves, like a vein, at intervals, and these are with
in greater number at the upper than at the lower part .
Occasionally the duct may be found on the left instead of
the right side of the aorta.
divided.
nished
valves.
lymph- In the thorax the duct receives the lymphatics of the left half Receives
of the wall of the cavity, viz. from the sternal and intercostal atics.
glands ; also the lymphatics of the left lung, of the left side of the
heart, and of the trachea, and the œsophagus.
duct
neck.
c. The right lymphatic duct, though not in the thorax, is Right
mainly formed by the large branches received from the
viscera of the cavity. It is a short trunk at the lower part is in the
of the neck, which is about half an inch in length, and opens
into the angle of union of the subclavian and jugular veins
of the same side. Its opening is guarded by valves.
ceives
the arm
Into this trunk the lymphatics of the right upper limb and right it reside of the head and neck pour their contents. In addition, the lymphlymphatics of the right side of the chest, of the right lung, of the atics of
right side of the heart, and some from the right lobe of the liver, and of
after passing through their respective glands, unite into a fewthorax.
large trunks that ascend beneath the innominate vein to reach the duct in the neck.
the
cord of
thetic
twelve
CORD OF THE SYMPATHETIC NERVE. The thoracic part Thoracic
of the gangliated cord of the sympathetic lies by the side of sympa
the spinal column, over the heads of the ribs and the intercostal vessels. The ganglia present on it are usually twelve, has
one being opposite each dorsal nerve, but this number ganglia,
varies much of these, the upper one is the largest ; and the
last two are rather anterior to the line of the others, being
situate on the side of the bodies of the corresponding vertebræ. In the chest the sympathetic nerve is covered by
348 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
and is the pleura, and it is continuous above and below with the
by pleu- cord in the neck and the abdomen.
covered
ra.
Branch- es
to join the spinal nerves
to supply viscera.
In the upper
Each ganglion furnishes external branches of communication with the spinal nerves, and internal or visceral
branches.
Connecting branches. Two offsets pass outwards from
each ganglion to join a spinal nerve (intercostal). In the
branches of communication both white and sympathetic
nerve fibres are combined.
The internal branches differ in size and distribution, according as they are derived from the upper or the lower six
ganglia.
a. The branches of the upper six are very small, and are distrisix gan- buted to the aorta, and the vertebræ and their ligaments. Mr.
Swan describes a plexus in front of the spine as formed by the
union ofthe branches of opposite sides. From the third and fourth
ganglia offsets enter the posterior pulmonary plexus.
glia off- sets are small.
In the lower six,
b. The branches of the lower six ganglia are larger and much
whiter than the others, and are united together to form some
large and visceral nerves of the abdomen (splanchnic) . These splanchnic and form nerves are three in number (large, small, and smallest), and pierce
nerves. the diaphragm to end in the solar or the renal plexus.
white,
three
Great splanch- nic,
which ends in semi- Junar ganglion.
Small splanch- nic
1. The great splanchnic nerve is a large white cord, which arises
by roots apparently from only four or five ganglia (sixth to the
tenth), but its fibres may be traced upwards on the knotted cord
as high as the third ganglion . The nerve descends on the bodies
of the vertebræ, pierces the fibres of the crus of the diaphragm,
and ends inthe semilunar ganglion of the abdomen.- ( See NERVES
OF THE ABDOMEN. )
At the lower part of the thorax the nerve may be divided into large
bundles, and it may present a ganglion, or more than one on its different bundles.
2. The small splanchnic nerve is formed by roots from the tenth
and eleventh ganglia, or their intervening cord. In the thorax
it communicates sometimes with the great splanchnic nerve, and
joins is transmitted inferiorly through the crus of the diaphragm,
plexus. to enter the part of the solar plexus by the side of the cœliac cœliac
splanchartery.
Smallest 3. The smallest splanchnic nerve begins in the last ganglion, and
nic ends accompanies the other nerves through the diaphragm. In the in renal abdomen it ends in the renal plexus. When this nerve is absent,
its place is taken by a branch of the preceding nerve.
plexus.
PARIETES OF THE THORAX. 349
PARIETES OF THE THORAX.
parts
ing the
Between the ribs in the wall of the thorax are the two Soft
layers of intercostal muscles, which enclose the intercostal boundnerves and arteries. At the base of the thorax the dia- thorax,
phragm is to be examined in part, as it forms the boundary
in this direction ; and at the apex of the cavity the relative and consituation of the parts contained in the upper aperture is to apex.
be studied.
-
tained in
costal J
INTERCOSTAL MUSCLES. The anterior part of these Intermuscles has been described with the wall of the thorax in mus cles.
the dissection of the upper limb (p . 229.). The posterior
part of the same muscles is now to be examined from the
inner side.
angle or
the rib.
The internal intercostal muscle is fixed to the inner Inner layer margin of the ribs bounding the intercostal space. Beginning at the sternum, it reaches backwards only to the reaches
angle of the ribs in the upper spaces, but in the lower head of
spaces the muscular fibres are continued nearly to the head
of the rib. Where the muscle ceases, a thin fascia is prolonged from it to the spine. The inner aspect is lined by Connecthe pleura, and the opposite surface is in contact with the
intercostal nerve and vessels.
tions.
layer External intercostal muscle. Between the posterior Outer
border of the internal muscle and the spine, when the fascia
before referred to is removed, the external intercostal
muscle will be seen. Its attachments above and below are extends
to the margins of two contiguous ribs, and its fibres cross head of
those of the internal muscular layer. Whilst this muscle
extends backwards to the spinal column, it does not reach
farther forwards than the cartilages of the ribs.
back to
the rib.
Dissection. —In a few spaces cut through the internal intercostal Trace
muscle, and trace outwards the intercostal nerve and artery.
nerves.
costal The INTERCOSTAL NERVES are the anterior divisions of Interthe dorsal nerves. In their distribution these nerves differ nerves
from the other spinal nerves of the body, inasmuch as they joined in
course forwards almost horizontally to the middle line, withare not
a plexus.
350 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Upper
out being united together in a plexus. Twelve in number,
they occupy the intercostal spaces, except the last, which is
below the last rib. There is the following difference between the upper and lower nerves, viz. that the upper six lie
between the ribs in all their extent, and are confined to the
lowersix wall of the thorax, whilst the lower six enter the abdominal
them in wall where the ribs cease in front.
six are in the spaces ;
leave
front.
Connec- tions with mus- cles ;
At the posterior part of the chest the nerves are seen to
lie at first between the pleura and the external intercostal
muscle, with an artery and vein ; but they soon enter
between the two layers of the intercostal muscles, and extend forwards to the middle line of the body, as before
with the said. Near the head of the rib each nerve is joined by filaments from the sympathetic ; and in its course it supplies
branches to the intercostal muscles and the ribs, as well as
cutaneous offsets to the surface, which are described in the
dissection of the upper limb ( p. 216. ) , and of the wall of the
abdomen.
sympa- thetic Offsets .
Excep- tions in There are some exceptions in the first and second nerves
two first . to the general arrangement which has been above specified.
First nerve enters
plexus.
a. The first nerve ascends in front of the neck of the first rib,
and ends in the brachial plexus. It supplies a small intercostal
brachial branch to the first space, which furnishes muscular offsets, and
becomes cutaneous by the side of the sternum, after the same
Has not, course as the others. But there is not any lateral cutaneous usually,
cutane branch from this nerve, except in those cases in which the next
branch. nerve is not as large as usual.
ous
Second b. The second nerve may extend a considerable way on the wall nerve. of the chest before entering between the intercostal muscles, and
may ascend even to the first space. It is remarkable in having a
very large lateral cutaneous branch (p. 217.) .
Form of upper
of dia-
- Upper surface of the diaphragm. —The diaphragmatic
surface partition between the thorax and abdomen is specially dephragm. scribed with the deep muscles of the latter cavity. The
upper surface of the muscle which is turned to the thorax is
on the whole convex, but the arch is greater on the right
than the left side. The centre of the muscle is tendinous,
Parts in but the lateral parts are fleshy. In contact with the upper
with it. surface are the lungs, one on each side, and the pericardium contact
LIGAMENTS OF THE TRUNK. 351
tures in in the middle. In the muscle are the following apertures : Aper-
-onefor the oesophagus and the pneumo-gastric nerves, it.
another for the vena cava, and a third for the aorta with the
thoracic duct and the vena azygos. The phrenic vessels and
nerves enter the upper surface external to the pericardium ;
and the splanchnic and sympathetic nerves are transmitted
to the abdomen through the posterior part.
―
ofparts
upper
dle line
side.
Parts passing through the upper aperture of the thorax. Position
In the middle line are the trachea and the oesophagus, in the
and the origin of the sterno-hyoid and sterno-thyroid muscles, aperture.
with the remains of the thymus gland in front of those tubes, In midand the longus colli muscle behind them.
Between the two on each
tubes is the recurrent nerve of the left side. On each side
the bag of the pleura and the apex of the lung project into
the neck ; and between the pleura and the trachea and
œsophagus, are found the several vessels and nerves that
pass from the thorax to the neck, or in the opposite direction. Thus, first, on both sides, is the innominate vein Partly
with the phrenic and pneumo- gastric nerves, but behind on both
these the parts on the two sides are different. On the right and partside, next in order from before backwards, are the innominate artery and the cardiac nerves ; but on the left side
the left common carotid artery, the thoracic duct, and the
left subclavian artery, with the cardiac nerves. Lastly,
altogether behind, on both sides, are the cord of the sympathetic, the first intercostal nerve, and the superior intercostal artery.
the same
sides,
ly not.
section The dissectors of the thorax now wait while the dissection The disof the back is made. Afterwards they should examine the ofthe
ligaments of the ribs and of the spine in the following now
section.
back is
made.
SECTION II.
LIGAMENTS OF THE TRUNK.
THE ration of ligaments connecting the vertebræ to one another, the Enume
ribs to the spinal column and the sternum, and the pieces theligaof the sternum one to another, are described in this section.
ments.
352 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
Afrib is united with vertebræ
ARTICULATION OF THE RIBS.
- The rib is united to the
vertebræ on the one side, and to the sternum on the other,
and by three sets of ligaments, viz. one between the head of the sternum . bone and the bodies of the vertebræ ; a second from its
neck and tubercle to the transverse processes of the vertebræ ; and a third, for each true rib, between its cartilage
and the sternum.
To ex- pose lito the verte- bræ.
Dissection. For the purpose ofexamining the ligaments between
gaments the posterior part of the rib and the vertebræ, take a piece of
the spinal column with the ribs attached. After removing the
intercostal muscles and the cellular membrane from the surface of
the bones, the ligaments that are superficial will be seen passing
forwards to the spinal column and upwards to the transverse process. The ligaments attaching the cartilage of the rib to the
sternum will be found on the part of the anterior wall of the
thorax that was removed in opening the thoracic cavity.
Liga- ments of head of rib are
costo- vertestellate,
A. Ligaments of the head ofthe rib. -The head of the
rib is received into a hollow on the side of the bodies of
two contiguous vertebræ, with the exception of the first,
eleventh, and twelfth ribs ; and it is provided with two retaining ligaments costo- vertebral and interarticular, and
between synovial sacs.
The costo-vertebral ligament, which is also named
bral or stellate from its form, is composed of radiating fibres, that
fix the rib to two vertebræ. It consists of three sets of
fibres the upper set is the largest, and is attached to the
body of the vertebra above the rib ; the lower one descends
to the inferior of the two vertebræ, with which the head
articulates ; and the central part is united with the fibrocartilage between those vertebræ.
interlar
The interarticular ligament is a short thin band, which
articu- is attached on one part to the ridge separating the articular
surfaces on the head of the rib, and becomes blended by the
other end with the interosseous substance between the vertebræ. In the first, eleventh, and twelfth ribs it is absent.
This band will not be seen till the stellate ligament is
divided.
with two sacs.
Synovial sacs. There are two sacs to each rib, one on
each side of the interarticular ligament, except in the three
LIGAMENTS OF THE RIBS. 353
ribs before mentioned, which have but one articular surface
for each rib.
ments of B. Ligaments of the neck and tubercle of the rib.— Three Ligaligaments (costo-transverse) pass from the neck and tubercle neck of
of the rib to the transverse processes. There is one synovial
sac between the rib and its transverse process.
rib,
costoverse.
The anterior costo-transverse ligament is larger and anterior
longer than the others, and ascends from the upper border of transthe neck of the rib to the lower edge of the transverse process
of the upper of the two vertebræ, with which the head of the
rib is connected. It is absent in the first and last ribs. Between this ligament and the vertebræ the posterior branches
of the intercostal artery and dorsal nerve pass backwards.
terior
transThe posterior costo- transverse is a short band of fibres Posbetween the tip of the transverse process of the lower of the costotwo vertebræ, with which the head articulates, and the rough verse
part of the tubercle of the rib. It is placed at the posterior
aspect of the rib. If the fibres are divided, a synovial membrane will be seen to cover the surface of the bones which sac.
are in contact ; but this is absent in the two lowest ribs.
covers a
synovial
costoverse .
The middle or interosseous costo- transverse is placed hori- Middle
zontally between the neck of the rib and the transverse transprocess with which the tubercle articulates. It will be best
seen by sawing horizontally through the rib and the transverse process. Its fibres are near the lower margin of the
transverse process, and are mixed with reddish cellular
membrane.
ofthe
cartiC. Ligaments of the cartilages of the ribs. - The costal Union
cartilages of the true ribs are united to the sternum by an costal
anterior and a posterior ligament, which cover a synovial lages
membrane ; and they are further joined externally to the
bony part of the rib. Some of the lower cartilages touch
and are connected together by fibrous bands and synovial
membrane.
ster- a. In the chondro- sternal articulation the cartilages of the with the
true ribs are received into the depressions on the side of the num ;
sternum, and are fixed in position by surrounding fibres, but
chiefly in front and behind, where they give rise to an anA A
354 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
rib ;
terior and a posterior ligament. Between the cartilage and
the articular surface of the bone is a synovial membrane. A
separate band of fibres passes between the cartilage of the
seventh rib and the xiphoid cartilage, and is named costoxiphoid ligament.
with the b. Costal cartilage with the rib. —The bony part of the
rib is hollowed to receive the costal cartilage, and the two
are united only by the investing membrane of the rib.
with one c. One costal cartilage to another. —The contiguous sur- another. faces of the costal cartilages, from the sixth to the ninth, are
connected by ligamentous fibres, and the surfaces in contact
are lined by a synovial membrane.
Union of pieces of ARTICULATION OF THE PIECES OF THE STERNUM. —The
sternum. upper piece of the sternum is connected to the lower by anterior and posterior longitudinal fibres, and between them is
an intervening fibro- cartilage.
Two sets ofliga- ments unite
ARTICULATION OF THE VERTEBRÆ.- The several vertebræ
composing the spinal column are united together by two sets
the ver- of ligaments -one between the bodies, and the other between
the processes of the bones.
tebræ.
How to see the several liga- ments.
The bodies are
-
These ligaments have a general resemblance along the
spinal column, and one description will suffice, except for
those between the first two vertebræ and the head, and those
between the bones of the pelvis. The description of the
special ligaments, thus excepted, will be found in the dissection of the neck (p . 158. ) and of the ligaments of the pelvis.
Dissection. After the dissection of the ligaments of the ribs,
the same piece of the spinal column will serve for the ligaments of
the bodies of the vertebræ and of their articular processes It is .
supposed that the spinal canal has been opened to examine the
spinal cord, and that the posterior ligament of the bodies of the
vertebræ is therefore evident. If the canal should not be opened,
the arches of the vertebræ must be sawn through close to the
articular processes. The remaining ligaments between the arches
and spines of the bones will be seen on those pieces that are
taken away in opening the spinal canal.
A. Ligaments of the bodies of the vertebra. -The bodies
of the vertebræ are united by an anterior and a posterior
LIGAMENTS OF THE VERTEBRÆ. 355
common ligament, and by intervening pieces of fibro - car- united
tilage.
by
common
ment,
varies in
and atThe anterior common ligament is whiter and more anterior
fibrous than the posterior, and reaches from the atlas to the ligasacrum. The ligament is widest opposite the lumbar verte- which
bræ, and becomes narrower as it is traced upwards. Its out- width,
line is also uneven, for it is rather wider opposite the bodies
of the vertebræ than on the intervertebral substance. Its
fibres are longitudinal in direction, and consist of a superficial and a deep layer. By detaching the ligament, the super- length,
ficial fibres will be seen to reach the length of three or more tachvertebræ, whilst the deep pass from bone to bone. At its its fibres ,
attachment a greater number of the fibres are found to be
connected with the intervertebral fibro-cartilages than with
the bones ; and of those which are connected with a vertebra
more are fixed to the margins than to the centre of its body.
If the ligament is cut across at intervals it will be found to and
be thickest opposite the hollow part of the body of the ness.
vertebra.
ment of
in thickterior
ligaat parts ;
The posterior common ligament is contained in the Posspinal canal, lying on the posterior aspect of the bodies of common
the vertebræ, and extends from the sacrum to the second ment
vertebra. It is wider opposite the intervertebral substance is wide
than opposite the body of the vertebra, and its margins are
therefore zigzag or dentate, especially in the lumbar part of
the spine. Its fibres are superficial and deep, as in the an- attachterior ligament, and are more closely united with the inter- and
vertebral substance than with the bone. The thickness and thickwidth of the ligament are greatest opposite the dorsal vertebræ. One surface of the ligament is in contact with the Connecdura mater ; and between the opposite surface and the vertebræ are the large veins issuing from the bones.
-
ment
ness.
tions.
the intebral
Dissection. To see the intervertebral substance, the anterior To see
and posterior common ligaments should be taken away. One terververtebra should be detached from the intervening fibro- cartilage subto obtain a horizontal view of the same ; and two other vertebræ stance.
should be sawn vertically to see the difference in its consistence.
The intervertebral substance is placed between the con- Inter- vertebral AA 2
356 DISSECTION OF THE THORAX.
sub- stance
has the
the bones,
tiguous surfaces of the bodies of the vertebræ from the axis
to the sacrum. Taking the shape of the vertebræ it forms a
shape of layer, or plate, of fibro-cartilage between those bones, and is
connected, as before remarked, with the anterior and posterior
common ligaments, and with the stellate ligaments of the heads
andgives of the ribs. These plates are thicker between the lumbar
curves to and cervical vertebræ, than between the dorsal vertebræ ;
spine. and where the spinal column is arched forwards, as in the
loins and neck, the convexity is due to the fibro- cartilages,
which are there deepest at their anterior edge.
the
the
Formed ofplates
round
central part.
are bent
The disc of the intervertebral substance is united firmly
that sur- to the surfaces of the bones. It is composed of a number of
a pulpy fibro- cartilaginous plates surrounding a central pulpy elastic
matter, that projects when two bones and their intervening
layer are sawn through. The plates of fibro- cartilage are
arranged in layers, one within the other, like the scales of an
onion, and their edges are connected to the bony surface ;
Its layers but they do not pass vertically from vertebra to vertebra, for
the external plates are bent outwards, whilst those nearer
the centre are bent so as to have the convexity of their curve
turned towards the central pulpy part. Each layer of the
fibro- cartilage is composed of oblique fibres, and the fibres of
one layer are directed across those of another like the parts
of the letter X. This disposition of the fibres will be best
seen on the discs between the lumbar vertebræ by dissecting
layer after layer.
differ- ently,
and their fibres cross.
Several ligathe verpro- cesses .
B. Ligaments ofthe processesof the vertebra.-The several
ments of processes of the vertebræ have special ligaments : thus the
tebral articular processes are united by a capsular ligament and a
synovial membrane ; the plates of the vertebræ are joined
by yellow ligaments ; the spinous processes have one band
along the tip and another between them ; and the transverse
processes have bands of fibres between them in some parts.
Those of a. Ligaments of the articular processes. - Between the
articulating processes there is a moveable joint. The bones
are covered with cartilage, and are surrounded by a loose
sular and capsular ligament of scattered fibres, which encloses a synovial membrane. In the cervical region of the spine, the
the arti- cular pro- cesses are capsynovial sac.
LIGAMENTS OF THE VERTEBRÆ. 357
capsular ligaments are larger and looser than in the dorsal
or lumbar part.
-
of the
are two
space.
ments.
b. Ligaments of the arches. The ligamenta subflava, so Those
named from their colour, are situate between the plates arches
or arches of the vertebræ, and close the spinal canal be- to each
hind. These are two somewhat square ligaments in the
interval between the arches of two contiguous vertebræ, one
for each half of the arch, which approach one another along
the middle line. Each consists of elastic yellow tissue, and Attachis attached above to the inner surface of the half arch, but
below to the upper border, and somewhat to the outer surface
of the corresponding part of the arch next below. On each
side the ligament reaches from the articular process to the
root of the spinous process. Between the first two vertebræ
and the skull there are special fibrous ligaments in the same
situation (see p. 158.).
ofthe
are
their tip
c. Ligaments ofthe spines.-Along the tips of the spinous Those
processes of the dorsal and lumbar vertebræ is a longitudinal spines
band of fibres, supraspinous ligament. It is thicker in the along
lumbar than in the dorsal region of the spine, and is formed
by superficial and deep fibres ; the former reaching over three
or more spines, whilst the latter pass from bone to bone.
It is closely united with the tendons of the muscles.
tween
spines.
In the dorsal and lumbar parts of the spinal column there and beare also found thin and somewhat membranous interspinousthe
ligaments, which reach from the root to the tip of the spinous
process. The strength of these bands is dependant upon the
interval they have to fill ; therefore they are more marked in
the lumbar than in the dorsal vertebræ.
of the
verse
d. Ligaments of the transverse processes. Between the Those
transverse processes of the lower dorsal vertebræ there are transround bundles of fibres, intertransverse ligaments. In the prolumbar vertebræ, also, there are thin membranous bands that
close the intervals between the same processes.
cesses.
AA 3
358
part is
ed.
CHAPTER V.
DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
How the THIS part of the body is either allotted to one student, or its
dissect- dissection is undertaken conjointly by the dissectors of the
head and upper limb ; one preparing the parts in the neck,
the other those in the dorsal and lumbar regions of the
back. If the last arrangement is adopted, the dissector of
the upper limb may direct his attention only to those paragraphs that are marked with an asterisk, and the dissector
of the neck may take for the most part the paragraphs which
are not so marked.
Position ofbody.
Dissec- tion to
skin.
Position..- For this dissection the body lies with the
face downwards, supported in that position by blocks beneath
the chest and the pelvis, with the limbs hanging over the
end and sides of the dissecting table. To make tense the
neck depress the head, and fasten it with hooks.
Dissection. In the back the student will meet with successive
raise the strata of large muscles, five in all, amongst which vessels and
nerves are interspersed. The first step in the dissection is to raise
the skin from the surface in two flaps, by means of the following
incisions : One cut is to be made along the middle line of the
body, from the occipital protuberance to the back of the sacrum.
Another incision is to be carried from the last dorsal vertebra to
the acromion process of the scapula, and the flap of skin above it
is to be turned outwards by both dissectors. The remaining piece
of integument is to be detached by a transverse incision opposite
the crest of the ilium, and then to be reflected by the dissector
of the upper limb, in the same direction as the other flap . Under
the upper flap of skin is the trapezius, and underneath the lower
one is the latissimus dorsi muscle.
Seek cuta- neous
The cutaneous nerves may now be sought in the subcutaneous
cellular layer. These nerves vary much in size in the different
nerves. parts ofthe back, and their number is also irregular. As a general rule, there is one corresponding to each vertebra. In the neck,
CUTANEOUS NERVES. 359
and opposite the upper part of the thorax, the nerves will be
found to issue near the spines of the vertebræ ; but over the lower
part of the thorax, and in the loins, they are in a line with the
angles of the ribs. Small cutaneous arteries accompany the
nerves, and guide the dissector to their position. The cutaneous branches of the sacral nerves come into the dissection of the lower
limb.
-
neous nerves how deCUTANEOUS NERVES. The tegumentary nerves of the Cutaback are derived from the posterior divisions of the spinal
nerves, in one part coming from the external, and in another rived.
spot from the internal branches into which these bifurcate.
Small arteries accompany the greater number of the nerves,
and there is the same difference in them as in the nerves,
respecting the branches from which they arise.
neck.
The branches of the cervical nerves perforate the trapezius, and In the
for the most part turn outwards in the integuments. There is one
from each nerve, except from the first, and from the three last.
The branch of the second nerve is named large occipital, and accompanies the occipital artery to the back of the head (p. 7.) .
The branch of the third cervical nerve, besides its transverse branch
to the neck, gives upwards an offset to the lower part of the head,
which is united with the great occipital nerve, and is distributed internal to it.
* The branches of the dorsal nerves are directed outwards in the Inthe dorsal integument over the trapezius and latissimus dorsi muscles. Those region.
of the six upper nerves perforate the trapezius near the spines of
the vertebræ, and the branch of the second, which is larger than the
rest, reaches as far as the scapula. The branches of the six lower
nerves pierce the latissimus dorsi mostly in a line with the angles
ofthe ribs ; these are oftentimes uncertain in number.
---
loins. * The branches of the lumbar nerves are derived only from the Inthe
first three ; they perforate the latissimus dorsi muscle in a line
with the outer border of the erector spinæ, and crossing the crest
ofthe ilium, are distributed in the integuments of the buttock.
Dissection. The cellular membrane is now to be taken from Dissec.
tion .
the trapezius and latissimus dorsi in the direction of the fibres of
each, and the upper limb is to be carried backwards or forwards
according as it may be necessary to put on the stretch the different
fibres of the muscles. Some of the cutaneous nerves should be
left, in order that they may be traced afterwards through the
muscles to their origin.
AA 4
360 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
Two muscles First layer of muscles of the back. -Two muscles, the
in first trapezius and the latissimus dorsi, are found in this layer.
layer.
Trape- zius.
aponeuInser- tion
-
* The TRAPEZIUS MUSCLE is triangular in shape, with the
base towards the spine, but the two muscles taken together
have the form of a trapezoid figure. The muscle has an
Origin extensive aponeurotic origin from the spines of the dorsal
otic. vertebræ and their supraspinous ligament, from the spinous
process of the seventh cervical vertebra, from the ligamentum nuchæ between the last point and the head, and
lastly from the superior transverse ridge of the occipital
bone the inner third. From this origin the fibres are
directed outwards, converging to the shoulder, and are infleshy. serted into the outer third of the clavicle, at its posterior
aspect ; into the acromion ; and into the upper edge of the
Connec- spine of the scapula. This muscle is subcutaneous. Along
the middle line the tendinous origins of the trapezius of
opposite sides form an aponeurosis of an oval form, which
extends from the spine of the sixth cervical to that of the
third dorsal vertebra ; and on the outer side the lowest
fleshy fibres end in a small triangular tendon that glides
over the smooth surface at the root of the spine of the
scapula. The anterior border bounds behind the posterior
triangular space of the side of the neck. By its insertion
the trapezius corresponds to the origin of the deltoid
muscle.
tions.
Trace spinal acces- sory.
Spinal acces- sory nerve in trape- zius.
Dissec- tion to reflect
- Dissection. The fibres of the trapezius are to be divided near
the scapula, and over the spinal accessory nerve, so as to trace the
ramifications of that nerve in the muscle, and its junction with the
branches of the cervical plexus. A small artery to the trapezius
(art. superficialis colli) accompanies the nerve.
The spinal accessory nerve, having crossed the posterior
triangle of the neck, enters beneath the trapezius, and forms
a kind of plexus with branches of the third and fourth
nerves of the cervical plexus. The nerve is distributed to
the muscle, and its filaments reach nearly to the lower
border.
Dissection. D
To see the parts that are covered by the trapezius,
divide the muscle longitudinally, internal to the position of the
trape- zius spinal accessory nerve, and throw inwards and outwards the two .
FIRST LAYER OF MUSCLES. 361
parts. The dissector of the upper limb should clean the fibres of
the rhomboidei and levator anguli scapulæ muscles, which are fixed
to the base of the scapula, that bone being drawn away from the
trunk to make tense the fibres. Whilst the dissector of the neck
should expose the parts beneath the clavicle, viz . the posterior
belly of the omo- hyoid muscle with the suprascapular nerve and
artery, the transverse cervical vessels, and the small branches of
nerves to the levator anguli scapulæ and rhomboid muscles. If
the trapezius is detached in the neck, the ligamentum nuchæ, from
which it takes origin, will be brought into view.
covered
pezius.
* The trapezius conceals in the neck the splenius and a Parts
small part of the complexus, with the levator anguli sca- by trapulæ ; and in the dorsal region it covers the following
muscles the rhomboidei, the erector spinæ, and the latissimus dorsi. As it reaches the scapula it lies over the supraspinatus muscle.
-
mentum The ligamentum nucha is a narrow fibrous band that Ligaextends from the spinous process of the seventh cervical nucha.
vertebra to the occipital protuberance. This structure
serves as a partition between the muscles of opposite sides
of the neck ; and from the under part processes are sent
down to be attached to the spinous processes of the six
lower cervical vertebræ.
mus the LatissiAt dorsi is
con- from its named
shape.
Origin is tendi- nous
middle
fleshy
some
* The LATISSIMUS DORSI is a thin and wide muscle in
back, but is pointed and fleshy towards the humerus.
its inner attachment the muscle is aponeurotic, and is
nected with the posterior half of the crest of the ilium, with
the spines of the sacrum, and with the spinous processes of
the vertebræ as high as the fifth dorsal ; further, the muscle along
has three or four fleshy processes of origin from as many of line,and
the lower ribs, which digitate with pieces of the external from
oblique muscle. All the fibres converge to the inferior ribs.
angle of the scapula, and after crossing that point of bone
are continued forwards to be inserted by means of a tendon Inserinto the bottom of the bicipital groove of the humerus. A humesmall part of the upper border is covered by the trapezius ; Connecbut near the scapula there is a space between the two
muscles, in which the ribs and the intercostal and rhomboid
muscles are seen. The lower or anterior border is either
tion into
rus.
tions.
362 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
Dissec- tion to
latissi- mus.
parallel to the edge of the external oblique muscle of the
abdomen in the interval between the last rib and the crest
of the ilium, or it overlays that muscle. Frequently the
latissimus has a distinct fleshy slip from the inferior angle of
the scapula.
-- Dissection. Divide the latissimus about midway between the
reflect spines of the vertebræ and the angle of the scapula, and reflect
inwards and outwards its halves. In raising the inner part of the
muscle, care must be taken not to destroy the thin serratus
muscle and the aponeurosis which is continued upwards from it.
In the interval between the last rib and the crest of the ilium the
latissimus is adherent to the aponeurosis of the transversalis abdominis muscle, and should not be detached therefrom.
Parts covered
latis- simus.
* The latissimus dorsi muscle lies on the erector spinæ,
by the the serratus posticus inferior, and the lower ribs with their
intercostal muscles. As it rests on the angle of the scapula,
it conceals the teres major and a part of the rhomboid
muscle. Its relation to the teres is remarkable : at the
angle of the scapula it is in contact with the posterior aspect
of the teres, but nearer the humerus it turns round this
muscle, and is inserted in front of it. Between the angle of
the scapula and the humerus the latissimus forms part of
the posterior boundary of the axilla.
Dissec- tion of fascia lumbo- rum.
Dissection. ― After the latissimus dorsi is reflected, the dissector
of the abdomen should examine the disposition of the posterior
tendon of the transversalis abdominis between the last rib and the
innominate bone. In this spot are the parts of the abdominal
muscles that have been left in the previous dissection . Firstly,
there may or may not remain a piece of the external oblique
muscle. After the removal of this muscle (supposing a part to be
left), the internal oblique is seen to be attached to a subjacent
aponeurosis, and to the ribs and the crest of the ilium ; its attachments above and below are to be cut through, and it is to be raised
from the transversalis muscle, as far as it can be, towards the
spine. Now the aponeurosis of the transversalis muscle (fascia
lumborum) appears, and perforating it are two nerves : one the
last dorsal, with an artery near the last rib ; and the other the
ilio-hypogastrie, close to the crest of the ilium. Two offsets are
prolonged from this fascia to the transverse processes. To see
one prolongation cut through the latissimus dorsi, both its aponeu-
SECOND LAYER OF MUSCLES. 363
rosis and fleshy part, by an incision directed outwards from the
middle line, on a level with the spinous process of the third lumbar
vertebra, and gently raise the outer border of the muscle (erector
spina), which is exposed thereby. By dividing this prolongation
transversely, another muscle (quadratus lumborum) will appear :
on raising the outer border of this last muscle the second offset of
the fascia comes into view.
lumbopart of
versalis
nis ;
offsets
The fascia lumborum is the posterior aponeurosis of the Fascia
transversalis abdominis muscle, and occupies the interval rum is
between the last rib and the crest of the ilium. By its transcutaneous surface it gives attachment to the internal oblique abdomimuscle, sometimes to the external oblique, and slightly
to the aponeurosis of the latissimus dorsi. The last dorsal
and ilio-hypogastric nerves pierce the aponeurosis in their
course from the abdomen. From the inner or posterior
part ofthe aponeurosis two prolongations reach to the transverse processes of the lumbar vertebræ. The more super- has two
ficial of the two is the strongest ; and passing beneath the behind ;
erector spinæ (in this position of the body), it is connected one to
to the apices of the transverse processes, filling the intervals
between those pieces of bone. The deeper or anterior
prolongation passes on the abdominal surface of the quadratus
lumborum, and is fixed to the roots of the transverse pro- the
cesses and to the bodies of the vertebræ. Thus the pro- root of
longations of the fascia contain the quadratus lumborum in verse
a sheath ; and the erector spinæ lies in another sheath, which cesses,
is formed by the aponeurosis of the latissimus on the one form
side, and the posterior prolongation of the fascia lumborum for
on the other.
apex,
other to
transpro..
which
sheaths
muscles.
muscu- The second layer of muscles consists of the elevator of Second
the angle of the scapula, and of the large and small rhomboid lar layer.
muscles. Besides these, there will be found in the neck
the posterior belly of the omo-hyoid muscle, with some
vessels and nerves that turn backwards towards the scapula.
ofangle The LEVATOR ANGULI SCAPULÆ arises by tendinous slips Elevator
from the posterior tubercles of the transverse processes of of scathe three or four upper cervical vertebræ. The fibres form
rather a roundish muscle, and are inserted into the base of
pula.
364 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
ments
nections.
Attach the scapula between the spine and the superior angle. At
and con- its origin the muscle is beneath the sterno-mastoideus, and
at its insertion beneath the trapezius, the rest of the muscle
appears in the posterior triangular space of the neck. Beneath it are some of the other muscles of the neck (splenius
and cervicalis ascendens).
boid Rhom- * RHOMBOIDEI MUSCLES. - The thin muscular layer
muscles that is attached to the base of the scapula consists of two
pieces, larger and smaller, which are separated by a cellular
interval.
are two.
Small * The rhomboideus minor is a small narrow band that muscle. arises from the spinous process of the seventh cervical verAttach- tebra, and from the ligamentum nuchæ, and is inserted into ments. the base of the scapula opposite the smooth surface at the
root of the spine of that bone.
Large muscle.
Origin.
The rhomboideus major is larger than the preceding by
the width of three spinous processes. It arises from the
spinous processes of the four or five upper dorsal vertebræ,
and from the supraspinous ligaments ; and its fibres are
directed outwards to be fixed to the base of the scapula
between the spine and the lower angle. Sometimes all the
fibres do not reach the scapula, but some end on a tendinous
Connec- arch near the bone. These muscles are covered in part by
the trapezius and the latissimus, but a portion of the larger
rhomboid muscle is subcutaneous near the angle of the
scapula.
Inser- tion.
tions.
Poste- rior
omo.
hyoid- eus.
Origin
and
The OMO-HYOID MUSCLE consists of two fleshy bellies,
belly of anterior and posterior, which are united by an intervening
tendon. Only the posterior part is now seen. The muscle
arises from the superior border of the scapula behind the
notch, and from the ligament that converts the notch into a
foramen. The fibres form a thin riband-like muscle, which
nation. is directed forwards across the lower part of the neck, and
ends anteriorly in a tendon beneath the sterno-mastoideus.
Connec- This muscle is placed partly beneath the trapezius, and is
partly superficial in the posterior triangular space of the
neck, where it lies above the clavicle and the subclavian
termitions.
SCAPULAR VESSELS AND NERVES. 365
artery. It lies on the brachial plexus, and near the scapula,
on the suprascapular vessels and nerve.
scapular
ofthe
vian
The suprascapular artery is a branch of the subclavian artery, Supraand is directed almost horizontally outwards across the lower part artery
of the neck to the back of the scapula. The artery lies at first subclabehind the clavicle, and appears in the small space that contains
the third part of the subclavian artery : farther out it enters beneath the trapezius, and is directed beneath the omo-hyoid muscle,
with the suprascapular nerve, to the supraspinal fossa of the sca- ends on
pula. Before entering the fossa it furnishes a small branch (supra- scapula.
acromial) to the upper surface of the acromion.
back of
scapular The suprascapular nerve is an offset of the brachial plexus, and Suprais inclined backwards to the superior costa of the scapula. It nerve
passes beneath the supraspinatus muscle, through the notch in the
superior costa of the bone, and its termination in the muscles on the accom- panies
dorsum of the scapula is seen in the dissection of the arm (p . 240. ) . artery.
The transverse cervical artery is also a branch of the subclavian, Transand has the same direction as the suprascapular branch, viz. cervical
towards the posterior part of the neck, but it is placed at a
greater height above the clavicle. Crossing the upper part of the clavian
space in which the subclavian artery lies, this branch passes beneath the trapezius, and divides into the two following branches- divides
superficial cervical and posterior scapular : -
a. The superficial cervical branch is distributed chiefly to
under surface of the trapezius, though it furnishes offsets to
levator anguli scapula and the cervical glands.
verse
artery of the sub...
into
the super- ficial the cervical and
scapular b. The posterior scapular branch crosses beneath the elevator of posterior
the angle of the scapula, and then turns downwards along the base
of that bone beneath the rhomboid muscles. If these muscles
are divided, the artery will be seen to furnish branches to them ,
and to give anastomotic twigs to both surfaces of the scapula,
which join the other arteries distributed on the bone.
The veins have the same name and course as the arteries above Accom- panying described ; they open into the external jugular vein near its junc- veins.
tion with the subclavian vein.
-
rhommuscle.
Nerve to the rhomboid muscles. This slender nerve of the Nerve of
brachial plexus (p. 69.) takes the same course as the preceding boid
artery, beneath the elevator of the angle of the scapula. Before
its termination it supplies one or two twigs to the elevator of the
scapula, and it is lost in the rhomboidei on their under surface.
Dissection.Reflect the rhomboidei muscles towards the spinous Dissec- tion .
366 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
processes, and remove the cellular membrane from the thin serratus muscle which is beneath them.
Third In the third layer are the following muscles : the serratus layer of muscles . posticus superior and inferior, with the splenius.
Serrati are two
ber.
* The SERRATI muscles are very thin, and receive their
in num- name from their mode of attachment to the ribs. They are
two in number, superior and inferior, and have aponeurotic
origins from the spines of the vertebræ.
Smaller one at upper
the tho- part of
rax .
Larger muscle
part of
* The serratus posticus superior is connected at its origin
with the ligamentum nucha and with the spinous processes
of the last cervical and two or three upper dorsal vertebræ.
The fleshy fibres are inclined downwards, and are attached
by slips to the second, third, and fourth ribs, external to
their angles. This muscle rests on the splenius.
* The serratus posticus inferior occupies the lumbar region,
at lower and is wider than the preceding muscle. Its aponeurosis
thorax. of origin is inseparably united with that of the latissimus
dorsi, and is connected to the spinous processes of the two
Connec- last dorsal and three first lumbar vertebræ. The fleshy tions.
Verte- bral
Attach- ments.
fibres ascend to be inserted by offsets into the four last ribs
in front of their angles, each successive process extending
further forward than the one below. This muscle lies on
the mass of the erector spinæ, and from its upper border
proceeds the vertebral aponeurosis.
* The vertebral aponeurosis is a fibrous expansion, which
aponeu- is spread over the fourth layer of muscles, and confines them rosis. in the hollow by the side of the spinous processes. Attached
inferiorly to the upper border of the inferior serratus, the
aponeurosis is continued beneath the superior serratus, and
binds down the splenius muscle. Internally, it is fixed to
the spines of the vertebræ, and externally it is inserted into
the angles of the ribs.
Dissec- tion.
Splenius has two
Dissection. Divide the superior serratus, and clear away the
subjacent vertebral aponeurosis, and the splenius muscle will be
exposed.
The SPLENIUS muscle consists of cervical and cranial parts,
parts. which are named respectively splenius colli and splenius
capitis. The two are frequently united in their origin.
THIRD LAYER OF MUSCLES. 367
the neck.
The splenius colli arises from the spines ofthe three or four One to
upper dorsal vertebræ, beginning at the sixth. Ascending
in the neck, the muscle is inserted by tendinous processes
into the posterior tubercles on the transverse processes of
the three upper cervical vertebræ, and behind the attachment
of the elevator of the angle of the scapula.
to the The splenius capitis arises from the spines of the last one
cervical and two first dorsal vertebræ, and from the liga- head.
mentum nuchæ as high as the third cervical vertebra. The
fleshy fibres ascend and are inserted into the apex and posterior part of the mastoid process, and into the ridge behind
it for about an inch.
connecwith
muscles.
The splenius colli is smaller than the splenius capitis, and Their
its fibres are more oblique. These muscles are beneath tions
the trapezius, the rhomboidei, and the serratus superior ; and other
the insertion into the occipital bone is beneath the sternomastoid muscle. The complexus muscle will be seen appearing above the upper border of the splenius capitis.
tion of Dissection. To expose the fourth layer of muscles, detach the Dissecsplenii from the spinous processes, and throw them outwards. fourth Detach also the serratus inferior in the same way with the ver- layer.
tebral aponeurosis, and clear the cellular membrane from the surface of the large mass of the erector spinæ that now comes into
view.
lumbaaccesmuscles .
Opposite the last rib is the beginning of a cellular interval which Sacrodivides the mass into an outer piece (sacro- lumbalis) , and an inner lis and
piece (longissimus dorsi). By sinking the knife into this interval, sory
the sacro-lumbalis may be turned outwards, so as to expose the
fleshy slips of its accessory muscle, which are fixed to the angles
of the ribs. A thin narrow muscle ( cervicalis ascendens) , which Offset
is continued from the sacro- lumbalis beyond the ribs, should neck.
be separated in the neck from the muscles around by the dissector of this part.
to the
and
simus
In dissecting the sacro-lumbalis muscle, the external branches of Vessels
the dorsal nerves with their accompanying arteries will be exposed. nerves.
Before the longissimus is displayed, raise towards the spinous Longisprocesses a thin muscular fasciculus of the spinalis dorsi, which dorsi
lies between it and the spines of the vertebræ in the dorsal region. longaNow seek the attachments of the longissimus dorsi. Externally
the muscle has thin muscular processes of insertion into about the
lower eight ribs. Internally it is inserted into the transverse proand protions.
368 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
and
cesses of the lumbar and dorsal vertebræ by rounded tendons ; and
for the purpose of seeing these tendons, the longissimus must be
drawn away from the transverse processes, and its superficial aponeurosis must be cut through below the ribs, in the line of separation between this muscle and the multifidus spinæ on its inner
Vessels side. Between the longissimus and multifidus spinæ are the internal branches of the dorsal nerves, and of the intercostal and
Offsets lumbar arteries. The dissector of the neck should trace upwards
a fleshy prolongation of the longissimus beyond the ribs this
is blended at first with the fibres of the longissimus ; but it is
afterwards divided into a cranial part (trachelo- mastoid) and a
cervical part (transversalis colli) .
nerves.
to the neck.
Fourth layer of Fourth layer. -In this layer are included the spinalis
muscles dorsi ; the erector spinæ, with its divisions and its accessory
muscles to the neck ; and the complexus muscle. Most of
consists the vessels and nerves of the back are in connection with
this layer of muscles.
of
Spinalis dorsi,
* The SPINALIS DORSI is found only by the sides of the
spines of the dorsal vertebræ. Inferiorly it arises by tendinous processes from the spines of the last two dorsal and
the first two lumbar vertebræ. From this origin the fibres
the dor- ascend, forming arches whose concavity looks inwards, and
are connected by tendinous processes to the spines of the
dorsal vertebræ, as low as the eighth, or only for half that
only along
sal ver- tebræ.
Erector spinæ
extent.
* The ERECTOR SPINE is the muscular mass that lies on
is single the side of the spine in the lumbar region. It is single and
origin, pointed below, and its cutaneous surface is covered near the
at its
sacrum by a dense aponeurosis, which is common to it and
the multifidus spinæ. The muscle arises from the aponeurosis above mentioned, and from the inner surface of the
innominate bone at its posterior part ; and it divides opposite
the last rib into sacro- lumbalis and longissimus dorsi. The
into two. attachment on the inner aspect of the os ilii corresponds to
the origin of the gluteus maximus on the outer aspect.
but is divided at the last rib
Sacro- lumbalis
is in- serted
* The SACRO-LUMBALIS (ilio- costalis ) is the smallest part
resulting from the division of the erector spinæ. The fibres
that compose it end in six or seven flat tendons, which are
connected together by their margins, and are inserted into
FOURTH LAYER OF MUSCLES. 369
the angles of as many of the lower ribs. The muscle is con- into six
tinued onwards to the other ribs, and to the neck by the two ribs.
under-mentioned parts :
lower
lus acrius
* The musculus accessorius ad sacro-lumbalem begins Muscuby a series of bundles on the angles of the six lower ribs, cessointernal to the tendons of insertion of the sacro-lumbalis ;
and ends in tendons which are inserted into the remaining is atribs (upper six) in a line with those of the sacro-lumbalis, to the
and into the transverse process of the seventh cervical
vertebra.
tached
ribs.
calis
dens
* The cervicalis ascendens is a muscular slip that con- Cervitinues the accessorius into the neck. More or less united ascenwith the preceding, this muscle arises from four ribs (third, reaches
fourth, fifth, and sixth), and is inserted into the transverse the neck .
processes (posterior tubercles) of the cervical vertebra with
the same numerical designation.
simus
serted
and
verse
cesses ;
* The LONGISSIMUS DORSI gradually decreases in size as it Longisascends along the thorax. Internally the muscle is inserted dorsi
into the transverse processes of all the lumbar and dorsal is invertebræ by a series of bundles ; and externally into the into ribs
ribs, except the two or three first, by thin fleshy processes transwhich are fixed between the tubercle and angle. In the prolumbar region the innermost insertion is in part fleshy, and
is connected with the whole length of the transverse process ;
and in part tendinous, where it is fixed to the pit at the root
of the process : some fibres likewise reach beyond that process, and are attached to the layer of the fascia lumborum.
The muscular prolongation to the neck is inseparably united is conwith the upper fleshy fibres of the longissimus, and splits the neck
into the two following pieces :-
tinued to
by the
versalis The transversalis colli arises from the transverse processes transof about four dorsal vertebræ ( sixth, fifth, fourth, and third), colli,
and is inserted into the transverse processes (posterior
tubercles) of the cervical vertebræ, except the first and last.
the head The trachelo-mastoid muscle arises in common with the andto
preceding, and has besides an attachment by distinct tendons by the
to the transverse processes of the four last cervical vertebræ. mastoid .
BB
trachelo
370 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
Connec- tions of
The fibres form a thin muscle that is inserted into the posterior part of the mastoid process beneath the splenius .
The erector spinæ and its prolongations occupy the lumine erce- bar, thoracic, and cervical parts of the back. In the loins
spine. the muscle is contained in an aponeurotic sheath (p. 363.),
tor
Com- plexus.
and has the multifidus spinæ on its inner side. Opposite
the ribs the sacro-lumbalis and longissimus dorsi are concealed by the muscles of the other layers which have been
examined. In the neck the accessory small muscles are
beneath the splenius and trapezius ; the cervicalis ascendens
is attached in a line with the splenius colli ; and the transversalis colli and trachelo-mastoid are more internal, or
between these and the complexus.
The COMPLEXUS is internal to the prolongations from the
longissimus dorsi, and converges towards its fellow of the
opposite side at the occipital bone. Narrow at its lower end,
Origin. the muscle arises by tendinous points from the transverse
processes of the three upper dorsal vertebræ, and from the
articular processes of the cervical vertebræ as high as the
third. From the tendons of origin the fibres pass upwards,
the inferior more vertically than the superior, to be inserted
into an impression between the curved lines of the occipital
bone. Closely united to the inner border is the following
muscular slip : -
Inser- tion.
Its ac- cessory .
piece.
The biventer cervicis is so named from its having two fleshy
bellies with an intervening tendon. It arises from two or
three transverse processes of the dorsal vertebræ, below the
Attach- attachment of the complexus, and is inserted into the occipital bone internal to that muscle. The biventer cervicis
frequently receives a fleshy slip from the spines of one or
two ofthe lower cervical vertebræ.
ments.
Connec- tions.
The complexus and biventer cervicis muscles are concealed by the splenius and trapezius ; and the cutaneous
surface of the complexus presents a tendinous cross intersection. Two or three of the cervical nerves perforate the
complexus. Along the inner side is the semispinalis muscle,
with the ligamentum nucha. Beneath the muscle are the
small recti and obliqui muscles, the semispinalis, and the
cervical nerves.
SPINAL NERVES OF THE BACK. 371
tion of
the neck
Dissection. To expose the nerves and vessels in the neck, it will Dissecbe necessary to detach the complexus from the occipital bone and the
the spines ofthe vertebræ, and to raise it with care from the sub- nerves of
jacent parts. Beneath the muscle is a dense fascia in which are
contained the ramifications of the internal branches of the four or
five highest cervical nerves. The first or suboccipital nerve is the
most difficult of the set to find, though the whole should be sought
with some care. This little nerve is a short trunk that is contained
in the interval between the recti and obliqui muscles near the
head, and it will be best found by looking for the small twigs that
are furnished by it to the recti muscles. The branches of the
three last cervical nerves are beneath the muscular fibres of the
semispinalis. The external branches of the cervical nerves are
very small, and are given off close to where the trunks appear. In and the
the dissection of the nerves the deep cervical artery is exposed on
the semispinalis muscle ; also the vertebral artery is found with
the suboccipital nerve ; and the occipital artery will be seen crossing the occipital bone.
vessels
same in
dorsal region.
* Opposite the thorax the dorsal nerves and vessels will readily ofthe
come into view by the removal of a little cellular membrane from the
between the transverse processes, and on the inner side of the
longissimus dorsi muscle. External and internal branches are to
be traced from each trunk ; the former have been seen in the interval between the sacro- lumbalis and longissimus dorsi.
lumbar * The lumbar nerves and vessels resemble the dorsal, and are In the
found in the same line ; but the inner branches are more difficult region.
to recognise.
The sacral nerves are beneath the multifidus spinæ muscle, and
will be exposed after its examination.
The Poste- rior dispinal nerves.
POSTERIOR DIVISION OF THE SPINAL NERVES.
spinal nerves, with a few exceptions in the cervical and vision of
sacral parts of the spinal column, bifurcate in the intervertebral foramina into anterior and posterior trunks. The
posterior trunks turn backwards to supply the integument
and the muscles of the back.
neck Cervical nerves. —All the posterior divisions of the cervi- In the
cal nerves, except those of the first two, appear beneath the
posterior intertransverse muscles, and divide into an inner
and an outer branch of distribution ; but, both in the first
and second nerves, the posterior division crosses the arch ofthey
the vertebra next beneath, after leaving its ganglion.
divide into two.
BB 2
372 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
are
External a. The external branches are very inconsiderable in size, and end
branches in the muscles inserted into the transverse processes, viz. the
small. splenius, and the prolongations from the erector spinæ muscle.
None to The first or suboccipital nerve has not any external branch. the first. b. The internal branches are larger than the external ; but the
branches first nerve is likewise excepted from this statement. All are
three directed inwards towards the spinous processes ; but the branches
last give of the second, third, fourth, and fifth nerves are superficial to the
Internal
above
cuta- neous offsets. semispinalis, whilst those of the three lowest nerves are beneath
that muscle. By the side of the spines of the vertebræ, cutaneous
branches are given from those nerves that are superficial to the
semispinalis, and ascend to the surface through the splenius, the
complexus, and the trapezius muscles, to be distributed as before
seen (p. 359.) . These nerves supply the surrounding muscles,
viz. the complexus, semispinalis, multifidus spinæ, and interBranch spinales. The branch of the second nerve is the largest of the
cond. series, and turns upwards over the inferior oblique muscle, after
it appears beneath the lower border of that muscle ; taking then
the name, great occipital nerve, it pierces the complexus, and ends
on the surface of the occiput.
of seSuboc- cipital nerve
-
Suboccipital nerve. — The posterior division of this nerve is the
smallest of the set, and is an exception to the others in its arrangement. Passing from the spinal canal, between the arch of the
atlas and the vertebral artery, the nerve pierces the ligament between the occipital bone and the first vertebra, and appears in the
supplies hollow between the recti and obliqui muscles. It is a short
Occa- sionally a cu- taneous
-- trunk, from which the following muscular branches radiate :
One enters the under surface of the complexus near its cranial
attachment. A slender branch is also furnished to each of the
small muscles that bound the space in which the nerve is contained, viz. to the rectus major and minor, and to the superior and
inferior oblique. The branch to the last muscle often joins the
inner branch of the second cervical nerve. Occasionally the suboccipital nerve gives a cutaneous branch to the occiput. *
offset. The suboccipital nerve and the internal branches of the two next
Poste- cervical nerves are sometimes connected by branches beneath the comvical plexus ; and in such case they form the " posterior cervical plexus " of plexus. M. Cruveilhier.
rior cerTwelve * Dorsal nerves.
dorsal - These nerves are twelve in number,
nerves and appear between the transverse processes. Each nerve
* See note to p. 139. ofthe first edition of this work.
VESSELS OF THE BACK. 373
divide into
and outer branch- es.
branches ofupper
soon divides into an internal and an external branch, which
are distributed after the same plan as those in the neck. inner
Cutaneous nerves are furnished from one or another set of
the branches, but not from both branches of the same nerve.
The external branches increase in size from the first to the last, Outer and are differently distributed above and below. The upper six
pass beneath the longissimus and its cervical prolongation, as far six end
as to the interval between the longissimus and the sacro- lumbalis, cles,
and end by supplying these muscles and the levatores costarum.
The lower six have a similar arrangement and distribution with but
respect to the muscles ; but after reaching the cellular interval those of
between the sacro- lumbalis and the longissimus dorsi, they are six give
continued to the surface through the serratus and latissimus neous
muscles, in a line with the angles of the ribs.
in muslower
entacffsets.
Inner branch- es .
six have
* The internal branches decrease in size from above downwards.
The upper six are directed inwards between the semispinalis
dorsi and multifidus spinæ muscles, and become cutaneous along Upper
the side of the spinous processes, by perforating the rhomboideus, cuta..
trapezius, and latissimus dorsi muscles. Offsets are supplied to neous
the muscles between which they are placed. The lower six are Lower
small in size, and end in the multifidus spinæ muscle.
and
offsets .
six not.
Lumbar
are di-
* Lumbar nerves. These are five in number,
appear between the erector and multifidus spinæ. In their nerves
general arrangement they resemble the dorsal nerves.
neous offsets are furnished only by the external set of
branches.
Cuta- vided into two.
nal * a. The external branches enter the fibres of the erector-spinæ, Exterand supply it and the small intertransverse muscles. The three branchfirst pierce the erector spinæ, and become cutaneous nerves after es give
piercing the aponeurosis of the latissimus. The outer branch of neous
the last nerve is connected with the first sacral nerve by an offset first
which lies near the bones.
cuta.
from
three.
es end
* b. The internal branches are supplied to the multifidus spinæ Internal
muscle. Near their origin they are difficult to find, in conse- branchquence of being contained in grooves near the articular processes in the of the vertebræ.
――
muscles.
sels are VESSELS IN THE BACK. The vessels that are now dis- Thevessected are the occipital and the deep cervical artery, part of
the vertebral artery, and the posterior branches of the intercostal and lumbar arteries of the aorta.
BB 3
374 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
the ocartery,
Part of The occipital artery is seen in the part of its course along the
cipital occipital bone. Appearing from beneath the digastric muscle,
this vessel is directed backwards beneath the sterno-mastoideus,
the splenius, and sometimes the trachelo- mastoideus, but over the
obliquus superior and complexus muscles. Near the middle line
it perforates the trapezius and ascends to the occiput, on which it
is distributed (p. 5.) . It supplies the surrounding muscles, and
furnishes the following branch to the neck :
which gives a
cervical branch.
Part of the ver- tebral artery.
Deep cervical
The cervical branch (r. princeps cervicis) supplies twigs to the under
part of the trapezius, and then passing beneath the complexus, anastomoses with the vertebral and deep cervical arteries.
The part of the vertebral artery now exposed lies on the posterior
arch of the first vertebra, behind the articulating process of that
bone, and appears in the interval between the straight and oblique
muscles, before perforating the ligament between the atlas and
occipital bone to enter the skull. Small branches are supplied by
the vessel to the surrounding part. Beneath the artery is the suboccipital nerve.
The deep cervical artery is a branch of the superior intercostal
artery. (of the subclavian) , and resembles the posterior branches of the
other intercostal arteries. Passing backwards between the transverse process of the last cervical vertebra and the neck of the first
rib, the vessel appears in this dissection between the complexus
and semispinalis muscles. Finally, the artery ascends as high as
the extent of the semispinalis muscle, and anastomoses with the
cervical branch of the occipital artery. The contiguous muscles
receive branches from the deep cervical artery, and anastomoses
are formed between its branches and those of the vertebral artery.
* Intercostal arteries. The posterior branches of these
arteries vessels accompany the nerves between the vertebræ and the
into anterior costo-transverse ligaments. In the back they are
divided into inner and outer branches.
Inter- costal
are split
inner and
Outer branch- e3,
and give a
branch
* The inner branches end in the fleshy mass of the multifidus
spinæ and semispinalis muscles, and furnish small offsets with
those nerves that reach the surface.
* The external branches cross beneath the longissimus dorsi, and
supply it and the erector spine. Like the nerves, the lowest
oranches of this set are the largest, because they extend to the
surface.
* Spinal branch.-As the dorsal branch of the intercostal artery
passes by the intervertebral foramen, it furnishes a small artery to the
tocordspinal . spinal cord and its membranes, and other branches to the vertebra.
FIFTH LAYER OF MUSCLES. 375
* Lumbar arteries. -
arteries The posterior branches of the Lumbar
lumbar arteries divide, like the intercostal, into internal and
´external branches, as soon as they reach the interval between
the longissimus dorsi and multifidus spine. They give also are also
a spinal branch to the spinal canal, and to the cord and the into
membranes investing it.
divided
* The internal branches are small, and end in the multifidus inner
spinæ muscle.
and
* The external branches supply the erector spinæ, and some are outer
continued onwards, with the nerves, to the integuments.
branch.
es .
are deep
tal,
VEINS. -With the deep cervical artery is a large vein, vena Veins
profunda cervicis, that communicates with the occipital and other cervical,
deep veins in this region, forming the posterior plexus of the neck,
and then passes forward between the transverse processes with the
artery, to join the vertebral vein. The occipital vein is with its occipiartery, and sometimes joins the lateral sinus through the mastoid
foramen. The dorsal and lumbar veins correspond to the arteries dorsal,
they accompany in their branching and distribution, and end in
the intercostal veins. In contact with the spinous processes and
plates of the vertebræ is a deeper set of veins (dorsi spinal) , which and deep
anastomose freely together, and enter the veins in the interior of
the spinal canal.
-
and lum.
bar,
veins.
are Dissec tion of two the last
muscles.
Dissection.- Most of the remaining muscles of the back
exposed by the previous dissection. Thus, between the first
vertebræ and the occipital bone are the small straight, and layer of
oblique muscles. In the cervical and dorsal regions is seen the
semispinalis muscle, with the small interspinales muscles internal
to it; and occupying a corresponding position in the loins is the
multifidus spinæ muscle. The small intertransverse muscles of
the lumbar vertebræ will be found by cutting through the erector
spinæ.
-
of the FIFTH LAYER. In this layer are included the following Muscles
small muscles, viz. the recti and obliqui, the semispinales, fifth
interspinales, multifidus spinæ, and intertransversales.
layer,
capitis
passes
The RECTUS CAPITIS POSTICUS MAJOR occupies the middle Rectus
line of the body, and is the larger of the two muscles be- major
tween the occipital bone and the first vertebræ. It arises between
from the spine of the second vertebra, and is inserted by occipital
rather a widened part into the inferior curved line of the
occipital bone, beneath the superior oblique muscle. This
axis and
bone,
BB 4
376 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
Rectus capitis minor
passes from
muscle is very oblique in its direction, and forms one side of
the triangular space that contains the suboccipital nerve.
The RECTUS CAPITIS POSTICUS MINOR is internal to the
preceding, and is the smallest of the four muscles between the
occipital bone and the first two vertebræ. Arising from the
posterior arch of the atlas, the muscle ascends to be inserted
atlas to into the occipital bone between the inferior curved line and
the foramen magnum. This small muscle is fan shaped, and
is deeper than the rectus major : it covers the ligament
between the atlas and the occipital bone.
occipital bone.
Obli- quus in- ferior The OBLIQUUS INFERIOR muscle arises from the spinous
process of the second vertebra or axis, external to the
rectus major muscle, and is inserted into the transverse
first two process of the atlas or first vertebra. This muscle lies
is be- tween
verte- bræ.
Obli- quus
from
obliquely between the first two vertebræ.
The OBLIQUUS SUPERIOR muscle takes origin from the
superior extremity of the transverse process, where the preceding
extends muscle terminates, and is directed inwards to be inserted
atlas to above the inferior curved line of the occipital bone, near
the mastoid process. This muscle is concealed by the complexus and trachelo-mastoideus, and crosses the vertebral
Connec- artery. Its insertion is beneath the splenius, but above the
rectus major muscle.
occiput.
tions.
Semi- spinalis
is di- vided into
semi- spinalis colli,
and
semi- spinalis dorsi.
Connec .
tions.
The SEMISPINALIS occupies the dorsal and cervical regions, and extends from the transverse to the spinous processes of the vertebræ. The lower part of the muscle is
called semispinalis dorsi, and the upper part semispinalis
colli.
The semispinalis dorsi arises from the transverse processes of the dorsal vertebræ, from the tenth to the sixth ;
and is inserted into the spinous processes of the four upper
dorsal and the two last cervical vertebræ.
The semispinalis colli arises from the transverse processes of the five or six upper dorsal vertebræ, and from the
articular processes of the cervical vertebræ except the three
first it is inserted into the spines of the cervical vertebræ
above the attachment of the semispinalis dorsi, the atlas
not receiving any slip.
The semispinalis muscle is covered by the complexus,
FIFTH LAYER OF MUSCLES. 377
and by the deep cervical artery and the cervical nerves.
To its inner side is the multifidus spinæ muscle.
The INTERSPINAL MUSCLES are placed as their name ex- Inter- spinal presses : they are best seen in the neck and loins, for they muscles
are only rudimentary between the spines of the dorsal
vertebræ.
In the cervical region these muscles are arranged in pairs inneckthe
between the spinous processes, except between those of the double ;
first two vertebræ. They are small round bundles, and are
attached above and below to the bifurcated apices of the
spines of the vertebræ. In the lumbar region the inter- in loins
spinal muscles are thin flat bands.
single.
transmuscles
* The INTERTRANSVERSE MUSCLES are found between the Intertransverse processes of the cervical and lumbar vertebræ. verse
Only those in the loins are now exposed, where they form in loins,
thin planes of muscular fibre, one in each intertransverse
space. In the neck they are double, like the interspinal in neck,
muscles of the same vertebræ. In the dorsal vertebræ there and
is a tendinous structure that occupies the place of the inter- region.
transverse muscle, but in the two last spaces there is
muscular fibre.
dorsal
tion of
fidus
Dissection. - Expose now the multifidus spinæ muscle which Dissecfills the hollow by the side of the spinous processes. Over the multisacrum it will be necessary to remove from it the thick aponeurosis spinæ.
that gives origin to it and the erector spinæ. This aponeurosis
will be found connected in the middle line with the spines of the
lumbar vertebræ and sacrum ; and on the outer side it is attached
to the posterior part of the crest of the ilium, and to the outer row
of tubercles on the back of the sacrum, being here connected with
the great sacro-sciatic ligament. In the neck and the dorsal
region the semispinalis should be detached from the spines, and
be turned aside from the multifidus spinæ.
fidus
has an
sive
* The MULTIFIDUS SPINÆ muscle extends from the sacrum Multito the second vertebra, and is much larger towards the pelvis spinæ
than in the neck. Its origin inferiorly is from the back of extenthe sacrum, between the central and external row of pro- origin.
cesses, as low as the fourth aperture ; from the inner part
of the posterior superior spinous process of the innominate bone ; as well as from the ligaments connecting this
378 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
bone to the sacrum. Higher in the back, the muscle arises
from the articular processes of the lumbar vertebræ, from
the tranverse processes of the dorsal vertebræ, and from the
articular processes of the cervical vertebræ. From this
extensive origin the fibres are directed obliquely inwards,
some extending more than the length of one vertebra, to be
inserted into the spines and the laminæ of all the vertebræ
Connec except the first. This muscle chiefly fills the vertebral tions. groove, and is concealed by the erector spine and the semispinalis. The internal branches of the vessels and nerves
of the back lie along its outer border. The following small
muscles may be said to be parts of the multifidus.
Inser- tion.
Rota- tores spinæ are parts
* Rotatores spinæ. - These are small muscles beneath
the multifidus spine in the dorsal region, and are separated
of multi- from that muscle by cellular tissue. Each is attached on
the one hand to the transverse process, and on the other to
the lower part of the lamina of the vertebra.
fidus.
Dissec- tion of sacral nerves.
Five sacral
-
Dissection. To expose the branches of the sacral nerves it will
be necessary to remove the part of the multifidus spinæ that
covers the sacrum. These nerves may be detected by following
inwards their external branches on the surface of the great sacrosciatic ligament. The two lowest nerves will be found on the
back of the sacrum, appearing through the apertures below the
extent of the multifidus spinæ muscle.
SACRAL NERVES. - The posterior divisions of the sacral
nerves : nerves are five in number, and issue from the spinal canal
are dif- by the apertures in the back of the sacrum. The three ferently distri- first have the common division into inner and outer branches,
like the other spinal nerves, but the last two are undivided.*
buted.
Three first have inner and outer
* First three nerves. -The inner branches of these nerves end
in the multifidus spinæ muscle. The outer branches are larger in
size, and are united together on the back of the sacrum ; but the
branch- outer branch of the first nerve is further connected with the corresponding part of the last lumbar, and that of the third nerve
the last joins in a similar manner the sacral nerve next below. After this
taneous looping, the nerves pass outwards to the surface of the great
es ;
give cuoffsets.
* See a paper on the branching of the posterior divisions of the spinal
nerves, -by the Author, in the Lond. Med. Gazette of Feb. 10. 1843.
PART OF WALL OF THE THORAX. 379
sacro-sciatic ligament, where they again join, and then become
cutaneous. (See DISSECTION OF THE BUTTOCK.)
- last are
vided.
* Two last nerves. These nerves are much smaller than the Two
preceding, and are undivided : they are connected one with an- undiother, and with the coccygeal nerve on the back of the sacrum. A
few filaments are distributed to the back of the sacrum and the
соссух.
geal nerve.
* The coccygeal nerve may be recognised by the side of Coccythe coccyx with care. It is joined by the last sacral nerve,
and ends on the posterior aspect of the coccyx.
sacral arteries,
* Small arteries leave the spinal canal with the sacral nerves ; Small
they supply the muscular mass of the erector spinæ and the
structures on the back of the sacrum. Anastomoses take place
between these vessels and the branches on the sacrum from the
gluteal and sciatic arteries.
tion of
costal
Dissection. The examination of the posterior part of the wall Dissecof the thorax should be made before the body is again turned. interBy the removal of the sacro- lumbalis and longissimus dorsi oppo- struc- site the ribs, the small levatores costarum will be seen. The
external intercostal muscle will be exposed at the same time.
tures.
tores
rum
from
verse
* The LEVATORES COSTARUM are small fan- shaped muscles Levathat arise from the apex of the transverse processes of the costadorsal vertebræ, and are inserted, the fibres spreading out, extend
into the upper border of the rib beneath. These muscles are transtwelve in number, and the first is fixed to the transverse proprocess of the last cervical vertebra. The fibres of the to ribs.
muscles have the same direction as the external intercostal
layer, of which they seem to be the continuation.
cesses
In some of the lower muscles a few of the fibres are con- Other elevator
tinued beyond one rib to that next succeeding. These muscles.
longer slips have been named levatores longiores costarum.
tercostal * The external intercostal muscle is continued backwards Outerinalong the ribs, as far as the tubercle, where they join the muscle.
elevator muscle. Beneath this outer muscle are the intercostal nerve and artery.
tion. Dissection. To trace the anterior and posterior divisions of the Dissecdorsal nerves to their origin in a common trunk, cut through the
elevator of the rib and the external intercostal muscle in one or
more spaces. The intercostal artery, with its posterior branch, is
exposed at the same time.
380 DISSECTION OF THE BACK.
Dorsal nerve has
poste- rior
nd an- terior trunk.
Inter- costal
* The dorsal nerves split in the intervertebral foramina
into anterior and posterior divisions.
* The posterior is directed backwards, internal to the anterior
costo-transverse ligament, and has been already examined (p. 371.) .
* The anterior is named intercostal, in consequence of its position between the ribs. Its anatomy is learnt in the dissection of
the thorax (p. 349.) .
* The intercostal artery has an almost exact correspondence
artery. with the dorsal nerve in its branching and distribution.
381
CHAPTER VI.
DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD AND ITS
MEMBRANES.
conin spinal
THE spinal cord is lodged in the canal formed by the bodies Cord is
and plates of the vertebræ, and gives origin to the different tained
spinal nerves. It is invested by prolongations of the mem- canal,
branes of the brain, which form sheaths around it, and by memsupport it in its large canal.
invested
branes.
tion to
dura mater.
Dissection. To expose the external membrane of the cord, Dissecopen the spinal canal by sawing through the arches of the vertebræ expose
on each side close to the articular processes, after the muscle is
removed from the bones. The cuts of the saw should extend to
the lower end of the sacrum, but not higher in the neck than the
fourth cervical vertebra. As it is difficult to use the saw in the
hollow of the lumbar region, a chisel and mallet will be found
useful to divide the plates of the vertebræ. When the spinal canal
is opened, the tube of dura mater will be seen to be covered by some
fat, especially at the lower part, and some veins. The fat is to be
scraped away with the handle of the scalpel, and the lateral prolongations through the intervertebral foramina are to be defined.
-
mem- MEMBRANES OF THE CORD. Three membranes envelop Three
the cord like the brain, viz. an external tube of dura mater, branes of
an internal sheath of pia mater, and an intervening arachnoid
or serous membrane.
the cord.
mater sur- rounds for cord
loosely,
The dura mater of the cord forms a strong tube, which is Dura
prolonged from that lining the interior of the skull. The
capacity of the sheath is much greater than is necessary
enveloping the cord ; and the size of the sheath is also larger
in the neck and loins than in the back. On the outer aspect and is slightly the dura mater is smooth, when a comparison is made be- connec
tween it and that in the skull, for it does not act as a peri- bones
osteum to the bones. Between it and the surrounding bones
ted with
around.
382 DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD.
offsets on
nerves
are some vessels and fat, but it is connected to the posterior
common ligament of the vertebræ by a few fibrous bands.
It gives On each side the dura mater furnishes offsets to the different
spinal spinal nerves issuing by the intervertebral foramina ; and
inferiorly these several offsets form small tubes which enclose
the sacral nerves, and lie for some distance within the spinal
and one canal. In the midst of these tubes, into which the dura
inferior mater is divided below, will be seen a slender impervious
cord, that descends from the lower part of the dura mater
to the end of the spinal canal, and is blended with the periosteum covering the back of the coccyx.
central
piece.
Its ves- sels.
Dissec- tion to remove cord
Vessels. -- The arteries of the dura mater are derived from the intraspinal branches of the vertebral, intercostal, and lumbar arteries.
veins open into the veins in the spinal canal.
-
The
Dissection. The tube of the dura mater with the contained
cord is next to be removed from the body. For this purpose cut
through the lateral processes in the intervertebral apertures, and
detach the central prolongation from the coccyx. Next cut
across the cord and its membranes as high as the canal is opened,
and remove them by cutting the bands that attach the dura mater
to the ligament of the vertebræ. When the cord is taken out, place
next co- it on a piece of board or on the table, with the lateral offsets vering. widely separated, and divide the dura mater along the middle as
and to expose
Arach- noid mem- brane has a
far as the small median cord before referred to. This membrane
is to be raised whilst it is being cut through, to avoid injuring the
loose arachnoid membrane that envelopes the cord. Lastly, draw
outwards the dura mater, and fasten it back with pins.
The arachnoid membrane is the thin serous covering of
the cord which is immediately beneath the dura mater. Like
the corresponding membrane in the skull, it invests the nervous centre, and lines the dura mater ; but the visceral layer
around the cord is much looser than the same part around
parietal the brain. The outer or parietal layer is inseparably joined
tached to the inner surface of the dura mater, and gives to that
membrane the shining appearance. The inner or visceral
a loose layer surrounds the cord loosely, so as to leave a considerable interval between the two (subarachnoid space): at the
lower part of the spinal canal this loose sheath is much the
largest, and envelops the mass of nerves that form the cauda
or atlayer,
and
or vis- ceral layer.
MEMBRANES OF THE CORD. 383
it and equina. As the different spinal nerves extend to the inter- Between
vertebral foramina they receive sheaths from the loose or cord is
visceral part of the arachnoid membrane, and retain the same arachtill they perforate the dura mater.
Dissection. -
subnoid space.
pose
arachThe subarachnoid space of the cord may be made To exevident, either by cutting through the visceral layer and placing subthe handle of the scalpel beneath it, or by placing a detached noid
piece of the cord in water, with the posterior aspect uppermost,
and blowing air beneath the serous membrane.
space.
arachspace is
below,
a fluid,
muniThe subarachnoid space is situate between the loose Subor visceral part of the arachnoid membrane and the spinal noid
cord invested by pia mater. Larger at the lower than at the largest
upper part of the spinal canal, the space contains a special contains
fluid ( subarachnoid) ; and it communicates with the cavity and comin the interior of the brain by the aperture in the fourth cates
ventricle. Crossing the space are bundles of fibrous tissue, withcar
especially at the posterior part of the cord, where they are
collected into an imperfect partition or septum along the There is
middle line. In the space are seen likewise the serrations perfect
of the ligamentum denticulatum, and the roots of the spinal behind.
nerves, with some vessels .
brain.
an imseptum
Dissection. For the purpose of seeing the next covering ofthe tion Dissec- of
cord with the ligamentum denticulatum, the dura mater should next co- vering.
be slit both before and behind, and fastened outwards. The arachnoid membrane is then to be taken away.
mater
the Where cord
The pia mater is much less of a vascular membrane on the Pia
spinal cord than on the brain. Thicker and more fibrous in
its nature, the membrane closely surrounds the cord, and supports
furnishes offsets to the roots of the spinal nerves.
the spinal cord ceases, viz. about the lower part of the body
of the first lumbar vertebra, the investing tube of the pia
mater is suddenly reduced in size, and has the appearance of
a round fibrous cord. This cord-like part of the pia mater andends
is unprovided with nervous substance, except for a short dis- riorly in
tance, and is blended with the central prolongation of the piece,
dura mater, on a level with the upper part of the sacrum. It which is
serves to fix the lower end of the medulla, and has been central
named, from that circumstance, the central ligament of the ment.
infea fibrous
called
liga-
384 DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD.
bands
cord. A vein and artery accompany this fibrous piece, and
thus mark it out from the surrounding nerves. The outer
Fibrous surface of the pia mater is rough. Along the front of the
are con- membrane is a central anterior fibrous band (linea splendens,
with it . Haller) ; and on each side also the fibrous ligamentum denticulatum is attached to it. A prolongation of the membrane
enters the anterior median fissure of the cord.
nected
One of these is
tate liga- ment,
which is
one side
The ligamentum denticulatum is a white fibrous band on
the den- each side of the spinal cord, which is named from its serrated
appearance. Situate between the anterior and posterior
fixed on roots of the nerves, the band reaches upwards to the meto cord dulla oblongata, and ends inferiorly on the lower pointed part
of the cord. Internally it is united to the surface of the pia
mater. Externally it ends in a series of triangular or toothlike projections, which are inserted into the dura mater about
midway between the apertures of transmission of the roots
points. of the spinal nerves. There are twenty or twenty-one of
Number these denticulations, of which the first is attached to the dura
mater opposite the margin of the occipital foramen, between
the vertebral artery and the hypoglossal nerve, and the last
is fixed opposite the last dorsal or the first lumbar vertebra.
This fibrous band supports the spinal cord, and has received
the name ligament from that circumstance.
and on other to dura mater by
and at- tach- ment of these.
Dissec- tion of
nerves .
Dissection. - The arachnoid membrane is next to be taken
roots of from the fibrils of the roots of the nerves, and the fibrils are
to be traced outwards to their transmission through apertures
in the dura mater. One or more of the offsets of the dura
mater, that have been cut of some length, should be laid
open to show the contained ganglion. The student should
define the ganglion, and should trace the roots of the nerves
to their union beyond the ganglion.
Trunks ofspinal SPINAL NERVES. ― The trunks of the spinal nerves are
nerves. formed by the blending together of the roots (anterior and
Number posterior ) in the intervertebral foramina. The number of the
range. nerves so constructed is thirty- one in all ; and they are
groups. divided into cervical, dorsal, lumbar, and sacral groups, to
which must be added one coccygeal nerve.
In each group.
and arment in
ROOTS OF THE NERVES. 385
the nerves are equal to the number of the vertebræ, except
in the cervical region of the spine, where there are eight
nerves. In consequence of this peculiarity in the cervical Last
nerves, the last is below the seventh vertebra ; and it follows
that the last nerve of each group will be below its correspond- the vering vertebra.
nerve of a group below
tebra.
nerve
roots,
and pos
ROOTS OF THE NERVES. Each nerve is attached to the Each'
side ofthe spinal cord by an anterior and a posterior root, and has two
its trunk is formed by the union of these, as before said, in anterior
the intervertebral foramen, or it may be in the spinal canal. terior.
The posterior root is marked by a ganglion, but the anterior
root is aganglionic.
rior root
than anfibres
lected
bundles
The posterior or ganglionic roots surpass in size the an- Posteterior, and are formed by larger and more numerous fibrils. is larger
They are attached to the side of the cord in a line, between terior.
its posterior and antero-lateral pieces, which they keep without deviation even to the last nerve. In their course to the Its
trunk ofthe nerve, the fibrils of the root pass outwards con- arecol
verging to an aperture in the dura mater opposite the inter- into two
vertebral foramen ; as they approach that aperture they are
collected into two bundles which, lying side by side, receive
a sheath from the dura mater, and enter the intervertebral that end
ganglion. From the dissection that has been made, the gan- interglion is seen to be bifid at the inner part, where it is joined bralgan
by the fibrils of the root, as if there were two ganglia, one for
each bundle of fibrils, which became blended at their outer
ends.
in the
verteglion.
ence
several
Besides the general fact, that the posterior root is larger Differthan the anterior, there is a difference in size to be noted be- in the
tween the fibrils of the posterior root in the different groups groups.
of the nerves.
cervical,
the cer- dorsal,
In the cervical nerves the fibrils of the posterior root increase Relative
in size from vertebra to vertebra ; but in the suboccipital or first size in
nerve the posterior is smaller than the anterior root. In the
dorsal nerves the posterior fibrils are smaller than in
vical, and, if the large first nerve is excepted, they vary but
slightly in size from above downwards. In the lumbar and sacral lumbar,
nerves the fibrils are the largest, supposing the last sacral and the sacral .
coccygeal nerve not to be included in this general statement, for
сс
and
386 DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD.
Anterior root is
gangli- on.
Its fibres
through
in these last the fibrils are smaller than in any other nerves of
the spinal cord.
The anterior or aganglionic roots arise from the side of the
without cord by filaments that are attached irregularly, and approach
inferiorly the centre of the front of the cord. Taking the
same direction as the posterior root, the fibrils enter a dis- pass tinct opening and sheath of the dura mater, and passing
over the ganglion of that root become blended beyond
opening the ganglion to form one trunk. Occasionally the filaments mater, of the anterior root are not confined to one nerve, but come
join pos- from the nerve above or below it. The same peculiarity is
seen in the posterior roots, viz. the passage of filaments
between contiguous roots.
a sepa- rate
and
terior root beyond gan- glion.
Differ- There are some differences to be observed in the anterior
ences in as well as in the posterior roots, with respect to the size of
the fibrils of one part of the cord, when compared with
those of another.
these roots
in the cervical ,
lumbar,
sacral
In the cervical nerves the anterior roots increase successively
in size, and their fibrils are smaller in proportion to the posterior
dorsal, than in any other group of the spinal nerves. In the dorsal, lum- and bar, and sacral nerves there is the same gradation in size as in the
fibrils ofthe posterior root, viz. the dorsal fibrils are smaller than
the cervical, and the lumbar and sacral are the largest of all . Of
course the last sacral and the coccygeal nerve form exceptions
among the anterior as amongst the posterior roots.
nerves.
The roots ofthe nerves
lique in the canal ;
the cer- vical ;
Length and inclination of the roots. The distance between the place of origin and the aperture of transmission
-- In the
are ob- of the roots of a spinal nerve increases from the upper to the
lower end of the cord, so that the following peculiarities are
least in to be recognised in each of the groups of nerves :
upper cervical nerves both roots are directed horizontally to
their ganglia, and are very short ; but in the lower nerves
the roots have to pass obliquely downwards for the length of
a vertebra, before they arrive at the ganglia. In the dorsal
dorsal ; nerves the fibrils are more oblique, and run downwards
by the side of the cord for the distance of two vertebræ
and still before they reach the intervertebral foramen. In the lumbar
the lum- and sacral nerves the roots are the longest, and become
more and more oblique until at last they have a vertical
more in the
more in
bar and sacral nerves,
VESSELS OF THE CORD. 387
they
cauda
direction. As the cord ceases opposite the first lumbar ver- where
tebra, the long roots of the lumbar and sacral nerves sur- form
round it, and give it some resemblance to a horse's tail, so equina.
that the term " cauda equina " has been applied to it.
on the
SituaSituation ofthe ganglia. -Commonly the ganglion on the Ganglia
posterior root of each nerve is lodged in the intervertebral roots.
foramen ; and the trunk of the nerve bifurcates at the same tion in
spot into an anterior and a posterior division . But devi- verteations from this arrangement are found in the following ramen,
nerves : -
interbral foin first
vical,
The first two cervical nerves have in each instance the except
ganglion on the posterior arch of the corresponding vertebra, two cerand the anterior and posterior divisions diverge from the
ganglion in that situation.
In sacral the sacral nerves the ganglia are contained in the spinal and the
canal, and the union of the roots in the trunk also takes nerves.
place within the canal. The primary divisions of the nerves
issue by the apertures in the front and back of the sacrum.
liarities
branches
The roots of the last sacral and of the coccygeal nerve are Pecualso united in the spinal canal, and the anterior and posterior of
divisions of each trunk escape by the lower aperture of that in two
canal. The ganglion on the posterior root of the coccygeal
nerve is placed about the middle of its length.
last nerves.
VESSELS OF THE SPINAL CORD. -The arteries on the Arteries
surface of the cord are anterior and posterior spinal.
ofcord are
spinal,
artery,
comes
verte- bral,
a. The anterior spinal artery occupies the middle line of the Anterior
cord beneath the fibrous band before alluded to in that position. a single
Commencing at the medulla oblongata by the union of two small which'
branches of the vertebral artery (p. 165. ) , the vessel is continued from
to the lower part of the cord by a series of anastomotic branches,
which are derived from the vertebral and ascending cervical
arteries in the neck, and from the intercostal and lumbar arteries and is
in the dorsal and lumbar regions. The branches of this artery nued by
ramify in the pia mater, and are then distributed to the substance motic
ofthe cord, some entering the anterior median fissure. Inferiorly
it supplies the roots of the nerves forming the cauda
ends on the central fibrous prolongation of the cord.
contianasto
branch- es .
equina, and Termi- nation.
CC 2
388 DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD.
Poste- rior arteries
b. The posterior spinal arteries, one on each side, are continued
from the upper to the lower part of the cord behind the roots of are two ; the nerves. Dividing into small branches, the vessels of opsidesof posite sides form a free anastomosis around the posterior roots,
and some offsets enter the fissure of the cord. These vessels
tribu- begin superiorly by offsets from the vertebral artery, and their
lie on
cord ;
their distion ;
are con- tinued along cord like an- terior.
Veins
pass from
continuity is maintained by a series of anastomotic branches,
which run along the spinal nerves, and are furnished from the
same source as the twigs that reinforce the anterior spinal
artery.
The veins of the spinal cord are very tortuous, and form a
plexus on the surface. At intervals, larger trunks arise which
accompany the spinal nerves to the intervertebral foramina, and
end in the veins outside the spinal canal. Near the top of the
cord the veins are united into two or more small branches that
nation at terminate in the inferior cerebellar, or the petrosal sinuses, after
communicating with the vertebral veins.
spinal canal.
Termitop of cord .
Situa- tion of the cord.
Its ex- tent
The SPINAL CORD (medulla spinalis) is the cylindrical
elongated part of the cerebro- spinal centre that is enclosed
within the spinal canal. Invested by the membranes before
examined, this body occupies about two-thirds of the length
of the spinal canal, and is much smaller than the bony case
that surrounds it.
The extent of the cord is from the level of the atlas to the
lower border of the first lumbar vertebra, but its termination
varies inferiorly may be a little higher or lower than that spot. Its below. length is usually about sixteen or seventeen inches. SuInferior periorly the cord joins the medulla oblongata ; and inferiorly
tionin it becomes pointed, being sometimes marked by one or two
Length.
terminathe adult
and in the em- bryo.
Its size is inswellings, and ends by a fibrous prolongation of the pia
mater (central ligament of the cord). In the embryo, before
the fourth month, the medulla reaches all the length of the
spinal canal, but it then gradually recedes from below as the
surrounding bones increase in size, until it takes the position
it has in the adult.
The size of the spinal cord is much increased opposite the
creased origin of the nerves for the supply of the limbs. There are
therefore two enlargements on it : one corresponds to the lower where the
FISSURES AND DIVISIONS OF THE CORD. 389
of the
are atcervical vertebræ, reaching as high as the third ; the other nerves
is smaller, and is on a level with the last dorsal vertebra. limbs
In the cervical enlargement, the greatest thickness is from tached.
side to side ; but in the inferior swelling the measurement of
the cord is greatest from before backwards.
aspect
guished
Whilst the pia mater remains on the cord, the anterior Anterior
surface is distinguished from the posterior by the position of distinthe central fibrous band and the anterior spinal artery, and from
by the anterior roots approaching the middle line towards rior.
the lower end.
posteDissection. For the examination of the structure the student Dissec- tion to should possess a piece of the cord which has been hardened in see con- stituents spirit, for that which is obtained from the spinal canal at this of cord .
period is not fitted for the purpose of dissection. Supposing the
pia mater removed from the surface of the cord, without the roots
of the nerves being detached, the student will be able to observe
the following facts :
Fissures of the
median,
FISSURES OF THE CORD. On both the anterior and posterior aspects of the cord is a median longitudinal cleft cord are,
(anterior and posterior median fissures), which mark its
division into halves ; and along the line of the posterior roots
of the nerves on each side is another slit (lateral fissure) .
a. The anterior median fissure is wider than the posterior, anterior
and penetrates about one-third of the thickness of the cord.
It is lined by a fold of the pia mater, and is deepest towards
the lower end of the cord. The medullary substance of the
surface enters the fissure, lining it ; and in the bottom of the
cleft the white fibres are transverse, and are pierced by
apertures for bloodvessels.
median, b. The posterior median fissure is not so wide or well posterior
marked as the anterior, but it is best seen at the upper part
of the cord. The vessels of the posterior aspect of the cord
enter this fissure, and white substance is continued into it
from one half to another of the medulla.
c. The lateral fissure (posterior ) is situate along the line lateral and
of attachment of the fibrils of the posterior roots. It reaches fissure.
inwards to the grey matter of the medulla, as will be afterwards seen.
Some anatomists describe another lateral fissure (an- Sup- posed cc 3
390 DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD.
other terior) along the line of origin of the anterior roots, but lateral fissure. there is not any cleft in that situation.
The cord is
into
DIVISIONS OF THE CORD. - Each half of the cord, viz.
divided from the anterior to the posterior median fissure, is divided
into two parts by the lateral slit or fissure. The piece in
front of that line ( posterior roots of the nerves) is called the
antero-lateral column, and the piece behind, the posterior
column.
antero- lateral a. The antero- lateral column includes rather more than
column two-thirds of the surface of the half of the cord, extending
backwards to the posterior roots of the nerves, and gives attachment to the anterior roots. By some anatomists it is
divided into two parts (an anterior and a lateral column)
by a supposed fissure along the attachment of the anterior
roots. *
and pos- terior b. The posterior column is situate between the posterior
column. roots of the nerves and the central fissure along the posterior
aspect of the cord. On the surface of this division, near the
median fissure, is a slight groove or furrow, marking off a
slender piece, the posterior median column, which terminates
superiorly in the posterior pyramid of the medulla oblongata. This separation is best seen in the cervical part of
the cord.
Cord consists
and white
STRUCTURE OF THE CORD. - A horizontal section of the
of grey medulla spinalis shows it to be composed of white medullary
substance, containing within it grey or cineritious matter ;
and to consist of two lateral parts or halves, which are united
internally by a central piece or commissure.
matter ;
Grey matter has two semi- lunar masses,
and a
trans- verse piece.
a. The grey matter in the centre of the cord is disposed
inthe form of two semilunar masses, one in each half, which
are connected by a central transverse piece. Each semilunar
mass has its convexity turned towards its fellow, and is
joined by the connecting transverse part (grey commissure).
The posterior extremity or cornu of the mass is long and
* For the sake of making the description of the fibres of the medulla oblongata more intelligible ( p. 176.), mention is made of three
columns, anterior, middle, and posterior ; but the two first are included
in the antero- lateral division.
DEEP ORIGIN OF THE NERVES. 391
tion of
lunar mass.
pointed, and projects to the surface of the cord at the lateral
fissure ; but the anterior cornu is larger and shorter than the Disposiposterior, and is directed forwards towards the line of at- the semitachment of the anterior roots, without, however, reaching
the surface of the cord. The extremity of the anterior cornu
is uneven at the margin ; and at the end of the posterior
cornu the grey matter is swollen, and appears somewhat
transparent (substantia cinerea gelatinosa).
matter
rounds
ed by
matter.
b. The white matter forming the circumference of the White
spinal cord is composed of nerve fibres disposed longi- surtudinally in bundles, so as to give passage to intermediate the grey.
vessels. In each half of the cord the white matter is sepa- white
rated into two parts by the projection to the surface of the separatposterior cornu of the crescentic mass of grey matter be- grey
tween the antero-lateral and the posterior column. The
posterior column of the cord, with its small slender piece,
is now seen to be wedge- shaped, as it projects inwards
between the posterior median fissure and the posterior cornu
of the grey matter. The antero- lateral column is partly The an
divided into two (anterior and lateral) by the projecting an- mass
terior cornu of the grey crescentic-shaped mass. It must be partly
terior
again
divided.
further remarked that the white matter of one half of the
cord is continued to the opposite across the median fissures.
c. The commissural or central piece connecting the halves Piece of the cord is formed of an internal layer of grey matter, halves
which is covered in front and behind by white substance. cord
between
of the
inside,
white in
The grey matter is the transverse band (grey commissure) is grey
that connects the masses in the halves of the cord. The and
white layers are derived from the white matter lining the frontand
median fissures : they are named anterior and posterior white
commissures, and the anterior layer is the thickest of the
two.
behind.
of the
in the
DEEP ORIGIN OF THE NERVES. -Respecting the ultimate Roots
destination of the filaments of the roots of the spinal nerves, nerves
there is much uncertainty. In each root some filaments are cord.
connected with the white matter of the cord, but in the posterior root they enter, in addition, the grey matter.
The anterior roots are situate over the anterior cornu of AttachCC 4
392 DISSECTION OF THE SPINAL CORD.
anterior roots.
ment of the grey substance, and are connected with the white matter
of the antero-lateral column of the cord, both in front of and
behind the place of attachment to the surface. According
to those anatomists who divide the antero-lateral column
into two, they arise from the white fibres of both the anterior
and lateral columns of the cord. It is said by Bellingeri that
the filaments enter the anterior cornu of the grey crescentic
Attach- ment of poste.
rior roots.
Ultimate termi- nation
mass.
The filaments ofthe posterior roots enter the lateral fissure
of the cord, and are connected with the extremity of the
posterior cornu of the grey crescent. They are connected
likewise with the white fibres of the posterior part of the
antero-lateral column (the lateral column of some anatomists),
but they join also the posterior column at some spots along
the cord.
The termination ofthe nerve tubes of the roots after they enter
the cord is very doubtful. It is supposed that those entering the
doubtful. white substance ascend along the cord ; whilst those in the grey
matter are considered either to end in it, or to traverse it and
join the other white fibres.
Vessels ofthe spinal canal.
Source of the
INTRASPINAL VESSELS. ― The arteries in the interior of
the spinal canal supply the cord and the bodies of the vertebræ. The veins form a remarkable plexus within the
canal, but much of this is destroyed in opening the canal and
removing the cord.
The intraspinal arteries supply branches to the spinal intra- cord, and are derived from the arteries along the sides and spinal arteries. front of the spinal column, viz. from the vertebral and
ascending cervical, fromthe intercostal, and from the lumbar
and lateral sacral.
Distri- As each artery enters the spinal canal by the intervertebral
bution the verto foramen, it divides into two branches, upper and lower : these tebræ and the cord.
branches are directed, one upwards and the other downwards,
behind the bodies of the vertebræ contiguous to the intervertebral
foramen, and outside the edge of the posterior common ligament
of the spine, to join in anastomotic loops with offsets of the intraspinal artery above and below. These loops extend from one
intervertebral foramen to another, and furnish branches to the
VESSELS IN THE SPINAL CANAL. 393
periosteum, and the bodies of the vertebræ on their posterior surface, as well as anastomotic twigs to connect the arches across the
vertebræ.
within
spinal
large.
The intraspinal veins are not seen unless they are in- Veins
jected. They consist of two anterior longitudinal veins, the
which extend the whole length of the spinal canal behind the canal are
bodies of the vertebræ ; of veins from the bodies of the vertebræ ; and of a plexus of veins beneath the plates or arches
of the vertebræ.
longitu- a. The anterior longitudinal veins are close to the bodies of the Anterior
vertebræ, one on each side of the common ligament of those dinal
bones, and are irregular in outline, owing to certain constrictions
near the intervertebral foramina. They receive opposite the are on
body of each vertebra the vein from that bone ; and they send verteoutwards through the intervertebral foramina branches of communication with the veins outside the spine in the neck, the dorsal region, and the loins.
bodies of
bræ.
the ver- b. Veins ofthe bodies of the vertebra. -Within the canals in the Veins of
bodies ofthe vertebræ are contained large veins, that join on the tebræ.
front of each vertebra with veins in that situation, and unite together behind into one trunk that passes from the bone by the
large aperture on the posterior surface. Escaped from the bone,
the trunk divides into two branches that pass, one to the right
another to the left, to open into the large longitudinal veins.
tact with
c. The posterior spinal veins form a plexus between the dura Posteri- or spinal mater and the lamina of the vertebræ. A large vein may be said veins are
to lie on each side of the middle line, which joins freely with its incont
fellow, and with the anterior longitudinal vein by lateral branches. laminæ.
Into this plexus the small veins on the outside of the laminæ pour
their contents. Branches from these vessels are directed to the
intervertebral foramina, where they end in the veins at the roots of the transverse processes.
394
CHAPTER VII.
DISSECTION OF THE PERINÆUM.
SECTION I.
PERINEUM OF THE MALE.
section
is tobe made soon.
Placethe
The dis- THE examination of the perinæum should be made before
the dissection of the abdomen, because the distinctness of
many of the parts is destroyed soon after death. Before the
body is placed in the position suited for the dissection, the
student may practise passing the catheter along the urethra.
Position ofthe body. —Whilst the body lies on the back body in position, it is to be drawn to the end of the dissecting table, till the
buttocks hang slightly over it. A moderate sized block is
then to be placed beneath the pelvis, to raise the perinæum
to a convenient height. Afterwards the legs are to be
upwards raised, and fastened out of the way by the following means :
-Bend the thighs upon the trunk, and bend the knees at
the same time ; make one or two turns of a cord round the
bent knee (say the right), carry the cord beneath the table,
encircling the opposite limb at the same part, and fasten it
finally round the right knee. When the position is arranged,
let the student raise the scrotum, and place a small bit of
cotton wool or tow within the anus, but let him avoid distending the rectum.
and fasten
the legs.
The surface ww Marking ofthe surface. The space in the male between
presents the scrotum in front and the thighs and buttocks on the sides
and behind, is of a dark colour, and covered with hairs.
About its centre is the aperture of the anus, which is posterior
to a line extended from the anterior part of one ischial tubertheanus, osity to another. In front of the anus the surface is slightly
araphé, convex, and presents a longitudinal prominent line (raphé),
which divides the space into two parts. Between the anus
BOUNDARIES OF THE SPACE. 395
on side
and
and the tuberosity of the ischium the surface is some- hollow
what hollowed, especially in emaciated bodies, and cor- of anus,
responds to the space of the subjacent ischio-rectal fossa.
The margin of the anal aperture has naturally numerous and folds
converging folds, which are more or less obliterated by the veins
position of the body and the distension of the rectum ; and that
projecting oftentimes through and around the opening are
some dilated hæmorrhoidal veins (hæmorrhoids).
around
opening.
ing parts
same as
outlet of
of the
Boundaries. -The perinæal space corresponds to the infe- Boundrior aperture or the outlet of the pelvis, and its limits may around,
be ascertained by referring to a dry or prepared pelvis, on those of
which the ligaments remain entire. Beginning in front, the pelvis.
student will find the arch of the pubes and the subpubic
ligament ; and at the posterior part, the tip of the coccyx.
On each side, from before backwards, is that part of the innominate bone which consists of the ramus of the pubes and
the ramus and tuberosity of the ischium ; and still further
back is the great sacro- sciatic ligament extending from the
tuberosity of the ischium to the tip of the coccyx. The space Form
included within these boundaries has the form of a lozenge, space and
and measures about four inches from before backwards, and ments.
three inches from one tuberosity to another of the ischium.
A line from the front of the tuberosity of one side to that of Aline
the other will divide the perinæal space into two triangular the tubeparts. In the anterior ( urethral half) are contained the divides
roots of the penis and their muscles ; the urethra, with two.
its muscles, vessels, and nerves ; and the triangular ligament.
The posterior part (anal half) is occupied by the lower end.
of the rectum, with its muscles, vessels, and nerves.
The Depth
depth of the perinæum from the anus to the bladder may be space.
said to be about three inches, but this measurement varies
much in different bodies.
-
measurebetween
rosities
it into
of the
tion Dissection ofthe anal halfofthe space.· Before the student pro- Dissecceeds with his dissection, let him trace with the finger the boundaries ofthe perinæum on the body. Afterwards make an incision
across the perinæum at the front of the anus, and extend it rather
beyond the tuberosity of the ischium on each side. A little behind
the tip of the coccyx, divide the skin in the same direction and
for the same distance. Then connect the two transverse cuts by
396 DISSECTION OF THE PERINÆUM.
ofsphinccarrying the knife along the middle line and around the anus.
Raise and throw outwards the two flaps of skin from the middle
line. In detaching the skin from the margin of the anus, the superter ani. ficial sphincter muscle will be exposed. The dissector should first
trace that muscle back to the coccyx, and then forwards beneath
Differ- the remaining piece of skin. The next step is to bring into view
exposing a large hollow (ischio-rectal fossa) between the side of the rectum
and the tuberosity of the ischium, clearing the fat out of it on the
left side without reference to the vessels and nerves, and making a
special dissection of these on the opposite side.
ence in
the ischio- rectal fossa.
Dissec- tion of left ischio- rectal fossa,
and of that on right side,
seeking vessels and
To clean out the fat from the left fossa, begin at the outer
margin ofthe sphincter, and from that point proceed forwards and
backwards. In front the dissection should not extend beyond the
anus, whilst behind it should expose the margin of the gluteus
maximus. On the inner side are the fibres of the levator ani
(sometimes very pale) and of the coccygeus ; and on the outer
boundary the pudic vessels should be exposed, as they lie in a canal
formed by fascia.
On the opposite side it is not necessary to clean the muscular
fibres when following the vessels and nerves. Beginning at the
outer border of the sphincter, the student will find the inferior
hæmorrhoidal vessels and nerve, which may be traced outwards to
nerves. their trunks (pudic vessels and nerve) : some branches of the nerve
are directed forwards and join with two other nerves, the superficial perineal and inferior pudendal. In the posterior angle of the
space is a small offset of the fourth sacral nerve ; and sometimes
external to it one or more branches of the sciatic nerve and artery
are found, turning round the border of the gluteus . Near the
front of the fossa is a superficial perineal artery and nerve (of the
pudic) ; and the last, after communicating with the hæmorrhoidal
nerve, leaves the fossa in front. The trunks of the pudic vessels
and nerve may be laid bare on the outer wall.
Situa- tion of the
The term ischio- rectal fossa is applied to the space
between the rectum and the ischial part of the innominate fossa. bone. Irregular in shape, it is larger behind than before,
Dimen- and is filled by a soft granular fat. Its width is about one sions. inch, and its depth about two inches. Internally, the space
Bound- aries.
is bounded by the levator ani muscle, and slightly by the
sphincter ; and externally by the obturator muscle and the
fascia covering it. In front it is limited by the triangular
ligament (to be afterwards seen) ; and behind by the great
MUSCLES OF THE ANUS. 397
-
vessels
outer
nerves
space.
sacro-sciatic ligament and the largest gluteal muscle. Along Pudic
the outer wall the pudic vessels and nerve lie in a tube ofon the
fascia, being one inch and a half from the margin of the wall,
tuberosity of the ischium ; but towards the front of the
space they are nearer to the edge of the ramus of that bone.
Crossing the centre of the space are the inferior hæmor- and
rhoidal vessels and nerve, branches of the pudic. At the in the
anterior part, for a short distance, is a superficial perineal
nerve (of the pudic), and in the posterior part is a small
branch of the fourth sacral nerve. Into this space the First cut
surgeon sinks his knife in the first incisions in the lateral tomy
operation of lithotomy, and as the knife is carried from this
before backwards, it divides the superficial hæmorrhoidal
vessels and nerve.
in lithoenters
space.
of rec- MUSCLES. -Connected with the lower end of the rectum Muscles
are three muscles, two sphincters (external and internal) and tum.
the levator ani.
nal
ter surrectum .
The EXTERNAL SPHINCTER (sphincter ani externus) is a Exterflat, thin, orbicular muscle, which is pointed in front and sphincbehind, and surrounds the lower part of the rectum. Like rounds
other orbicular muscles, the fibres form elipses around a
central aperture. The muscle arises posteriorly from the tip origin.
of the coccyx by a fibrous band, and from the superficial
fascia in front of that bone. The fibres pass forwards to the
anus, where they separate to encircle that aperture, and
having again united in front of it, are inserted into the Insersuperficial fascia and the central point of the perinæum.
The sphincter is close beneath the skin, and partly conceals Connecthe levator ani. The outer border projects over the ischiorectal fossa, and the inner is contiguous to the internal
sphincter.
tion .
tions.
sphinca pale
around
The INTERNAL SPHINCTER (sphincter ani internus) is Internal
situate around the extremity of the intestine, internal to the ter is
preceding muscle, and is seen by removing the mucous band
membrane. The fibres of this muscle are pale, and of a finer the end
texture than those of the other sphincter ; they encircle the gut.
lower part of the rectum in the form of a band, and are in- Inserted
serted in front into the central point of the perinæum. The common
of the
into
point.
398 DISSECTION OF THE PERINÆUM.
Inser- tion of
ani
to coc- cyx,
in front ofit ;
muscle may be considered to be only a band of the circular
fibres of the large intestine.
The LEVATOR ANI muscle can be seen now only in part,
levator and the external sphincter should be detached from the
coccyx, that its insertion may be more apparent. The
muscle descends from the inner aspect of the innominate bone
to be inserted along the middle line, from the coccyx to the
to tendon central point of the perinæum. The most posterior fibres
are connected to the side of the coccyx ; and between that
bone and the rectum the muscles of opposite sides are
united in a central tendinous line. The middle fibres are
blended with the side of the intestine (rectum). Whilst the
anterior are joined with those of the opposite muscle, in
front of the rectum, in the central point of the perinæum.
This muscle bounds the ischio-rectal fossa on the inner side.
to rec- tum ,
and to centre of peri- næum.
Arteries of the space.
hæmorrectum
ARTERIES. -The inferior hæmorrhoidal is the only named
branch of the pudic artery that is now exposed. Some other
small branches of the pudic and sciatic are also seen.
Inferior The inferior hæmorrhoidal artery arises from the trunk of the
rhoidal pudic, internal to the tuberosity of the ischium, and divides into
branches that pass inwards across the ischio- rectal fossa to end in
ends on the skin and the sphincter and levator ani muscles. On the
and in its rectum this artery anastomoses with the middle hæmorrhoidal
artery ofthe internal iliac, and with the artery of the opposite side.
In a well-injected body, some cutaneous branches are seen to run
forwards to the anterior part of the perinæum, and communiBranch cate with the superficial perineal artery. A vein accompanies the
artery.
muscle.
of vein.
Other offsets of pudic.
BranchOther small branches of the pudic artery cross the front of the
fossa for the supply of the anterior part of the levator ani muscle.
Branches ofthe sciatic artery appear on the inner aspect of the
the sci- gluteus maximus at the back of the fossa ; some end in that muscle, and others are continued round its border to the surface.
es of
atic.
Nerves.
Inferior hæmorNERVES. -The branches of nerves are the inferior hæmorrhoidal, an offset of the fourth sacral nerve, and some
branches of the small sciatic nerve.
The inferior hæmorrhoidal nerve is most frequently a branch of
rhoidal the pudic, though it may have a separate origin from the sacral
artery of plexus. Accompanying the artery of the same name across the is with
SUPERFICIAL FASCIA OF THE PERINEUM. 399
name. ischio-rectal fossa, it reaches the margin of the anus, where it ter- same
minates in offsets to the integument and the sphincter muscle. TermiOther cutaneous offsets of the nerve turn forwards over the fossa, nation
and communicate with the superficial perinæal nerve, and with the
inferior pudendal (of the small sciatic) on the margin of the thigh.
The hæmorrhoidal branch of the fourth sacral nerve reaches the Branch
ischio-rectal fossa by piercing the fibres of the coccygeus, or by
passing between that muscle and the levator ani. Appearing in
the posterior part of the fossa, close to the coccyx, the nerve ends
by supplying the external sphincter and the integument behind supplies sphinc- the anus.
of sacral nerve
ter.
neous One or two cutaneous branches of the small sciatic nerve turn Cutaround that part of the lower border of the gluteus, which is now offsets
exposed in their course to the integuments on its surface.
-
of small sciatic.
to raise Dissection of the urethral half of the perineal space. -To raise Incisions
the skin from the anterior part of the perinæum, make a trans- the skin.
verse cut at the back of the scrotum, and continue the same for a
short distance (two inches) on each thigh. A second incision
along the middle line will allow the flaps of skin to be reflected.
and pe
space,
To define a partition of the superficial fascia between the Define partition perinæal space and the thigh, which is connected with the rami of between
the pubes and ischium, it will be necessary to remove, on the left thigh
side, the superficial fascia from the fascia lata of the thigh, external rinæal
to the line of the bones before mentioned. In repeating the dissection on the right side, the student should seek the inferior pu- and seek
dendal nerve, which pierces the fascia lata about one inch anterior pudento the tuberosity of the ischium, and the same distance from the dal
margin of the ramus of that bone ; and should trace its junction
with the inferior hæmorrhoidal nerve in the superficial fascia.
Afterwards this nerve is to be followed forwards to where it enters
beneath the piece of the superficial fascia in the middle line.
inferior
nerve.
superfireflect it.
To separate the superficial fascia covering the front of the Blow up
perinæal space, blow it up by means of a blow- pipe, introduced cial fasbeneath it at the posterior part. Each side is to be inflated to de- cia, and
monstrate the fact that a partition exists in the middle line. The
student is next to cut through the superficial fascia, on the left
side, from the scrotum to the ischio-rectal fossa, and to remove
some cellular membrane, in order to expose the line of attachment
ofthat fascia to the bones externally, and to the triangular ligament
posteriorly. The septum along the middle line should also be
defined.
The superficial fascia of the anterior half of the perinæum Superfi-
400 DISSECTION OF THE PERINEUM.
cia.
Its thick- ness varies.
bles that
in having
ers.
nections
cial fas- is continuous with that of the rest of the body, extending
on each side to the thigh, in front to the scrotum, and backwards around the anus. Its depth and the quantity of fat
in it will vary with the condition of the body. It resembles
Resem- the superficial fascia of the groin and upper part of the
ofgroin, thigh, in having two strata ; —one is a subcutaneous fatty
two lay part ; and the other is a deeper membranous layer, which is
of limited extent, and is connected with the firm subjacent structures. Air blown beneath the fascia has been
seen to pass only to the scrotum ; and this direction is given
to it bythe connections of the deeper layer on the under surIts con- face. An examination of these connections shows this layer
with to have the following attachments : -On the outer side it is
around. fixed to the rami of the pubes and ischium, external to the
line of the crus penis and its muscle, extending as low as the
tuberosity of the ischium. Posteriorly the fascia dips down
to join the triangular ligament of the perinæum ; but in front
it is unattached, and is continued to the scrotum and the
Forms penis. Thus a pouch is formed over the anterior half of the
open in perinæal space by the marginal attachment of the superficial
fascia. From the under surface of the fascia a septum dips
divided downwards, and divides the subjacent space into two parts ;
septum. but anteriorly this partition is less perfect or disappears.
Course Should urine be effused beneath the membranous part of the
ed urine. fascia, the fluid will be directed forwards, through the
scrotum, to the penis and the front of the abdomen.
parts
a pouch,
front;
this
by a
of effus.
Dissec- Dissection. Cut through the superficial fascia on the right side tion of of the perinæum in the same manner as on the left side, and then
and ves- trace out the superficial vessels and nerves beneath it.
nerves
sels on right side.
Super- ficial vessels of pudic .
Onelong
slender artery is the superficial perinæal, which gives a transverse
branch near its commencement. Sometimes there are two long
superficial branches. There are two superficial perinæal nerves
with the artery, and the inferior pudendal is to be traced forwards
to the scrotum. Communications are to be found between these
anteriorly, and between one of the perinæal and the inferior hæmorrhoidal posteriorly ; and all are to be followed back to their origin.
ARTERIES. -The superficial arteries beneath the fascia
are branches of the pudic, viz. superficial and transverse
perinæal, and are, as before said, two or three in number.
-
SUPERFICIAL PERINEAL VESSELS AND NERVES. 401
ficial
al
scrotum ,
The superficial perineal branch is given off from the pudic in Superfront of the hæmorrhoidal. Perforating usually the base of the perinætriangular ligament, it turns forwards over or under the transverse
muscle, and beneath the superficial fascia, to the back of the scrotum, where it ends in flexuous branches for that part . As ends in
the vessel lies beneath the fascia, internal to the rami of the
ischium and pubes, it supplies offsets to the muscles beneath ; and supand in front it anastomoses with the external or superficial pudic muscles.
plies the
arteries. Sometimes there is a second superficial perinæal branch.
At the origin of the superficial perinæal, some other muscular Other
branches pass inwards to the front of the levator ani.
muscu- lar branch- The transverse artery of the perinæum arises at the same spot es.
as the preceding, or from it, and is directed transversely to the Transmiddle of the perineal space, where it is distributed to the integu- artery .
ments and the transverse muscles. It anastomoses with the one of
the opposite side.
verse
Branches of veins correspond to those of the artery, and open Veins
into the trunk of the pudic vein.
-
with the arteries.
neous
of scroNERVES. There are three long cutaneous nerves of the Cuta
scrotum : the inferior pudendal from the small sciatic, and nerves
two superficial perineal branches from the pudic nerve. tum .
The superficial perinæal nerves, two in number, are Two sunamed anterior and posterior from their relative position at peritheir origin. They arise from the lower division of the
pudic nerve.
perficial
næal.
rior a. The posterior branch appears in the front of the ischio- rectal Postefossa, and entering beneath the superficial fascia, is continued forwards with the artery of the same name to the back of the scro- crosses
tum. Whilst in the fossa the nerve gives inwards an offset to the fossa
integuments in front of the anus, which communicates with the scrotum ,
inferior hæmorrhoidal nerve.
over
to the
terior
anatomy as posteb. The anterior branch, appearing somewhat farther forward than and anthe other, passes either over or under the transverse muscle, and has same
accompanies the posterior branch to the scrotum. At its origin
muscular offsets are furnished to the levator ani muscle. Other
muscular branches arise from the pudic nerve at the same spot, but
these will be afterwards examined.
rior ;
joined The superficial perinæal branches communicate with one both are
another, and the posterior one is joined by the inferior and dispudendal nerve. At the scrotum they are distributed byto scro- D D
tributed
402 DISSECTION OF THE PERINEUM.
tum and long slender filaments, which reach as far as the under sur- penis. face of the penis. In the female these nerves supply the
labia pudendi.
Inferior pudendal nerve
The inferior pudendal nerve is a branch of the small sciatic ; it
pierces the fascia lata about one inch in front of the tuberosity of
the ischium, and coursing forwards along the inner part of the
thigh, enters beneath the superficial fascia of the perinæum.
Finally, it passes forwards with the superficial perinæal nerves, and
ends in ends in the outer part and front of the scrotum. A communication
and joins takes place between this nerve and the posterior superficial pericial pe- næal branch. In the female the inferior pudendal nerve is distributed to the labium.
scrotum ,
superfirinæal.
Other offsets of small sciatic.
Dissec- tion of some muscles ofthe urethra and penis.
Three muscles
triangu.
On the surface of the thigh some other filaments (internal
branches) of the small sciatic nerve may be observed.
Dissection. -Take away the superficial fascia from the anterior
half of the perinæal space, as well as the vessels and nerves that
have been examined. Then expose the muscles beneath by removing a thin aponeurotic layer from them. In cleaning the
muscle in the middle line (accelerator urinæ) , trace out especially
a posterior and an anterior fasciculus of fibres prolonged from it.
On the outer side of the space is the erector penis, and passing
horizontally between the other two is the transverse muscle. The
dissector should seek out, on the right side, the branches of nerves
to the muscles to the erector muscle there is a separate branch,
and beneath the transversalis is the offset that supplies the other
two muscles and the urethra.
MUSCLES.
- Superficial to the triangular ligament are
above three muscles of the anterior half of the perinæal space, viz.
lar liga- the erector penis, the accelerator urinæ, and the transversalis perinæi. Other muscles of the urethra are concealed by the triangular ligament.
ment.
Erector penis.
The ERECTOR PENIS is the most external of the three
muscles, and is narrower at each end than in the middle.
Origin. It covers the crus penis, and its fibres arise from the inner
surface of the tuberosity of the ischium behind the crus of
the penis, and from the ramus of the pubes on each side of
the crus. Superiorly the muscle ends in two slips, of which
the outer is the larger, that are inserted by aponeuroses,
one into the inner and the other into the outer aspect of the
penis. The muscle rests on the crus penis and the bone.
Inser- tion.
Covers crus penis .
MUSCLES OF THE PERINÆUM. 403
rator
at midtion by
parts.
The ACCELERATOR URINÆ muscle lies on the urethra along Accelethe middle line of the perinæum. The muscles of opposite urinæ.
sides join through the interposition of a median tendon.
Each muscle arises from the common tendon along the Origin
middle line, and from the central point of the perinæum. dle line .
From that origin the fibres are directed outwards, and give
rise to a thin muscle which is curved around the convexity
of the urethra, and has the following insertion : -The most Inserposterior fibres are lost on the anterior surface of the trian- three
gular ligament. The anterior fibres, which are the longest
and best marked, turn round the penis to be inserted on its
outer aspect anterior to the erector ; and, according to
Kobelt*, send a tendinous expansion over the dorsal vessels
of the penis. Whilst the middle or intervening fibres turn
round the urethra (between it and the body of the penis),
and join in a central tendon with the muscle of the opposite
side. The accelerator muscle covers the bulb and
urethra for two inches beyond the triangular ligament.
the muscle is cut through on the right side, and turned
the urethra, the insertion on the opposite aspect of that tube sling.
will be visible.
the Covers the ureIfthra, and
off rounds surit in a
versalis The TRANSVERSALIS PERINAI is a small thin muscle which Translies across the perinæum, opposite the base of the triangular perinæi.
ligament. Arising by a tendon from the inner aspect of Origin.
the ascending ramus of the ischium, the fibres run inwards,
and join in the central point of the perinæum with the Ends in
muscle of the opposite side, and with the sphincter ani and point of peri- the accelerator urinæ. Behind this muscle the superficial
fascia dips down to join the triangular ligament.
central
næum.
sory Sometimes there is a second small muscular slip anterior Accesto the transversalis (transversalis alter), which throws itself transinto the accelerator muscle.
versalis.
gular The three muscles now described enclose a triangular A trianspace, of which the accelerator urinæ forms the inner side, space
the erector penis the outer side, and the transversalis the
perinæi muscle the base. In the area of this interval is muscles
* Die Männlichen und Weiblichen Wollust-Organe, von G. L.
Kobelt, 1844.
between
three
de- scribed.
DD 2
404 DISSECTION OF THE PERINÆUM.
The knife enters this in litho- tomy.
Dissec- tion to see trian- gular liga- ment.
Trian- gular
ment of
the triangular ligament of the urethra, with the superficial
perinæal vessels and nerves. Into the posterior part of this
space the knife enters during the deeper incisions in the
operation of lithotomy ; and as the instrument is carried
backwards in the direction of the external incision, it will
cut the transverse muscle and artery, and possibly the superficial perinæal vessels and nerves.
Dissection of the triangular ligament. On the left side remove
completely the accelerator urinæ from the front of the ligament,
and the erector penis from the crus of the penis. The same proceeding may be followed on the right side, but the dissector should
observe, before cutting away the muscles, the branches of the
nerve to them. One nerve is also to be traced to the urethra.
Detach the crus penis from the bone on the left side, and, if necessary, on the right side also, and the triangular ligament will come
into view. Be careful not to cut the triangular ligament when
separating the crus penis from the bone, and not to injure the
terminal branches of the pudic artery, after it appears on the surface ofthe ligament near the pubes.
The triangular ligament of the urethra (perinæal aponeuliga- rosis) occupies the anterior part of the pubic arch, and supurethra, ports the urethral canal. The ligament is of a triangular form,
and and about one inch and a half in depth. On the sides it is form . fixed to the rami of the pubes and ischium beneath the crura
ments. penis. Above ( its apex) the ligament is prolonged on the
Extent
Attachsurface.
front of the symphysis pubis, where it joins the periosteum ;
and below or behind ( its base) it is connected in the middle
line with the central point of the perinæum, whilst the
lateral parts are sloped downwards from that spot towards
the bone. A thin fascia that covers the surface of the
levator ani muscle in the ischio- rectal fossa is connected to
Anterior the lower border. The anterior surface is in contact with
the muscles in the anterior half of the perineal space, and
the superficial fascia is united to this surface near the lower
border. Perforating the ligament about one inch below the
symphysis pubis is the canal of the urethra, but the margin
of the opening that gives passage to that tube is blended by
means of fibres with the tissue of the urethra. About half
an inch below the symphysis pubis is the aperture for the
Aper- tures in it for ure- thra,
DEEP MUSCLES OF THE URETHRA. 405
sal vein
and for
vessels
dorsal vein of the penis ; and external to this, near the for dorbone on each side, the terminal branches of the pudic of penis,
nerve and artery to the dorsum of the penis perforate the dorsal
ligament. The triangular ligament is composed chiefly of and
transverse fibres, but it is so thin as to allow the vessels and Consists
muscular fibres to be seen through it. Beneath the liga- of fibres
ment will be found the muscles of the membranous part of Parts bethe urethra, the artery of the bulb, and Cowper's glands.
nerves.
neath .
ferent
trianIn some anatomical works the triangular ligament of the urethra Difis said to consist of two layers (anterior and posterior) that enclose view of
the membranous part of the urethra with its muscular fibres. The gular structure, which has been described as the posterior layer, is part ligaof the fascia lining the interior of the pelvis, and is not perforated
by the canal of the urethra.
-
――
ment.
tion of
beneath
gular
ment. ?
Dissection. On the left side cut through with care the Dissecattachment of the triangular ligament to the bone, and raise muscles
and turn inwards the piece of membrane. By a little careful triandissection, and the removal of some veins, the following ligaparts will be exposed : Near the base of the ligament is a
narrow transverse muscle, which is directed to the bulb of
the urethra ; higher than this, and coming downwards to
the urethra from behind the ramus of the pubes, is the
fasciculus of fibres of the compressor urethræ muscle, which
surrounds the membranous part of the urethra. Beneath
the bone (rami of the ischium and pubes) are the pudic
artery and nerve, the former giving its branch to the bulb.
By passing deep enough, the dissector will be able to see
the layer of the pelvic fascia that separates these parts
from the cavity of the pelvis. Near the pubes is the subpubic ligament.
-
of ure- MUSCLES. The muscles connected with the membranous Muscles
part of the urethra are two in number : a deep transverse thra.
muscle, and a constrictor of the urethral passage.
trans- The DEEP TRANSVERSE muscle of the perinæum (elevator Deep
urethræ, Santorini) is a thin flat band, on a level with the verse.
base of the triangular ligament. It arises externally from Origin.
the ramus of the ischium, and occasionally from that of the
pubes, and is directed inwards between the tip of the bulb DD 3
406 DISSECTION OF THE PERINEUM.
nation .
and the membranous part of the urethra, to join (sometimes
Termi. by a tendon) the muscle of the opposite side, and to be attached by some fibres to the side of the bulb. This muscle
conceals Cowper's gland near the bulb, and is frequently
placed over the artery of the bulb.
Con- strictor of ure- thral
The CONSTRICTOR MUSCLE of the urethra (constrictor
isthmi urethralis) encloses the membranous part of that
passage tube from the bulb to the front of the prostate. It consists
hastwo of two parts, viz. of superficial transverse fibres, both above
and below the urethra, which are connected on each side to
the ramus of the os pubis, and of a deeper layer of circular
fibres.
parts.
Trans- verse part
arises from pubes,
a. The transverse part of the muscle arises by aponeurotic fibres
from the descending ramus of the pubes for the distance of half or
three quarters of an inch ; but this attachment is not evident except
the muscle is exposed from behind . From this origin the fibres
pass inwards, and separate near the urethra into two layers, which
are directed one over the other under that canal, and unite in the
middle line, sometimes by tendinous bands, with corresponding
middle parts of the muscle of the opposite side. Or the fibres may be
over and described as extending across the perinæum from one lateral at- under tachment to another, and enclosing the tube of the urethra in their
and ends in
line,
ure- thra.
part.
passage (Müller).
Circular b. The circular part surrounds the urethra between the bulb
and the prostate ; its fibres do not reach outwards to the bone, but
are blended with the transverse fibres of the other part of the
muscle.*
Cow- per's The glands of Cowper will be found by cutting through
glands. the transverse muscle : they are situate, one on each side,
Situa- tion close behind the bulb, and below the membranous part of
and size. the urethra. Each gland is about the size of a pea, and is
made up of many small lobules. Connected with each is a
Length minute duct, nearly an inch in length, which perforates
mina- obliquely the wall of the urethra (corpus spongiosum), and
and tertion of the duct.
* For farther information respecting this muscle, consult the Septemdecim Tabulæ of Santorini ; a Treatise of J. Müller, Ueber die
Organischen Nerven der erectilen Männlichen Geschlechts Organe, &c.;
a Paper by James Wilson in the first volume of the Med. Chirur. Transactions ; and the Work of Mr. Guthrie, On the Anatomy and Diseases
of the Neck of the Bladder and Urethra.
PUDIC VESSELS AND NERVE. 407
opens into the urethral canal about an inch in front of the
triangular ligament : the aperture of the duct in the ordinary condition of the parts does not admit a bristle. These
bodies are sometimes so small as to escape detection, and
they appear to decrease in size with advancing age.
tion of
dic vesnerve.
Dissection. -The student may complete the examination of the Dissecperinæum by tracing out the pudic vessels and nerve, and theirthe puremaining branches. From the point of division into two branches sels and
beneath the crus (dorsal branch of penis and branch of the corpus
cavernosum), the artery is to be followed backwards along the
outer wall of the right ischio- rectal fossa. The pudic nerve is exposed at the same time, but should any of the branches be cut
away, the corresponding ones may be sought on the opposite side.
artery
along
ischium
The pudic artery is a branch of the internal iliac, which, Pudic
after entering the perineal space through the small sacroischiatic notch, is distributed to the perinæum and the
genital organs. Entering the posterior part of the ischio- courses
rectal fossa, the artery extends forwards along the outer ramus of
wall in an aponeurotic canal, being attached to the fascia
covering the obturator muscle, and at the height of one inch
and a half above the tuberosity of the ischium. At the base
of the triangular ligament the vessel is near the margin of
the ramus of the pubes ; it then ascends along that bone and of
nearly to the subpubic ligament, where it perforates the
triangular ligament, and divides into the artery of the body, and ends
and that of the dorsum of the penis.
pubes,
on penis.
es not The branches of the vessel in the perinæal space are Branchnumerous. Some of them have been examined, viz. inferior yet seen
hæmorrhoidal, transverse perinæal, and superficial perinæal ;
the remaining are subjoined : -
are
bulb The artery ofthe bulb of the urethra is a branch of considerable artery of
size, and arises near the base of the triangular ligament. Passing beneath triangu- almost transversely inwards beneath the ligament, and about half lar liga.
an inch from the base, the artery reaches the bulb of the urethra,
and enters its spongy structure. Near the urethra it furnishes a
small branch to Cowper's gland.
ment.
tuation The distance of this branch from the base of the ligament de- Its sipends upon its origin ; for if the vessel arises farther back than varies.
usual, it may be altogether below the base of the ligament, but if DD 4
408 DISSECTION OF THE PERINÆUM.
portance
it arises more anteriorly than the base of the ligament, or from an
accessory pudic branch, its position will be higher than the level
The im- of the bulb. From the size of the vessel its place is important in
the operation of lithotomy. In the case first mentioned, it would
be liable to be cut across, whilst in the last it would be altogether
out ofthe way of the knife.
of this in litho- tomy.
Artery of body The artery ofthe cavernous structure of the penis (art. corporis
of penis . cavernosi) is one of the terminal branches of the pudic. At first
this small vessel lies between the crus penis and the ramus of the
pubes, but it soon enters the cavernous structure of the penis, and
ramifies in it.
penis.
Artery The dorsal artery of the penis runs upwards between the crus of dor- sum of penis and the bone, and reaches its destination by passing between
the layers of the suspensory ligament of the penis. Its distribution
with the accompanying nerve is noticed at page 419. It is much
smaller in the female than in the male.
Pudic vein.
Pudic nerve is
The pudic vein has the same connections, and the same branches
as the artery, with the exception that the dorsal vein of the penis
does not join it.
The pudic nerve is derived from the sacral plexus, and
with ar- distributes offsets corresponding to the branches of the pudic tery artery. The nerve enters the posterior part of the ischiolike it on
rectal fossa, and supplies there the inferior hæmorrhoidal
and ends (p. 398. ) and a large perineal branch. Much diminished
penis. in size, it continues with the artery without branching,
pierces the triangular ligament of the urethra, and is continued onward to the dorsum of the penis with the dorsal
branch of the pudic artery. Its termination is described
at page 419.
Peri- næal The perineal branch supplies the superficial perinæal nerves,
branch which have been already described (p. 401.) , and extends forwards
below the pudic artery, nearly to the base of the triangular ligaends in ment, where it ends in offsets to the muscles, as well as to the bulb
lowing ofthe urethra.
the folmuscusets.
Muscular branches.- One turns outwards to enter the under
lar off- surface of the erector penis ; others pass beneath the transversalis,
supplying it and the accelerator urinæ ; and one or two other
slender filaments pierce the triangular ligament, and supply the
muscles beneath it.
Nerve of the bulb.
The nerve ofthe bulb is a long slender branch that supplies, like
the artery, the spongy structure investing the canal of the urethra.
PARTS DIVIDED IN LITHOTOMY. 409
Some ofthe filaments of distribution run for some distance on the
surface before entering the corpus spongiosum urethræ.
-
Parts cut through cut in in the operation of lithotomy. — A Parts
review of the relative position of the parts in the perinæum litho
will bring to mind the structures that must be cut in reaching the bladder, and those that are to be avoided.
tomy.
in In cut- ting
the surthe
In making the external incisions the knife is entered
the middle line of the perinæum, one inch in front of the from
anus, and is drawn backwards on the left side to midway be- face to
tween the tuberosity of the ischium and the anus. It has staff,
been before said that the skin and superficial fascia, and the
inferior hæmorrhoidal vessels and nerves, lying across the
ischio-rectal fossa, would then be cut. In the subsequent
incisions to reach the staff, when the knife is introduced
into the anterior part of the wound, the transverse perinæal
muscle and artery, with the lower part of the triangular
ligament, and possibly the superficial perinæal vessels and
nerves, are divided. The membranous part of the urethra and in
and the muscular fibre about it are cut, when the knife is knife
placed within the groove of the staff. Lastly, as the knife staff into
is pushed along the staff into the bladder, it incises in its
progress the membranous part of the urethra, and part of
the substance of the prostate gland with the large veins
around it.
running
along
bladder.
Parts to be avoidrectum .
vessels,
The several parts to be avoided in the stages of the operation are the following : - In the first incisions in the ed are
ischio- rectal fossa, the rectum will be cut if the knife is
turned inwards across the intestine, instead of being kept
parallel with it, and if the gut is not kept out of the way
withthe fore-finger of the left hand. The pudic vessels on pudic
the outer wall of the ischio- rectal fossa may be wounded
near the anterior part of that hollow, where they approach the
margin of the ramus of the pubes ; but, posteriorly, they are
very securely lodged inside the projection of the tuberosity of
the ischium. Whilst making the deeper incisions to reach the
staff, the bulb and its artery lie immediately in front of the bulb
knife, and will be cut if the incisions are made too far for- artery,
ward ; but the vessel must necessarily be cut, when it arises
farther back than usual, and crosses the front of the ischioand its
410 DISSECTION OF THE PERINEUM.
tory duct.
ejacula rectal fossa in its course to the bulb of the urethra. In
dividing the prostate gland the edge of the knife is to be
turned outwards and downwards, in the direction of a line
from the urethra through its left lateral lobe, so as not to
Division injure the ejaculatory duct below. The whole of the prostate and its capsule are not to be cut through, otherwise the
urine may be effused beneath the peritoneum.
ofcap- sule of the pros- tate gland.
When the dissection of the perinæum is completed, the
flaps of skin are to be fastened together, after some preservative fluid has been used, and the limbs are to be put
down.
SECTION II.
PERINEUM OF THE FEMALE.
Peri- næum
male
In the female the perinæum differs from the same region in
of fe- the male more in the external form than the internal anahas spe- tomy ; but it has special parts distinguishing it, viz. the
aperture of the vagina surrounded by its sphincter, and the
aperture of the vulva with the labia.
cial parts.
Along middle,
tures of
vulva.
Parts
-
Surface marking. On the surface of the perinæal space
aper- in the middle line, there are two apertures, viz. those of
anus and the anus and vulva ; the former is situate rather farther
back than in the male, and the vulva is in the situation of
the scrotum of the other sex. Bounding the vulva are the
labia majora, one on each side. Within the vulva, at the
upper part, is the clitoris, with two small membranous folds,
labia minora, extending downwards from it. Below the
clitoris is the small aperture of the urethra ; and still lower
down is the vagina, whose aperture is sometimes partly
closed by a thin piece of membrane, the hymen.
within vulva.
Parts bound- ing space are same in both sexes.
Boundaries. - The boundaries of the perinæum are alike
in both sexes. But in the female the outlet of the pelvis ,
corresponding to the perinæum, is larger than in the male ; it
equals about four inches in the transverse direction, and its
width is nearlythe same as the antero-posterior measurement.
In this sex the perinæum is not so deep as in the male.
PERINEUM OF THE FEMALE. 411
first
rectal
Dissection. The steps of the dissection are much the same in Take
both sexes, and the same description will serve generally for the ischioperinæum ofthe male and female. Make, first, the dissection offossa.
the ischio-rectal fossa, and afterwards examine the muscles, vessels,
and nerves of the posterior half of the perineal space. (See description of the MALE PERINEUM, p. 395.)
examine
half of
Next raise the skin from the anterior half of the perinæal space, Then
as in the male, making the transverse incision in front at the ante- anterior
rior part of the vulva. Examine the attachments of the superficial perifascia, and trace the cutaneous vessels and nerves beneath it
(p. 399.).
næum.
cial Superficialfascia. The description of this structure in superfi
the male will serve for the anatomy of it in the female with fascia.
this modification ; that here it is less perfect and of less extent,
in consequence of the aperture of the vulva, and is continued
forwards through the labia majora to the inguinal region.
-
tion of the musDissection. Remove the labia and the superficial fascia, and Dissecfollow the sphincter vaginæ muscle around the opening of the
vagina. The two other muscles now exposed ( transversalis perinæi
and erector clitoridis) resemble those in the male.
cles.
ter The SPHINCTER VAGINÆ is an orbicular muscle around the Sphincorifice of the vagina. Posteriorly it is attached to the vagina.
central point of the perinæum, where it mixes with the Origin.
sphincter ani and transversalis muscles, and its fibres are
directed forwards, some on each side of the vagina, to be Inserinserted into the body of the clitoris.
tion.
clito- The ERECTOR CLITORIDIS resembles the erector of the Erector
penis in the male, though it is much smaller. The trans- ridis .
versalis is similar to the same muscle in the male. The one versalis.
description will suffice for these parts in both sexes (p. 402.).
Transpose tri- Dissection. -Detach the erector and crus clitoridis from the To exbone, and remove the outer fibres of the sphincter vaginæ to see angular
the triangular ligament of the urethra.
liga- ment.
lar liga- The triangular ligament transmits the urethra, but is not Trianguquite so strongly marked as in the male ; its extent is partly ment.
interrupted behind by the large aperture of the vagina
(p. 404. ).
-
muscles Dissection. Cut through the ligament in the same way as in To see
the male, and dissect out the deep transverse muscle with the ofurepudic vessels and nerve, and their branches. Afterwards follow
back the trunks of those vessels and of the pudic nerve.
thra.
412 DISSECTION OF THE PERINEUM.
Deep trans- verse muscle.
ConThe DEEP TRANSVERSE MUSCLE ( depressor urethræ, Santorini) has the same origin externally as in the male, and it
meets its fellow at the middle line. Santorini described the
muscle as passing over, instead of below the urethra ; hence
the name given to it by its discoverer.
The CONSTRICTOR MUSCLE of the urethra resembles that
urethræ strictor . of the male in its origin from the pubes, and its disposition
Pudic vessels.
Pudic nerve.
around the urethra.
The description of the pudic artery ( p. 407. ) will serve
for both sexes, except that the branch in the female, corresponding to the artery of the bulb, is furnished to the vagina.
The terminal branches are much smaller too in the female.
The pudic nerve has the same peculiarity as the artery
with respect to the branches to the vagina, and the smaller
size of the terminal part of the nerve on the clitoris .
413
CHAPTER VIII.
DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
SECTION I.
WALL OF THE ABDOMEN.
tions for THE dissector may here be reminded that he has to proceed Direcas far as the end of Section 3. before the body is turned for the disthe dissection of the back.
section.
of the Position. The body is sufficiently raised by the blocks Position
placed beneath the thorax and buttocks, as directed for the body.
dissection of the limbs ; but the dissector should see that the
chest is higher than the pelvis. After inflating the abdomen
by an aperture through the umbilicus, let the following markings on the surface be first attended to.
Surface-marking.
-
ances
front of
domen.
On its anterior aspect, the abdomen Appearis for the most part convex, especially in fat bodies, whilst on the
on the sides, between the ribs and pelvis, the surface is some- the abwhat depressed. Along the middle line is a slight groove,
corresponding to the linea alba, which presents about its
centre the excavation of the umbilicus. Inferiorly the
groove ceases a little above the pelvis, in the prominence of
the pubes ; and superiorly it subsides in a hollow (epigastric
fossa) below the ensiform cartilage. On each side of the
middle line is the projection of the rectus muscle, and this is
intersected in well- formed bodies by two or three transverse
depressions.
tions of Beneath the eminence of the pubes the student will be Projecable to recognise with his finger the symphysis pubis, and to pubes
trace outwards from it the crest of the os pubis which leads
to the spinous process. Ifthe finger is still carried outwards
to the crest of the innominate bone, it will detect the firm and Pou- part's li- band of Poupart's ligament, and sometimes a few inguinal gament.
414 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
minal rings.
Abdo- glands. Rather above and to the outside of the pubes, the
opening of the external abdominal ring may be felt, and the
prominence of the spermatic cord descending to the testicle
may be recognised. The position of the internal abdominal
ring is still to the outer side, or midway between the symphysis pubis and the crest of the innominate bone, and a little
above Poupart's ligament. Attached to the front of the
symphysis pubis in the male are the penis and the scrotum.
Raise
the
skin
Dissection. —The incisions requisite to raise the skin from the
sides and front of the belly are the following : one cut is to extend outwards over the side of the chest from the ensiform cartilage to about midway between the sternum and the spine ; a second incision is to be begun in the middle line midway between the
umbilicus and the pubes, and to be carried outwards to the crest
of the ilium, and along the crest till it ends opposite the first cut ;
lastly, the ends of the two incisions are to be connected along
the side of the chest and belly. Raise the piece of skin thus
marked out towards the middle line, and seek the undermentioned
cutaneous vessels and nerves in the fat. The lateral cutaneous
nerves, which are five or six in number, appear along the side
of the abdomen, in a line with the corresponding nerves of the
thorax ; they give offsets backwards, and are then directed forwards with small cutaneous arteries. The lower branch from the
last dorsal nerve crosses the crest of the ilium near its front ; and
still farther back on the crest is the cutaneous branch of the ilioand seek hypogastric nerve. Near the middle line the small anterior cutaneous nerves will be found ; these are uncertain in number and
size, and are directed outwards in the integuments.
cuta- neous nerves.
Take the skin Next throw downwards, on both sides, the piece of skin that
from the covers the lower part of the abdomen or the groin, by means of an groin.
incision along the middle line to the root of the penis, dissecting
the cutaneous vessels and nerves on the right side, and the superficial fascia on the left.
Seek vessels and nerves in right groin.
To make the necessary dissection on the right side, raise the
fascia that is superficial to the vessels, and throw it downwards to
the thigh in the same manner as the piece of skin ; the vessels now
exposed are the superficial pudic on the inside, the superficial epigastric in the centre, and there may be an offset of the superficial
circumflex iliac artery on the outside. Some inguinal glands are
seen along the line of the reflected fascia. Two cutaneous nerves
are to be sought ; one ( ilio- inguinal) comes out through the abdo-
SUPERFICIAL FASCIA OF THE GROIN. 415
minal ring, and descends to the thigh ; the other (ilio-hypogastric)
appears in the superficial fascia above, and rather outside the
abdominal ring.
superfascia into
in left
To show the existence of two layers of fascia, on the left side, Separate
one above and one beneath the vessels, raise a layer from the ficial
vessels by means of one transverse cut from the spine of the ilium
to the middle line, and not much above Poupart's ligament, and layers
another along the middle line to the pubes. The position of the groin.
subjacent vessels marks the depth of the layer ; and when these
are reached, raise and throw down towards the thigh a flap of the
fascia like the piece of skin. To define the thinner under-layer,
cut it across in the same manner as the other layer, and then detach it with the vessels on it from the tendon of the external
oblique muscle. This layer, like the preceding, is to be traced around the cord to the scrotum ; and as the student follows it
downwards, he will find it connected with Poupart's ligament,
and inseparably joined with the fascia lata close below that structure.
The superficial fascia over the greater part of the abdo- ficial Supermen is a single layer between the skin and the special fascia fascia
investing the muscles, but in the groin it is seen to be is didivided into a subcutaneous and a deep layer by the vessels into two layers.
and glands.
vided
cutalayer
fat,
a. The subcutaneous layer contains the fat, and therefore The subvaries in appearance and thickness in different bodies ; for neous
in a fat body it is divisible into several layers, whilst in a contains
thin one it is somewhat membranous near the thigh. This
layer is continuous with the superficial fascia of the thigh,
and with that of the rest of the abdomen ; and ifit is traced to
the limb, it is found to be separated from Poupart's ligament
by the superficial vessels and glands. Internally it is con- except
tinued to the penis and scrotum, where it loses its adipose penis
tissue ; and after investing the testicle, the layer is prolonged tum.
to the superficial fascia of the perinæum.
in the
and scrolaver is
memb. The deeper layer of the superficial fascia ( aponeurosis Deeper
of the fascia lata, Scarpa) is thinner and more membranous thin and
than the other, and is closely united to the tendon of the ex- branous ;
ternal oblique by fibrous bands, especially towards the linea
alba. Like the subcutaneous part of the fascia, this layer is
continued upwards on the abdomen, and inwards to the penis
416 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
ed to Pou- part's liga- ment,
and ends
lata.
characis join- and the scrotum ; but it extends only a very short distance
in the limb . As it passes over Poupart's ligament it is
closely joined to that structure by a thin membrane, and ends
a little below the ligament on the fascia lata across the front
on fascia of the thigh. The piece that is continued to the scrotum
around the cord becomes very thin and acquires special
Special characters ; and having passed through the scrotum it reaches
ters and the perinæum in union with the other layer, where it has
tion in attachments to the subjacent parts as before specified (p. 399.).
and peri- When urine escapes from the urethra, it is directed through
Attach- the scrotum, by reason of the attachments of the superficial
fascia, and then upwards along the cord to the abdomen.
From the disposition of the deep layer across the thigh, it is
evident that the fluid cannot pass down the limb, whilst its
progress over the front of the abdomen is uninterrupted.
disposiscrotum
næum.
ments deter- mine course of ef- fused urine.
In the female.
Cuta- neous nerves
rived
In the female the superficial fascia of the groin is separable into two layers, as in the male ; and the disposition of
each is nearly the same as in the other sex ; but the part
that in the one sex is continued to the scrotum, in the other
enters the labium in its course to the perinæum. In the
female the round ligament of the uterus is lost in the superficial fascia of the groin.
CUTANEOUS NERVES.
-
- The nerves in the superficial fascia
are chiefly derived from the trunks of the lower five or six
intercostal nerves ; -the branches along the side of the belly
are de- (lateral cutaneous) are offsets from those nerves, whilst the
branches along the front (anterior cutaneous) are the ter
sources. minal parts of the same trunks. Cutaneous offsets from two
branches of the lumbar plexus (ilio-hypogastric and ilioinguinal) are seen at the lower part of the abdomen.
from two
Lateral cutathe inThe lateral cutaneous nerves of the abdomen emerge in a line
neous of with the same set of nerves on the thorax, the lowest being the
most posterior. As soon as they appear on the surface they divide, with the exception of the last, into an anterior and a posterior branch.
tercos- tal ,
which divide into a. The posterior branch is of small size, and is directed backwards
rior and to the integuments over the latissimus dorsi muscle.
posteanterior branch.
b. The anterior branch runs forwards in the superficial fascia nearly
CUTANEOUS VESSELS AND NE1.VES. 417
to the edge of the rectus muscle, and supplies the integuments on the
side of the belly.
Last dorsal nerve. -The lateral cutaneous branch of this nerve Last dorsal is larger than the rest, and does not divide like the others. After nerve.
piercing the fibres of the external oblique muscle, the nerve is
directed over the crest of the ilium to the surface of the gluteal
region.
cutanerves
The anterior cutaneous nerves of the abdomen reach the surface Anterior
by piercing the sheath of the rectus. On the surface they turn neous outwards towards the lateral cutaneous nerves. The number and of interthe place of exit of these small nerves from the abdominal wall are
very uncertain.
costal .
pogastric The ilio-hypogastric nerve is distributed on the surface by two Ilio-hyparts one lies over the crest of the ilium (iliac branch) , the other of lumis on the lower part of the abdomen (hypogastric branch) .
bar plexus.
branch. a. The iliac branch crosses the crest of the innominate bone behind Iliac
the last dorsal nerve, and enters the integument of the gluteal region ;
its size and its position on the bone are dependant upon the bulk and
the situation of the branch of the dorsal nerve.
b. The hypogastric branch pierces the aponeurosis of the external Hypo- gastric oblique muscle above the external abdominal ring, and is distributed, branch .
as the name expresses, to the integument of the hypogastric region of
the abdomen.
The ilio -inguinal nerve becomes cutaneous through the external Ilio-in- guinal abdominal ring, and having perforated the deeper layer of super- nerve
ficial fascia, descends to the scrotum and the upper part of the of the
thigh.
CUTANEOUS VESSELS.
plexus.
from
sources.
Some cutaneous vessels are found Vessels
with both sets of nerves on the abdomen : with the lateral two
cutaneous nerves are branches from the intercostal arteries,
and with the anterior cutaneous are offsets from the internal
mammary and epigastric vessels. In the groin, where they
are dissected on the right side, are three small superficial
branches of the femoral artery, viz. pudic, epigastric, and
circumflex iliac.
lateral a. The lateral cutaneous arteries have the same anatomy as the Both
nerves they accompany. These small vessels are directed towards
the front of the abdomen on the surface of the external oblique
muscle, and end about the outer edge of the rectus muscle. The and ananterior cutaneous vessels are irregular in number and in position cutaEE
terior
neous.
418. DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
From femoral
these
like the nerves. After piercing the sheath of the rectus, they run
outwards with the nerves towards the other set of branches.
The superficial branches of the femoral artery turn upwards
artery from the thigh, between the layers of the superficial fascia, and
branch. ramify in the integuments of the genital organs, and lower part
of the abdomen. The greater part of these vessels appears in the
dissection of the thigh.
es :
Exter- nal pudic .
Super- ficial
The external pudic branch (superficial) crosses the spermatic cord, to
which it gives offsets, and ends in the integuments of the under part
of the penis.
The superficial epigastric branch ascends over Poupart's ligament
epigas- near the centre, and is distributed in the superficial fascia as high as
the umbilicus. Its size varies very much.
tric.
Circum- flex iliac.
Veins.
Inguinal glands.
The circumflex iliac branch usually lies below the level of the crest
of the ilium, and sends only a few offsets upwards to the abdomen.
Small veins accompany the arteries and join the internal saphenous vein in the thigh.
The glands ofthe groin are three or four in number, and
lie over the line of Poupart's ligament. They are placed between the two layers of the superficial fascia, and receive the
lymphatics from the abdomen, from the upper and outer part
of the thigh, and from the superficial parts of the genital
organs. Their efferent ducts pass downwards to the sathigh. phenous opening in the thigh to enter the abdomen.
Ducts enter
Dissec- tion of coverDissection. After the examination of the superficial fascia and
its vessels and nerves on the abdomen, the student may make the
ings of dissection of the cutaneous coverings of the penis and scrotum. penis.
Divide therefore the skin along the dorsum of the penis, and throw
it to each side, and then reflect the skin from the scrotum by
means of a vertical incision on the left side.
Super- ficial
penis
scrotum .
On the penis the superficial fascia becomes very thin and
fascia on membranous, and loses the fat that it possesses in most other
and in parts of the body. The fascia that is continued to the scrotum becomes also thin, and of a reddish colour ; and if it is
cut through the student will see that the prolongation sent
around the cord of one side does not communicate with the
prolongation of the other side, and that the septum scroti
is formed by the contact of the two pieces in the middle
line.
DORSAL VESSELS OF THE PENIS. 419
tion of
and
Dissection. Remove the cellular membrane from the root of Dissecthe penis and from the front of the symphysis pubis, to expose the vessels
suspensory ligament of the penis. Afterwards follow forwards the nerves.
dorsal arteries, nerves, and vein of the penis, by removing the
superficial fascia.
sory liofpenis
The suspensory ligament ofthe penis is a band of fibrous Suspentissue, of a triangular form, which is attached by its apex to gament
the front ofthe symphysis pubis near the lower part. Widen- Attaching as it descends, the ligament divides into two pieces, which ments.
are fixed to the upper surface of the body of the penis, and
are prolonged on it for some distance. In the interval be- Contween the layers are the dorsal vessels and nerves of the vessels
penis.
tains
and nerves.
penis,
of pudic.
The dorsal artery of the penis, one on each side, is the terminal Dorsal
part of the pudic artery. Appearing between the layers of the artery of
triangular ligament, the vessel extends forwards on the dorsum of a branch
the penis as far as the corona glandis, where it ends in many
branches which enter that structure. In this course the artery
supplies the integuments and the body of the penis. This artery Pecumay be a separate branch of the internal iliac, and arrive at its
destination by a course along the side of the prostate, and through
the triangular ligament of the urethra.
liarities.
vein The dorsal vein of the penis is a single trunk, and commences Dorsal
by numerous branches from the prepuce and glans penis. The ends in
course of the vein is backwards by the side of the artery, between prostatic plexus.
the layers of the suspensory ligament, and then through the triangular ligament of the urethra to join the prostatic plexus of veins.
In its extent along the penis this vein receives branches from the
corpus cavernosum.
pudic.
Eachdorsal nerve of the penis takes the same course as the artery Dorsal
to the glans penis, and ends like it in numerous branches to that nerve of
part. Moreover it furnishes a large branch to the corpus cavernosum penis, and other branches to the integuments of the dorsum,
the sides, and the prepuce of the penis.
In the female these vessels are much smaller than in the vessels
male, and they occupy the upper surface of the clitoris.
---
on cli- toris.
pose Dissection. The surface of the most external muscle of the To exabdominal wall is next to be freed from superficial fascia on both
sides of the body. Where the muscle is fleshy, viz. posteriorly,
the knife is to be directed along the fibres. In front of a line muscle..
exter- nal ob- lique
EE 2
420 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Three flat mus- cles in wall of abdo.
men
extended upwards from the anterior part of the crest of the ilium,
the muscle presents a wide thin aponeurosis, which the dissector
should not injure, especially at the upper part, where it is very
thin over the margin of the ribs. On the right side define the
margin of the external abdominal ring, to show the cord passing
through it ; and on the left side preserve a thin fascia (intercolumnar) , that is connected with the margin of that opening. Lastly,
the dissector should make evident the free margin of the external
oblique muscle between the last rib and the crest ofthe ilium.
Muscles ofthe abdominal wall. - In the wall of the abdomen are three large flat muscles, which are named from
their position to one another, and from the direction of their
fibres. The most superficial muscle is the external oblique,
the next one the internal oblique, and the last is the transand their versalis. Anteriorly they end in aponeuroses which are
roses in- partly conjoined to incase the rectus and pyramidalis musthree cles. Posteriorly the transverse muscle ends also in a second
aponeurosis (fascia lumborum), which encloses the quadratus
lumborum muscle.
aponeucase
vertical ones.
External oblique
first.
Origin from ribs.
The EXTERNAL OBLIQUE MUSCLE is fleshy on the side, and
muscle is aponeurotic on the fore part of the abdomen. It arises by
fleshy pointed digitations from the outer surface of the eight
lower ribs, the five highest pieces alternating with similar
parts of the serratus magnus, and the three lowest with the
processes of origin of the latissimus dorsi muscle. From the
attachment to the ribs, the fibres are directed over the side
of the abdomen in the following manner : the lower fibres
descend almost vertically to be inserted into the anterior half
pelvis of the crest of the ilium at its outer margin ; whilst the
alba. upper and middle fibres are continued forwards, the one set
Inser- tion into
and linea
tions.
-
horizontally, the other obliquely, to the aponeurosis on the
Connec- front of the belly. The muscle is subcutaneous, and at its
attachment to the ribs, the fibres are continuous with the external intercostal muscle. The posterior border is usually
free between the last rib and the crest of the ilium, and is
contiguous to the edge of the latissimus dorsi, so that a part
of the internal oblique may be seen between them ; but this
border may be concealed by the latissimus dorsi muscle.
Aponeu- The aponeurosis of the muscle occupies the anterior part
EXTERNAL OBLIQUE MUSCLE.
421
the muscovers
the
ed by
alba,
naris,
transof the abdomen, in front of a line from the eighth rib to rosis of
the crest of the ilium, and is rather narrower about the centre cle
of the abdomen than either above or below. Along the front of
middle line of the body this tendinous expansion ends in the belly.
linea alba,-the common point of union of the aponeuroses of
opposite sides. Appearing through the aponeurosis, external Is markto the linea alba, is a white line ( linea semilunaris) , corre- linea
sponding to the outer edge of the rectus muscle ; and cross- semiluing between those two lines are three or four whitish marks and
(lineæ transversa). Numerous small apertures in the tendon verse ;
give exit to cutaneous vessels and nerves. On the lower perfo
part ofthe abdomen the fibres of the aponeurosis are stronger aperand more separate than in the other parts, and are directed
downwards and inwards to be fixed to the pubes, or collected ends
in the firm band of Poupart's ligament, between the pubes Pouand the crest of the ilium. Near the pubes is the aperture gament ;
(external abdominal ring) which gives passage to the cord in gives
the male, or the round ligament in the female.
The following parts in connection with the aponeurosis of
the external oblique muscle, are to be described with more
detail.
rated by
tures ;
below in
part's lipassage to cord.
linea
aponeuLinea alba.-This is the central white line of the front of the In the
abdomen, in which the aponeuroses of the muscles of opposite sides alba the
are united. It extends from the xiphoid cartilage to the pubes, roses are
and serves as a ligament between the thorax and pelvis. Its united .
breadth is wider above than below, and it is perforated here and
there by small apertures that allow masses of fat to protrude in some
bodies. A little below the centre is the umbilicus, which projects In its
now beyond the surface, though before the skin was removed there umbiliwas a hollow corresponding to it. Through the umbilicus a piece
of intestine may protrude from the abdomen, and give rise to um- bilical hernia.
—
middle is
cus.
nal abring.
External abdominal ring. Towards the crest of the os Exterpubis the fibres of the aponeurosis diverge to their attach- dominal
ment to separate points of that bone, and leave thereby the
angular space of the external abdominal ring. This interval Form
is somewhat triangular in form, with the base at the crest of tuation.
the os pubis, and the apex pointing upwards and outwards.
The long measurement of the aperture is about an inch, and Size.
and siEE 3
422 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Inner side or
Outer margin.
the transverse about half an inch. The inner margin ( inner
pillar. pillar) is thin and continuous with the rest of the aponeurosis ; it is prolonged to the front of the symphysis pubis
into which it is inserted, and on which it crosses over the
corresponding piece of the aponeurosis of the opposite side.
The outer or lower margin (outer pillar ) is formed by the
part of the aponeurosis named Poupart's ligament, and is
attached to the spine or tuberosity of the os pubis : this margin is not straight like the inner, but is bent backwards so as
Aprolong- fascia to present a kind of groove for the spermatic cord. Athin
ed from membrane (intercolumnar or spermatic fascia) obscures the
opening. sides of the opening, and is derived from some fibres ( interthe
The cord in male,
columnar ) on the surface of the aponeurosis. The ring gives
passage in the male to the spermatic cord, and in the female
to the round ligament ; and each lies on the outer or lower
pillar as it passes through, and obtains a covering from the
and her- intercolumnar fibres. Through the same aperture the in- nial pro- trusion guinal hernia protrudes from the wall ofthe abdomen, receivthrough. ing at the same time a covering from the intercolumnar
fascia.
pass
Inter- colum- nar fibres.
ment inThey
The intercolumnar fibres form a layer over the aponeurosis of
the external oblique at the lower part of the abdomen, and bind
together the parallel fibres of that aponeurosis, so as to form a
Attach- resisting membrane. Here some of the fibres are connected by
feriorly. a pointed process with the outer third of Poupart's ligament,
and extend back to the crest of the ilium. From this point the
fibres diverge, and at the external abdominal ring they stretch from
side to side (hence the origin of their name), and becoming
stronger and aggregated together, close the upper part of that
and pro- opening. Moreover they give rise to the membrane, intercolumnar
thin in- fascia, which is prolonged from the margin of the abdominal ring.
On the left side, where the fascia is entire, this thin covering will fascia. be manifest on the surface of the cord, or on the round ligament.
To see the attachments and connections of Poucross upper part of ring,
duce the
terco- lumnar
To see
of Pougament.
Dissection.
insertion part's ligament, it will be necessary to reflect the lower part of the
part's li- aponeurosis of the external oblique muscle towards the thigh on
both sides. For this purpose make one incision through the
aponeurosis from the crest of the ilium nearly to the middle line.
Throw Detach the aponeurosis with the handle of the scalpel from the
piece of subjacent parts, and cut it vertically in the direction of a line to the
oblique. symphysis pubis, when, it cannot be separated farther from the
down
external
POUPART'S LIGAMENT. 423
tendons beneath. After the triangular piece of the aponeurosis
has been thrown to the thigh, dislodge the cord from the surface
of Poupart's ligament to see the insertion of that band into the os
pubis, and the fibres that ascend therefrom to the linea alba, and
form the triangular ligament.
part's lition .
and
attachPoupart's ligament is the lower border of the aponeurosis Pouof the external oblique muscle, which intervenes between the gament.
crest ofthe ilium and the pubes, and arches over the vessels and Situamuscles that pass from the abdomen at this spot. Its external Outer
half is round and cord-like, and is attached to the anterior
superior spine of the ilium ; but the internal half widens as inner
it approaches the pubes, and is inserted into the spine of the ments :
os pubis as well as into the pectineal line, external to that
point of bone, for three quarters of an inch. When the
ligament is in its natural position, the fibres that are connected with the pectineal line give rise to a triangular looking piece, with its base directed outwards, which is named
Gimbernat's ligament. (See the Dissection of the THIGH. ) last
The line of Poupart's ligament is not straight between its Gimberouter and inner attachments, but is curved downwards to the gament.
thigh, and retains this position as long as the fascia lata re- tion,
mains uncut. To the posterior surface, along the outer half, and
are united the internal oblique, cremaster, and transversalis contact
muscles of the abdomen ; and passing over the upper surface
of the ligament at its inner end is the spermatic cord.
-
forms
nat's liIts direcparts in
with it.
tion to
internal
Triangular ligament. -From the insertion of Gimbernat's liga- Trian- gular li- ment into the pectineal line, some fibres are directed upwards and gament.
inwards to the linea alba, where they become blended with the other tendons. As the fibres ascend, they diverge and form a
thin band, to which the term triangular ligament has been applied.
Dissection. - On both sides of the body remove the remaining Dissecportion of the external oblique, to see the parts covered by it. Carry expose
the scalpel through the digitations on the ribs back to the free oblique.
border of the muscle, and then cut through the attachment to the
crista ilii. Throw forwards the muscle as far as it is practicable, after
the nerves that cross the crest of the ilium are dissected out ; and
take care neither to detach the rectus muscle from the ribs,
nor to cut through the tendon of the internal oblique near the
same part. By the removal of cellular membrane the following muscle and the nerves on its surface will be cleaned . At the
EE 4
424 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Parts co- vered by
lower border of the internal oblique is the cremaster muscle, which
should be defined,
Beneath the external oblique is the internal oblique
external muscle, with the ribs and the intercostal muscles. At the oblique. lower part of the abdomen, this muscle conceals the cord and
the branches of nerves from the lumbar plexus that are in
the abdominal wall. The aponeurosis of the external oblique
assists to form the sheath of the rectus.
oblique
InserInternal The INTERNAL OBLIQUE MUSCLE is fleshy below and apomuscle. neurotic above, just the reverse of the preceding muscle ;
and its fibres (except the lowest) in ascending cross the
Origin direction of those of the external oblique. The muscle arises from pelvis. from the outer half of Poupart's ligament, from the anterior
two thirds of the crest of the ilium, and from the fascia lumborum in the interval between the crest of that bone and the
last rib. The fibres diverge on the abdomen to their destination. The most posterior fibres ascend to be inserted into
the ribs the lower border of the cartilages of the four lower ribs,
alba, where they join the internal intercostal muscle of the two
The most anterior fibres (from Poupart's
except ligament) arch downwards and inwards over the spermatic
fibres. cord, and are inserted into the crista of the os pubis, and into
the pectineal line by a tendon (part of the aponeurosis), which
is blended with a similar part of the transversalis muscle.
The intervening fibres are continued into the aponeurosis on
the front of the abdomen.
tion into
and linea
lowest
Aponeu- rosis of
lowest spaces.
The aponeurosis of the muscle covers the anterior part of
the mus- the abdomen from the pelvis to the chest, and is blended with cle. the other aponeuroses in the linea alba. It is widest at the
Attachchest ments to thorax, and is connected beneath the rectus muscle with the
and pel- ensiform cartilage, and with the last true and the first false vis. rib. Inferiorly it is fixed to the crest and the pectineal line of
the os pubis, behind the insertion of Poupart's ligament into
Divides that bone. At the margin of the rectus the aponeurosis is
rectus. divided into two pieces, which incase that muscle, and unite
at its inner margin ; but midway between the umbilicus and
the pubes the aponeurosis is undivided, and lies in front ofthe
to incase
rectus.
INTERNAL OBLIQUE MUSCLE. 425
covering
oblique.
The internal oblique is covered by the external oblique Parts
muscle. It is attached on all sides, except between Poupart's internal
ligament and the os pubis, where it arches over the cord, and
has the cremaster muscle contiguous to it. The parts covered
by the internal oblique cannot be seen till the muscle is
reflected.
ter musments :
The CREMASTER MUSCLE, so named from suspending the Cremas.
testicle, is a fasciculus of fibres that lies along the lower cle.
border of the internal oblique muscle, but is separated from
it by a cellular interval. Superiorly the muscle has attachments (internal and external) similar to those of the internal oblique. Its external fleshy part is attached to Pou- Attachpart's ligament below the internal oblique, with which some external fleshy,
of the fibres are connected, and it may also join the transversalis ; but the inner part is small and pointed, and is fixed, internal
chiefly by tendon, to the front of the os pubis and sheath of nous ;
the rectus. Between those two fixed points the fibres de- forms loops
scend on the front and sides of the cord, forming loops with over the
the convexity downwards ; and the lowest loops are connected with the tunica vaginalis testis, on its outer aspect.
The muscular fibres are united by cellular membrane so as giving
to give rise to a covering for the front of the cord, fascia cremascremasterica. Occasionally the fibres may be behind as well fascia.
as on the sides and front of the cord.
tendicord ,
rise to
teric
parts.
Dissection. On the left side of the body the student should not In left groin make any further dissection of the abdominal wall ; but the parts replace
that have been reflected in the groin should be carefully replaced,
until he returns to the examination of those parts in connection
with hernia.
side of abdomen reflect cremasinternal
On the right side divide the cremaster muscle longitudinally, On right
and reflect it from the cord. Afterwards cut through the internal
oblique near the ribs, and near the crest of the ilium, and connect
those incisions behind : the depth of the muscle will be indicated ter and
by a cellular layer between it and the transversalis. Throw the oblique.
muscle forwards to the edge of the rectus, cutting at the same
time the fibres that arise from Poupart's ligament, and separating
them with great care from those of the transversalis, with which
they are often conjoined. In raising the muscle the branches of
the intercostal nerves and arteries will be exposed, and many
branches that enter it must be cut ; but the student should dissect
426 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Parts covered
out of it the last dorsal nerve, and the two branches of the lumbar
plexus (ilio -hypogastric and ilio- inguinal) , near the front of the
crest ofthe ilium .
The internal oblique conceals the transversalis muscle, and
by inter- the vessels and nerves between the two. Near Poupart's nal ob- lique.
Trans- versalis
from
loins,
ligament it lies on the spermatic cord and the fascia transversalis the rectus muscle is partly concealed by its aponeurosis.
The TRANSVERSALIS MUSCLE forms the third stratum in the
muscle. wall of the abdomen ; it is attached on all sides except where
the spermatic cord lies, and it has both an anterior and a posOrigin terior aponeurosis. It arises at the pelvis from the outer chest, third of Poupart's ligament, and from the two anterior thirds
of the crest of the ilium. At the chest it takes origin by
fleshy processes from the under surface of the cartilages of
the six lower ribs. And between the chest and pelvis it is
connected with the posterior aponeurosis, or the fascia lumFibres borum. Most of the fibres are directed transversely to the
But the lower fibres arch downwards
and pelvis.
end in aponeu- aponeurosis in front.
arch
rosis. above the spot at which the cord leaves the abdomen, and
Lowest are inserted ( by tendon) with the lower fibres of the internal
down to oblique into the crest of the pubes and into the pectineal line
for about one inch, the two forming the structure called the
conjoined tendon.
pubes.
The aponeu- rosis
passes
rectus to linea
cept invis joins
Its aponeurosis is widest inferiorly, as in the most external muscle. It is continued to the linea alba beneath the
beneath rectus, except midway between the umbilicus and pubes,
where it passes in front of that muscle to reach the middle alba, ex- line. Its attachment to the os pubis is nearly the same as
feriorly. that of the aponeurosis of the internal oblique, for it is
At pel fixed to the crest of the pubes and to the pectineal line, but
that of beneath the insertion of the oblique muscle. The tendons
oblique or aponeuroses of these two muscles are united near their
joined attachment to the bone, and give origin to the conjoined
tendon ; but whilst that of the oblique extends beyond the
crest of the bone only a short way, the aponeurosis of the
transversalis reaches an inch along the ilio- pectineal line.
At its insertion into the pubes, some of the fibres are geneinternal
in contendon.
TRANSVERSALIS AND RECTUS MUSCLES. 427
rally spent on the transversalis fascia, and are connected Fibres
with the deep arch.
to trans- versalis fascia.
Superficial to the transversalis are the two muscles before Connectransmuscle.
examined, and beneath it is the thin fascia transversalis, tions of
which separates it from the peritoneum. The attachments versalis
to the ribs digitate with like processes of the diaphragm ;
and the lower border is fleshy in the outer half, but tendinous in the inner half, and is arched over the internal abdominal ring. Occasionally the muscle arises from Poupart's
ligament as low down as the internal oblique, with which it
is then inseparably united.
rior apo- neurosis.
pose recThe posterior aponeurosis of the transversalis, or the fascia Postelumborum, is described in the dissection of the back (p.363. ).
Dissection. To bring into view the rectus muscle, make a Toex.
longitudinal incision through the aponeurosis covering it,
turn to each side its tendinous sheath. A small muscle,
pyramidalis, will be exposed at the same time near the pubes. The
dissector should take care of the nerves entering the outer border ofthe rectus.
and tus and
the Pyrami dalis.
muscle.
pubes
The RECTUS MUSCLE extends along the front of the abdo- Rectus
men from the pelvis to the chest. The muscle is narrowest Attachinferiorly, and is attached by two tendinous processes, one to ments to
the front and the other to the crest of the pubes ; and becom- and ribs .
ing wider towards the thorax, it is inserted into the cartilages
ofthe last three true ribs. The fibres of the rectus are in- Has cross
terrupted at intervals by irregular tendinous lines (lineæ
transversæ), and the muscle is contained in an aponeurotic
sheath.
tendons.
sheath,
formed.
Sheath ofthe rectus. -At the outer border of the upper Its
part of the rectus muscle, the aponeurosis of the internal
oblique divides into two pieces, which pass, one before, the how
other under that muscle, and unite at its inner border, thus
forming a sheath for it. Inseparably united with the front
of the sheath is the aponeurosis of the external oblique ; and
joined in a similar manner with its posterior part is the
aponeurosis of the transversalis. At the lower part of the Its exmuscle, however, or midway between the umbilicus and the
pubes, the sheath suddenly ceases posteriorly, in consequence of the aponeuroses of all the lateral muscles being
tent.
428 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
cient in- Defi- placed in front of the rectus. The spot where the sheath
feriorly. disappears will be seen to be marked by a white well-defined
margin, when the outer edge of the muscle is raised. Where
the sheath is deficient, the rectus is in contact with the fascia
transversalis.
Lineæ trans- versæ
are
more.
The Linea transversæ are the tendinous bands that cross
the surface of the rectus. There are usually three of these
three or intersections at the following spots : one is opposite the
umbilicus, another at the ensiform cartilage, and the other
midway between those two. If there is a greater number,
the additional ones will be below the umbilicus. These
bands seldom extend the whole breadth or depth of the
muscular fibres.
Situa- tion .
Linea semi- Linea semilunaris. This line has been already seen,
lunaris through the aponeurosis of the external oblique muscle, to
reach from the eighth rib to the outer part of the crest of
is at edge the pubes. It marks the outer edge of the rectus muscle,
and, consequently, the line of the division of the aponeurosis
of the internal oblique muscle.
of rec- tus.
Pyrami- dalis
ment to
The PYRAMIDALIS MUSCLE is triangular in form, and is
muscle. placed in front of the rectus near the pelvis. The muscle
Attach- arises by its base from the front of the os pubis, and is
inserted by its apex into the linea alba, about midway between the umbilicus and the pubes. This small muscle is
often absent. It is contained in an aponeurotic sheath like
the rectus.
pubes and linea alba.
Nerves in wall of ab- domen.
Inter- costal nerves
NERVES. - In the wall of the abdomen, between the internal oblique and transversalis muscles, are the intercostal nerves, and near the pelvis are the two branches of
the lumbar plexus. Some arteries accompany the intercostal nerves, but they will be again referred to with the
vessels of the abdominal wall.
a. The intercostal nerves ( six lower) enter the wall of
the abdomen at the anterior part of the intercostal spaces.
are be- Placed between the internal oblique and transversalis
oblique muscles, the nerves are directed forwards to the edge of the
rectus, which they pierce in their course to become cutaneous along the front of the abdomen. About midway between
and trans- versalis.
NERVES OF THE ABDOMINAL WALL. 429
tween the spine and the linea alba, the nerves furnish
cutaneous branches to the side of the abdomen (lateral cuta- Offsets.
neous) ; and whilst between the abdominal muscles they
supply muscular branches, as well as offsets of communication one with another. Agreater part of the lower than
of the upper nerves is visible, because of the diminished
length of the intercostal spaces.
dorsal nerve.
The last dorsal nerve is placed below the last rib, but otherwise Last
it has the same connections and distribution as the preceding. As
it extends forwards to the rectus it sometimes communicates with
the ilio-hypogastric nerve. Its lateral cutaneous branch perforates
the two oblique muscles.
b es of . The two branches of the lumbar plexus are seen in a Branchpart of their course, viz. between the muscles of the wall of lumbar
the abdomen.
plexus.
pogasnear
ilium.
The ilio-hypogastric nerve perforates the posterior part of the Ilio-hytransversalis muscle, near the crest of the ilium, and gives off the tric lies
iliac or lateral cutaneous branch. The continuation of the nerve crest of
then turns forward near the crest of the ilium, and is connected the
with the following nerve (ilio -inguinal) , near the front of that bone.
Perforating now the fleshy part of the internal oblique, and the
aponeurosis of the external oblique near the linea alba, the nerve
becomes cutaneous as before seen (p. 417.) . The iliac branch Fur
pierces both oblique muscles, near the crest of the ilium, to reach cutathe gluteal region.
nishes
neous branch.
The ilio-inguinal nerve appears on the surface of the transver- Ilio-in- guinal salis, near the front of the crest of the ilium, where it is connected issues through with the preceding. The nerve afterwards pierces the internal ob- ring .
lique, to which it supplies branches, and coursing over that muscle,
reaches the surface of the thigh through the external abdominal
ring (p. 417.).
very This nerve may be so small as to end by joining the ilio-hypogastric May be
branch. In such case the ilio-hypogastric furnishes an offset that small.
takes the usual place and distribution of the ilio-inguinal nerve.
tion of
versalis
Dissection. For the purpose of seeing the transversalis fascia it Dissecwill be necessary to raise the lower part of the muscle of the same transname on the right side by two incisions ; -one through the fibres fascia .
that are attached to Poupart's ligament ; the other across the
muscle from the crest of the ilium to the margin of the rectus.
With a little care the muscle will be separated from the thin
fascia beneath.
430 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Fascia transis best marked in the groin.
Near Pou- part's ligament
ternal
nal ring.
The fascia transversalis, which has been so named by
versalis Sir A. Cooper, is a thin fibrous layer between the transversalis muscle and the peritoneum. In the groin or inguinal region, where it is unsupported by muscles, the
fascia is stronger than in any other part of the wall
of the abdomen, and is joined by fibres of the aponeurosis of the transversalis muscle. In the part of the fascia
now exposed is the opening of the internal abdominal ring,
is the in- which gives passage to the spermatic cord, or the round
abdomi- ligament. It is situate midway between the symphysis
pubis and the anterior superior spine of the ilium, and half
an inch above Poupart's ligament. From the margin of the
opening a thin tubular prolongation is continued around
Is fixed the cord. The fascia on the inner side of the opening is
thinner than on the outer side, and is fixed internally into
the os pubis and the pectineal line of that bone, behind the
Is partly conjoined tendon with which it is united. When traced Pou- down to Poupart's ligament, the fascia is found to be congament, nected to the posterior margin of that band along its outer
and part- half ; but along the inner half of the ligament the fascia ly not.
passes downwards to the thigh, being but slightly connected
with that structure, and forms the anterior part of the
Supe- femoral sheath.. Above the inguinal region the membrane riorly it decreas- gradually decreases in strength as it ascends beneath the
strength. transversalis muscle, until at the thorax it becomes an
into the pelvis.
joined to
part's lies in
tion.
unimportant cellular structure.
Dissec- Dissection. Divide the transversalis fascia by a longitudinal
incision begun a little above the abdominal ring, and continued
downwards through that spot, so as to trace a prolongation ofthe
fascia on the cord. With the handle of the scalpel the fascia may
be easily reflected to each side from the subperitoneal fat. After the
subperitoneal fat has been seen, let it be removed to trace the
remains of the tube of peritoneum along the cord.
Subperi- toneal
groin.
The subperitoneal fat is placed between the fascia transfat in the Versalis and the peritoneum. The depth of this layer varies
much in different bodies, but the stratum is thicker at the
lower part of the abdomen than elsewhere. A prolongation
is sent from it along the cord. This structure will be more
SPERMATIC CORD. 431
specially examined in the dissection of the wall of the abdomen from the inside.
neum of
is proon the
may be
vious,
or saccuThe peritoneum is seen to project slightly forwards oppo- Peritosite the cord, on the removal of the subperitoneal fat, and tothegroin
be joined by a fibrous process, the remains of the prolongation longed
to the testis. There is great variety in the condition of this cord ;
part. Thus in one case it can be followed only a very short piece
distance, whilst in another it may be traced as a fine band imperto the tunica vaginalis of the testis. In other instances the
tube of the peritoneum has been imperfectly obliterated,
and one large pouch or sac is left in front of the cord in the
inguinal canal ; or the tube has been obliterated only here
and there, forming a sacculated piece. Lastly, in some rare or open.
cases, the process of peritoneum remains unobliterated, so
that a coil of intestine can descend along it from the
abdomen. In the female the tube sometimes remains per- In fevious for a short distance ( canal of Nuck) in front of the partly
round ligament.
lated,
male,
open.
tic cord
lique in
domen
tical
tions
parts
The SPERMATIC CORD extends from the internal abdominal Sperma.
ring to the testis, and consists ofthe vessels and the efferent
duct of that gland united together by coverings from the
structures by or through which they pass. In the wall of the is obabdomen the cord lies obliquely, because its aperture of en- the abtrance therein, or the internal abdominal ring, is not opposite
its aperture of exit from the muscles, or the external ring ; and verbut escaped from the abdomen, it descends almost vertically beyond.
to its destination. Being placed obliquely between the Connecmuscles, the cord lies at first beneath the internal oblique, with
and rests against the fascia transversalis ; but beyond the around.
lower border of the oblique muscle it rests on the upper
surface of Poupart's ligament, having the aponeurosis of
the external oblique between it and the surface of the body,
and the conjoined tendon between it and the abdomen. Its Coverdifferent coverings have been seen in the examination of the
parts from which they are derived, there being a prolongation from each structure in the wall of the abdomen, except
from the transversalis muscle. Thus, proceeding from
within outwards, the student will find the following layers
surrounding the constituents of the cord : first, the subings.
432 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
In fe- male,
gament
peritoneal fat, then the tube of the fascia transversalis, next
the cremaster muscle from the internal oblique, afterwards
the intercolumnar fascia from the external oblique muscle,
and lastly the superficial fascia and the skin.
The round ligament, or the suspensory cord of the uterus,
round li- occupies the inguinal canal in the female. Its coverings are
is in the same as those of the spermatic cord, except it wants,
cord. usually, the cremaster. It ends in the integuments of the
groin.
place of
Dissec- tion .
Consti- tuents of
Dissection. --The constituents of the cord will be exposed by
turning aside the different surrounding layers and removing the
cellular membrane. The dissector should trace branches of the
genito-crural nerve and epigastric artery into the cremasteric
covering.
Vessels and nerves of the cord. - In the cord are colthe cord. lected together the spermatic artery and veins that convey
the blood to and take it away from the testis, nerves and
lymphatics of the testicle, and the vas deferens or the
efferent duct.
Sperma- tic ar- tery,
The spermatic artery is a branch of the aorta, which
enters the cord through the internal abdominal ring, and
descends to the testis, in which it ends. It distributes
branches to the vas deferens and the epididymis. In the
female, a branch from the ovarian artery ( spermatic) enters
the round ligament. The spermatic veins leave the posterior
part of the testicle, and receive branches from the epididymis : ascending in the cord, in front of the vas deferens,
they divide and anastomose, forming the spermatic plexus.
nerves. The nerves are derived from the spermatic plexus of the
veins,
sympathetic in the abdomen ; they accompany the artery to
Lymph- the testicle. The lymphatics begin in the testis, and ascend atics. along the cord through the internal abdominal ring to join
Vasdefe- the lumbar glands. The vas deferens is placed behind the rens.
Situa- tion
and course.
other constituents of the cord, and will be easily recognised
by its resemblance to a piece of whipcord when it is taken
between the finger and the thumb. As it enters the abdomen through the opening in the fascia transversalis (internal
ring), it lies on the inner side of the vessels of the cord, and
VESSELS OF THE ABDOMINAL WALL. 433
it winds behind the epigastric artery in its descent to the
urethra in the pelvis.
and
the coThe cremasteric covering of the cord has a separate artery and Artery
nerve. The artery is derived from the epigastric (its cremasteric nerve of
branch), and is distributed to the coverings of the cord . The verings
genital branch of the genito- crural nerve enters the cord by the of the
internal abdominal ring, and ends in the cremaster muscle. Other
filaments to the cord come from the ilio -inguinal nerve.
cord .
tion of
arch
the
Dissection.-Cut across the cord near the abdominal ring, and Dissecturn it upwards on the abdomen. Below Poupart's ligament will deep
be sometimes seen a thin band (deep crural arch) passing inwards
to the os pubis. The dissector should define this band with care.
Afterwards the remaining vessels of the abdominal wall should be and of
exposed, viz. the epigastric and circumflex iliac, and the ending of vessels .
the internal mammary artery. On turning up the outer edge of
the rectus, the epigastric and mammary arteries will be seen, one
above and the other below ; and the epigastric with its branches may
be further traced by removing the fascia transversalis that covers
it near Poupart's ligament. The circumflex iliac artery may be
observed behind Poupart's ligament (the outer half) , and should
be pursued along the crest of the ilium.
Deep crural arch crural . Below the level of Poupart's liga- Deep
ment is the thin band of fibres which lies over the femoral arch.
vessels, and has received the name of deep arch. * This
fasciculus of fibres begins externally about the centre of
Poupart's ligament, and is prolonged inwards to the pubes,
where it becomes wider, after the fashion of Poupart's ligament, and is inserted into the pectineal line on the abdominal
aspect of Gimbernat's ligament. This structure is closely
connected with the front of the femoral sheath, and is arched
down on the inner side to be fixed to the bone.
---- in abdowall.
VESSELS IN THE WALL OF THE ABDOMEN. With the Vessels
intercostal nerves on the side of the abdomen are the inter- minal
costal and lumbar arteries ; and in the sheath of the rectus,
the epigastric and internal mammary vessels.
crest of the ilium is the circumflex iliac branch.
Around the
* In six bodies, both male and female, that I examined carefully,
I found this band to be formed only by a thickening of the fascia
transversalis.
FF
434 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Inter- costal The intercostal arteries enter the abdominal wall between the
arteries . transversalis and internal oblique muscles, at the anterior part of
the intercostal spaces. As they extend forwards with the nerves
they supply the contiguous muscles, and anastomose with the internal mammary, epigastric, and lumbar arteries.
Internal
ry.
The vessel that accompanies the last dorsal nerve is furnished by
the first lumbar artery.
The abdominal branch of the internal mammary artery (p. 231.)
mamma- enters the wall of the abdomen beneath the cartilage of the seventh
rib. Descending for a short distance in the sheath of the rectus,
the artery enters the substance of that muscle, and anastomoses
in it with the epigastric artery.
Epigas- tric ar- tery
moses
ternal mam- mary in
The epigastric artery arises from the external iliac about a quarter
ofan inch above Poupart's ligament ; and ascending in the sheath
anasto- of the rectus, it divides above the umbilicus into branches that
with in- enter the muscular substance, and anastomose with the internal
mammary. In its course the vessel is first bent inwards, but it
sheath of then ascends beneath the fascia transversalis, and perforating rectus . that fascia, enters the sheath of the rectus over the defined
tions in border at the posterior aspect. As it ascends to the sheath of the
rectus the artery passes beneath the cord and on the inner side of
the internal abdominal ring ; and is directed obliquely inwards
across the lower part of the abdomen, where it forms the lateral
boundary of a triangular space between it and the edge of the
Branch rectus muscle. The branches of the artery are numerous but inconsiderable in size.
Connecwall of abdo- men.
es .
Pubic a. The pubic branch is a small transverse artery that runs behind
Poupart's ligament to the posterior aspect of the pubes, where it anastomoses with a similar branch from the opposite side. Behind the joins obturator pubes it gives downwards a branch to communicate with a small offset by an offset . from the obturator artery : the size of this last offset varies very much
but its situation is internal to the crural ring.
Cremas- teric.
Muscu- lar.
Cutane.
ous.
Epigas- tric veins.
Peculiab. A cremasteric or spermatic branch is furnished to the coverings of the cord as before mentioned.
c. Abdominal branches are given from the outer side of the artery to
supply the muscles of the abdominal wall, and to anastomose with the intercostal arteries. Other branches enter the rectus.
d. Some cutaneous offsets pierce the rectus, and ramify in the integument with the cutaneous nerves.
Two veins are found with the epigastric artery, but these join
into one before they open into the external iliac vein.
Peculiarities. - The position of this artery on the trunk of the exrities in ternal iliac may be shifted from the level of Poupart's ligament to two origin.
HERNIA OF THE ABDOMEN. 435
inches and a half above ; or the origin of the vessel may be transferred
to the superficial or the deep femoral artery. Frequently the epigastric May
furnishes the obturator artery to the pelvis ; in such case the small give off
communicating offset, which is ordinarily given to the obturator, may
be supposed to be enlarged.
obtura- tor .
of abdo- men,
The circumflex iliac artery arises from the outer side of the ex- Circumternal iliac opposite the epigastric, and then courses outwards around flex iliac
the crest of the ilium, as the name expresses. At first the artery
is below Poupart's ligament, after it has pierced the tube of mem- is in wall
brane that surrounds the upper part of the femoral vessels, but it next passes beneath the transversalis muscle to the middle of the
crest of the ilium. Here the vessel pierces the transversalis, and and
is continued backwards between it and the internal oblique to anastoanastomose with the ilio -lumbar branch of the internal iliac artery , with ilio- Its branches are muscular and anastomotic.
moses
lumbar.
lar off- Near the front of the crest of the ilium a small branch ascends be- Muscutween the internal oblique and transversalis muscles, supplying them, sets.
and anastomosing with the epigastric and lumbar arteries. As the vessel
extends backwards it gives lateral offsets that supply the neighbouring
muscles, and communicate on the one side with the ilio-lumbar, and on
the other with the gluteal artery.
flex vein. The companion vein with this artery is formed by the junction Circumof two collateral branches, like the epigastric, and crosses the
external iliac artery, nearly an inch above Poupart's ligament, to
reach the vein on the inner side.
SECTION II .
HERNIA OF THE ABDOMEN.
hernia. THE lower part of the wall of the abdomen, that has been Inguina
reserved onthe left side ofthe body, should now be dissected
for the anatomy of inguinal hernia.
-
cessary dissec- tion to
left
Dissection. The skin, the superficial fascia, and the aponeu- The ne
rosis of the external oblique having been already reflected in the
previous examination of the wall of the abdomen, the necessary bemade
dissection of the inguinal region will be completed by raising the on the
internal oblique muscle. Make one incision across the fleshy part groin
of the internal oblique, from the crest of the ilium towards the linea
alba ; and after the depth of the muscle is ascertained by the cellular layer beneath, cut carefully through the origin of the lowest
fibres from Poupart's ligament ; then detaching it cautiously from
FF 2
436 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Situa- tion of
bernia.
position
it fol- lows.
the subjacent transversalis, turn it upwards on the abdomen. The
separation of the two muscles just mentioned is sometimes difficult
in consequence of their fibres being blended together, but a cellular
interval and a branch of the circumflex iliac artery mark their intermuscular space. Afterwards divide the cremaster muscle or
fascia on the cord, and turn it to the side. Let the dissector clean
the surface of the transversalis muscle without displacing its lower
arched border, and trace with care the conjoined tendon of the
internal oblique and transversalis, to show its exact extent outwards. The fascia transversalis and the spermatic cord should
likewise be nicely cleaned. Crossing the space below the
border of the transversalis muscle is the epigastric artery, which
lies close to the inner side of the internal abdominal ring, but
beneath the fascia transversalis. A small piece of the fascia
should be cut out to show that vessel on the side of the abdominal
ring.
Inguinal hernia. - The previous dissection has sufficed
inguinal to show that the weakest part of the abdominal wall is just
above Poupart's ligament, where the two internal muscles
are wanting, and arch over the spermatic cord. In consequence of this deficiency in the muscular strata, the intestine
escapes most readily at this part of the abdomen, and gives
Predis- rise to an inguinal hernia. But the intestinal protrusion in
natural the inguinal region is predisposed to by the passage of the ly. spermatic cord through the abdominal parietes, and by the
Course existence of fossæ on the inner surface of the wall. The gut,
in leaving the abdomen, either passes through the internal
abdominal ring with the cord ; or it may be projected through
the part of the abdominal wall between the epigastric artery
and the edge of the rectus muscle, which corresponds to the
fossæ before alluded to. The hernia of this region is distinguished by names derived from its position with respect.
to the epigastric artery (external or internal), or from its
external direction in the abdominal wall (oblique or direct ) ; so that
lique ; the hernia that comes through the internal abdominal ring
or direct .With the cord is called synonymously external or oblique,
whilst the hernia between the edge of the rectus and the
epigastric artery is named, in like manner, internal or direct.
EXTERNAL or OBLIQUE INGUINAL HERNIA leaves the abdomen with the spermatic cord, and after traversing the inTwo kinds,
or obinternal
External or ob- lique.
EXTERNAL OR OBLIQUE INGUINAL HERNIA. 437
guinal canal, makes its exit from the wall of the abdomen by
the external abdominal ring.
Anatomy.
tomy of
conTo acquire a knowledge of this hernia it will Anabe necessary to study the space in which it lies (inguinal parts
canal), the apertures by which it enters and leaves the wall cerned.
of the abdomen (abdominal rings) , and the coverings that it
receives in its progress to the surface of the body.
-
canal.
tion.
ings.
aries
surface.
abdomi.
vity.
The inguinal canal is the interval between the flat mus- Inguinal
cles of the abdominal wall, which contains the spermatic cord
of the male, or the round ligament of the female. Its direc- Direction is oblique downwards and inwards, being nearly parallel
to Poupart's ligament ; and its length is about one inch and Length
a half. Superiorly it communicates with the cavity of the Openabdomen by the internal abdominal ring, and inferiorly ends
on the surface by the external abdominal ring. Towards Boundthe surface of the body the canal is bounded by the two next
oblique muscles : - the outer third of its extent (half an
inch) being formed by the fleshy internal oblique, together
with the aponeurotic part of the external oblique ; and the
inner or lower two-thirds (one inch) being completed bythe
aponeurosis of the external oblique alone. Next the cavity Next the
of the abdomen the wall of the canal is formed by the nal ca
fascia transversalis, and bythe conjoined tendon of the internal
oblique and transversalis, in this wise : - the fascia alone
reaches about half an inch of the distance, like the internal oblique ; and the conjoined tendon, with the fascia transversalis
behind it, extends the rest of the way (an inch) along the
posterior boundary. Occasionally the triangular ligament
projects far enough outwards to take part in the formation of
the posterior wall of the canal behind the external abdominal ring. Along the lower part, or the floor, the canal Flooring
is limited by the union of the fascia transversalis with Pou- ofthe
part's ligament, and by the fibres of that ligament that turn
back to the pectineal line ; whilst along the upper part its
extent is determined only by the apposition of the muscles.
In the female, the canal has the same length and bound- Canal in
aries, though it is usually somewhat smaller. In that sex it male.
lodges the round ligament.
-
and roof
canal.
the feThe internal abdominal ring is an aperture in the fascia Internal
FF 3
438 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
nal ring.
tion .
Form and margin.
Upper and
abdomi- transversalis, which is situate half way between the symSitua- physis pubis and the crest of the ilium, and half an inch
above Poupart's ligament. It is oval in form, the extremities of the oval being directed upwards and downwards,
and the fascia at its outer and lower parts is stronger than
at the opposite margin. Arching above the aperture, and
then descending on the inner side, is the lower border of the
transversalis muscle, which is fleshy in its outer, but tendinous in its inner half. On the inner side of the opening
lies the epigastric artery. This opening in the fascia transversalis is the inlet to the inguinal canal, and through it the
cord, or the round ligament, passes into the wall of the abdomen. The external hernia likewise leaves the abdomen
at the same spot. All the protruding parts receive as a
covering a prolongation of the fascia from the margin of
the opening.
inner'
bound- ary.
Parts trans- mitted through it.
Exter- nal abring.
The external abdominal ring is the outlet of the canal, and
dominal through it the cord, or the inguinal hernia, reaches the surface
Situa- of the body. This aperture is placed in the aponeurosis of
the external oblique muscle, near the crest of the ilium, and
from its margin a prolongation is sent on the parts passing
through it (see p. 421. ).
tion .
The in- testine ,
the cord ,
verings ofthe perito .
neum and fat,
fascia transCourse and coverings of the hernia. When a piece of
follow intestine leaves the abdomen with the 'cord, and continues ing the
course of with it to the surface of the body, it will obtain the same
coverings, viz. one from every structure in the wall of the
has co- abdomen, except the transversalis muscle. It receives its
investments in this order : as the intestine is first thrust
outwards, it carries before it the peritoneum and the subperitoneal fat, and enters the tube of the fascia transversalis
(infundibuliform fascia) that surrounds the cord. Still increasing in size the piece of gut is directed downwards to
the lower border of the internal oblique muscle, where it has
the cremasteric fascia or covering applied to it. The intestine is afterwards directed along the front of the cord to
the external abdominal ring, and in passing through that
opening receives the investment of the intercolumnar or
spermatic fascia. Lastly, as the hernia descends to the
cial as scrotum, it has the additional coverings of the superficial
versalis ,
cremas- ter,
sperma- tic fas- cia,
superfi.
INTERNAL OR DIRECT HERNIA. 439
skin,
fascia and the skin . So that in a hernia which has passed cia , and
the external abdominal ring, the coverings from without inwards are the following : the skin and superficial fascia, the
spermatic and cremasteric fascia, the fascia transversalis,
the subperitoneal fat, and the peritoneum or sac : these dif- if it has
ferent laminæ become much thickened in a hernia that has abdomiexisted for some time. Should a piece of intestine remain
in the inguinal canal (bubonocele), the layers that invest it
will depend upon the spot to which it has extended.
left the
nal wall.
ture Seat of stricture. — The protruded intestine may be con- Stricstricted in the internal abdominal ring by the neck of the where
sac, in the inguinal canal by the fleshy internal oblique situate .
muscle, or at the external abdominal ring ; and the frequency of the seat of stricture is the same as the order in
which the constricting parts are here mentioned. Whilst
efforts are being made to force back the piece of protruded
intestine, the direction of the canal and the situation of the
internal abdominal ring should be borne in mind ; and To free
should it be necessary to expose the intestine and divide the tion of
strictured part from within, the incision should be made cision .
directly upwards.
it, directhe inapplied
position
It may here be remarked that this kind of hernia has Terms
other names applied to it by surgeons ; these designations to the inguinal depending on its having passed certain points in the wall of hernia
the abdomen, or upon the condition of the sac of the peritoneum. If the protrusion remains in the inguinal canal, from its
the term bubonocele is applied to the swelling ; but if it has
extended into the scrotum, the appellation of scrotal rupture,
or oscheocele, is given to it. Should the piece of peritoneum
that accompanies the testicle from the abdomen in the fetus
remain unobliterated, and the intestine descend in it, the
hernia is called congenital ; but should that prolongation of and from
the peritoneum be partly obliterated, say in the inguinal ture of
canal, so that the descending intestine projects into the un- toneal
obliterated part from above or behind, like a viscus into a
serous membrane, the hernia is named infantile.
the nathe perisac.
The INTERNAL or DIRECT INGUINAL HERNIA passes through Internal the wall of the abdomen internal to the epigastric artery, hernia
FF 4
440 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
behind
ring.
comes ' and has a straight course through the abdominal parietes
external andthe external abdominal ring. Its situation and its coverings will be comprehended after the examination of the
part of the abdominal wall through which the hernia
passes.
It passes through
strengthpart by
conjoin ed ten- don.
- Anatomy. At the lower part of the abdominal wall is a
a trian- small triangular space between the epigastric artery on one gular space, side, the outer edge of the rectus muscle on the other, and
which is the inner part of Poupart's ligament below. Over the two
ened in inner thirds of the area of the space the conjoined tendon of
the internal oblique and transversalis is stretched, as it
descends to its insertion into the pectineal line ; but in the
outer third there exists only fascia transversalis. Any
intestine protruding in this spot must, it is evident, rupture
or elongate the different structures, because there is not any
aperture or tube by which it can descend, as in the external
Hernia hernia ; and, further, the coverings of the hernia, and its
space of extent and direction in the lower part of the inguinal canal,
must vary according as the gut is forced through the part of
the space covered by the conjoined tendon, or through the
part free from that tendon.
in this
two kinds.
Cover- ings of
common
neum
jacent fat,
Coverings ofthe hernia. —The more common kind of inthe more ternal hernia (inferior) passes through that part of the
kind are triangular space which is covered by the conjoined tendon ;
and this kind is found to be present when the obliterated
hypogastric artery takes its usual course along the interior
of the abdominal wall, behind or near to the epigastric
perito artery. The intestine in protruding carries before it the
and sub- peritoneum, the subperitoneal cellular membrane, and the
fascia transversalis ; next, it either elongates the conjoined
tendon, or, as is the case in a sudden rupture, separates
conjoin the fibres, and escapes between them. Nowthe intestine
don, has advanced into the lower part of the inguinal canal, where
it is opposite the external abdominal ring ; and it passes outwards through the ring, lying on the inner side of the cord,
sperma- and receiving at the same time the covering of the fascia
super- spermatica. Lastly, it is invested by the superficial fascia
and the skin. In number the coverings of this internal
hernia are the same as in the external form ; and in kind
fascia trans- versalis
ed tentic fascia,
ficial fascia,
and skin.
RARE INTERNAL HERNIA. 441
they are the same, with this exception, viz. that the conjoined tendon is substituted for the cremasteric covering.
ture.
tion.
Seat ofstricture. -The stricture in this form of hernia is Stricfound most frequently at the neck of the sac, next in fre- situaquency at the margin of the fissured tendon, and lastly at
the external abdominal ring. The position of the openings
in the abdominal wall should be kept in mind during attempts to reduce an internal hernia ; and the straightness of
the course of the intestine, when compared with an external
hernia, should be remembered. Where it is necessary to Its diviopen the hernial sac to relieve the structure, the cut should
be made directly upwards, as in the external hernia.
sion.
kind of
hernia
out than
ceding
trianguRarer kind ofinternal hernia. Another kind of internal Rarer
hernia (superior) projects through that part of the triangular internal
space in which the abdominal parietes is formed only by
fascia transversalis. Its existence is generally owing to an is farther
unusual position of the obliterated hypogastric artery, —that the precord crossing the triangular space, where the two inner in the
thirds join the outer third, instead of lying behind the epi- larspace,
gastric artery, and thus predisposing to a hernial protrusion
by reason of the fossa that it produces in the interior of the
abdomen. The student will perceive that if a hernia exists
at the part specified, it would be close to the epigastric
artery, that it would descend along nearly the whole of
the inguinal canal to reach the external abdominal ring, and and is oblique
that consequently the term direct would not apply to this in direcform of internal hernia.
-
tion .
ings are
in externia.
Coverings. As this form of internal hernia traverses Covernearly the whole of the inguinal canal, it has exactly the same as
same number and kind of coverings as the external hernia nal herthat accompanies the spermatic cord, viz. the skin and
the superficial fascia, the spermatic and cremasteric fasciæ,
the fascia transversalis, and the subperitoneal fat and the
peritoneum.
ture at
spots .
Seat of stricture. —The constriction of the intestine will Stricbe at the same spots as in the external hernia ; and from the same
impossibility of deciding in the living body whether the form
of hernia now under consideration is internal or external, the
rule observed in dividing the stricture is to make the in- Division ofit.
442 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Umbili- cal her- nia.
Cover- ings
cision directly upwards, as in the other kinds of inguinal .
hernia.
UMBILICAL HERNIA, or exomphalos, is a protrusion of a
piece of intestine either through or by the side of the umbilicus. It is very variable in size, and its course is straight
through the abdominal wall.
-- Coverings. The coverings of the intestine in a small
hernia are thin and few in number, viz. the skin and the
superficial fascia, a prolongation from the tendinous margin
of the abdominal opening, together with the remaining
common coverings of the fascia transversalis, the subperibecome toneal fat, and the peritoneum. Over the end of the tumour
over the the fat of the superficial fascia disappears, and this covering
becomes blended with the other structures on each side of it.
If the hernia is suddenly produced, it may want the investment that otherwise is derived from the tendon of the
external oblique muscle.
united
tumour.
Stric- ture,
where ound.
Other abdomiobtura- tor,
Seat of stricture. —The stricture on the intestine is generally found at the margin of the tendinous opening in the
abdominal wall ; and it should be remembered that this
opening is at the upper part, not in the centre of the swelling. The constriction may be removed by cutting upwards,
but there is not any vessel to be avoided in the operation.
OTHER FORMS OF HERNIA. -At each of the other natural
nal her- apertures in the parts bounding the cavity of the abdomen, a
niæ are piece of intestine may be protruded, so as to form a hernial
femoral, tumour. For instance, there may be femoral hernia below
Poupart's ligament, with the femoral vessels ; obturator
hernia through the obturator foramen, with the artery of the ischia- same name ; and ischiadic hernia through the ischiadic notch.
The femoral hernia, as the most important, will be noticed
presently ; but the student must refer to some special treatise
for his information respecting the other abdominal herniæ.
dic.
Dissec- tion .
Dissection. The abdomen may now be opened to see the cords
and the depressions on the posterior aspect of the abdominal wall,
below the umbilicus. For this purpose make a transverse cut
through the umbilicus across the front of the abdomen, and on
FEMORAL HERNIA. 443
holding up the lower flap certain cords will be seen ascending to
the umbilicus.
and fosabdomiddle
on each
two fostimes
Cords and fossa of the abdominal wall. —In the middle Cords
line of the abdominal wall, at its posterior aspect, is the pro- sæ inside
minence of the remains of the urachus, which reaches from men ;
the summit of the bladder to the umbilicus. On each side is one in
another cord, or the projection of the obliterated hypogastric line,
artery, which is directed from the side of the pelvis to the another
umbilicus, and usually lies behind or close to the epigastric side,
artery, near Poupart's ligament. When the disposition of forming
the cords is such as above mentioned, two fossæ are seen sæ.
near Poupart's ligament, one on each side of the obliterated
hypogastric artery, corresponding to the situation of the
internal and external abdominal rings. But sometimes the Somecord of the obliterated hypogastric is removed inwards from last cord
the line of the epigastric artery, and crosses the triangular inwards
space between this artery and the edge of the rectus, in the
line of union of the outer with the two inner thirds. In this causing
last case there are three fossæ at the lower part of the abdo- fossæ.
men;· one on each side of the obliterated hypogastric, corresponding to the two subdivisions of the triangular space
between the rectus and the epigastric artery, and to the spots
at which the two kinds of internal hernia escape ; and the Number
third fossa is outside the epigastric artery, opposite the in- hernial
ternal abdominal ring. The existence of these fossæ de- sions
termines the different kinds of inguinal hernia.
--
moved
three
ofthe
protrusame as fossæ.
tion of
moral
FEMORAL HERNIA. -In this hernia the intestine leaves Situathe abdomen below Poupart's ligament in the sheath that the fesurrounds the femoral vessels. The course that the intestine hernia.
takes, and the coverings that it receives, will be easily understood after the anatomy of the parts among which it passes
has been learnt. Only part of the anatomy will be given
here, because the rest is fully described in the dissection of
the thigh.
Dissection. —Divide the lower part of the abdominal wall by an Dissecincision from the umbilicus to the pubes ; and on the left side of tion of the parts the body proceed to examine the structures concerned in the for- concernmation of femoral hernia. Detach the peritoneum from the inner ed.
444 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Anatomy of the struc- tur es.
Subpe- ritoneal fat
surface of the abdominal wall and from the iliac fossa. Next sepa.
rate in the same way the layer of the subperitoneal fat, but before
doing this it will be necessary to cut through the cord at the abdominal ring as this layer is raised, one or more lymphatic glands
will be seen by the side ofthe iliac vessels. Any cellular membrane
that remains is to be taken away to show the upper opening of the
membranous sheath that contains the femoral vessels. In this dissection the genito - crural nerve is seen on the iliac artery. Afterwards trace the iliac fascia and the fascia transversalis to Poupart's
ligament, to see the part that each takes in the production of the
femoral sheath.
- Anatomy. The structures concerned in the production of
the femoral hernia are severally to be examined, viz . the
subperitoneal fat, the membranes lining the interior of the
abdominal cavity near Poupart's ligament ( transversalis and
iliac fascia), with the sheath to which they give origin ; and,
lastly, the crural ring, or the space through which the hernia
leaves the abdomen.
The subperitoneal fat extends as a continuous layer beneath the peritoneum, though it is thickest and most fibrous
at the lower part of the abdomen, where the vessels pass beneath Poupart's ligament. Here it extends over the upper
opening of the sheath of the vessels, instead of descending in
it around the vessels. Internal to the vein it covers the
space of the crural ring, and a lymphatic gland that occupies
forms that space.
The piece of the layer that stretches over the
crurale. crural ring is named by M. Cloquet septum crurale, and is
described by him as being concave towards the abdomen, and
convex towards the thigh. Some apertures exist in it for
the ducts ofthe inguinal glands, and one gland is generally
attached to its under surface.
septum
Fascia trans- The fascia transversalis has been before described
versalis. (p. 430.) . When traced down to Poupart's ligament, it is
seen to join the iliac fascia external to the situation of the
large iliac artery ; but internal to that spot it is continued
downwards in the thigh, in front of the femoral vessels, and
forms the anterior part of the femoral sheath.
Iliac fas- cia, The iliac fascia covers the iliacus muscle, and lies beneath
the iliac vessels. When it is followed down to Poupart's
ligament its disposition is found to resemble that of the
ANATOMY OF FEMORAL HERNIA. 445
transversalis fascia ; for external to the iliac vessels it joins
that fascia along the line of Poupart's ligament ; but, internal
to the spot mentioned, it is prolonged behind the vessels
into the posterior part of the femoral sheath.
of femosels
The femoral sheath, or the loose membrane that encloses Sheath
the femoral vessels as they enter the thigh, is derived ral vesfrom the membranes that line the abdomen ; - its ante- formed byoffsets
rior part being continuous with the fascia transversalis, and of pre- ceding.
its posterior part with the fascia iliaca. The whole of the
upper part of the sheath is not filled by the vessels, but a
space remains on the inner side of the vein (crural ring)
which contains a gland, and through which the intestine
descends in femoral hernia.
on inner This side of the ves- half sels is the cruThe crural ring is described in the dissection of the A space
thigh, but its boundaries are better seen here.
space on the inner side of the femoral vein is about
an inch wide, and is filled by a lymphatic gland. Internally, ral ring.
it is bounded by Gimbernat's ligament and the conjoined Size and
tendon, and externally by the femoral vein. In front is ries.
Poupart's ligament with the deep arch, and behind is the
pubes. Along the front of the space is the spermatic cord
in the male, and the round ligament in the female.
vessels
ring .
Position of vessels around the ring. -Usually the crural Usual
ring is partly surrounded by vessels. Thus, on the outer around
side, is the femoral vein ; above, and on the outer side, are
the epigastric vessels ; and in front is a small branch (pubic)
from the epigastric artery to the back of the pubes. Moreover, the vessels of the spermatic cord may be said to be
placed along the front of the ring. Commonly, therefore, the
ring is bounded by vessels, except internally and behind.
the unvessels.
But in some instances the obturator artery takes origin State of
from the epigastric, and passes to the pelvis, either close to usual
the iliac vein, and therefore on the outer side of the ring,
or it arches over the ring, descending on its inner side at
the base of Gimbernat's ligament. If the artery takes the
first-mentioned course, which is the most frequent arrangement, the extent of vessels around the ring is not increased,
for the vein previously occupied this same side. But in the
other case the ring will have an additional vessel on the
446 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Course and coof the hernia.
inner side, and will be entirely encircled except at the
posterior part.
- Coverings of femoral hernia. The intestine, as before
verings said, leaves the abdomen by the opening of the crural ring ;
and it descends in the large sheath of the vessels, internal to
the vein, as far as the saphenous opening, where it projects
to the surface of the thigh. In its progress the intestine
it has will push before it the peritoneum, the subperitoneal fat,
(septum crurale ), and will displace, or cause to be absorbed,
perito- the gland that fills the crural ring. Having reached the neal fat . level of the saphenous opening, the intestine carries before
From abdomen
perito- neum and subInner
it the inner side of the femoral sheath and the cribriform
fascia ; and, lastly, it receives coverings from the superficial
sheath. parts of the thigh. The dissection of the thigh may be
referred to for fuller detail.
part of
Stric- ture
neck , or
nous
to divide
wound- ing ves- sels in
Seat of stricture. -― The stricture of a femoral hernia
is either in the neck of the sac, opposite the base of Gimbernat's ligament, or lower down, at the margin of the sapheeither in nous opening. To free the intestine from the constricting
at saphe band of the upper part of the saphenous opening, an incision
opening. is to be made upwards and inwards ; and to relieve the
Incision stricture in the neck of the sac, the knife is to be carried
it. horizontally inwards through a few fibres of the free edge of
Risk of Gimbernat's ligament. In the use of the knife there is
danger of wounding some of the many vessels that lie about
regular the ring. When the incision is made inwards, or upwards
and inwards (the only two ways, it is to be remembered, by
which the constricting bands can be loosened), there is not,
in ordinary cases, any vessel that will be injured, unless,
indeed, the cut upwards and inwards should be made so long
as to reach the spermatic cord, or the small pubic branch of
and irre- the epigastric artery. But in some few instances (once in
about eighty operations, Lawrence) the obturator artery lies
in front and on the inner side of the neck of the sac, and
will be before the knife in whichever of the two available
directions it is used ; the existence of this condition of the
vessel cannot be recognised beforehand, and the surgeon will
best avoid the danger of wounding the artery by a cautious
and sparing use of the knife.
gular condi- tion of them .
CAVITY OF THE ABDOMEN. 447
SECTION III.
CAVITY OF THE ABDOMEN.
tion to
domen.
Dissection. -THE part of the abdominal wall above the umbilicus Dissecis to be divided by a cut along the left side of the linea alba as far open abas the xiphoid cartilage. When the flaps are thrown to the sides,
the cavity ofthe abdomen is exposed.
of abdoand
The ABDOMEN is the largest cavity in the body, and Cavity
lodges the digestive, the urinary, and the generative organs. men.
It is oval in form, and the greatest measurement is from Form
above downwards. Superiorly it is limited by the dia- boundaphragm ; and inferiorly by the pelvis, and by the structures ries.
that close the outlet of the pelvis. In front and on the sides
are the abdominal muscles ; and behind is the spinal column,
with the psoas and quadratus muscles. The space included Is diby the boundaries above mentioned is wider above than into
below, and is divided for anatomical purposes into the cavity
of the abdomen and the cavity of the pelvis.
vided
pelvis The cavity of the pelvis contains some of the generative Cavity o
and urinary organs : it will be examined further on.
abdomen The cavity of the abdomen extends from the diaphragm and of
to the brim of the pelvis. In it are contained the kidney ; proper.
with the alimentary tube, and its appendages the liver,
pancreas, and spleen. The space is lined by a serous membrane (peritoneum), which is reflected around the viscera.
nal camarked
regions
Regions. The abdominal cavity is divided artificially Abdomiinto regions by lines extended from certain points of the vity is
wall. If two circular lines are carried round the body -out into
one opposite the cartilage of the ninth rib, and the other on
a level with the most prominent part of the crest of the
ilium -the cavity of the abdomen will be divided into
three parts, the epigastric above, the hypogastric below, and
the umbilical in the middle. Each of these regions is further
subdivided by another line, on each side, from the cartilage
of the ninth rib to the anterior superior spine of the innominate bone. This vertical line marks off a piece from each
of the three circles, which is named respectively hypochon-
448 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Parts of viscera seen without
ment.
driac, lumbar, and iliac (right and left ) which lie in that
order from above downwards. The central and lower part
of the hypogastric subdivision is named pubic region, and
each lateral part the inguinal region.
Parts first seen. — On first opening the abdomen the
following is the disposition of the parts that come into view :
displace--On the right side is the liver, which is partly concealed by
the ribs. On the left side a part of the stomach is visible ;
but this viscus is chiefly beneath the ribs, and is somewhat
overlayed by the liver. Descending from the stomach is
the large omentum (a fold of peritoneum), which reaches to
the pelvis, and conceals the intestine. If the bladder is
distended, a small part of it may come into view just above
the pelvis. In some bodies the omentum is raised into
the left hypochondriac region, and leaves the small intestine
uncovered.
Connec- tions of
CONNECTIONS OF THE VISCERA.
The connections of the viscera with the surrounding parts,
viscera and their situation in the different regions of the abdomen,
may be next examined before the natural position is disturbed.
to be seen.
Position of stoConnecpend on its conThe stomach. The stomach intervenes between the
mach. gullet and the small intestine, and is retained in position by
folds of the serous membrane. It is somewhat of a conical
form, with the larger end to the left side ; and it occupies
tions de- the left hypochondriac, the epigastric, and part of the right
dition. hypochondriac region . The connections with the surrounding parts will depend upon the condition of the
stomach for when this viscus is empty, its surfaces look
forwards and backwards, and its borders upwards and downwards ; but when it is distended it becomes somewhat
circular, and rolls so as to bring forwards the border usually
lowest, and to turn upwards that aspect which is directed
forwards at other times.
Extre- mities are,
large
The left or large end is beneath the ribs, and is in contact
with the spleen, which is connected with it by a fold of
peritoneum (splenic omentum) : when this part of the
CONNECTIONS OF THE INTESTINE. 449
small.
stomach is distended it pushes up the diaphragm, and encroaches on the space for the left lung. The right end and
reaches towards the gall bladder, and is in contact with the
wall of the abdomen and with the under surface of the liver,
The anterior surface is in contact with the diaphragm Surfaces .
towards the left, with the abdominal wall in the centre, and
with the under part of the liver towards the right side ; and
the posterior surface corresponds to the pancreas, the pillars
of the diaphragm, and the solar plexus.
The upper border is connected to the liver by a fold of Borders.
peritoneum (small omentum) ; and the lower border has
connected with it another fold of the peritoneum (great
omentum or epiploon), which floats freely over the intestines.
tions in
from disThe position and the connections of the stomach may be Alterachanged by an alteration in the size of any of the surrounding position
organs, or by accumulations of fluid in the chest or in the ease.
belly. The stomach may also be dragged down by the great
omentum entering a hernial sac, or it may be forced down
towards the pelvis by the pressure of tight stays. In these
instances the right end moves more than the left, because it
is attached only by peritoneum to the parts around.
-
intestion and
The small intestine. The smaller part of the intestinal Small
tube (intestinum tenue) reaches from the stomach to the tine.
right iliac region, where it ends in the large intestine. It situais divided into three parts, duodenum ( twelve inch intestine), divijejunum, and ileum ; of the two last, one receives its name
from its empty condition, and the other from its numerous
coils.
sions.
The duodenum cannot be satisfactorily seen now, and it Duodewill therefore be examined afterwards.
num.
The jejunum and ileum begin on the left side of the and Jejunum second lumbar vertebra, without any distinct mark of sepa- ileum .
ration from the duodenum. Two-fifths of the intestine are
given to the jejunum, and the remaining three-fifths to the
ileum. This part of the intestinal tube forms many circum- Situa
volutions in the umbilical, hypogastric, lumbar, and iliac
regions of the abdomen ; and it descends oftentimes in the
female into the cavity of the pelvis. In front of the in
G G
tion.
450 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
tions.
Connec- testine is the great omentum ; and posteriorly the small
intestine (beyond the duodenum) is fixed to the spine by a
fold of peritoneum (the mesentery) which includes vessels
and nerves. Surrounding the jejunum and ileum is the large
intestine or colon, but on the left side of the body the large
is concealed by the small intestine.
Large intestine The large intestine. —The large intestine or colon is sachow dis- culated, and is less movable than the small intestine. It tinguish- ed. begins in the right iliac region in a dilated part or head
(caput cæcum coli), and ascends to the liver through the
Course right iliac, lumbar, and hypochondriac regions. Then crosstent.
ing the abdomen below the stomach, it reaches the left hypochondriac region, and lies in this transverse part of its course
between the epigastric and umbilical regions, or altogether
and ex- in the latter. Finally, it descends through the regions on
the left side, corresponding to those it occupied on the right,
forms a remarkable bend ( sigmoid flexure) in the left iliac
fossa, and ends opposite the brim of the pelvis in the
rectum . The large intestine takes an arched course around
the small intestine, and is divided into six parts, viz. cæcum,
ascending colon, transverse colon, descending colon, sigmoid
flexure, and rectum.
Divi- sions.
Cæcum,
or head
Situa- tion
The cæcum, or the commencement of the colon, is placed
of colon. in the right iliac fossa, in which it is fixed by peritoneum
stretched over it. In front are the convolutions of the small
intestine, but when it is distended it touches the abdominal
and con- wall. Behind, it rests on the iliac fascia, only cellular mem- nections . brane intervening. On the inner part it is joined by the
Ascend- ing cosmall intestine, and it presents inferiorly a worm- like piecethe vermiform appendix. Sometimes the peritoneum surrounds the cæcum, so as to allow of some degree of
movement.
The ascending colon reaches from the cæcum to the under
lon. surface of the liver, on the right of the gall bladder. It lies
against the quadratus lumborum inferiorly, but higher up it
is placed in front of the kidney. The peritoneum fixes it
immoveably to the wall of the abdomen, but this membrane
does not surround more than two-thirds of its circumference.
To its inner side are the convolutions of the small intestine.
Parts around.
CONNECTIONS OF THE LIVER. 451
the Connec- tions of In the
the verse co- translon :
The transverse colon passes obliquely upwards and to
left, along the curvature of the stomach, to the spleen.
this extent it has above it the liver and the gall bladder,
stomach, and the spleen ; and below it the small intestine.
In front is the great omentum ; and behind is a fold of peritoneum (transverse meso -colon), which attaches it to the
posterior part of the abdominal wall, and contains its vessels
and nerves. The transverse colon is more moveable than is most
any other part of the intestinal tube, its peritoneal folds able
allowing it to be raised and placed on the margin of the ribs. large inSmall pieces of peritoneum, containing fat (appendices epiploica), are attached to the intestine.
movepiece of
testine.
ing cotion.
The descending colon commences below the spleen, and Descendreaches to the left iliac fossa. At first it is deeply placed in lon .
the left hypochondriac region, and in its whole course it is
deeper than the right colon. In front of it are the convolu- Situations of the small intestine ; and behind are the diaphragm,
the outer part of the kidney, and the quadratus lumborum.
This part of the intestine is smaller than either the right Is coveror the transverse portion, and is surrounded less by the peri- small
toneum that attaches it to the abdominal wall.
ed by
intes- tine.
The flexure sigmoid flexure of the colon is situate in the left iliac Sigmoid
fossa, to which it is attached by a fold of the peritoneum
(sigmoid meso-colon), but it is often partly situate in the
cavity of the pelvis. The intestine makes two turns like the
letter S ; whence its name. It is concealed by the small in- is in left
testine, which is directed more to the left than to the right
side. The extent of this part of the intestine is from the
crest of the ilium to the junction of the same bone with the
sacrum, where it ends in the rectum .
iliac fos- sa.
The rectum is the part of the large intestine which is con- Rectum .
tained in the pelvis, and it will be seen in the dissection of
that cavity.
ofthe The liver. - The liver is situate in the epigastric and Position
right hypochondriac regions, and sometimes reaches to the liver.
left hypochondrium. Folds of peritoneum (ligaments) retain
it in its place.
faces.
The upper surface is convex, and turned to the diaphragm, Surand is divided into two parts by the suspensory ligament.
GG 2
452 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Borders.
Position is changdiature of body,
The under surface is in contact with the ascending colon,
the duodenum, the stomach, and with the right kidney. Attached to this surface is a fold of the peritoneum (small
omentum ) that contains hepatic vessels.
The anterior border is thin, and extends beyond the margin of the thorax in the erect position of the body : projecting beyond this edge is the gall bladder. The posterior
border is thick, and is connected to the diaphragm by certain
ligaments ; it lies on the spine, on the large vessels ( aorta
and cava), and on the pillars of the diaphragm.
The liver is moved by the ascent and descent of the diaed by phragm in respiration, and is therefore constantly changing
phragm, its position. In inspiration the liver descends, and in exbypos- piration it regains its former level. In the upright and
sitting postures the viscus descends an inch lower than in
the horizontal condition of the body ; so that, in the one
state, the anterior border can be felt below the edge of the
ribs, but in the other it is withdrawn within their margin.
andby The connections of the liver with the surrounding parts may
in other be changed by the growth of a tumour, or by collections of
fluid in the chest or in the abdomen.
disease
parts.
Situa- tion of
tions.
The spleen. The spleen lies deeply in the left hypochonspleen. drium, between the stomach and the ribs, and is connected
by peritoneum (splenic omentum) to the great end of the
stomach on one side, and to the diaphragm on the other side.
Connec. Its position is almost vertical. Its outer surface is convex
and corresponds to the diaphragm, and is opposite the ninth,
tenth, and eleventh ribs ; and the inner surface, which is
concave, is in contact with the stomach and with the tail of
the pancreas. Below the spleen are the kidney with its
supra-renal capsule, and the beginning of the descending
colon. When the stomach is distended the spleen is somewhat behind it.
Kidney The kidney. The kidney should be examined on the left
side, in order that the duodenum may not be displaced. To
see it, detach the descending colon and the peritoneum from
the abdominal wall. This viscus is surrounded with fat, and
occupies , is situate in the lumbar region ( one on each side), opposite
region. the last dorsal and the two or three upper lumbar vertebræ.
lumbar
REFLECTIONS OF THE PERITONEUM. 453
rather
front,
Its position is somewhat oblique, so that the upper part is Right
nearer than the lower end to the spinal column, and the right lowest.
kidney is rather lower than the left. In front of the kidney Parts in
are the peritoneum and the colon, with a small part of the
duodenum on the right side, and the edge of the spleen on the
left side. Behind it are the quadratus lumborum and psoas behind,
muscles, and the part of the diaphragm covering the last two
ribs. Above the left kidney is the spleen, above the right above,
one the liver, and below each is the crest of the ilium. below.
Resting on the upper part of each kidney is the suprarenal
capsule. The inner border looks to the spine and receives
the vessels. Sometimes the two are united in front of the
aorta, forming the horse-shoe kidney.
The connections of the pancreas will be omitted for the Panpresent.
creas.
PERITONEUM.
neum
of a paand visIts ceral
This is the largest serous membrane in the body. Like Peritoother membranes of this kind it is a closed sac, except in the
female, where it is continuous with the lining of the Fallopian tubes. One part of it lines the wall of the abdomen consists
(parietal layer), and another is reflected over the different rietal
viscera, except where the vessels enter ( visceral layer).
inner surface is smooth, but the outer is rough when
tached from the parts with which it is in contact.
folds of the membrane that attach the viscera to the abdo- folds on
minal wall, or pass from viscus to viscus along the vessels,
consist for the most part of two layers, one on each side of
the vessels.
de- layer,
The and
It is customary to trace the continuity of the sac both in
a vertical and in a horizontal direction.
forms
vessels.
memaround
Circle around the abdomen. —If the membrane is followed out- Conti- nuity of wards from the umbilicus it is found partly to enclose the large the
intestine, and to fix it to the abdominal wall. From that intestine brane
it is continued over the kidney to the middle line, where it is re- the
flected along the vessels to the small intestine, then over the intes- body,
tine, and back to the spine along the other aspect of the vessels. umbili.
Lastly it is continued outwards to the colon of the opposite side,
and along the wall of the abdomen to the umbilicus. The memopposite
cus.
GG 3
454 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Con- tinuity of the serous mem- brane from above down ;
forms pouch of omen- tum,
and de- scends
intestine to the pelvis .
brane that fixes the colon to the abdominal wall is named mesocolon, and that attaching the small intestine`is the mesentery.
Circle from above downwards. -Beginning at the liver, the
student will perceive that the pieces of peritoneum covering the
anterior and posterior parts of that viscus are prolonged from the
under surface on the vessels. From the liver they may be followed along those vessels, one piece before and the other behind,
forming the small omentum, to the upper border of the stomach.
Separating to enclose the stomach, the pieces or layers are applied
to one another beyond that viscus, to form the great omentum or
epiploon. After descending to the lower part of the abdomen, they
turn backwards and upwards, and may be seen to enclose the
transverse colon like the stomach, and then to be continued to the
spine, giving rise to the transverse meso-colon. At the attachment
of the transverse meso- colon to the spine, the two companion
layers will be found to separate, one passing upwards, the other
downwards.
The ascending piece is continued in front of the pancreas and
the pillars of the diaphragm to join the peritoneum on the posterior
part of the liver, and to form the posterior part of a pouch or bag,
which is behind the stomach.
The descending piece or layer can be followed from the transover the verse meso- colon along the middle line of the spine, over the duodenum and the great vessels on the spine (aorta and cava), till it
meets with the artery to the small intestine, along which it is
continued to form the mesentery, as before explained in tracing the
peritoneum in a circular direction. From the root of the mesenteric artery the peritoneum descends to the pelvis, and partly covers there the viscera. Thus it surrounds the upper part of the
rectum, and attaches it to the abdominal wall by the meso- rectum ;
next, it is continued forwards between the rectum and the bladder,
or between the rectum and the uterus, where it forms a pouch ;
thence it passes from the pelvis over the back and sides of the
bladder. Lastly, the serous membrane is continued to the inguinal
region, where it forms the pouches before alluded to (p. 443.) ; and
it can be traced upwards on the wall of the abdomen and on the
diaphragm to the surface of the liver.
Chief folds of
toneum .
--
Folds ofthe peritoneum. — After tracing the continuity
the peri- of the serous sac over the viscera, the student should examine the chief folds or processes of the membrane, viz.
the small and the great omentum, and the several folds that
attach the small and the large intestine to the abdominal
FOLDS OF THE PERITONEUM. 455
wall. The pieces of the membrane that fix the liver, the
bladder, and the uterus are named ligaments.
omen
tion.
The small or gastro- hepatic omentum is stretched between Small
the under surface of the liver and the upper border of the tum.
stomach, and contains the vessels and nerves of the liver. It Situa
is formed by two pieces of peritoneum, as before explained,
and presents a free border on the right side. Behind it is
the space called foramen of Winslow. Its lower border is Attachfixed to the small curve of the stomach ; whilst its upper
border is attached to the transverse fissure and to the posterior half of the longitudinal fissure of the liver, becoming
blended with the left lateral ligament of that viscus.
ments.
omenments.
a fold
of small
The gastro-colic or great omentum is the largest fold Great
of the peritoneum, and consists of two pieces or layers, con- tum.
tinuous with those on the front and back of the stomach. It is Attachattached to the spleen and to the lower border of the stomach,
where the pieces are separated by vessels, and then descends
in front of the intestines, but lower on the left than on the
right side of the body. At the lower part of the abdomen Forms
the membrane is bent back, and returns towards the spine, in front
the pieces of which it is composed separating and enclosing intes
the transverse colon as before seen. Between the layers of
this fold are contained some fat, and some vessels and nerves ;
and the power of separating one from another diminishes
with the increase of the distance from the stomach, until
at last the membrane they form is thin and net-like. The Consist
anterior part of the fold is separated from the posterior layers.
by a space (bag of the omentum) that extends a varying
distance.
-
tine.
of two
the
tum .
aries .
a. Cavity or bag of the great omentum.· When an opening is Bag of
made through the great omentum, near the stomach, and this viscus omen.
is raised, a large space is seen to extend upwards to the liver, and downwards into the omentum. This is the omental sac. In front Boundthe space is bounded by the small omentum, the stomach, and the
anterior part of the great omentum. Behind it are the posterior
part of the great omentum, the transverse colon, the transverse
meso- colon, and the ascending layer of the transverse meso- colon.
Above is the liver, and below is the doubling of the great omentum. This bag communicates with the rest of the peritoneal Opens
GG 4
456 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
into general
Winscavity, through the space behind the small omentum (foramen of
Cavity by Winslow) . If the bag of the omentum were perfect, it could be
foramen inflated through the foramen ; or if detached from the surround- low. ing parts, it could be drawn through the same hole into the
general bag of the peritoneum. Supposing it to be detached and
drawn out, the following parts would have peritoneum taken
from them, viz. the small omentum (posterior piece), the posterior
part of the stomach, the great omentum (inner piece), the upper
aspect of the transverse colon, the pancreas and the spine, and the
posterior part of the liver. Should this piece of peritoneum be
removed, there is not any hindrance to the vessels reaching the
different viscera ; and it may readily be conceived how the detached membrane could be replaced over the viscera and the vessels,
without being perforated by these.
Fora- men of Wins- low.
Splenic omen- tum .
Perito- neum
b. The foramen of Winslow is the space behind the small omentum, through which the bag of the omentum opens into the general
cavity of the peritoneum. In front of it is the small omentum, and
behind are the vena cava and the spine. Above it is the liver
(lobulus Spigelii), and below is the duodenum. Should this hole
be closed by inflammation, there may be a dropsical collection
either in the bag of the omentum, or in the general bag of the
peritoneum.
The splenic omentum reaches from the great end of the
stomach to the concave surface of the spleen. It contains
the vessels that pass between the two viscera, and is continued inferiorly into the great omentum.
Folds on the large intestine.
-
The large intestine is conattach- nected to the wall of the abdomen by a fold of the peritointestine neum (meso- colon ), which is formed of two pieces, as the ing large
forms
Meso- cæcum .
ing,
other folds. Each part of the large intestine has a separate
meso-colon : thus there is an ascending, a transverse, a
descending, and a sigmoid meso- colon : the cæcum is also
fixed by a meso-cæcum, and the rectum by a mesorectum .
a. The meso- cæcum attaches the cæcum to the right iliac fossa.
Usually the peritoneum does not surround the cæcum so as to form
a fold behind it, but in some instances the serous membrane does
give a suspensory band to that part of the intestine.
Ascend- b. Bythe ascending and the descending meso-colon, the ascending
descend- and the descending part of the colon are kept in place. In these
folds, as in that of the cæcum, the peritonenm is not in contact ing,
LIGAMENTS OF THE LIVER. 457
sigmoid behind the intestine. The sigmoid meso- colon is longer than the and
preceding, and attaches the sigmoid flexure of the colon to the left mesoiliac fossa. The meso- rectum contains the hæmorrhoidal vessels,
and connects the rectum to the front of the sacrum.
colon.
verse c. The transverse meso- colon is a more perfect fold than either of Transthe others that are attached to the large intestine, and serves as a mesopartition between the small intestine and the stomach, liver, and colon,
spleen. By one side it is fixed to the colon, and by the other side to
the abdominal wall below the pancreas. It is formed of two layers of
peritoneum, as before said, which enclose the vessels of the colon.
Small processes of the peritoneum are attached along the tube Appenof the great intestine, chiefly to the transverse colon ; they are the epiappendices epiploica, and contain fat.
dices
ploicæ.
neal
of small
tine.
neum on
Folds to the small intestine. The small intestine is not Peritoenveloped by the peritoneum after the same manner through covering
all its extent. For whilst the jejunum and ileum are at- intestached to the abdominal wall by one fold (mesentery), the
duodenum has special connections with the serous membrane.
Serous covering of the duodenum. The first part of the Perito
duodenum is surrounded by peritoneum, like the stomach ; the duodenext part of the intestine is covered only in front ; and the
last part, that crosses the aorta, is but slightly in contact
with the serous membrane, for at first it lies between the
layers of the transverse meso- colon, and then beneath the
upper part of the superior mesenteric artery.
num.
tery.
The mesentery supports the small intestine (jejunum and Mesenileum), and is stronger than any other fold of the serous
membrane. It is narrowed at the spine, and its attachment Form.
thereto extends from the left side of the second lumbar vertebra to the junction of the right os ilii with the sacrum.
The other end of the fold is wide, and is connected with the Attachintestine. Between its two layers are placed the superior Parts
mesenteric vessels and nerves, with lymphatic glands and ed in it.
lacteals.
ments.
containtoneal
theliver.
Ligaments ofthe liver. — The reflections of the peritoneum Perifrom the diaphragm and from the wall of the abdomen sup- folds of
port the liver in the right hypochondrium, and are named
ligaments. There is a suspensory ligament along the upper
part, containing the obliterated umbilical vein, and a coronary
ligament along the posterior border.
458 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Suspen- sory liments.
The suspensory or falciform ligament is placed between
gament. the upper convex surface of the liver and the abdominal
Shape. wall. It is falciform in shape, and the base is turned forAttach- wards, and the apex backwards. The lower border is concave, and is attached to the liver ; whilst the opposite border
is convex, and is connected to the abdominal wall, on the
right ofthe linea alba, and to the under part of the diaphragm.
In its base or free part is contained the remains of the umbilical vein, or the round ligament. This fold is produced
by the passage of the umbilical vein to the liver, without
formed. piercing the peritoneum ; and with a little care the dissector
will be able to detach the serous membrane from the vein,
and to trace the sac upwards on each side of it into the
suspensory ligament.
Con- tains round liga- ment.
How
Coro- nary liga.
ment
gives rise to
left and
right lateral'
The coronary ligament is a short process of the peritoneum,
which is reflected from the diaphragm to the liver, and is
attached to all its posterior margin. But the ligament is
enlarged at each side, forming a triangularly shaped piece,
to which the terms right and left triangular ligaments have
been applied.
a. The left triangular or lateral ligament is attached above the
edge of the left lobe, and is formed by two pieces of peritoneum,
which are in contact ; it lies in front of the œsophagean opening
in the diaphragm.
b. The right triangular or lateral ligament lies deeply in the
triangu- hypochondriac region, but the two pieces of peritoneum in it are
ments. not close together, like those of the left ligament. Its position is
in front of the vena cava inferior.
lar ligaVessels of intesMESENTERIC VESSELS AND SYMPATHETIC NERVE.
The mesenteric arteries ( superior and inferior) are two
tine. large visceral branches of the aorta, which supply the intestinal tube, except the duodenal part. Each is accompanied
by a vein, and by a plexus of nerves of the same name derived from the sympathetic.
Dissec- tion of -
Dissection ofthe superior mesenteric vessels and nerves.
To exsuperior pose the superior mesenteric vessels and nerves, place the great
omentum and the transverse colon on the margin of the ribs, and
remove one layer (anterior) of the mesentery, following the arterial
mesen- teric .
SUPERIOR MESENTERIC VESSELS. 459
branches to the small intestine. Whilst cleaning the artery in the
mesentery, the student will meet with corresponding veins, and
with offsets of the sympathetic nerves on the arteries. Some
mesenteric glands and a few lacteal vessels will come into view at
the same time. The branches from the right side of the vessel to
the large intestine are next to be followed . After all the branches
are cleaned, the trunk of the artery should be traced back beneath
the pancreas, and the plexus of nerves surrounding it should be
defined.
rior meartery.
to intesthe metions
The superior mesenteric artery supplies branches to the Supesmall intestine beyond the duodenal part, and to half the senteric
large intestine, viz. as far as the end of the transverse colon.
Arising from the aorta near the diaphragm, the vessel is Courses
directed downwards between the layers of the mesentery, tine in
forming an arch with the convexity to the left side, and sentery.
terminates in offsets to the cæcum and to the end of the small
intestine. At first the artery lies beneath the pancreas and
the splenic vein ; and as it descends to the mesentery it is Connecplaced in front of the duodenum and the left renal vein.
This vessel is surrounded by the mesenteric plexus of
nerves, and is accompanied by the vein of the same name.
Branches. Whilst the vessel is covered by the
it gives a small branch to that body and the duodenum. es.
The other branches are intestinal ; those from the left or
convex side of the vessel supply the jejunum and ileum
(rami intestinales) ; and those from the opposite side supply
the colon, and are named colic arteries.
― and pancreas branchaticodenal.
es to
intesThe pancreatico-duodenal branch (inferior) is of small size, and Pancreafter giving twigs to the pancreas, extends from left to right along duothe concavity of the duodenum, and anastomoses with the other duodenal branches.
The branches to the small intestine, viz. to the jejunum and ileum, Branchare about twelve in number, and pass from the left side of the small mesenteric artery, between the layers of the mesentery, to their tine .
destination. About two inches from their origin, or sooner, the Number
branches bifurcate, and each resulting branch unites with a similar
part from the collateral artery, so as to form a series of arches.
From the convexity of these arches other branches take origin, and ar- which divide and unite in the same way. This process is repeated ment in
four or five times between the origin and distribution of the arteries, but at each branching the size of the vessel diminishes. From
rangearches.
460 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
bution Distri- the last set of arches, branches pass on both sides of the intestine,
on the and anastomose round that tube, supplying its structure.
gut.
Arteries oflarge gut.
Ilio- colic
The branches to the large intestine are three in number,
ilio-colic, right colic, and middle colic arteries.
a. The ilio-colic artery, or the continuation of the mesenteric
branch trunk, descends to the cæcum and divides into branches that
encircle the head of the colon, like the tube of the small intestine.
A descending branch is distributed to the lower part of the ileum,
ends on the cæcum, and the vermiform appendix ; and an ascending branch
supplies the beginning of the ascending colon, and anastomoses
with the right colic artery.
cæcum.
Right colic b. The right colic artery is commonly an offset of the preceding,
branch instead of a separate branch from the trunk. Its course is to the supplies ascend right or ascending colon, near which it divides into an ascending
and a descending piece, and anastomoses with the ilio-colic artery
on the one side, and the middle colic on the other. This artery
gives ramifications to the ascending colon.
ing colon.
Middle colic c. The middle colic branch arises from the upper part of the
branch superior mesenteric artery, opposite the transverse meso- colon.
to trans- Entering between the layers of that fold of the peritoneum, the passes
verse colon.
one, the vessel divides into two large diverging branches :
right branch, anastomoses with the artery to the ascending colon,
and the other (left) inosculates on the descending colon with a
branch (left colic) of the inferior mesenteric artery. The intestinal branches to the transverse colon are supplied from these two before divisions, but before entering the gut they are united in arches
like those to the small intestine.
They form arches
entering intes- tine .
Supe- rior mevein. *
The superior mesenteric vein commences in that part of
senteric the intestinal tube to which the artery is distributed . The
branches of origin unite into one trunk that accompanies the
artery beneath the pancreas, and there joins the splenic vein
to form the vena portæ.
Mesen- teric glands The mesenteric lymphatic glands are numerous between
the layers of the mesentery, and are lodged in the intervals
between the branches of the vessels. Along the large intestine are a few lymphatic glands, meso- colic, which receive
receive the lymphatics of the large intestine. The lactiferous or
tics of chyliferous vessels of the small intestine, and the lymphatics
and of of the part of the large intestine supplied by the superior
of large mesenteric artery, pass through the mesenteric glands to
lymphasmall,
part
intes- tine. reach the thoracic duct.
INFERIOR MESENTERIC VESSELS. 461
After Dissec- tion of
teric.
Dissection of the inferior mesenteric vessels and nerves. —
the small intestines are drawn over to the right side, the inferior inferior
mesenteric artery will be observed on the front of the aorta, a little mesenabove the bifurcation of that vessel. The dissector should remove
with care the peritoneum from the vessel, and trace its branches
outwards to the remaining half of the large intestine. The part
of the artery that enters the pelvis will be afterwards dissected.
On the artery and its branches is the inferior mesenteric plexus of
The mesenteric vein is likewise to be traced upwards to
its junction with the splenic, or with the superior mesenteric vein.
On the aorta the student will meet with a plexus of nerves which
is not to be injured.
nerves.
mesen- The inferior mesenteric artery supplies branches to the Inferior
part of the large intestine beyond the transverse colon, and teric
communicating with the superior mesenteric, maintains the artery.
chain of anastomosis from the one end to the other of the
intestinal tube. This vessel is of smaller size than the
superior mesenteric, and arises from the aorta from one
to two inches above the bifurcation. At first the vessel Place of origin.
descends on the aorta, and then crosses the left common Course
iliac artery in its course to the pelvis, where it ends in
branches to the rectum (superior hæmorrhoidal). The and
following branches are furnished by it to the descending
colon and the sigmoid flexure.
branch- es .
colic The left colic artery ascends in front of the left kidney, and Left
divides into ascending and descending branches for the supply of branch
the descending colon. By the ascending branch it anastomoses descendwith the middle colic branch of the superior mesenteric artery.
to the
ing colon.
The sigmoid artery is distributed to the sigmoid flexure. Pass- Sigmoid
ing almost transversely outwards, it divides into branches that branch
anastomose above with the preceding colic branch, and below with
the hæmorrhoidal. Here, as in the rest of the intestinal tube, to sigarches are formed by the arteries destined for the supply of the dexure.
intestine.
The superior hæmorrhoidal artery enters between the layers of
the meso-rectum, and is distributed to the lower part of the great
intestine. It will be described in the dissection of the pelvis.
moid
Branch to rec- tum.
mesen- The inferior mesenteric vein begins in the part of the Inferior
great intestine to which its companion artery is distributed, teric
and ascends along the psoas muscle, away from the artery,
vein.
462 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
intestine
to open into the splenic vein beneath the pancreas. Occasionally it joins the superior mesenteric vein .
Veins of The mesenteric veins are without valves, and may be injected
without from the trunk to the branches like an artery. valves.
Lymph- atic Lymphatic glands are found by the side of the descending
glands. colon and the sigmoid flexure. The lymphatics from these
parts, after passing through the glands, enter the left lumbar
lymphatic glands.
Some plexuses ofthe sympa- thetic to the viscera.
Dissec- tion of the nerves.
SYMPATHETIC NERVE - . The following plexuses of the
sympathetic, which are derived from the solar plexus beneath
the stomach, are in connection with the vessels that are now
exposed, viz. superior mesenteric, aortic, spermatic, inferior
mesenteric, and hypogastric. The remaining parts of the
sympathetic nerve in the abdomen will be subsequently referred to.
Dissection. On the mesenteric arteries the dissector has
already exposed the plexuses of nerves that are distributed to the
intestinal tube beyond the duodenum. It now remains to trace on
the aorta itself the connecting nerves between the mesenteric
plexuses. By taking the peritoneum from the aorta between the
mesenteric vessels, the aortic plexus will appear ; and by removing
the serous membrane from the front of the sacrum, and following
downwards, over the iliac arteries, the nerves from the aortic
plexus and the lumbar ganglia, the dissector will arrive at the hypogastric plexus of the pelvis. From the upper part of the aortic
plexus an offset is to be followed along the spermatic artery ; this
may be done, on the left side, where the artery is partly exposed.
Supe- The superior mesenteric plexus is a large offset on the
senteric mesenteric artery and its branches, and is distributed to the plexus same extent of the intestinal tube as the vessel supplies.
The nerves closely surround the artery with a sheath, and
are at first covered by the pancreas. In the mesentery, near
the intestine, some of the nerves leave the arteries, and divide
and communicate with others before entering the gut.
rior meis on artery of same name.
Its se- The secondary plexuses are the same as the branches of the condary artery, viz. intestinal nerves to the small intestine ; and an iliocolic, a right colic, and a middle colic plexus to the large intestine.
plex- uses.
AORTIC AND MESENTERIC PLEXUSES. 463
plexus
rived
solar
The aortic plexus is a network of nerves, that covers the Aortic
aorta below the superior mesenteric artery. Superiorly it is deis continuous with the solar plexus, and inferiorly it ends in from
branches that cross the common iliac artery on each side, plexus.
and enter the hypogastric plexus of the pelvis. From it an Offsets .
offset is furnished to the two visceral arteries of the aorta
below the renal and superior mesenteric trunks, viz. to the
spermatic and inferior mesenteric arteries.
plexus is
marked
The aortic plexus is stronger on the sides than on the front of the This
aorta, in consequence of its receiving accessory branches from the best
lumbar ganglia, especially the left. At the upper part the plexus
seems to be derived from an offset on each side of the aorta, which of acrta.
is connected with the solar and renal plexuses.
on sides
matic The spermatic plexus is formed by an offset from both Sper.
the aortic and the renal plexus. The nerves from it run on plexus.
the spermatic artery to the testicle. In the cord they join
other filaments on the vas deferens.
In the female, the nerves on the spermatic (ovarian) artery are In fesupplied to the ovary and to the uterus.
male.
mesenplexus.
The inferior mesenteric plexus surrounds the trunk and Inferior
branches of the artery of the same name, and is supplied to teric
the same part of the intestinal tube as the artery is distributed to. This plexus is furnished from the left part of the
aortic plexus, and the nerves composing it are whiter and
larger than in either of the preceding offsets of the sympathetic. Near the intestine (sigmoid flexure) the branching Nerves
of the nerves and the union of the contiguous twigs are well like the
marked.
join
vessels.
condary
of the
The following secondary plexuses are supplied to the arteries of Se- the same name, and are distributed like them to the intestine, viz. plexuses.
the left colic, the sigmoid, and the superior hæmorrhoidal plexus.
On the intestinal tube the nerves of one plexus join those of an- Union
other. Thus the superior mesenteric joins by one end the nerves nerves
to the duodenum, and by the other the nerves to the large intes- on the tine from the inferior mesenteric plexus. And the inferior mesen- tinal
teric plexus communicates below with branches to the rectum from
the hypogastric centre.
intestube.
The hypogastric plexus, or the large prævertebral centre Hypo
464 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
plexus.
Situa tion .
In it aortic
gastric for the supply of nerves to the viscera of the pelvis, is
situate in front of the upper part of the sacrum and beneath
the peritoneum. It is developed more on each side than in
the centre ; and the nerves, which are large and flat, have a
plexiform arrangement, but without any ganglionic masses
on them. By its upper part the plexus receives on each
plexus side the termination of the aortic plexus ; and it is joined by
some filaments from one or two of the upper sacral ganglia.
Inferiorly the plexus ends in two parts, right and left, the offsets last being the largest, which are continued forwards with
to pelvic the branches of the internal iliac artery to the viscera of the
pelvis.
ends ;
and from it
are sent
viscera.
Parts around aorta and cava.
Dissec- tion to see them .
Aorta lies in
of spine.
Parts around.
CONNECTIONS OF THE AORTA AND VENA CAVA.
The connections of the abdominal aorta and of the vena
cava may be next looked to before the viscera are removed
from the body.
-
Dissection. —The part of the abdominal aorta below the origin
of the superior mesenteric artery is laid bare by the previous dissection. To see it higher up, it will be necessary to detach the
great omentum from the stomach, without injuring the gastroepiploic artery, and after raising the stomach and the spleen to
remove the peritoneum from the surface of the pancreas. A short
arterial trunk (cæliac axis) above the pancreas is not to be cleaned
now, otherwise the nerves about it would be destroyed. The vena
cava will be exposed at the same time as the aorta.
The aorta enters the abdomen between the pillars of the
middle diaphragm, and divides into iliac arteries opposite the left
side of the fourth lumbar vertebra. At the diaphragm the
vessel occupies the middle line of the spine, but it gradually
inclines to the left as it descends. In the abdomen the aorta
is covered at first by the solar plexus, and by the pancreas
and the splenic vein ; still lower (beyond the superior mesenteric artery) by the duodenum, and by the left renal vein ;
and thence to its termination by the peritoneum and the
aortic plexus. The aorta lies on the lumbar vertebræ, and
Branch to its right side is the vena cava. Its branches are fur- es .
nished to the viscera and to the wall of the abdomen, but
these will be enumerated farther on.
BRITISH
ISE
CONNECTIONS OF THE DUODENUM. 465
cava ;
and conside of
aorta,
The vena cava inferior commences on the right side of Vena
the fifth lumbar vertebra by the union of the common iliac extent
veins, and reaches from that spot to the heart. In the abdo- nections ;
men this venous trunk is placed on the right side of the is by the
vertebral column, and is concealed by the same parts as the the
aorta. As high as the crus of the diaphragm it is close to
the aorta, but above that spot it ascends on the right of the except
crus, and is imbedded in the posterior part of the liver.
Lastly, it leaves the abdomen by an aperture in the tendinous part of the diaphragm, on the right of the aortic
opening. The vena cava is joined by some branches from Branchthe abdominal viscera, and by others corresponding to the
branches of the aorta that are supplied to the parietes of
the abdomen.
above.
es .
CONNECTIONS OF THE DUODENUM AND PANCREAS.
The situation and the connections of the duodenum and
pancreas should be next examined.
Remove intes- Dissection. — To see distinctly the duodenum and the pancreas,
it will be necessary for the dissector to take out the intestinal tube, tine
beyond the duodenum, in the following way : one ligature is to be
placed on the upper part of the jejunum, another on the lower
end of the sigmoid flexure of the colon, and the gut is to be cut
through at the points at which it is tied . The detached piece of
the intestinal tube is to be removed by cutting through the vessels
and the peritoneum that connect it to the wall of the abdomen,
and is to be set aside for examination when the body is turned. to see
To clean the viscera, and the cœliac vessels and nerves, the student blood vessels,
should moderately inflate the stomach and duodenum from the duodecut extremity of the latter. By turning upwards the stomach the num,
student will be able to trace the pancreas from the spleen on the and panone hand to the duodenum on the other, and by raising the duodenum, to find the common bile duct between it and the head of
the pancreas.
-
the
creas.
of duo- DUODENUM. The first part of the small intestine, or the Extent
duodenum, begins at the small end of the stomach, and, denum
crossing the spinal column, ends on the left side of the
second lumbar vertebra. It takes a curved direction around course
the head of the pancreas, and occupies the right hypochon- ation.
H H
;
and situ-
466 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Divi- sions.
First part is
and is move- able.
driac, the right lumbar, and the umbilical region of the
abdomen. Its peritoneal covering is incomplete and peculiar (p. 457.), and its course around the pancreas is divided
into three parts superior transverse, vertical, and inferior
transverse.
-
The superior transverse part is free and moveable, like
shortest, the stomach ; it measures about two inches in length, and is
directed from the pylorus to the neck of the gall bladder,
ascending slightly in its progress from one point to another.
In front it is overlapped by the liver, as well as by the gall
bladder when this is distended ; and behind it are the bile
duct and the vena porta.
Second part is fixed,
The vertical part is fixed almost immoveably by the peritoneum and the pancreas. It is nearly three inches in
length, and descends from the gall bladder as far as the third
lumbar vertebra. Superficial to this part is the right bend
and rests of the colon, and beneath it are the kidney and its vessels,
kidney. whilst on its inner side is the head of the pancreas, with the
common bile duct. The ducts of the pancreas and liver
pour their contents into this piece of the duodenum.
on the
The third part is the long- est,
and is move- able.
Parts around it.
The inferior transverse part is the longest of the three,
and is continued across the spinal column to end in the
jejunal portion of the small intestine. As it crosses the
spine it corresponds to the attachment of the transverse
meso-colic fold of the peritoneum, being between its layers,
and has the following connections with the parts around :
In front of it are the superior mesenteric vessels, with their
plexus of nerves ; beneath it lie the aorta and vena cava,
with the pillars of the diaphragm, and sometimes the left
renal vein is between it and the aorta ; above it is the
pancreas.
Form and situ- PANCREAS.
-
Of an
The pancreas is situate behind the stomach,
ation of and has numerous and complicated connections.
elongated form, it extends across the spine from the spleen
to the duodenum, and occupies the left hypochondriac, the
umbilical, and the right lumbar region of the abdomen.
the pan- creas .
The gland is covered anteriorly by the ascending layer of
by the the transverse meso-colon, and is in contact posteriorly with
Its con- nections
surfaces
CHYLO-POIETIC VESSELS. 467
the aorta, the vena cava, and the pillars of the diaphragm ;
it likewise conceals the splenic vein and the commencement
of the vena porta. Projecting above the upper border, near borders
the centre, is the arterial trunk of the coeliac axis ; to the
left of that vessel, along the same border, is the splenic
artery, whilst to the right of it are the hepatic artery and
the first part of the duodenum. At the lower border, the
superior mesenteric vessels are seen emerging opposite the
coeliac axis, but to the right of that spot is the third part of
the duodenum, and to the left of it the inferior mesenteric
vein ascending to join the splenic. The left end or the tail and
of the pancreas touches the spleen, and rests on the left ties.
kidney ; and the right extremity, or the head of the gland,
is received into the concavity of the duodenum, the two
being partly separated behind by the common bile duct, and
in front by the pancreatico-duodenal artery.
extremiVESSELS AND NERVES OF THE CHYLO-POIETIC VISCERA.
The arteries that are furnished to the stomach, duodenum,
liver, pancreas, and spleen are derived from the coeliac axis
(a branch of the aorta), which subdivides into coronary,
hepatic, and splenic branches. The veins corresponding to
these vessels are collected into one trunk- -the vena portæ ;
and the nerves are supplied from the vagus and the sympathetic nerves.
-
dissect
axis
Dissection. The vessels that are now to be learnt have been in How to
part laid bare by the previous dissection, and the preparation of coeliac
them will be completed by the removal of the cellular membrane
and the peritoneum. Before beginning his task the dissector
should take care that the liver is well raised, and in the execution
ofit let him spare the plexuses of nerves that surround the vessels.
Starting from the cœliac axis, the student may first follow to the and its
left side the small coronary artery, and clear its branches to the branchœsophagus and stomach. Next the hepatic artery, with the vena
porta and the bile duct, are to be traced to the liver and the gall
bladder, and a considerable branch of it is to be pursued beneath
the pylorus, together with its branches to the stomach, duodenum,
and pancreas. Lastly, the splenic artery that lies along the
upper border of the pancreas is to be cleaned, and its branches to
several
es.
HH 2
468 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
This
the pancreas, stomach, and spleen defined. The veins are dissected
for the most part with the arteries, but the origin of the vena
portæ is to be made evident beneath the pancreas.
The CŒLIAC AXIS is the first visceral branch of the abdo- trunk minal aorta, and arises from that vessel between the pillars supplies thethree
ing branch- es :-
follow- of the diaphragm. It is a short thick trunk, about half an
inch long, which projects above the upper border of the
pancreas, and is surrounded by the nerves of the solar plexus
of the sympathetic. Its branches -coronary, hepatic, and
splenic, radiate from the trunk (whence the name axis)
to their destination to the viscera in the upper part of the
abdomen.
Coro- nary,
which gives
--
1. The coronary artery is the smallest of the three
branches, and passes between the layers of the little omentum to the left orifice of the stomach. At that spot it furnishes some œsophageal branches, and then turns from left to
right, along the upper border of the stomach, to anastomose
with a branch (pyloric) from the hepatic artery. Its offsets
to the oesophagus and the stomach are thus disposed of:-
a. The œsophageal branches ascend on the gullet through the
the phagusso- opening in the diaphragm, and after supplying that tube, anasto- mose on it with branches from the thoracic aorta.
offsets to
and to the sto- mach.
Splenic artery
supplies the spleen,
the panb. The gastric branches are given to both sides of the stomach
as the artery lies along it, and those to the left end communicate
with twigs (vasa brevia) of the splenic artery.
2. The splenic artery is the largest branch of the cœliac
axis in the adult. It is a tortuous artery, and runs almost
horizontally to the left, along the upper border of the pancreas, to reach the spleen. Near this body it divides into its
terminal branches (splenic), which are about six in number
(from four to ten), and enter the substance of the spleen by
the concave surface, towards the stomach. In its course the
vessel is accompanied by the splenic vein, which is below it,
and it distributes branches to the pancreas, and to the
stomach.
a. Pancreatic branches. -Numerous small branches are supplied
creasby to the gland as the artery lies along it. And one of these, art.
pancreatica magna, arises near the left end of the gland, and runs
large and small twigs,
to the right with the duct, in the substance of the viscus.
BRANCHES OF THE CELIAC AXIS. 469
stomach b. The branches for the stomach arise from the divisions of the and the
artery near the spleen. Some of these, vasa brevia, turn back- by vasa
wards to the left end of the stomach between the layers of the brevia
gastro-splenic omentum, and ramify in the coats of that organ.
Another branch, art. gastro- epiploica sinistra, which is larger than the and left
others, turns to the right, along the great curvature of the stomach, epiploic .
between the layers of the great omentum, and inosculates with the
right gastro- epiploic branch of the hepatic artery. This artery
distributes twigs to both surfaces of the stomach, as well as between the pieces of peritoneum forming the great omentum.
gastroartery ;
3. The hepatic artery was the largest, in the fetus, of the Hepatic
three branches into which the cœliac axis divides ; but in the
adult it is intermediate in size between the other two, and is
to the encircled by the largest plexus of nerves. In its course to courses
the liver, the vessel is first bent to the right towards the liver,
small end of the stomach, where it supplies its principal
branches (superior pyloric and gastro- duodenal) . It then
ascends between the layers of the little omentum, on the
left side of the bile duct and vena portæ, and divides near in which
the transverse fissure of the liver into two large terminal
arteries the right and left hepatic. Its branches are dis- and sup.
tributed not only to the liver, but freely to the stomach, the
duodenum, and the pancreas.
-
it ends,
plies
the sto- a. The superior pyloric branch descends to the upper border of offsets to
the stomach, and running from right to left anastomoses with the mach.
coronary artery ; it distributes small arterial twigs to both the
anterior and the posterior aspect of the stomach.
es to the
and
num ,
b. The gastro- duodenal artery is a short trunk of considerable Branchsize, which descends beneath the duodenum near the pylorus, and stomach,
divides at the lower border of the intestine into two branches : duodeone for the stomach (right gastro- epiploic) , and one for the pan- viz.
creas and the duodenum (pancreatico- duodenal) . As this trunk
lies beneath the duodenum it supplies small inferior pyloric inferior pyloric,
branches to the small end of the stomach.
gastro- The right gastric epiploic branch (art. gast. epiploica dextra) right
turns from right to left along the great curvature of the stomach, epiploic,
between the pieces of the great omentum, and inosculates with the
left gastro- epiploic branch of the splenic artery. Some branches
are given upwards from it on the surfaces of the stomach, and
others downwards between the layers of the omentum.
The pancreatico-duodenal branch (superior) continues along the and creatico- ran- HH 3
470 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
duode- nal .
Branch- es to the liver ;
one for
curve of the duodenum, lying between it and the pancreas, and
anastomoses below with the pancreatic duodenal branch (inferior)
of the superior mesenteric artery (p. 459.) . Both the duodenum and the pancreas receive offsets from this vessel. Another small
artery has a similar position and distribution on the posterior aspect ofthe viscera.
c. The hepatic branches sink into the liver at the transverse
fissure, and ramify in its substance.
The right branch is divided when about to enter the liver at the
theright right end of the transverse fissure, and supplies the following
small artery to the gall bladder. The cystic artery, on reaching
the neck of the gall bladder, divides into two twigs that ramify
on the opposite surfaces, and are distributed to its coats.
gall bladder,
and one for the The left branch is smaller than the other, and enters the liver at
left lobe. the left end of the tranverse fissure. A branch to the Spigelian
lobe of the liver arises from this division of the artery.
Three veins,
viz.-
coronary from the
VEINS. - The veins of the viscera of this part of the abdomen are three in number, viz. the superior coronary, the
splenic, and the portal vein.
The superior coronary vein lies along the upper border of
stomach ; the stomach. It begins in the oesophagus and the left part
of the stomach, and joins the vena portæ at the pylorus.
splenic from the The splenic vein is of large size, and is formed by the
spleen, union of branches that issue from the spleen. It takes much
the same course as the artery, but is lower than it, and runs
beneath the pancreas to the front of the cava, where it joins
the superior mesenteric vein to form the vena porta.
stomach,
creas .
Between its origin and termination it receives branches corand pan- responding to the following arteries, vasa brevia, left gastroepiploic, and pancreatic ; it is also joined by the inferior mesenteric vein about the middle of its length.
Vena portæ resem- bles an
its
The vena porta conveys to the liver the blood that has
been circulated through the following chylo- poietic viscera,
artery in viz. the alimentary canal, the pancreas, and the spleen. This
branch- vein commences by roots in the viscera above mentioned,
like any other vein, but it is deficient in valves, and ramifies
through the structure of the liver in the same manner as an
artery.
ing.
Its ori- gin,
The vein results from the union of the splenic and superior
mesenteric veins, and its origin is placed in front of the vena
SYMPATHETIC NERVE. 471
cava, but beneath the pancreas, and about two inches from
its right end. This vessel is about four inches long, and is length ,
directed upwards in the small omentum, behind the bile duct and terand the hepatic artery, to the transverse fissure of the liver, tion.
where it divides into a right and a left branch.
minaIn its course it is joined by the coronary or gastric vein, and by Accesthe cystic vein near the liver.
The right branch is sometimes joined by the cystic vein, and
enters the transverse fissure to ramify in the liver.
sory branch- es.
Termi- nal branchThe and left.
left branch is distributed to the left part of the liver, and es right
gives a small branch to the Spigelian lobe of that viscus.
mon heduct ;
BILE DUCTS. -Two ducts issue at the transverse fissure Comof the liver, one from each lobe, and unite to form the patic
common hepatic duct. The excretory tube, thus formed, is how
an inch and a half long, and after being joined by the duct
of the gall bladder it is named the common bile duct.
formed.
mon bile
length
course.
The common bile duct (ductus communis choledochus), Comwhich is formed as above said, is about three inches long, duct ;
and descends almost vertically beneath the upper transverse and
piece of the duodenum, and then between the pancreas and
the vertical piece of the duodenum, to open into this part of
the intestine at its inner margin, and above its middle.
Before piercing the coats of the intestine, it is commonly Termijoined by the pancreatic duct, but the two may enter the
duodenum separately. Whilst in the small omentum, the
duct lies to the right of the hepatic artery, and somewhat
before the portal vein.
nation.
SYMPATHETIC AND VAGUS NERVES.
-
disposi- SYMPATHETIC NERVE. In the abdomen the sympathetic General
nerve consists, as in the thorax, of a gangliated cord on each tion in
side of the vertebral column, and of prevertebral centres or domen.
plexuses, which furnish branches to the viscera.
the ablarge
solar
Two prevertebral plexuses are found in the abdomen. Two
One of these is the solar or epigastric plexus, which is placed centres,
behind the stomach, and supplies nerves to all the viscera
above the cavity of the pelvis. The other is the hypogastric and hyplexus, which is situate in the pelvis, and distributes nerves tric .
pogasни 4
472 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Part to be seen in the abdo- men.
How to
to the pelvic viscera. The offsets or secondary plexuses of
these centres accompany bloodvessels to their destination.
The visceral part of the sympathetic nerve that remains
to be seen, consists of the great epigastric centre, viz. the
semilunar ganglia and solar plexus, with their offsets.
Dissection. To expose the great prevertebral centre above
lay bare mentioned, let the air escape from the stomach and duodenum ;
plexus. and after cutting through the portal vein, the common bile duct,
solar
Semi- lunar ganglia.
Follow the end- ing ofthe vagus nerves.
Solar
appearand the gastro-duodenal artery behind the pylorus, turn the stomach, the duodenum, and the pancreas over to the left side. After
the liver has been well raised, and some cellular tissue taken away,
the vena cava appears. The vein is to be cut across above the
junction of the renal vein with it, and the lower end is to be drawn down with hooks.
Beneath the vein the dissector will find the large reddish semilunar ganglion of the right side. From its inner part he should
trace the numerous nerves which form the solar plexus around the
coeliac and superior mesenteric arteries ; and should unravel the
offsets around those arteries with their secondary plexuses. From
the outer part of the ganglion branches are to be traced to the
kidney, the supra-renal body, and the diaphragmatic arteries. At
the upper part of the ganglion the dissector will observe the large
splanchnic nerve, and deeper than it, one or two other smaller
splanchnic nerves that throw themselves into the solar and renal
plexuses. Mixed up with the nerves of the solar plexus are
numerous lymphatic glands and a dense cellular membrane, which
require to be removed with care.
The student should now trace the ending of the pneumogastric
nerves on the stomach. The left nerve will be found in front
near the upper border ; and the right nerve will be seen at the
opposite aspect. Branches are to be traced from the right nerve
to the plexus of the sympathetic by the side of the cœliac axis, and
from the left to the hepatic plexus.
The EPIGASTRIC or SOLAR PLEXUS is the largest of the
plexus ; prevertebral plexuses of the sympathetic, and furnishes
nerves to all the viscera of the abdomen above the pelvis.
It is a large network of nerves and ganglia, which lies in
front of the aorta and pillars of the diaphragm, and extends
from the supra-renal capsule of one side to that of the other.
It surrounds the coeliac axis and the superior mesenteric
artery, and extends downwards to the pancreas. The plexus
ance,
extent ;
SOLAR PLEXUS AND BRANCHES. 473
is connected on each side with the large and small splanchnic
nerves, and it is joined also by some twigs from the right
pneumogastric nerve. Large offsets are furnished to the gives
different viscera along the vessels.
offsets on blood vessels .
on each SemiEach is ganglia ;
lunar
tion ;
The semilunar ganglia of the solar plexus, one
side, are the largest ganglia in the whole body.
situate at the upper and outer part of the plexus, close to
the supra-renal capsule, and on the side of the pillar of the
diaphragm. The ganglion of the right side is beneath the situa
vena cava. Irregular in shape, the mass is sometimes oval, form.
and at other times divided into smaller ganglia. From the
outer side nerves are directed to the kidney and superrenal Nerves
capsule, and to the inner side the cords of the solar plexus ed with
are connected. By the upper end it is joined by the great
splanchnic nerve.
connecteach .
offsets of
plexus.
Offsets ofthe plexus. · -The nerves supplied to the viscera Several
run on the branches of the aorta, forming plexuses around the
them ; thus there are cœliac, mesenteric, renal, spermatic,
and other plexuses. The diaphragmatic artery has also a
separate plexus on it.
to the Diaphragmatic plexus. —The nerves that form this plexus Plexus
come from the upper and outer part of the semilunar dia- phragm ganglion. They are placed at first on the phrenic artery,
but they soon leave it to enter the substance of the diaphragm.
A communication takes place between the phrenic nerve of
the cervical plexus and these branches of the sympathetic.
On the under surface of the diaphragm is a small ganglion has a
ganglion where the spmpathetic nerve joins the spinal nerve, and from it on right
filaments are supplied to the vena cava and to the supra- renal
body. The ganglion is absent on the left side.-(Swan. )
side.
renal The supra-renal nerves are directed almost horizontally Supraoutwards to the supra-renal body which they enter at the nerves.
upper part. One of the splanchnic nerves communicates
with this plexus.
plexus The renal plexus is derived from the semilunar ganglion, Renal
and from the outer part of the solar plexus, and it is further
joined by one of the two smallest splanchnic nerves. The
nerves surround the renal artery, having small ganglia on
them, and enter the kidney with the vessels. An offset is
474 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
joins sperm- atic.
Coeliac plexus
given from the renal nerves to the spermatic plexus (p.
463.).
The cœliac plexus is a direct continuation forwards of the
solar plexus around the artery named cœliac axis. It is
further joined by the small splanchnic nerve on each side,
and by an offset from the right pneumogastric nerve. -
divides (Swan. ) The plexus surrounds the artery, and divides, like
artery, it, into three parts - coronary, splenic, and hepatic.
like the
into co- ronary
splenic,
and hepatic .
a. The coronary plexus accompanies the coronary artery to the
upper border of the stomach which it supplies. It communicates
with the left vagus nerve, and with the sympathetic on the pyloric
artery.
b. The splenic plexus surrounds the splenic artery, and is conducted by it to the substance of the spleen. It furnishes, like the
artery, pancreatic nerves, and other nerves to the stomach along
the left gastro- epiploic artery. This plexus is joined by twigs
from the left semilunar ganglion, and by an offset from the right
pneumogastric nerve.
c. The hepatic plexus is continued on the vena portæ, the hepatic
artery, and the bile duct to the transverse fissure of the liver,
where it enters the liver and ramifies on the vessels. Whilst
ascending in the small omentum the plexus is joined on the left
side by offsets from the left vagus and phrenic nerves.-(Swan.)
The last Secondary plexuses are furnished around the branches of the
second- hepatic artery, which have the same name and distribution as the
ary ones, vessels . The following are these plexuses : -
has these
pyloric, A pyloric plexus accompanies the pyloric artery to the upper gastro- border of the stomach. A gastro-duodenal plexus surrounds the duodepancre- atic,
nal, artery ofthat name, and divides like it into two plexuses—gastro- epiploic, epiploic (right) and pancreatico-duodenal : the former meets nerves
from the splenic plexus, and the latter communicates with the
superior mesenteric plexus on the end ofthe duodenum. A cystic
cystic. plexus is distributed to the gall bladder with its artery.
and
Ending of left vagus
The remaining offsets of the solar plexus, viz. superior
and inferior mesenteric, aortic, and spermatic, have been
already described (page 462. ) ; but the derivation of the
superior mesenteric and aortic plexuses from the epigastric
centre is now seen.
Ending ofthe vagus nerve. -In the abdomen the pneumogastric nerves are distributed to the stomach. The left
VAGUS AND SPLANCHNIC NERVES. 475
divides into branches, that extend over the front and along
the small curvature of the stomach ; these join, moreover, the
sympathetic, and give offsets to the hepatic plexus. The
right nerve is distributed to the posterior surface of the and
stomach, and communicates with the coeliac and the splenic
plexus.
—
right.
oflarge
nic
Ending of the splanchnic nerves. The large nerve per- Ending
forates the crus of the diaphragm, and generally ends alto- splanchgether in the semilunar ganglion, but it may give filaments nerve,
to the renal plexus and to the supra-renal body. The small small,
nerve comes through the same opening in the diaphragm as
the preceding, and ends in the coeliac plexus ; but it enters
the renal plexus if the smallest splanchnic nerve is absent. and
The smallest nerve, after piercing the diaphragm, joins the
renal plexus.
smallest.
for turn- Dissection.- The viscera are now to be removed from the abdo- Prepare
men in order that the body may be turned for the dissection of ing the body.
the back and other parts. The stomach and the spleen with
the duodenum and the pancreas may be readily taken away when
the œsophagus has been cut through near the diaphragm, and the
vessels and nerves they receive have been divided. The liver is
to be removed by cutting across its ligaments and dividing the
vena cava between its posterior border and the diaphragm. At the
same time the right kidney is to be taken out with its supra-renal
body; and lastly the dissector should remove the left testicle by
cutting through the cord.
tions for
sector.
Supposing the body now to lie with the face downwards Direcfor the usual time, the dissector will first examine the dispo- the dissition of the fascia lumborum, or the posterior aponeurosis
of the transversalis abdominis muscle, which is described in
the DISSECTION OF THE BACK, page 363. Afterwards he
should occupy the rest of the time in examining the form
and structure of the viscera, as in the following section.
476 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
SECTION IV.
ANATOMY OF THE VISCERA OF THE ABDOMEN.
THE STOMACH.
tion .
Defini- THE stomach is a dilated pouch between the oesophagus and
the small intestine, into which the food is received to be
changed into chyme.
Separate and blow up the
Dissection. ― - To see the form of the stomach, detach the spleen
and cut through the duodenum near the pylorus. Then blow up
stomach. the stomach moderately and clean the surface.
Form,
direc- tion ,
size,
divi- sions.
Left end
and right
cardiac
Form and Divisions. - The stomach is somewhat conical
in form, and is directed obliquely across the abdomen, with
the base or wider part turned to the left, and the apex to the
right side. Its size varies much in different bodies, and is
sometimes much diminished by a constriction in its centre.
When the stomach is moderately distended, it is about twelve
inches long and four wide. This viscus presents for examination two ends, two orifices, two surfaces, and two borders or curves.
Extremities. The left end or tuberosity (fundus ventriculi) is the largest part of the stomach, and projects about
three inches to the left of the oesophagean opening. The
right or pyloric end is much smaller than the other, is cylindrical, and forms the apex of the cone, to which the stomach
is likened.
- Openings. The left opening (cardiac), which communicates with the oesophagus, is at the highest part of the
stomach, and is funnel- shaped towards the cavity of the
and py- organ. The right or inferior opening (pylorus) opens into
the duodenum, and is guarded internally by a valve. At the
same spot the stomach is slightly constricted externally,
loric open.
ings ;
last has
a valve. where a firm circular ring may be felt.
Surfaces rounded Surfaces.
- The surfaces are somewhat flattened when
or flat. the stomach is empty, but rounded when it is distended.
The parts in contact with the sides have been referred to
(p. 448.).
STRUCTURE OF THE STOMACH. 477
-
border ;
border,
Borders. The upper border, or small curve of the Upper
stomach, is concave towards the left opening, but convex at
the opposite end ; and the lower border, or large curve, is lower
convex, except near the right end, where it is concave.
The concavity of the one border corresponds to the con- differvexity of the other. An arterial arch and a fold of peri- outline.
toneum (omentum) extend along each border.
STRUCTURE. -
ence in
strata
the stoIn the wall of the stomach are found four Four
layers or coats, viz. a serous, a muscular, a cellular or are in
fibrous, and a mucous, together with vessels, nerves, and mach.
lymphatics.
- rous coat
and ad1. Serous coat. -The peritoneum gives a complete cover- The ɛeing to the stomach, and is adherent to the surface except at is thin
the margins, where an interval exists corresponding to the herent.
attachment of the small and the large omentum. In this
space are contained the vessels, nerves, and lymphatics of the
stomach, surrounded by cellular membrane. During distension of the stomach, the space above mentioned is
destroyed.
muscuis made
2. The muscular coat will be exposed by the removal of The
the serous covering. It consists of three sets of muscular lar coat
fibres, viz. longitudinal, circular, and oblique, which lie from up of
without inwards in the order mentioned. The fibres are unstriped, with a few exceptions in the outer layer.
dinal,
a. The longitudiual fibres are derived from those of the œsopha- longitugus ; they spread over the surfaces, and are continued onwards to
the pylorus and the small intestine. These fibres are most marked
along the borders, particularly the smaller one, and at the pylorus
they are much stronger than in the centre of the stomach.
b. The circular fibres form the middle stratum of the muscular circular ,
coat, and will be seen by removing the longitudinal fibres, especially near the pylorus. They reach from the cardiac to the
pyloric end of the stomach, but at the latter part they are most
numerous and strongest, and form a firm ring around the pyloric
opening.
c. The oblique fibres are continuous with the circular or deep and ob- lique layer of fibres of the œsophagus, and form only part of a layer in fibres.
the gastric wall. On the left of the cardiac orifice they are seen
to arch over the great end of the stomach, and then to spread out
478 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
The cel- lular
thin, but
on the anterior and posterior surfaces, gradually disappearing on
them.
3. Fibrous or submucous coat. -By removing the muscoat is cular layer over a small spot, the cellular or fibrous coat will
firm . appear as a white shining stratum. Formed of fine areolar
tissue, this coat gives strength to the stomach, and serves as
a bed in which the vessels and nerves ramify before their
final distribution to the mucous coat. If a small opening is
made in this membrane, the mucous coat projects through it
when the stomach is distended with air.
Mucous coat ;
feel,
folds,
4. The mucous coat will come into view on cutting open
the stomach, but the appearances about to be described can
be seen only in a recent stomach.
This coat is a thickish layer, smooth and soft to the
touch, which, in the natural and healthy condition, is found
colour, of a pale rose colour, soon after death. In infancy the natural redness is greater than in childhood or in old age ; and
in the empty state of the stomach the membrane is less vascular than during digestion. When the stomach is contracted, the membrane is thrown into numerous wavy lines
or ruga, which are longitudinal along the great curve,
towards the pylorus. The thickness of the mucous membrane ness ; is greatest near the pylorus, and here it forms a fold opposite
disposi- the muscular ring, which assists in closing the opening. If
pylorus. this membrane and its submucous layer are removed from
the pyloric part of the stomach, the ring of muscular fibres
(sphincter of the pylorus) will be more perfectly seen.
thicktion at
On the surface Microscopic structure of the mucous membrane. —With
are pits the aid of a lens the surface of the mucous membrane will or al.
veoli ;
their size,
shape,
be seen to be marked all over by shallow depressions or
alveoli, which measure from th to th of an inch across.
These depressions are occupied by the apertures of minute
tubes. Generally hexagonal or polygonal in outline, these
hollows become larger and more elongated towards the small
and ap- end of the stomach. Near the pylorus, too, the margins of
the alveoli project, and are irregular, so as to resemble rudipylorus . mentary villi .
pear- ance near
The By means of a thin section under the microscope, the
made up membrane is seen to be formed almost altogether of minute texture
STRUCTURE OF THE SMALL GUT. 479
of small vertical tubes that lie side by side, and project into the sub- oftubes
mucous cellular tissue. Measuring from th to th of an size ;
inch in length, the tubes open on the surface of the stomach
both in the alveoli and in the inter-alveolar spaces, but are
closed at the opposite or deep end. For the most part they mostly
are straight, but towards the pylorus they become longer, with
and somewhat sacculated at the deep extremity. Their deep
interior is lined by columnar epithelium, which becomes lined by
spheroidal in the bottom of the tube ; and filling them is a lium ;
colourless fluid, which contains a granular material.
straight
closed
end,
epithe
contain fluid .
cles .
Over the surface of the mucous membrane small lentiform Follifollicles are scattered, which have a depression in the centre.
These are in greatest number near the pyloric end of the stomach, and are most marked in young children.
A lial co- columnar epithelium covers the surface of the mucous Epithemembrane, and enters the small tubes, as before mentioned. vering.
On some parts of the surface of the stomach, the scaly or
pavemental epithelium is also found.
Blood- vessels and nerves of the stomach.-The different arteries Arteries,
of the stomach, after supplying the muscular coat, ramify in the
submucous cellular tissue, and terminate in the mucous coat.
From that anastomosis in the submucous stratum small offsets are
continued on the tubes to the inner surface of the mucous membrane, where they form a net- work. The veins begin in the veins ,
mucous coat, receive branches from the muscular coat, and deliver lymph.
their blood into the portal system. Two layers of lymphatics, super- atics ,
ficial and deep, are found in the stomach. The nerves are derived and
from the pneumogastric and sympathetic, as before said, p.474.
nerves.
SMALL INTESTINE.
ters.
The three parts into which the small intestine is divided, Characviz. duodenum, jejunum, and ileum, have the following
differences in their characters : -
and fix- The duodenum measures about as much as the breadth of Length
twelve fingers (about ten inches), and is more fixed than the edness.
rest of the intestinal tube. It is wider in capacity than Width
either the jejunum or the ileum, and its muscular coat is
also thicker. Into it the common bile duct and the pancre- Ducts
atic duct pour their contents.
and thick- ness.
entering it.
480 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Length.
arbiThejejunum and the ileum together are about twenty feet
long, and are connected to the mesentery by one border.
There is not any perceptible difference between the termiDivision nation of the one and the commencement of the other, but
trary. two fifths of the length are assigned to the jejunum, and
Differ- three fifths to the ileum. At the ends, however, a marked
the ends. difference may be observed, for the upper part of the jejunum
is thicker and more vascular than the lower part of the ileum,
and the width of the tube is also greater.
ences at
Wall has same strata as the sto- mach.
Serous coat
STRUCTURE. —In the small intestine the wall is formed
by the same number of layers as in the stomach, viz. serous,
muscular, cellular, and mucous ; and these have the same
position from within outwards. These different structures
are to be examined on the duodenum, and on pieces taken
from the upper part of the jejunum, from the lower end of
the ileum, and from the middle of the small intestine.
pieces of intestine, when obtained, are to be distended
with air.
The
1. The serous coat is closely connected with the subjacent
muscular layer. To the greater part of the small intestine
(jejunum and ileum) it furnishes an entire covering, except
like that at the posterior aspect, where the vessels enter. At that
stomach, spot a space exists, resembling those at the borders of the
stomach, where the peritoneum is reflected off to form the
except mesentery. The peritoneum surrounds the duodenum only
duode- partly ; this peculiarity has been described at p. 457.
ofthe
in the
num.
Muscu- lar coat 2. The muscular coat is constructed of two sets of fibres,
is form a superficial or longitudinal, and a deep or circular. The
ed by a fibres are pale in colour, and are unstriped.
longitu- dinal
and a
circular
a. The longitudinal fibres will be seen only by a careful removal
of the peritoneum, for they are generally taken away with that
membrane. They form a thin layer, which is most marked at the
free border of the gut.
b. The circular fibres are much more distinct than the others,
layer. and give the chief strength to the muscular coat : they do not
appear to form complete rings around the tube of the intestine.
Cellular 3. The cellular coat has the same position with respect to coat like
that in other parts, and the same use, as the corresponding layer in
VALVULE CONNIVENTES. 481
the stomach.
in it.
By the removal of a part of the muscular
stratum, this submucous layer will come into view. In the Glands
upper part of the duodenum the student should seek the
small compound glands, those of Brunner, which are imbedded in this tissue. They lie beneath the mucous membrane, and will be found when the muscular coat is taken
away.
coat ;
ness,
4. The mucous coat will be ready for examination when Mucous
the pieces of intestine are opened and washed ; but the gut
should be cut along the line of attachment of the mesentery,
so as to avoid Peyer's glands on the opposite side . The
lining membrane of the small intestine is thicker and more thickvascular at the beginning than at the ending of the tube,
and is marked by numerous prominent folds ( valvulæ conni- folds,
ventes). The surface of the membrane is soft, and is covered
with small points (villi). Occupying the substance of the and
mucous coat are numerous glands ; and covering the whole surface .
is a columnar epithelium.
villous
Folds or valves ;
ment,
The valvula conniventes (valves of Kerkring) are permanent folds of the mucous membrane, which are arranged arrangecircularly, one after another, along the intestine, and project
into the alimentary mass. Crescentic in form, they extend length,
round the intestine for half or two thirds of its circle, and
some end in bifurcated extremities. Larger and smaller size and
folds are met with, sometimes alternating ; and the larger
ones are about two inches long, with two thirds of an inch
in depth towards the centre. Each valve is formed of a how
doubling of the mucous membrane, which encloses cellular
membrane and vessels between the layers.
depth ;
formed.
on the
tine .
The valves begin in the duodenum, one to two inches Extent
beyond the pylorus, and are continued in regular succession intesto the middle of the jejunum ; but beyond that point they
become smaller and more distant one from another, and
finally disappear about the middle of the ileum, having previously become irregular and rudimentary. The valvulæ
are largest and most regular beyond and not far from the
opening of the bile duct.
The aperture of the common bile and pancreatic ducts is Opening
a narrow orifice, situate in a small prominence on the sur- duct;
I I
482 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
where situate.
face of the mucous membrane of the duodenum, from three
to four inches from the pylorus, and at the inner and posterior part of the intestine. A probe passed into the bile duct
will show the obliquity of its course (half an inch) through
the wall of the intestine. Sometimes the pancreatic duct
double. opens by a distinct orifice.
Some- times
Parts to be learnt in the intes- tine.
The villi cover
face ;
Microscopic structure of the mucous membrane.— With
the use of the microscope, and with fresh pieces of intestine,
the student will be able to make out the nature of the villi,
the several glandular structures, and the epithelium.
Villi.-When the mucus is washed away from a piece of
the sur- the lower part of the duodenum, and this is examined in
water, the surface of the mucous membrane is found to be
studded over very thickly with small projections, which give
it the appearance of velvet. Existing along the whole of
the intestine, both on the valves and between them, these
bodies are irregular in form, some being triangular, others
conical or cylindrical with a large end. Their length is
from one fourth to one third of a line. They are best marked
where the valvulæ conniventes are largest, where their number is estimated at 50 to 90 in a square line ; but in the
lower end of the ileum at only 40 to 70 in the same extent
of intestine. Krause.
their shape,
size,
and number.
Compo- sition.
Several
Each villus is an extension of the mucous coat, which
contains a capillary net-work of arteries, mostly a single
vein, and lacteal vessels. The entire surface of each is
invested with columnar epithelium.
Glands.In the glandular apparatus of the small intes- kinds of tine are included the crypts of Lieberkuehn, some solitary
glands, and Peyer's and Brunner's glands.
glands.
Simple
in the
but not so close ;
· The crypts ofLieberkuehn are minute simple tubes, similar
to those in the stomach, though not so closely aggregated,
stomach, that are found throughout the small intestine. These tubes
open on the surface of the mucous membrane, by small
orifices, between the villi and around the larger glands ; but
at the opposite end they are closed, and project into the
submucous cellular layer. Their length is from
of a line, and their diameter is th of a line.
their size th to th
They are
GLANDS OF THE SMALL INTESTINE. 483
contents.
filled with a clear fluid that contains granules, and are lined and
by epithelium.
simple
size and
tion.
sacs .
ofPeyer;
The solitary glands are roundish white eminences, about Solitary
the size of a millet seed, which are scattered along the whole glands ;
extent of the small intestine, but rather in greatest number situaat its lower part. Placed on any side of the intestine, or
even on or between the valvulæ conniventes, these bodies
are covered by the villi of the mucous membrane, and have
around them the apertures of the crypts of Lieberkuehn.
These glands are small sacs, which contain an opaque whitish Closed
granular fluid, but have not any aperture into the intestine.
The glands of Peyer (glandulæ agminatæ) are found Glands
chiefly in the ileum, in the form of oval patches, which
measure from half an inch to two inches or more in length, size ;
and about half an inch in width. These glands are situate situaon the part of the intestine opposite to the attachment of the tion ;
mesentery, and their direction is longitudinal in the gut.
Usually they are from twenty to thirty in number. In the number ;
lower part of the ileum the patches are largest and most pecunumerous ; but they decrease in number and size upwards
from that spot, till at the lower part of the jejunum they
become irregular in form, and may consist only of small
roundish masses.
liarities ;
sition of
that of
tary
A patch, when examined with the microscope, appears to Compo
be only a collection of the solitary glands, for it consists of a gland
a number of small flattened vesicles or sacs, which are round
or oval in form, and are covered by the mucous membrane. same as
Like the glands referred to, the vesicles contain a whitish the soliconsistent fluid, and are commonly without any aperture, glands.
though they have been found with openings into the intestine. Around the vesicles is a circle of apertures of the
crypts before described ; and the mucous membrane over
them is a little hollowed, and may in some instances be furnished with villi. Between the vesicles the lining membrane
of the bowel has the same appearance as in other parts.
pound Glands of Brunner. -Directions have been already given comto expose these glands (p. 481 ). They are small compound glands,
glands, which exist only in the duodenum. Near the pylorus Brunthese bodies are visible without a lens, being nearly as large
or
ner's ;
II 2
484 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
sition.
compo- as hemp seed. When examined more minutely, the glands
are found to consist of lobules, with appertaining little ducts ;
and each may be seen to end on the surface of the mucous
membrane by a duct, whose aperture is slightly larger than
the mouths of the contiguous crypts of Lieberkuehn.
Aper- tures of their ducts.
The epi- thelium is co- lumnar.
How to see the cellular coat.
Arteries ;
Epithelium.-The epithelial lining of the mucous membrane of the small intestine is of the columnar or cylindrical
kind. For the villi it forms a very distinct covering of
elongated or prismatic pieces ; and it also sinks into the
crypts of Lieberkuehn, giving them a lining.
Dissection.-To show the cellular membrane between the coats
of the intestine, turn inside out a piece of the bowel, and inflate it
forcibly. The air enters the wall of the intestine, where the peritoneal coat is wanting, and then spreads through the whole gut ;
but opposite the patches of Peyer's glands the mucous coat is more
closely connected with the subjacent structures, and the cellular
stratum will not be distended with the air. The intestine may be
examined when it is dry.
Vessels and nerves of the intestine.-The branches of arteries
ramify in the submucous cellular layer, and end in small twigs
that form a network in the mucous membrane to supply the
valves, the villi, and the glands. Opposite the patches of Peyer's
veins ; glands the intestine is most vascular. The veins have their usual
absorb resemblance to the companion arteries. The absorbents consist of
a superficial longitudinal set (lymphatics) , and of a deep transverse
set (lacteals), which end in larger vessels in the mesentery. Beneath the patches of Peyer's glands the lymphatics form distinct
plexuses.
ents.
Two coats in
duct,
Structure of the bile duct. -The bile duct consists of a
the bile strong fibrous coat, with an internal or mucous coat. Scattered over the surface of the mucous membrane are two sets
of glands ; one kind consists of small single cells collected
together, and the others are branched tubes, which have
often lateral dilatations.
and glands.
Extent ofthe gut ;
LARGE INTESTINE.
The large intestine is the part of the alimentary canal
between the termination of the ileum and the anus. Its
divisions, and the connection of these by peritoneum to the
FORM OF THE LARGE INTESTINE. 485
abdominal wall have been described ( pp. 450, 456). In
length this part of the alimentary canal measures about five length ;
or six feet, -one fifth of the extent of the intestinal tube.
The diameter of the colon is largest at the commencement in size ;
the cæcum, and gradually decreases from that part, so that
it is somewhat less in the ascending colon, less in the transverse colon, and still less in the descending colon and the
sigmoid flexure. In the rectum there is, however, a dilatation near the end.
pared of with small
is gut,
larger,
more
not coiled.
When compared with the small intestine, the colon is found Comto be distinguished by the following characters : -it is
greater capacity, being in some parts as large again, and
more fixed in its position. The large intestine is also free
from coils, except in the left iliac fossa, where it forms the fixed,
sigmoid flexure. Instead of being a smooth cylindrical tube,
the colon is sacculated, and is marked by three longitudinal Saccumuscular bands, which alternate with as many rows of dila- with
tations or small sacs. Attached to the surface, at intervals,
are processes of peritoneum, containing fat (appendices epi- Appendploïca), especially along the transverse colon. In the rectum, in the
or the lower part of the large intestine, the surface is smooth, rectum,
and the bands have disappeared.
lated
bands.
ages.
of the
intesDissection. For the purpose of examining the large intestine Take
the student should select and blow up the cæcum, with part of the pieces
ileum entering it ; he should also prepare in a similar way a piece large
(about four inches) of the transverse colon, and a piece of the tine.
sigmoid flexure. Afterwards the cellular membrane is to be removed with care from each.
tion of
and
The CÆCUM, or the head of the colon (caput cæcum coli), Defini .
is the rounded part of the large intestine which projects, in cæcum;
the form of a pouch, below its junction with the ileum. It
measures about two inches and a half in length, and, though length
gradually narrowing inferiorly, the cæcum is the widest part width ;
of the colon, hence the name caput coli. At its inner side receives
it is joined by the small intestine ; and still lower is seen a and apsmall worm-like projection -the vermiform appendix.
Appendix vermiformis. —This little convoluted projection vermiis attached to the lower and posterior part of the cæcum, of pendix ;
which it was the direct continuation at one period in the ment.
-
ileum
pendix.
form apattach.
II 3
486 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
dimen- sions ;
growth of the embryo. From three to six inches in length
the appendix is rather larger than a goose-quill, and is connected to the inner part of the cæcum by a fold of peritoneum. It is hollow, and has an aperture of communication
with the intestine. In structure it resembles the rest of the
It is hollow.
Dry the
and open
the
colon.
Dissection.
-
To study the interior of the cæcum, and the valve
cæcum between it and the small intestine, the cæcum should be dried,
it to see and the following cuts then made. An oval piece is to be taken
from the end of the ileum, another from the side of the cæcum,
opposite the entrance of the small intestine, and lastly the end of
the colon included in the ligature is to be cut off.
valves.
Situathe valve ;
two pieces form it ;
colic,
the other ileoThese are joinIleo-cæcal valve.-On looking into the intestine, the ileotion of cæcal valve will be seen at the entrance of the ileum into the
cæcum. This structure is composed of two pieces, each with
a different inclination, which project into the interior of the
cæcum, and bound a narrow, nearly transverse aperture of
communication between the two differently-sized parts of the
one ileo . alimentary canal. The upper piece of the valve (ileo- colic)
projects vertically into the large intestine, opposite the junction of the ileum with the colon ; and the lower piece (ileocecal . cæcal) , which is the larger of the two, has a horizontal
direction between the ileum and the cæcum. At each
ed at the extremity of the opening the pieces of the valve are blended ends, together, and the resulting folds extend transversely for
and form some distance on the intestine, forming the fræna or reti- fræna. nacula of the valve. The size of the opening in the valve
in the depends upon the distension of the intestine ; for when the
cæcum is enlarged, so as to stretch the frana, the margins
of the opening are approximated, and may be made to touch.
Each piece of the valve is formed by the circular muscular
valve a fibres of the small and large intestine, covered by mucous
gation of membrane ; as if the ileum was thrust obliquely through the
wall of the cæcum, after being deprived of its peritoneal
coat and of its layer of longitudinal fibres. The arrangement above referred to is easily seen on a fresh specimen by
dividing the peritoneum and the longitudinal fibres, and
then gently drawing out the ileum.
Opening
valve.
The
prolonthe wall ofthe gut.
Append- The opening of the appendix into the cæcum is placed openз
STRUCTURE OF THE COLON. 487
below that of the ileum. A small fold of mucous membrane into
partly closes the aperture, and acts as a valve.
cæcum.
in the cæcum
Folds or ridges are also seen in the interior of the gut to Ridges
be directed transversely, and to correspond to the depressions
on the outer surface between the sacculi. These eminences how
result from the doubling of the wall of the intestine, and the
largest enclose vessels and cellular membrane.
formed.
strata in
of the
STRUCTURE OF THE COLON. -The coats of the large intes- Four
tine are the same in number and kind as in the small gut, the wall
viz. a serous, muscular, cellular, and mucous : their relative gut.
position to one another is also the same.
coat
along
testine.
1. Serous coat. The peritoneum does not cover the Serous
large intestine in the same degree throughout. Commonly differs
it covers only the front of the cæcum, and the front the inand sides of the ascending and descending colon ; but in
neither of these does it reach the posterior aspect. The
transverse colon is incased like the stomach, and has an interval along both the anterior and the posterior border, at
the attachment of the transverse meso- colon and great
omentum.
layers of 2. The muscular coat is formed by longitudinal and cir- Two
cular fibres, as in the small intestine, but the former are fibres ;
arranged in bands.
dinal in
bands,
a. The longitudinal set of fibres may be traced in the cæcum as longitua thin layer over the surface, but they are collected for the most three
part into three longitudinal bands about half an inch in width.
On the vermiform appendix the longitudinal fibres form a uniform which
layer ; but they are continued thence in the form of three bands are spread
along the cæcum and colon to the rectum, where they are again out on
diffused over the surface. When the bands are divided the intes- dix and rectum,
tine becomes unfolded and elongated, the sacculi and the ridges in
the interior of the gut disappearing at the same time.
appencular,
b. The circular fibres are spread over the intestine, but are and cirmost marked in the folds or ridges that project into the intestine.
In the rectum (to be afterwards seen) they also form the strong
band ofthe internal sphincter muscle.
coat as 3. The cellular coat resembles that of the small intestine Cellular
in every particular. It will be exposed by removing the in small
peritoneal and muscular coverings.
gut.
II 4
488 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
This coat 4. The mucous coat, which will be seen on opening the
is with- intestine, is smooth, and of a palish yellow colour. It is not
folds and marked by folds except in the rectum, for the ridges in the
interior of the gut are formed by all the coats. The surface
out
villi.
Struc- ture very
of small
is free from villi ; and by this circumstance the mucous
membrane of the large is distinguished from that of the small
intestine. This line of demarcation is well seen in the ileocæcal valve ; for the upper aspect which looks to the small
intestine is covered with villi even to the edge of the opening, whilst the lower aspect which is covered by the lining
membrane of the cæcum is free from these projections.
Microscopic appearances. In a fresh piece of intestine,
like that the mucous membrane will be seen, under the microscope, to
possess small tubes or crypts, some larger solitary follicles,
and an epithelial covering.
gut.
crypts more numer- ous than
Tubes or The tubules or crypts resemble those of the small intestine
but are more numerous and closer together. Their orifices
on the surface are circular, and are more uniformly diffused
than the apertures of the crypts in the small intestine . A
but like vertical section ofthe membrane will show the tubes to exLieber- tend vertically from the surface into the cellular coat, and to
be of greater length than the crypts of Lieberkuehn in the
jejunum and ileum.
those of
kuehn.
Simple glands
the cæcum ;
size
The solitary follicles are found all through the large inmost in testine, scattered here and there ; but they are in greatest
number in the cæcum, and in the vermiform appendix. They
are whitish rounded bodies from to a line in diameter,
and are situate in the submucous cellular layer amongst the
tubules. These follicular glands are simple sacs with a dilated
cavity and a narrow neck opening into the intestine, being
in form something like a small rounded fruit with a stalk.
and form.
Epithe- lium.
and
The epithelium is of the columnar kind, as it is in the small
intestine, and enters the tubules and the follicles.
Vessels Vessels and nerves. -The distribution of the vessels and nerves
nerves of in the wall of the large intestine is the same as in that of the
smaller bowel. The absorbent vessels after leaving the wall join
the lymphatic glands along the side of the colon.
the gut.
THE PANCREAS. 489
THE PANCREAS.
seven Form
dog's length ;
and The pancreas is a narrow flattened gland about
inches in length, which has some resemblance to a
tongue. It is larger at the right than at the left end ; and sions.
is divided into head, tail, and body.
diviand form
head,
of the
The head, or the right extremity, occupies the concavity Situation
of the duodenum, and projects above and below the body of of the
the gland, like the head of a hammer beyond its handle ;
and the lower projecting piece is directed to the left along
the duodenum as far as the superior mesenteric vessels, beneath which it passes. The left extremity, or the tail, is
rounded, and touches the spleen. The body of the gland
is narrowest a little to the right of the vertebral column, and
is thickest at the upper border ; it measures about one inch
and a half in breadth, and from half an inch to an inch in
thickness. Its connections with surrounding parts are
described at p. 466.
tail ,
and of thebody.
Dissection. -Place the pancreas on its anterior surface, and trace Trace
posteriorly, from right to left, the excretory duct contained in its out the
substance. The duct will be recognised by its white colour.
-
duct.
comgland,
STRUCTURE. The pancreas is a compound gland, and is It is a
provided with a special duct. It is destitute of a distinct pound
capsule, but it is surrounded by cellular tissue, which pro- without
jects into the interior, and connects together the lobules. tinct
The fluid secreted by it assists in the digestion of the aliment.
a discapsule.
The glandular structure and is soft and loose in texture, and is Texture
of a reddish, or greyish white colour. It consists of lobules, colour ;
which are united into larger masses by cellular tissue, vessels,
and ducts. In analysing a lobule it will be found to consist constiultimately, as in the parotid, of the branchings of the excre- like the
tory duct which end in closed vesicular extremities, and are glands.
surrounded by a plexus of vessels.
tution
salivary
ofthe The duct of the pancreas (canal of Wirsung) extends the Theduct
entire length of the gland, and is somewhat nearer the lower gland ;
than the upper border. It begins in the tail of the pancreas, extent ;
490 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
es ;
nation ;
where it presents a bifurcated extremity ; as it continues
branch- onwards to the head of the gland it receives many branches,
and it finally ends by opening into the duodenum, either in
termi- union with, or separate from the common bile duct (p. 481. )
Of the tributary branches the largest is derived from the
size and head of the pancreas. The duct measures one line or one
line and a half in diameter near the duodenum, and is formed
of a fibrous and a mucous coat ; in the latter a few follicles
are sometimes found near the termination in the gut.
struc- ture ;
peculi- arities :
Vessels and
Occasionally there are two pancreatic ducts : or the branch from
the head of the pancreas may open separately into the duodenum
one inch or more from the chief duct.
Vessels and nerves. —The arteries and veins have been described
nerves. already. The lymphatics join the lumbar glands, and the nerves
are furnished by the solar plexus.
Consist- ence and
THE SPLEEN.
The spleen is a vascular spongy organ of a bluish or purple
colour colour, sometimes approaching to gray ; and of slight conspleen ; sistence, so that the texture is friable, and easily broken
under pressure. The use of the spleen is unknown.
ofthe
use ;
form ;
sur- faces ;
The viscus is somewhat elliptical in shape, and is placed
position ; vertically against the great end of the stomach, as before
described (p. 452.). On the outer aspect the surface is convex towards the ribs. On the inner aspect the surface is
flat or slightly concave, and is marked by a longitudinal
fissure or hilus, nearer the posterior than the anterior border,
which transmits the vessels into the interior ; to this surface
the gastro- splenic omentum is connected, and with it the tail
of the pancreas is in contact. The anterior border is thinner
than the posterior, and is often notched. Of the two extremities, the lower is more pointed than the upper.
borders ;
ends.
Size
and weight.
The size of the spleen varies much at different times. In
the adult it measures commonly about five inches in length,
three or four inches in breadth, and one or one inch and
a half in thickness. Its weight lies between four and ten
ounces, but is rather less in the female than in the male.
STRUCTURE OF THE SPLEEN. 491
times accesSmall masses or accessory spleens (splenculi) are often found Somenear the fissure of the spleen, in the gastro-splenic omentum, or in
the great omentum. Varying in size from a bean to a moderate sory
sized plum, these bodies are commonly one or two in number ; but
they may be many more. In one instance they exceeded even a
score.
spleens.
coats
special
in the
STRUCTURE. Enveloping the spleen are two coverings, Two
a serous and a fibro- elastic. The mass of the spleen is and
formed by a network of fibrous tissue, which contains in its material
meshes the proper splenic substance, the ramifications of the spleen.
bloodvessels, and the Malpighian corpuscles. No duct ex- ists in connection with this organ.
coat 1. The serous or peritoneal coat incases the spleen, cover- Serous
ing the surface, except at the hilus and posterior border.
is closely connected to the subjacent coat.
It nearly com- plete.
and Fibrous coat
inwards pro- cesses.
2. Thefibro-elastic coat gives strength to the viscus,
forms a complete case for it. At the fissure on the inner sends
surface, this investment enters the interior of the spleen with
the vessels to which it furnishes sheaths. If an attempt is
made to detach this coat, numerous fibrous processes will be
seen to be connected with the inner surface. Its colour is Fibres
whitish ; and its structure is made up of areolar and elastic form it.
tissue with, in certain animals, some unstriped muscular
fibres, like those of the middle coat of an artery. Professors Sharpey and Kölliker. - Quain's Anatomy.
—
that
of On cutting across the spleen the surface is reddish brown, Interior
with interspersed white bands. By washing and squeezing spleen,
a piece of fresh bullock's spleen under water, so as to remove
the grumous material, its spongy structure will come into
view.
con- and dis- position Near offibrous
it.
The fibro-elastic tissue ofthe interior of the spleen is
tinuous at the hilus with that forming the outside coat.
the hilus the tissue forms thick bands that surround the tissue in
vessels, and incase their branches. Farther in the substance To form
of the spleen smaller bands (trabecula) are given off in all
directions from those sheaths of the vessels, which divide
and subdivide so as to form a network of fibres through the
whole mass of the spleen. In the interstices between the
ane aro- lar struc ture .
492 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Parts seen with micro- scope.
sub- stance ;
colour,
consistfibres the proper red pulpy substance of the spleen and the
vessels are contained.
Microscopic appearances.
-The characters of the substance of the spleen, and of the Malpighian bodies must be
made out with the aid of the microscope.
Splenic a. The proper substance of the spleen is a soft semi-fluid
red-brown mass, which fills the areola of the trabecular
structure. Under the microscope this material is composed
of rounded, reddish corpuscles, about the size of those of the
blood.
ence and size.
Malpi- ghian
size ;
attach- ment ;
b. The Malpighian corpuscles are found only in the recent
bodies ; condition of the part ; they are small vesicular bodies, varying
in diameter from th to th of an inch. Collected together
groups ; in groups of six or eight, these bodies are embedded in the
splenic substance near the smallest bands of fibrous tissue,
and are supported by a small arterial branch that serves as a
pedicle to them. Their wall is formed of two coats, the extuents ; ternal being apparently fibrous ; and in the interior is a
white soft material which contains globules resembling those
of the chyle. The arteries that extend to the vesicles do
vessels. not enter the interior, but form around them a vascular
layer.
constitheir
Splenic artery
cles of
Blood- vessels. -The branches of the splenic artery enter the
spleen, and are surrounded by sheaths of the elastic tissue. In
this viscus they ramify until the branches become very minute, and
are contained in the small fibrous bands. Lastly, terminal twigs supplies
corpus- leave the trabeculæ, and entering the areolæ, end in tufts amongst
spleen. the corpuscles of the splenic substance. The splenic vein begins in
the interstices between the trabeculæ, where its branches form a
byplex- plexus ; but its commencement with respect to the arteries is
unknown. At the same part they also present lateral dilatations.
The branches of veins are much larger than the arteries which they
accompany to the fissure of the spleen, and in their course they
receive accessory branches, some joining at a right angle.
Vein begins
uses.
Lymph- atics.
Nerves.
-
Nerves and lymphatics. —The lymphatics are superficial and
deep, and enter the glands in the gastro-splenic omentum ; the
nerves come from the solar plexus, and surround the artery and its
branches.
FORM OF THE LIVER. 493
THE LIVER.
the liver.
The liver secretes the bile, and is the largest gland in the Office of
body. Its duct opens into the duodenum with that of the
pancreas.
the vesthe
Dissection. Preparatory to examining the liver, place upper- Clean
most its under surface, and remove the peritoneum and cellular sels on
membrane from the vessels and from the hepatic duct. To make under
the dissection easier inflate the vena portæ, and the gall bladder surface.
through its duct ; clean then the gall bladder. On following outwards the left branch of the vena portæ to the longitudinal or
antero-posterior fissure, it will be found connected anteriorly with
the remains of the umbilical vein, and posteriorly with the remains of the ductus venosus.
and conThe liver is the largest of the abdominal viscera, and Size,
weighs commonly in the adult from three to four pounds
(fifty to sixty ounces). It is of a red-brown colour and firm colour ,
consistence. Transversely the gland measures from ten tosistence;
twelve inches ; from front to back between six and seven sureinches ; and in thickness, at the right end, about three inches,
but this last measurement must change with the spot examined.
meaments.
and divi❤ In shape the liver is somewhat square, and offers for Form
examination externally two surfaces, two borders, and two sions.
extremities, with several lobes, fissures, and vessels. The
ligaments and the connections of the liver are described at
pp. 451 , 457.
surface Surfaces. On the upper aspect the liver is convex. Ex- Upper
tending from front to back is the suspensory ligament, which smooth ;
divides the upper surface into two unequal parts, the right
being the larger. The under surface is irregular, and is under
marked by lobes, fissures, and fossæ. In contact with this irregusurface is the gall- bladder. A fissure divides the under
surface into a right and a left lobe.
surface
lar.
border is
notched,
Borders.--The anterior border is thin, and is marked by Anterior
two notches : one is opposite the fissure on the under sur- thin and
face before alluded to, and the other corresponds to the edge
of the gall-bladder. The posterior border is much thicker posteat the right end than at the left, and in that part it is con- thicker,
rior is
494 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
and also nected by cellular tissue to the diaphragm .
vertebral column is a hollow in this border.
notched.
Extre- mities.
Lobes are on under surface,
Opposite the
The vena cava
is partly imbedded in the substance of the liver on the right
of that spot.
Extremities. -The right part of the liver is thick and
rounded, but the left is thin and flattened.
Lobes. - On the under surface the liver is divided into a
right and a left lobe, by the fissure (longitudinal) that passes
and are from before backwards ; and the right lobe is further subdivided inferiorly into three others, viz. the square lobe, the
Spigelian lobe, and the caudate lobe.
five, viz.
left,
right ;
divided
The left lobe is smaller and thinner than the right,
and has a slight depression inferiorly where it touches the
stomach.
The right lobe forms the greater part of the liver, and is
last sub- separated from the left lobe by the longitudinal fissure on
the one aspect, and by the suspensory ligament on the other.
To it the gall-bladder is attached ; and the following lobes
are projections on its under surface.
into
square,
Spige- lian,
date lobe.
Three fissures,
The square lobe (lobulus quadratus) is situate between
the gall bladder and the longitudinal fissure. It reaches
anteriorly to the margin of the liver, and posteriorly to the
fissure (transverse) by which the vessels enter the interior
of the organ.
The Spigelian lobe lies behind the transverse fissure, and
forms a roundish projection on the surface. On its left side
is the longitudinal fissure, and on its right the vena cava
inferior.
and cau- The caudate lobe is a slight elongated eminence that is
directed from the Spigelian lobe behind the transverse
fissure, so as to form the posterior boundary. Where the
fissure terminates, this projection subsides in the right lobe.
Fissures. -Extending horizontally half across the right
lobe, between the Spigelian and caudate lobes on the one
portal, hand, and the square lobe on the other, is the transverse or
portal fissure. This fissure or hilus is nearer the posterior
than the anterior border of the liver, and contains the vessels,
nerves, ducts, and lymphatics of the viscus. At its left end
it is united with the longitudinal fissure at a right angle.
viz.
or trans- verse,
FISSURES OF THE LIVER. 495
dinal ;
The longitudinal fissure extends from the front to the back longituof the liver between the right and left lobes. In the part
anterior to the transverse fissure ( umbilical fissure) is the
remains of the umbilical vein, which is called round ligament, and is oftentimes arched over by some of the hepatic
substance (pons hepatis). In the part behind the transverse
fissure (fissure of the ductus venosus) is a small obliterated
cord that remains from the ductus venosus of the fetus.
The fissure or groove for the vena cava is placed on the one for
right side of the Spigelian lobe, and is frequently bridged cava.
over by the liver. If the cava is opened, the large hepatic
veins will be seen entering it.
Fossa.- On the under surface of the right lobe are these
depressions : one for the gall-bladder, to the right of the
square lobe ; another for the colon, near the anterior part ;
and a third for the kidney, near the posterior part.
the vena
in the
verse
and
ing.
Vessels ofthe fissures. -The vessels lying in the transverse Vessels
fissure, viz. vena portæ, hepatic artery, and duct, have the transfollowing disposition : -the duct is most anterior, the portal fissure ;
vein most posterior, and the artery between the other two.
Hepatic duct. - The duct that conveys away the bile is situation
formed by two branches that issue from the liver, one from brancheach lobe, and are soon blended in a common tube or hepatic
duct. After a distance of two inches, the hepatic duct is
joined by the duct of the gall-bladder ; the union of the two
giving rise to the common bile-duct. The hepatic artery is
divided into two, for the right and left lobes, and its branches
are surrounded by nerves and lymphatics. The vena portæ
branches, like the artery, into two trunks, for the same lobes,
and gives also an offset to the Spigelian lobe. Its left branch
is the longest.
fissure
In the longitudinal fissure are the remains of former vessels In the
which have the undermentioned arrangement in the fœtus. Be- dinal longitufore birth the large umbilical vein occupies the longitudinal fissure, in the
and opens posteriorly into the vena cava ; but the part of the fœtus,
vessel beyond the transverse fissure receives the name ductus
venosus. Branches are supplied from it to both lobes of the liver,
and a large one that is directed to the right lobe is continuous with
the left division of the vena porta. After birth the umbilical
496 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
condi- tion after birth.
Glandu- lar
is envein is closed, and becomes eventually the round ligament ; the
ductus venosus is also obliterated, only a thin cord remaining in
its place, whilst the lateral branches in a line with those ofthe vena
portæ remain open, and form part of the portal system of vessels.
Occasionally the ductus venosus is found pervious in part.
STRUCTURE OF THE LIVER. -Two coats envelop the liver,
structure viz. a serous and a cellular. The substance of the liver
cased by consists of a collection of small secreting bodies, called
lobules or acini ; together with a large proportion of vessels,
which are concerned both in the production of its secretion
and in the nutrition of the organ.
two coats.
Serous coat,
where defici- ent.
Fibrous cover- ing is
ed to the
1. Serous coat. -The peritoneum invests the liver in
great part, and adheres closely to the subjacent coat. At
certain spots, intervals exist between the two, viz. in the
fissures occupied by vessels, at the lines of attachment of the
ligaments, and on the surface covered by the gall- bladder.
Where the right lateral ligament is inserted the space is the
largest ; and here the liver is fixed to the diaphragm by
cellular membrane.
2. The cellular or fibrous covering is very thin, but it is
rather stronger where the peritoneum is not in contact with
prolong- it. It invests the liver, and is continuous, at the transverse
interior . fissure, with the fibrous sheath (capsule of Glisson) that
surrounds the vessels in the interior of the hepatic mass.
When the membrane is torn from the surface, it is found to
have fine prolongations, that dip between the lobules or
glandular structure of the liver.
Lobules of the liver ;
appear.
ance ;
Lobules.-The lobules constitute the proper hepatic substance, and can be seen on the exterior of the liver, on a cut
size and surface, or by means of a rent of the mass. As thus observed,
these bodies are about the size of a pin's head, and measure
from half a line to a line in diameter. Closely massed toform and gether, each presents a dark central point, and is isolated from
the surrounding ones by a cellular stratum. By means of
transverse and vertical sections of the lobules, their form
will appear triangular on the exterior, but five or many
sided in the interior of the liver. They are clustered around
the smallest divisions ( sublobular) of the hepatic vein, to
which each is connected by a small twig issuing from the
cellular invest- ment.
STRUCTURE OF THE LIVER. 497
centre (intra-lobular vein), something like the lamina with
the stalk or petiole of a leaf. The part of each lobule in
contact with the small sublobular vein wants the cellular
covering that invests the other sides.
to study To study the minute structure of these ultimate elements Difficult
of the hepatic substance, the student should have the lobules.
different vessels of the liver minutely injected, and be provided with a microscope.
is a
gland.
Each lobule or elementary piece of the liver may be said A lobule
to be a distinct gland, for it is provided with special secretory distinct
vessels and with an excretory duct. Minute injections show
the lobules to be composed of a network of capillaries of the
vena portæ, hepatic vein, and biliary duct, with constituent
cellular membrane.
ment of
vena
vein ,
The disposition of these several vessels is the following : The Arrangesmallest branches of the vena portæ (interlobular) , after uniting its ves- sels,
in a circle around the lobule, enter its substance, and form therein viz.
a network of capillaries near the circumference. The hepatic portæ,
vein occupies the centre of the lobule, and its radicles communi- hepatic
cate with the portal plexus ; it issues from the base of the lobule
as the intralobular vein. The ultimate ramifications of the bile and bile duct,
duct (lobular biliary plexus) are situate in the intervals of the network of the portal plexus ; and connected with these are some
secretory or biliary cells that take part in the production of the
bile : the roots of the bile duct leave the lobule at its circumference, and are joined in a plexus (interlobular) outside it, like
the portal vessels. From the facts above stated respecting the Use of
arrangement of the vessels, it appears that the portal capillaries sels,
convey the blood from which bile is secreted ; that the hepatic
vein carries back the remaining blood ; and that the secreted bile
is conveyed away by the branches of the biliary duct.
the vescells of
tion and
Forming a part of the lobule are some hepatic or biliary cells, Biliary
which extend from the centre to the circumference in the form ofthe lo- bule.
rows of particles, and are situate in the intervascular spaces.
Under the microscope they have an irregular form, being roundish, Situaelongated, or many sided ; and they possess a bright nucleus, or form ;
even more than one. In size they vary from to th of an size and
inch ; they are of a yellowish colour, and enclose certain granules tents ;
and fat globules besides a nucleus. These nucleated cells are con- connecnected with the origin of the ducts, and are concerned in the ducts.
secretion of the bile ; but the origin of the ducts within the lobule,
K K
contion with
498 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
ment of
in the liver.
and the disposition of the cells have not been ascertained with
exactness.
Arrange- VESSELS OF THE LIVER. -Two sets of vessels ramify in
vessels the liver : one set, concerned in the secretion and the nutrition ofthe organ, enter the transverse fissure, and are directed
transversely in spaces (portal canals), where they are enveloped by cellular tissue ; the other set, or the hepatic veins,
run from the anterior to the posterior border of the liver,
and convey to the vena cava the blood that has been circulated through the organ. The ramifications of these different
vessels are to be traced in the liver.
Vena The vena porta ramifies in the liver like an artery, and the portæ blood is circulated through it in the same manner, viz. from trunk
occupies to branches. After entering the transverse fissure the vein portal canals, divides into primary branches that lie in the portal canals or
spaces with offsets of the hepatic artery, of the hepatic duct, and
and of the nerves and lymphatics. The same division is repeated again supplies vaginal and again, and the resulting vessels give off minute lateral
branches, some of which, vaginal, ramify in the cellular sheath
before their final distribution to the hepatic substance, whilst
others from the smaller divisions pass to the lobules without preand in- vious anastomosis. Finally, the last branches of the vein penetrate terlobu- between the lobules, around which they form a circle, and then
branch- end in the interior as before explained : where these twigs lie
between the lobules they are named interlobular.
lar
es.
Bile duct.
Some ducts in the lateral liga.
ment.
Hepatic artery
es the
The hepatic duct begins in the lobules, and its branches form
a plexus, interlobular, between them. The smallest ducts soon
unite into larger vaginal branches that lie in the portal canals with
the other vessels. Lastly, the ducts are collected into a right and
a left trunk, which leave the liver at the transverse fissure as before described.
In the left lateral ligament of the liver ducts are sometimes found
between the layers of the peritoneum ; they anastomose together and
are accompanied by branches of the vessels of the liver, viz. vena
portæ, hepatic artery, and hepatic vein.
The hepatic artery is consumed in the nutrition of the structure
nourish- of the liver. Whilst surrounded by the capsule of Glisson it farliver, nishes vaginal branches which ramify in that sheath, giving it a
andjoins red appearance in a well injected liver ; and other twigs enter the
porta. coats of the vena portæ and biliary duct. From the vaginal vena
THE GALL-BLADDER. 499
branches there are some few offsets sent between the lobules to
supply their structure. This artery is supposed by Mr. Kiernan to
terminate in venous capillaries that communicate with the branches
of the vena portæ.
tained in
The capsule of Glisson is a layer of fibro - cellular structure that Preced- ing ves- envelops the vessels entering the liver through the transverse sels confissure. In this sheath the vessels ramify, and in it they are a cellular
minutely divided before their final termination in the lobules. sheath
Processes of the sheath accompany the small interlobular vessels, that exand join the cellular covering of the lobules. If a transverse to the
section is made of a portal canal, the vessels will retract somewhat lobules .
into the loose surrounding tissue.
tends
veins
a sheath
The hepatic veins (venæ cavæ hepatica) begin by a plexus in Hepatic
the interior of each lobule. Issuing from the base of the lobules without
as the intralobular veins, they end in still larger or sublobular
branches. The next sized branches cease to receive any intralobular twigs, and merely unite with neighbouring branches to
produce larger veins. Finally the hepatic veins are collected into begin
large trunks that are directed from before backwards to the vena lobules,
cava inferior, into which they open by large orifices. The venæ and end
cavæ hepaticæ may be said to be without a cellular sheath, for it is in the
very slight only in the larger trunks ; consequently when they are cava.
cut across the ends remain patent by reason of their close connection with the hepatic structure.
in the
vena
THE GALL-BLADDER.
situa- The gall-bladder is the receptacle of the bile, and is situate Use and
in a depression on the under surface of the right lobe of the tion ;
liver, to the right of the square lobe. Conical in form, or form ;
pear-shaped, its larger end (fundus) is directed forwards
beyond the margin of the liver ; whilst the smaller end, or
the neck, is turned in the opposite direction, and bends
downwards to end in the cystic duct by a zigzag part. In size ;
length the gall-bladder measures three or four inches, and in
breadth rather more than an inch at the fundus, or the widest
part. It holds rather more than an ounce. By one surface
the sac is in contact with the liver, and on the opposite it is
covered by peritoneum. The larger end touches the abdominal wall opposite the tip of the cartilage of the tenth rib,
connec tions ;
KK 2
500 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Struc- ture of wall.
Serous coat .
Fibrous
and is contiguous to the transverse colon ; and the small
end touches the duodenum.
Structure.
- The wall of the gall- bladder has a peritoneal,
a fibrous, and a mucous coat, with thin intervening cellular
layers.
1. The serous coat is stretched over the under or free
aspect of the gall-bladder, and surrounds the large end when
the viscus is distended.
2. The fibrous coat, which has not much strength, gives stratum a complete covering to the sac, and is formed by the intermixture of white shining fibres. Unstriped muscular fibres
muscu- have been recognised in this coat in the gall-bladder of
the ox.
some- times
lar.
Mucous layer
lar on
3. The mucous coat is marked internally by numerous
is areo- ridges and intervening depressions, which give an areolar or
surface, honeycomb appearance to the surface. On laying open the
gall-bladder, this condition will be seen, with the aid of a
lens, to be most developed about the centre of the sac, and to
diminish towards each extremity. In the larger hollows
there are other smaller depressions, which lead to mucous
a colum- follicles. The surface of the mucous membrane is covered nar epi- thelium. by a columnar epithelium.
and co- vered by
Projec- tions of Where the gall-bladder is bent, at its junction with the
the wall . cystic duct, its coats project into the interior, and give rise
to ridges that resemble the parietal septa in the sacculated
large intestine.
Duct of gall- The cystic duct joins the hepatic duct at an acute angle,
Bladder. to form the ductus communis choledochus. It is about an
inch and a half long, and is distended and somewhat sacculated near the gall-bladder.
Struc- ture same as sac,
coat like
Structure. -The coats of the duct are the same as those of the
sac from which it leads. On slitting open the duct the mucous
membrane is seen to form a series of semilunar projections (from
mucous nine to twenty) , which are arranged obliquely around the tube like
the thread of a screw, and increase in size towards the gall- bladder.
This structure is best seen on a gall-bladder inflated and dried ; in
and is which state the parts of the bladder between the folds are most
with distended, giving rise to the sacculated appearance. The mucous
glands, lining is provided with glands, as in the hepatic and common bile
a screw,
provided
FORM OF THE KIDNEY. 501
ducts (p. 484.). In the hepatic duct the glands are arranged in a
row on each side.
-
and Blood-vessels and nerves. The vessels of the gall-bladder are Artery,
named cystic ; the artery is a branch of the hepatic, and the vein vein,
opens into the vena portæ near the liver. The nerves are derived nerves,
from the hepatic plexus, and entwine around the artery. The and
lymphatics follow the cystic duct, and join the deep lymphatics on atics.
the spinal column.
lymphTHE KIDNEY AND URETER.
The organ for the secretion of urine has a characteristic Use and
form, and serves as a type of comparison with other bodies.
Flattened on the sides, it is larger at the upper than at the form.
lower extremity, and is hollowed out at the inner part of its
circumference. For the purpose of distinguishing between To disthe right and left kidneys, let the excavated margin be sup- right
posed to be turned to the spinal column, the ureter, or the left.
excretory tube, being kept more posterior than the several
vessels, and let that end be directed downwards towards
which the ureter is naturally inclined.
tinguish
from
With the general form above mentioned, the kidney is of Colour,
a deep red colour, and presents an even surface. Its average size,
length is about four inches, its breadth two inches, and its
thickness about one inch ; but the left is commonly longer
and more slender than the right kidney. The usual weight and weight.
of this body is about four ounces and a half in the male, and
rather less in the female.
mities ;
At its upper extremity the kidney is rounded, is thicker Extre
than at the lower part, and is surmounted by the suprarenal body, whilst the lower end is flat and more pointed.
The relative position with respect to the spinal column has
been before detailed (p. 452). On its anterior aspect the surkidney is convex, but on the opposite surface it is flattened.
The outer border is convex ; but the inner is excavated, and borders,
is marked by a longitudinal fissure (hilum) , which contains
the vessels, nerves, and excretory duct of the kidney.
faces ;
ofthe In the fissure of the kidney the several vessels are thus Contents
placed with respect to one another : -The divisions of the fissure ;
KK 3
502 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
their position.
Openthe kidney,
and clean vessels.
Secre- tory tubes are incased by a
fibrous coat.
Fibrous coat
offsets .
renal vein are in front, the ureter behind, and the branches
of the artery between the other two. On the vessels the
nerves and lymphatics ramify, and cellular structure surrounds the whole.
-
Dissection. To examine the interior of the kidney it will be
necessary to cut it through from the outer to the inner border,
and to remove the loose cellular membrane from the vessels, and
from the divisions of the excretory duct that enter the hilum.
The hollow that now comes into view, and contains the bloodvessels, is called sinus of the kidney.
STRUCTURE OF THE KIDNEY.
-- The substance of the
kidney consists of a mass of minute secretory tubes, intermixed with blood-vessels, lymphatics, nerves, and fine cellular
tissue and the whole is encased by a fibrous coat.
The fibrous coat is a white firm case, which is connected
with the renal tissue by fine processes and vessels, but is
sends in readily detached therefrom by slight force. At the inner
margin of the kidney, it sinks into the hollow or sinus, and
sends processes on the entering vessels : at the same spot it
is continuous with the fibrous coat of the excretory duct.
Renal sub- stance divided
tical and
The interior of the kidney appears on a section to consist
of two different materials, viz. of an external granular or
into .cor- cortical part ; and of internal, darker coloured, pyramidal
pyrami- masses, that converge towards the centre, and are connected
with the divisions of the excretory duct. But it will subsequently appear that each of these parts is constructed of the
same elements somewhat differently arranged.
dal.
Extent of corstance ;
The cortical substance, or the external part, forms about
tical sub- three-fourths of the kidney ; it covers the pyramidal
masses with a layer about two lines in thickness, and sends
prolongations between the same nearly to their extremities.
colour ; Its colour is of a light red, unless the kidney is blanched,
consist- and its consistence is so slight that the mass gives way
compo- beneath the finger. This layer is formed of a congeries of sition. minute convoluted uriniferal tubes, surrounded by vascular
.ence ;
Pyra- mids,
plexuses ; and in a well-injected specimen red points (Malpighian bodies) are seen scattered here and there through its
texture.
The pyramidal masses (pyramids of Malpighi, medullary
STRUCTURE OF THE KIDNEY. 503
and dipapillæ.
substance, ) are twelve or eighteen in number, and con- number,
verge to the sinus of the kidney. Each mass is conical in form,
form, with its base turned towards the circumference of the rection ;
organ, and surrounded by the cortical substance ; and with its
apex, which is free from cortical covering, directed to the
hollow at the inner part of the kidney. At this last spot it end in
ends in a smooth, rounded part, named mamilla or papilla,
which is surrounded by one of the divisions (calyx) of the
excretory tube. Occasionally two of the masses are united
in one papillary termination. This part of the kidney is Physical
denser than the cortex, its colour is darker, and its cut sur- ters ;
face has a grooved appearance. The conically- shaped mass composi
is constructed of a bundle of the uriniferal tubes, which have
become straight, and are converging to their termination on
the papilla. If the mass is compressed, urine will exude
from the tubes through apertures in the apex.
charaction.
mentary
the
In the human fœtus, and in some animals, the kidney is divided Rudiinto separate lobes, to which a pyramidal mass, with its cortical condienvelope, corresponds in the adult. With the growth of the human tion of
kidney the original divisions disappear, and the cortical covering kidney.
of contiguous lobes is blended to produce the interlobular cortical
part. In the fully developed kidney the uriniferous tubes and the
vessels of each pyramid and its envelope are distinct as in the
organ in its lobular condition.
kidney is
studied .
To obtain a knowledge of the anatomy of the secreting Howthe
tubes, and to make out the disposition of the blood- vessels, to be
the dissector will require a microscope and good fine injections of the part.
ferous
ter in
of kid.
convoThe uriniferous tubes (tubuli uriniferi) are the ramified Uriniterminations of the excretory duct, which pour out the urine. tubes ;
In the cortex of the kidney, where the tubes present closed Characextremities, they are innumerable, are very convoluted, and cortex
of different sizes (tubes of Ferrein), though they average nex
aboutth of an inch. In this part they are closely sur- luted,
rounded by a plexus of blood - vessels, and are usually distinct rounded
one from another. A certain number of the tubes converge
towards each pyramid (which they form), and having become
straight, are directed downwards to the apex of that body, mid
where they open by somewhat dilated orifices. In the pyra- fewer in
surby ves- sels ;
in pyra
straight,
KK 4
504 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
and ves- sels ;
number mid the tubes lie close together, and have but few vessels
between them ; they further diminish in number, from base have to apex, by repeated unions, and are enveloped by the
mouths parenchymatous structure of the kidney. On a section of
one of the pyramids, near the lower end, Krause estimated
the number of tubes at a hundred in a square line.
open
inferior.
ly.
Struc- ture of
bule ;
base- ment At its
The tubes consist of a thin basement membrane, lined by
the wall an epithelium of the spheroidal form, which forms threeof a tu- fourths of the thickness of the wall, except in the pyramid,
where it is thinner, and the cells smaller and flatter.
free extremity each tube presents a dilated or saccular part,
brane which contains a small vascular Malpighian body, and it is
thelium. there perforated by the two vessels connected with that body. *
Into this little sac the epithelial lining does not extend, for it
ceases at the neck, becoming very delicate and translucent.
memand epiNature
quantity
Intermediate substance of the kidney. — Between the uriniferal and tubes there is a small quantity of a parenchymatous material
whose nature has not been agreed on. By some it is described as
cellular, by others as fibrous.
uncer.. tain .
Blood vessels are large,
BLOOD- VESSELS. -The artery and vein that are distributed
to the kidney are very large in proportion to the size of the
and ar. organ they nourish. Moreover, some small arterial branches
teries have a pecular disposition in the Malpighian bodies before
liar. they become capillary, and end in the veins.
are pecu.
Branchartery
reach
Renal artery. - As the artery enters the kidney it divides into
es of the four or five branches, which are invested by sheaths of the fibrous
capsule, and are transmitted to the cortical substance between the
pyramidal masses. Some of the offsets of a chief branch enter
exterior, the pyramidal mass, and ramify on the tubes, forming anastomotic
supply loops parallel with those tubes, whilst the continuation of the tubules, trunk is distributed in the cortex around the pyramid. The terglome- minal twigs of the artery end either in the Malpighian bodies or
in a vascular plexus around the uriniferal tubes.
and form
ruli ;
these are in the The Malpighian corpuscles (glomeruli of Ruysch) are small,
tubules. rounded or oblong, vascular bodies, that are contained in the
* See a Paper in the Philosophical Transactions for 1842, Part. I. ,
On the Structure and Use of the Malpighian Bodies of the Kidney, by
W. Bowman, F.R.S.
THE URETER. 505
ed of two vessels.
dilated extremities of the uriniferal tubes. Each little vascular size ;
tuft has commonly a diameter of th of an inch, and is formed compos
by the capillary ramifications of two small vessels that perforate
the end of the containing tube. One vessel (afferent) is a small
twig of the renal artery, which forms the exterior of the tuft by
its branchings ; the other (efferent) begins in the centre of the
tuft, and issuing from the tube ends in the plexus on a neighbouring uriniferal tube. This capillary body is free in the cavity
of the tube that secretes the urine, but it is covered by some
nucleated scales.
Renal vein. This vein begins in the capillary plexuses on the Veins begin!
convoluted urine tubes, and its larger branches are directed to the around tubules,
centre of the kidney, where they communicate around the pyra- midal masses. From this spot the divisions of the vein accompany those of the artery, and are united finally into one trunk that and end
opens into the vena cava. Some of the small roots of the vein cava.
may be seen to form an arborescent appearance on the surface of
the kidney.
in vena
office ;
The URETER is the tube by which the fluid secreted in the Ureter ;
kidney is conveyed to the bladder. Its anatomy must be
studied when the body is in a suitable position. Between length.
its origin and termination this duct measures from sixteen to
eighteen inches in length. Its size corresponds commonly to size
that of a large quill, but near the kidney it is dilated into a
funnel-shaped part, named pelvis, and near the bladder it is
again somewhat dilated, though its aperture of termination is
the narrowest part of the tube.
varies.
In its course from one viscus to another, the ureter is close Course
beneath the peritoneum, and is directed obliquely downwards
and inwards along the posterior wall of the abdomen as far
as the pelvis, where it becomes almost horizontal in direction
in the posterior false ligament of the bladder. At first the and conureter is placed over the psoas muscle, inclining on the right
side towards the inferior vena cava, and then on the common
or on the external iliac artery *, being situate between the
vessel and the sigmoid flexure on the left side, and between
* In a dozen uninjected bodies that were examined for me by S. F.
Statham, Esq. , the ureter was found as frequently over the one as the
other ofthe two vessels mentioned.
nections .
506 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Some- times double.
Ureter has
which embrace руга- mids,
it and the end of the ileum on the right side ; and, lastly, in
the posterior ligament of the bladder it will be subsequently
seen to lie below the level of the obliterated hypogastric
artery. About the middle of the psoas this excretory tube
is crossed by the spermatic vessels . Sometimes the ureter is
found divided into two for a certain distance.
Part in the kidney. When the ureter is traced upwards
calices, into the kidney, it is found to begin by a set of cup- shaped
tubes, named calices, which vary in number from seven to
thirteen. Each cup-shaped part embraces the rounded end
of a pyramidal mass, and receives the urine that flows
through the apertures in that projection. The several calices
are united together to form two or three larger tubes ; and
these are finally blended in the excretory duct or the ureter,
which is dilated into a pouch, pelvis, in the hilum of the
near the kidney. Sometimes a calix surrounds two or three papillæ,
and is dilated
kidney.
Two ' coats in
and mus- cular ;
Structure. — On cutting open the ureter, both longitudinally and ureter, across, its walls will be found to consist of an external or fibrous
fibrous and an internal or mucous coat. The fibrous covering forms a
dense bluish-white layer, which is composed of bundles of areolar
mucous. tissue, and of unstriped muscular fibres. The mucous coat is
thrown into longitudinal folds during the contracted state of the
The ca- ureter, and is lined by an epithelium of the spheroidal form. The lices also calices resemble the rest of the duct in having a fibrous and a
two coats.
mucous coat. Around the pyramid the fibrous tissue is continuous
with that of the enveloping tunic of the kidney where this projects
inwards ; and at the apex of that body, the mucous lining is prolonged into the uriniferal tubes through the small openings of the
papilla.
Use un- known.
THE SUPRA-RENAL CAPSULE.
This small body, whose use is unknown, has received its
name from its position in the abdomen. Its vessels are
No duct. numerous, but it is not provided with any excretory duct.
Situa- In form, the supra-renal capsule resembles a cocked hat,
and it is situate, one on each side, on the front of the upper
colour, extremity of the kidney. It is of a yellowish colour, and
without care it may be removed with the surrounding fat,
tion,
SUPRA-RENAL CAPSULE. 507
which it resembles. The upper part is convex, but the base form,
weight.
or lower part is hollowed where it touches the kidney. Its size and
size in the adult is about one inch and a half in depth, and
one inch and a quarter in width, and its weight is about one
drachm and a half ; but the left is commonly larger than the
right capsule.
tions. Some cellular tissue attaches the supra-renal body to the Connec
kidney, and large vessels and nerves retain it in situation.
The connections with the surrounding parts are the same as
those of the upper end of the kidney. Thus this body rests
on the diaphragm on both sides, whilst above the right one is
the liver, and above the left the spleen. On the inner side
of the right capsule is the vena cava, with part of the solar
plexus, and internal to the left is the aorta, with the same
plexus of nerves.
Structure. By means of a perpendicular section, the Asulecapsur- .
supra-renal body will be seen to be formed of a firm external rounds
or cortical part, and of an internal soft and dark material.
The whole is surrounded by a thin fibrous capsule, that
sends processes into the interior and along the blood- vessels. two difWith the aid of a microscope, the nature of the two mate- strucrials above noticed will be found to be as below :
ferent
tures,
viz.-
cal,
consists
bules,
The cortical part is yellow in colour and striated, and its a cortiultimate structure consists, according to Mr. Simon, of very which
small separate closed tubes, about 7th of an inch in dia- of tumeter, which are arranged vertically, in masses, around the
central part, and surrounded by blood- vessels. In these
fine microscopic tubes there are contained bodies like nuclei,
together with nucleated granular cells, granules, and particles
of oil.
The central central soft part is of a black or dark brown hue, and and a
is formed chiefly of a plexus of minute veins. In the inte- vascular
rior ofthe mass there is sometimes a venous space.
part.
Blood-vessels. -Numerous branches of arteries are furnished to Arteries.
the supra-renal body from the diaphragmatic and renal arteries,
and from the aorta. In the interior of this body the arteries end
in capillary plexuses that surround the small tubes above described.
The veins originate in the plexuses on the tubes, and the several veins.
508 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
branches are collected into a trunk that opens on the right side
into the vena cava, and on the left, into the renal vein.
Situa- tion in
tum and
THE TESTES.
The testes are two glandular organs for the secretion of
the scro- the semen, and are lodged in the scrotum . Each is susenvelop- pended by the spermatic cord, and its coverings ( p. 431 ) ,
the left being usually lower than the right, and each is provided with an excretory duct named vas deferens. A serous
sac partly surrounds each organ.
ed by a
serous sac.
To see the serous sac.
Serous bag
partly covers
Dissection. For the purpose of examining the serous covering
of the testicle (tunica vaginalis) , make an aperture into it and inflate it. Then clean the surface both of the sac and ofthe spermatic
cord, and follow the vessels of the latter to their entrance into the
testicle.
The tunica vaginalis is a serous bag, which is continuous
with the peritoneal lining of the abdomen in the fetus, but
becomes a distinct sac in the adult, in consequence of the
obliteration of the tube connecting the two. It invests the
the tes- testicle after the manner of other serous membranes on their ticle,
respective viscera ; for the testicle is placed behind it, so as
to be partly enveloped by it, and yet not in the enclosed
and lines cavity. The sac, however, is larger than is necessary for scrotum ; covering the testicle, and projects some distance above that
its vis- ceral part
and parietal.
viscus. Like other serous membranes, it has an external
rough, and an internal secerning smooth surface ; and like
them it has a visceral and a parietal part. To examine its
disposition the sac should be opened.
The visceral layer (tunica vagin. testis) covers the testicle, except
posteriorly, where the vessels enter or leave it, and is inseparably
united with the special fibrous coat of that viscus. On the outer
side it extends farther back than on the inner, and it passes between the testis and the arched body (epididymis) that lies on this
aspect ofthe organ.
The parietal part of the sac (tunic. vag. scroti) is more extensive
than the piece covering the testicle, and lines the immediately
contiguous layer of the scrotum.
FORM OF THE TESTIS. 509
oval ;
sus- pended
ly.
Form and position of the testis.-The testicle is oval in Form
shape, smooth on the surface, and flattened on the sides. It
is suspended obliquely, so that the upper part is directedobliqueforwards and somewhat outwards, and the lower end projects
backwards and rather inwards. The anterior margin is Margins.
convex, and the posterior, which is flatter, is pierced by the
spermatic vessels and nerves. Stretching like an arch along Bodies
the outer part of the testis is the epididymis, or the convo- testicle .
luted part of the excretory duct of the organ ; and attached
to the upper part of the testis or of the epididymis is a small
body, two or three lines in length, whose use is unknown.
on the
sions Size and weight.—In length the testis is an inch and a Dimenhalf or two inches ; but it measures from before backwards rather more than an inch, and from side to side
rather less than an inch. Its weight is nearly an ounce, and
and the left is frequently larger than the other.
weight.
tunic
small
ing
STRUCTURE.-The substance of the testicle is composed of A dense
minute secerning tubes, that end in one excretory or efferent contains
duct, named vas deferens. Around the tubes the blood- vessels secretare disposed in plexuses. Surrounding and supporting the tubes.
delicate seminiferal tubes is the dense covering of the tunica
albuginea.
-
structhe tesDissection. - For the purpose of examining the investing fibrous How to
coat, place the testis on its outer side, viz. that on which the see the
epididymis lies, and fix it in that position with pins. Then cutture of
through the fibrous coat along the anterior part of the testis, and tis.
raise it as far backwards as to the entrance of the blood- vessels.
In this proceeding a number of fine bands will be seen traversing
the substance of the testicle, and a short septal piece (mediastinum) will be observed at the back of the viscus, where the vessels
enter. It will afterwards be necessary to remove part of the
testicular mass of tubes to bring into view the mediastinum, and
to trace back some of the finer septa to it.
coat ;
The tunica albuginea, or the strong fibrous coat of the Fibrous
testicle, is of a bluish-white colour, and resembles in appear- characance and structure the sclerotic coat of the eye-ball. This ters ;
membrane supports the soft glandular part of the testicle, use.
and maintains the shape of the organ by reason of its dense
and unyielding nature. Besides determining the general
510 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Sends inwards pro- cesses,
which are me- diasti- num
form, it sends inwards processes to support and separate the
seminal tubes ; and one of these, which is larger than the
rest, is placed at the back of the testicle, along with the
vessels, and is named mediastinum. These several offsets of
the membrane are seen in the dissection that has been made.
The mediastinum testis (corpus Highmorianum) is the
thick process at the back of the gland, which projects inwards
with the blood-vessels for the distance of a few lines. It
extends from the upper nearly to the lower part of the testis,
and is larger and deeper above than below. To its front
and sides are connected the finer septal processes ; and in
its interior (for it is said to be formed of two lateral pieces
united at an acute angle in front) are contained the bloodvessels, and a network of seminal ducts forming the rete
and finer testis. Of the finer processes of the tunica albuginea, there
are two kinds : one set are round, cord- like, but of different
lengths, which are fixed posteriorly to the mediastinum, and
serve to maintain the shape of the testis ; the other set form
delicate membranous septa, which divide the seminal tubes
into lobes, and are continued, like the others, to join the mediastinum .
septa.
A vas- cular
lines it
vascu- losa).
Within the tunica albuginea is a thin vascular layer, the
layer tunica vasculosa of Sir A. Cooper, which lines the fibrous
(tunica coat, and covers the different septa in the interior of the
gland. It is formed of the ramifications of the blood- vessels
united by areolar tissue, like the pia mater of the brain, and
in it the vessels are subdivided before they are distributed
on the secerning tubes.
Seminal tubes ;
ance and
Seminal tubes (tubuli seminiferi ) .- These secerning tubes
are the minute branched extremities of the duct or vas defeappear- rens. They are very wavy, and are but slightly held together
by fine cellular tissue and surrounding blood-vessels, so that
they may be readily drawn out of the testis for some distance.
Their length is said by Monro to be sixteen feet, but by
Lauth to be only two feet and a quarter. The size and the
characters of the minute tubules can be learned only with
the aid of the microscope. Towards the circumference of
commu- the testis, the tubes have for the most part closed extremitions ; ties, but some communicate, forming loops or arches, and
length ;
nica-
STRUCTURE OF THE TESTIS. 511
ture .
some are further united deeper in the gland. The diameter size ;
of the tubules varies from th to Toth of an inch.
The strucwall of the tubuli, though thin, has considerable strength :
lining the interior is a nucleated granular epithelium, and on
the exterior is a plexus of blood- vessels.
change
name.
From the disposition and appearance of the seminal tubes, Tubes
the several parts of the testis take their name. Thus, where their
they are collected into separate masses, they form the lobes
of the testis ; as they enter the mediastinum testis they are
named vasa recta ; where they communicate in the mediastinum they produce the rete testis ; and, lastly, as they leave
the upper part of the gland, and become convoluted, they
are called coni vasculosi.
The lobes ofthe form the testis are formed, as above explained, by They
bundles of the seminiferal tubes, and are situate in the inter- lobes,
vals between the processes sent inwards from the tunica
albuginea. The number of these is differently stated : ac- number ;
cording to one authority (Berres) they are 250; but according
to another (Krause), 400 or more. They are conical in form, form.
with the base of each turned to the circumference, and the
apex to the mediastinum testis. Each is made up of one, Tubes in
two, or more tortuous seminal tubules ; and the tubes of one arrangelobe are sometimes united with those of the neighbouring
lobes. Towards the apex of each lobe the tubules become
less bent, but they are united together ; and the tubuli of the
several lobes are further joined at the same spot into larger
canals that form the tubuli recti.
them and
ment.
next berecti) ;
Tubuli recti, rete testis, and vasa efferentia. -The seminal They
tubes that issue from the several lobes become larger in size come straight and straighter in direction, and are named tubuli recti or vasa (tubuli
recta. They are about twenty in number, and pierce the
fibrous mediastinum, entering into its interior. In the substance of the mediastinum the tubes lose their former name,
and are directed to the upper end of the testis. They are aftersituate in the anterior part of that fibrous process, in front join to- gether of the blood-vessels, and freely communicate, so as to form (rete testis),
a network, called rete testis. About twelve or twenty seminal
tubes issue from the top of the rete testis, and leave the upper
part of the testicle as the vasa efferentia. These are larger
wards
512 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
leavethe
(vasa
and then than the tubes of which they are the continuation, and end
gland in the common excretory duct. Though straight at first,
efferen- they soon become convoluted ; whence the name coni vasculosi that has been given to them. When they are unravelled,
they are found to be from six to eight inches long, and to
join the excretory duct at intervals of about three inches.
tia).
Excre- tory duct
is bent on the
forming epidi- dymis ;
how named
The EXCRETORY DUCT of the testis receives the vasa efferentia from the upper part of the gland, and extends thence
to the urethra. Its first part, which is in contact with the
testis, is very flexuous, and forms the epididymis ; but the
remainder is straight, and is named vas deferens.
The epididymis extends, in the form of an arch, along the
testicle outer side of the testis, from the upper to the lower end, and
receives its name from its situation . Opposite the upper
part of the testicle it presents an enlarged portion or head
(globus major), and at the lower part of that organ it becomes
more pointed or tail-like (globus minor), before ending in the
vas deferens. The intervening narrow part of the epididy
; mis is called the body. Its head is attached to the testis by
the vasa efferentia that open into it ; and its tail or lower
part is fixed to the tunica albuginea by some fibrous tissue,
is but a and by the reflection of the tunica vaginalis. After the
removal of the serous membrane and fibrous tissue, the epididymis will be seen to be formed of a single tube, bent into
a zigzag form, whose bends are united by fibrous tissue into
This tube, when unravelled, measures twenty
feet in length. The diameter of its canal is about 1th of
an inch ; but there is a slight diminution in size towards the
globus minor.
single tube ;
length and size .
Where it is
it is the
ferens ;
one mass.
The vas deferens begins opposite the lower end of the
straight testis, at the termination of the globus minor of the epidivas de- dymis. At first this part of the excretory duct is slightly
wavy, but afterwards it becomes a firm round tube. In its
course to the urethra it ascends on the inner side of the
testicle to reach the blood- vessels, with which it enters the
into the internal abdominal ring ; and it is then directed along the
side of the bladder, and through the prostate, to open on the
length inner surface of the latter (see PELVIC VISCERA). The and size. length of this part of the excretory duct is about two feet,
this opens
urethra ;
STRUCTURE OF THE TESTIS. 513
and the width of its canal about th of an inch. Near its
termination the vas deferens becomes enlarged and tortuous;
but this condition will be referred to with the viscera of the
pelvis.
aberrans
sionally
tion and
Connected with the vas deferens, in the angle of union between Vas
it and the epididymis, is sometimes found a small narrow cæcal occatube, the vas aberrans of Haller. This body is convoluted, and present ;
projects upwards about two or three inches amongst the vessels of situa
the testicle. Like the epididymis, it is much longer when it is size.
unravelled, measuring fourteen inches sometimes in this condition,
but it may not exceed an inch and a half in length. Its capacity
is greatest at the end. Its use is unknown. The vas aberrans may
be found divided or doubled.
coats
duct ;
Structure. — The excretory duct of the testis is formed by Two
a thick, special, elastic coat, which is covered externally by form the
cellular tissue, and lined internally by epithelium. To the
feel the duct is firm and wiry, like whip- cord, and on a section its wall is dense and of a yellow colour, but it is thinnest
at the head of the epididymis. The special coat is composed a fibrous
of longitudinal and circular pale fibres (? muscular), the
former being in greatest abundance. The mucous membrane
is marked by longitudinal ridges in the straight part of the mucous.
canal, and by irregular ones in the sacculated part. A
columnar epithelium covers the inner surface.
and a
aberrans The canal of the vas deferens is larger than that of the Vas
epididymis, as before stated. The vas aberrans resembles like the
the vas deferens in structure.
-
duct.
Blood-vessels of the testicle. The branches of the spermatic Artery.
artery pierce the back of the testis, and enter the posterior part of
the mediastinum behind the rete testis. Leaving the mediastinum
the vessels are finely divided to form the vascular membrane that
lines the interior of the tunica albuginea. After being thus
divided, offsets are continued on the fine septa between the lobes
to the seminal tubules, on which they are distributed. The sper- Veins .
matic veins begin in the plexuses around the seminal tubes, and
issue from the gland at the posterior part ; they then ascend along
the cord, forming a plexus, and end in one trunk which joins the
vena cava on the right side and the renal vein on the left (p. 520.).
The lymphatics ascend on the blood vessels, and join the lumbar Lymphglands. The nerves are derived from the sympathetic.
LL
atics and nerves .
514 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Vessels of the duct.
A special blood-vessel (artery of the vas deferens) is furnished
to the excretory duct from the upper vesical artery ; and some
veins from the epididymis enter the spermatic veins.
bloodSECTION V.
AORTA AND VENA CAVA, AND THE DEEP MUSCLES.
Dissect AFTER the body is replaced in its former position (on the
vessels back) the student should prepare for examination the large
muscles. vessels and their branches, with the remaining muscles of the
abdomen.
and
To see Dissection. The peritoneum is to be removed from the surface
the dia- of the diaphragm, especially from the central tendinous part, and phragm.
from the fleshy processes or pillars which are fixed to the lumbar
vertebræ. On the right side the dissector should define two aponeurotic bands (arches), which give attachment to the muscular
fibres- one curves over the psoas muscle, and the other extends
from the transverse process of the first lumbar vertebra to the
last rib.
Aorta,
branch- es.
Take from the surface of the aorta and vena cava some cellular
cava, and membrane with the sympathetic nerve and the lymphatic glands,
and clean their branches to the diaphragm, to the kidney and
supra-renal body, to the testicle, and to the lumbar vertebræ and
the spinal cord. In like manner expose the large iliac divisions of
the aorta and cava, as far as Poupart's ligament. The ureter and
the spermatic vessels are to be cleaned as they cross the iliac
artery; and on this artery, branches ofa small nerve (genito- crural),
are to be sought near the thigh.
Psoas.
oflum- bar
On the right side clean the surface of the psoas muscle along the
side ofthe spine ; but on the left side show the fascia covering the
Nerves muscle, and clear away the fat from about the kidney. On the
surface of the muscle, and in the fat external to it, will be found
plexus. the branches of the lumbar plexus. On the anterior aspect is the
genito-crural nerve. Issuing at the outer border are four nerves :
-the ilio-hypogastric and ilio- inguinal near the top, the external
cutaneous about the centre, and the large anterior crural at the
lower part. Along the inner border of the muscle is the gangliated
cord of the sympathetic, with a chain of lumbar lymphatic glands ;
and somewhat below the pelvic part of the muscle is the obturator
BRANCHES OF THE AORTA. 515
tus lum- nerve. External to the psoas is the quadratus lumborum muscle, Quadraand crossing it near the last rib is the last dorsal nerve, with an forum
artery. In the hollow of the os ilii is the iliacus muscle, which, Iliacus
with the preceding, may be cleaned on the right side, whilst the
fascia that covers them may be observed on the opposite side.
muscle.
of the The ABDOMINAL AORTA extends from opposite the last Extent
dorsal vertebra to the left side of the body of the fourth aorta.
lumbar vertebra, where it divides into the common iliac
arteries. Its commencement is between the fleshy pillars of
the diaphragm, and its termination is nearly on a level with
the highest part of the crest of the ilium. The connections Connecof the vessel with surrounding parts have been before
referred to (p. 464.), and its branches now remain to be
examined.
tions.
branch- es ;
The branches of the aorta are numerous, and arise in the follow- Place of origin of ing order : -First, are the diaphragmatic arteries, two in number, the
which, if they arise separately, leave the sides of the aorta immediately it appears in the abdomen. Close to the tendinous ring of
the diaphragm the single trunk of the cœliac axis arises from the
front of the aorta ; and about a quarter of an inch lower down, also
on its front, is the trunk of the superior mesenteric artery. Half
an inch lower the renal arteries, right and left, take origin from
the sides of the aorta. From the fore part of the trunk, close
above each renal, is the small capsular branch, and below it is the
spermatic artery. From the front of the aorta, one to two inches
above the bifurcation, springs the superior mesenteric artery ; and
from the angle of division the small middle sacral artery runs
downwards. Four or five small lumbar arteries on each side come
from the posterior part of the aorta, opposite the bodies of the
vertebræ.
- their classifi- The branches may be further classified into two sets,
those that supply the viscera of the abdomen (visceral), and cation.
those that are furnished to the abdominal walls (parietal).
branch- A. The visceral branches are coeliac axis, superior and Visceral
inferior mesenteric, renal, capsular, and spermatic. Of this es.
set all, except the three last, viz. the renal, capsular, and
spermatic, have been examined (p. 458-470. ).
artery.
The renal arteries leave the aorta nearly at a right angle, Renal
and are directed outwards, one on each side. Near the
kidney each divides into four or five branches, which enter LL 2
516 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
is be- neath its vein ;
gives offsets .
Differ- ence be tween left and
its substance between the vein and the ureter. Each lies
beneath its companion vein, being surrounded by a plexus
of nerves, and supplies small twigs to the supra-renal capsule
(inferior capsular), to the ureter, and to the cellular membrane about the kidney.
The arteries of opposite sides have some differences. The
left is the shortest, owing to the position of the aorta. The
right. right crosses the spine, passing beneath the vena cava, and is
placed beneath its companion vein. Varieties, both in the
number and place of origin of this artery, are frequent.
Capsular artery .
Sperm- atic
remark- able.
to the
The capsular artery ( middle) is a small branch that runs
almost transversely outwards to the supra-renal body, to
which it is distributed. This artery anastomoses with the
other branches supplied to the supra-renal body by the renal
and phrenic arteries. It is of large size in the fetus.
The spermatic artery is destined for the testicle, and is
artery is remarkable in being small in size in proportion to its length,
in leaving the cavity of the abdomen, and in having the part
in the abdomen straight, but that in the cord tortuous.
Course From its origin below the renal, the vessel passes downwards
testicle. along the posterior wall of the abdomen, beneath the peritoneum, to the internal abdominal ring, where it enters the
spermatic cord, as before described ( p. 432.) . In the course
specified, the vessel passes along the front of the psoas,
crossing over the ureter and the external or the common
iliac artery, and as it leaves the abdomen it turns round the
epigastric artery, but is separated from it by the vas
deferens. On the right side the artery crosses the vena
cava. It is accompanied by the spermatic vein, and bythe
spermatic plexus of nerves.
Inthe female.
Condi.
tion in fetus.
BranchIn the female the corresponding artery (ovarian) descends
into the pelvis to the ovary and uterus.
In the fetus, before the testicle leaves the abdomen, the spermatic
artery is very short, but the vessel is elongated in proportion as
the part supplied is removed from its former site.
B. The parietal branches of the aorta are the phrenic,
wall of lumbar, and middle sacral arteries.
es to
abdo- men. Thediaphragmatic or inferior phrenic arteries are directed
ILIAC VESSELS. 517
-
phrenic
left
right.
Distriupwards and outwards along the under surface of the dia- Middle
phragm, near the posterior part, and end in branches to that
muscle, as well as in branches to anastomose with the surrounding arteries. The left artery passes behind the œso- course of
phageal opening, and the right behind the vena cava. Each and
ends in two branches : one (internal) passes onwards towards the fore part of the diaphragm, and anastomoses with bution.
its fellow of the opposite side, and with the branch to the
diaphragm (musculo- phrenic ), from the internal mammary ;
the other (external) is larger, and is directed outwards to
the side of the muscle, where it meets with the intercostal
arteries.
offsets.
Small branches are supplied by the external division of this Small
artery to the supra-renal body (superior capsular) ; and some
twigs are given by the left artery to the œsophagus, and by the
right to the vena cava.
The other parietal branches, viz. lumbar and middle sacral,
are not dissected in this stage. The former will be seen
after the lumbar plexus (p. 531. ), and the latter in the pelvis.
-
and tertion.
tions.
The COMMON ILIAC ARTERY is directed outwards from the Extent
bifurcation of the aorta to the base of the sacrum, and divides mina.
into two large trunks : one is for the supply of the lower
limb (external iliac ) , and another for the pelvis ( internal
iliac). Placed obliquely on the vertebral column, the vessel Connecmeasures about two inches in length, and is covered by the
peritoneum, also by branches of the sympathetic nerve, and
sometimes by the ureter. To the outer side, near its termi- Branchnation, is the psoas muscle. It is accompanied by a vein of
the same name. Usually it does not furnish any branch,
but it may give origin to the ilio-lumbar, or one renal
artery.
es.
ence beright
On opposite sides the vessels have some differences.
The Differ
artery of the right side is rather the longest, in consequence tween
of the position of the aorta on the left side of the spine. Its
companion vein is at first beneath, but afterwards external
to it, and this artery is also in front of the left common iliac
vein. On the left side the artery is crossed by the continu- and lef vessel.
LL 3
518 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN,
Place of origin and length change.
This artery
lower limb.
Extent and di- rection.
tions with parts
ation of the inferior mesenteric artery, and the corresponding
vein is situate below it.
Peculiarities. -The place of origin changes with that of the bifurcation ofthe aorta, and the length varies from less than half an inch (in
one case) to four inches and a half (Quain). Generally the left artery
divides lower than the right.
The EXTERNAL ILIAC ARTERY is that part of the leading
leads to vessel of the lower limb which is contained in the cavity of
the abdomen. Its extent is from the bifurcation of the
common iliac to the lower border of Poupart's ligament
(where it becomes femoral) ; and its direction would be indicated on the surface of the abdomen by a line from the left
of the umbilicus to the middle of the space between the
Connec- 1 symphysis pubis and the crest of the ilium. The vessel lies
above the brim of the pelvis, in its course to Poupart's ligaaround, ment, and is covered closely by the peritoneum in all its
extent. Near its origin it is crossed sometimes by the
ureter, and near Poupart's ligament the thick layer of subperitoneal fat conceals the artery, and the spermatic vessels
and part of the genito-crural nerve here lie on it for a short
distance ; but before the artery leaves the abdomen, the circumflex iliac vein crosses it, and the vas deferens bends down
along its inner side. To the outer side of the vessel is the
psoas muscle, except at Poupart's ligament, where the artery
lies on the psoas. A chain of lymphatic glands is placed
and with along the inner side of the vessel. The position of the external iliac vein is not the same on both sides. On the left
side the vein is internal to the artery all the way ; whilst on
the right side the vein has the same position on the pubes,
but it afterwards passes beneath the arterial trunk.
vein.
Two branch- es,
Occabranches
Two large branches, epigastric and circumflex iliac, arise
from the artery near its end, and are distributed to the wall
of the abdomen (p. 434.) . Some small unnamed twigs are
also given by it to the psoas muscle and to the lymphatic
glands.
Peculiarities. -Though the trunk of the vessel is commonly free sional from any large artery till near Poupart's ligament, it may be occupied
from it. about the middle by the origin of the obturator artery, or further on by
the internal circumflex artery ofthe thigh.
3
BRANCHES OF THE INFERIOR CAVA. 519
VEINS.
the abexcept
portæ,
The veins of the abdomen correspond so closely Veins of
to the arteries, both in the number, extent, and connections domen,
of the trunks, that it will be unnecessary to go into the same vena
detail as in the description of the arteries. Further, as the
veins increase in size, from the circumference towards the
centre of the body, those most distant from the heart will be
first described.
my of
iliac.
The external iliac is the continuation of the femoral vein Anatointo the abdomen beneath Poupart's ligament. It has the external
same extent as the artery of the same name, and ends by
uniting with the vein from the pelvis (internal iliac) to form
the common iliac vein. On the pubes the vein is on the Position
same level as the artery, and lies on the bone between the tery.
psoas and pectineus muscles ; but this position is not retained
throughout, for though the left vein remains internal to, the
right slips beneath its artery.
to ares.
The veins that open into it arethe epigastric and circumflex Branchiliac (p. 434.).
mon
veins
cava.
The common iliac vein ascends by the side of its com- Companion artery, the right almost vertically, and the left iliac
obliquely, to the right side of the body of the fifth lumbar form
vertebra (its upper part), where the two are blended in one
trunk-the vena cava. The right vein is the shortest, and Differis at first behind, but afterwards outside the artery of the length
same side. The left is altogether below the artery of that nections.
side, and moreover crosses beneath the right common iliac
artery.
ence in
and conit. Each receives the ilio-lumbar, and sometimes the lateral Veins to
sacral vein ; and the middle sacral vein also ends in the common iliac of the left side.
where
change.
Instead of the common iliac veins uniting at the spot men- Place
tioned, they may be continued upwards, one on each side of the the veins
aorta, as high as the kidney, before the left crosses that vessel to join may
join the right, and give origin to the vena cava. In these cases the vein on the left side receives one renal vein, and the two common
iliacs are connected by a small intervening branch at the spot
where they are commonly united.
The VENA CAVA INFERIOR collects and conveys to the Lower
heart the blood of the lower half of the body. Taking by side cava is
LL 4
520 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
of the aorta.
origin, as before said, on the right side of the fifth lumbar
vertebra, rather below the bifurcation of the aorta, this large
vein ascends on the right side of the vertebral column, and
Extent reaches the heart by perforating the diaphragm. Its connections. nections with the surrounding parts have been already described (p. 465.).
and cones from abdo- men,
Branch- In this course the cava receives parietal branches from the
wall ofthe abdomen and the diaphragm, and visceral branches
from the testicle, the kidney, the supra-renal body, and the
except liver. The veins belonging to the digestive apparatus, viz.
digestive to the intestinal canal, the spleen, and the pancreas, are appara- tus.
Lumbar veins
united to form the vena portæ (p. 470.) ; but the blood circulating in these veins reaches finally the cava through the
indirect channel of the veins of the liver.
The lumbar veins enter the posterior part of the vena cava,
after. and correspond in number and course to the arteries of the
same name : they will be dissected with those arteries.
Sperm- atic vein The spermatic vein enters the abdomen by the internal
abdominal ring, after forming the spermatic plexus in the
cord (p. 432.) . At first the vein consists of two branches
in the abdomen, which lie on the sides of the spermatic
ends dif- artery ; but these soon merge into one trunk, which ends on ferently on left the left side in the renal vein, opening into it at right angles ; andright sides. and on the right side in the inferior cava, which it pierces
Vein in the
obliquely below the renal vein. As the vein ascends to its
destination, it receives one or more branches from the wall
of the abdomen, and from the fat about the kidney.
In the female this vein (ovarian) has the same ending as
female. in the male, and it forms a plexus in the broad ligament of the uterus.
Renal vein ;
to ar- tery ;
The renal or emulgent vein is of large size, and joins the
position vena cava at a right angle. It commences, by many branches,
in the kidney ; and the trunk resulting from their union is
differ superficial to the renal artery. The right is the shortest,
and joins the cava higher up than the other. The left vein
crosses the aorta close to the origin of the superior mesenteric artery.
ence on two sides.
Branch.
es .
Each vein receives branches from the supra-renal capsule,
and the left is joined by the spermatic vein of the same side.
THE DIAPHRAGM. 521
renal The supra-renal vein is of considerable size when a com- Supraparison is made between it and the body from which it ends difcomes. On the right side it opens into the cava, and on the
left side into the renal vein.
ferently.
veins.
The diaphragmatic veins (inferior), two for each artery, Phrenic
spring from the under surface of the diaphragm. They join
the cava either as one trunk or two.
The hepatic veins enter the cava where it is in contact Hepatic
with the liver. These veins are described in the dissection before
of the liver (p. 499.) .
veins,
noticed.
be also
side,
or in
Peculiarities of the vena cava.— Where transposition of the viscera Vena exists the vena cava and the aorta change sides. But without that cavamay
transposition the vein may be on the left side of the aorta as high as on left
the renal vein, before it crosses that vessel to take its usual place. Or
the inferior cava may enter the azygos vein, and the blood from the part,
lower part of the body be then transmitted to the heart by the superior end in
cava ; when this deviation exists the hepatic veins form a separate gos vein.
trunk, which opens into the right auricle in the situation of the inferior cava.
or may
the azyTHE DEEP MUSCLES.
muscles The muscles in the interior of the abdomen are the dia- These
phragm, psoas, iliacus, and quadratus lumborum. Some are,
fasciæ are also to be seen in connection with the muscles.
phragm.
tion and
at the
ference.
The DIAPHRAGM is a vaulted moveable partition between Diathe thorax and the abdomen. It is concave towards the situa
latter cavity, where it is marked by a central tendon, and is form.
attached externally, by a muscular part, to the surrounding
ribs and to the spinal column. The origin of the muscle is Origin
similar on each side of the middle line : thus, beginning in circumfront and passing backwards, it will be found connected by
fleshy fibres with the posterior part of the xiphoid cartilage,
and with the inner aspect of the six lower ribs ; with two
aponeurotic arches between the last rib and the vertebræ, one
being placed over the quadratus lumborum, and the other over
the psoas muscle ; and, lastly, it is connected with the bodies
of the lumbar vertebræ by a thick muscular part (pillar). InserFrom this extensive origin at the circumference, the fibres tion
522 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
into a
tendon.
contact
under
the
of fibres are directed, with different degrees of obliquity and length,
central to the central median tendon ; and with peculiarities of disposition in some fibres (those of the pillars) which will be
examined afterwards more in detail. The muscle arches
Parts in higher on the right than the left side, and is covered for the
with the most part by peritoneum. In contact with it, on the right
surface, side, are the liver and kidney ; and on the left side, the stomach, the spleen, and the left kidney : in contact also with
the pillars is the pancreas, with the solar plexus and the
and with semilunar ganglia. The thoracic surface is covered by the
upper. pleura and by the pericardium, and is convex towards the
thorax (p. 350) . At the circumference of the muscle, the
fleshy processes of origin alternate with like parts of the
Attach- transversalis muscle. A cellular interval separates the
border. attachments to the xiphoid cartilage and the seventh rib ;
and there is also another interval sometimes between the
fibres from the last rib and those from the arch over the
Aper- quadratus lumborum muscle. In the diaphragm are certain
apertures for the transmission of parts from the thorax to the
abdomen, viz. one for the oesophagus, another for the vena
cava, and a third for the aorta between the pillars of the
muscle and the spinal column : moreover, the pillars are
perforated by the splanchnic and sympathetic nerves.
ment of
tures in the muscle.
Special parts to be exThe following parts, that have been mentioned incidentally
in describing the diaphragm, are now to be noticed more
amined. fully they are the central tendon, the pillars, and the arches
and apertures.
Central tendon,
like a
trefoil leaf.
Two pillars,
with certain resem- blances
The central tendon (tendo diaphragmatis, cordiform tendon) is situate at the highest part of the diaphragm, and is
surrounded by muscular fibres. It is of a pearly white
colour, and its tendinous fibres cross in different planes and
in different directions. In form it resembles a trefoil leaf,
of which the central part is the largest, whilst the left division (ala) is the smallest.
The pillars (crura appendices) are two large fleshy processes, one on each side of the abdominal aorta, which are
connected with the lumbar vertebræ. Each is pointed and
tendinous below, where it is attached to the vertebræ, but
large and fleshy at the upper part ; and between them is a
PARTS OF THE DIAPHRAGM. 523
ferences.
ment of
each,
tendinous arch over the aorta. The pillars differ somewhat and difon opposite sides : thus the right is the larger of the two,
and is fixed by tendinous processes to the bodies of the first
three lumbar vertebræ, to their intervertebral substance,
and to the fibro- cartilage between the third and fourth vertebræ. The left pillar, which is situate more on the side of
the spine, is partly concealed by the aorta, and does not reach
so far as the right by the depth of a vertebra or of an intervertebral substance. In each pillar the fleshy fibres that Arrange
succeed to the tendon pass upwards and forwards, diverging fibres in
from each other. The external and middle join at once the
central tendon. But the internal fibres ascend by the side of as they
the aorta and pass to the opposite side, decussating between tothe
that vessel and the opening of the esophagus with those of
its fellow ; having changed sides, these fibres are directed
upwards to the central tendon around the œsophagean opening, which they limit. In the decussation between the
aorta and the oesophagus the fasciculus of fibres from the
right crus is larger than that from the left, and is anterior
to it.
ascend
tendon.
arches,
or true,
The arches (ligamenta arcuata) are two fibrous bands over Two
the quadratus lumborum and psoas muscles on each side.
The arch over the psoas (lig. arcuatum internum) is the internal
strongest, and is connected by the one end to the tendinous
part ofthe pillar of the diaphragm, and by the other end to
the transverse process of the first or second lumbar vertebra.
The external arch over the quadratus lumborum muscle and ex-
(lig. arcuat. externum) is only a thickened part of the fascia false.
covering that muscle, and extends from the same transverse
process (first or second lumbar) to the last rib. As before
said, fleshy fibres take origin from both bands.
ternal or
tures
aorta ;
The apertures in the diaphragm are three large ones for Aperthe aorta, the vena cava, and the oesophagus, with some aresmaller ones for nerves and vessels. The opening for the For the
aorta is rather behind than in the diaphragm, for it is situate
between the pillars of the muscle and the spinal column : it its contransmits the aorta, the thoracic duct, and sometimes the
vena azygos. The opening for the oesophagus and pneumo- For
gastric nerves is rather above and to the left of the aortic gus and
tents.
œsopha
nerves.
524 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
aperture. It is situate in the muscular part of the diaphragm,
and is formed by the fibres of the pillars, as above explained.
For the The opening for the vena cava is placed in the right division vena cava.
Fissures in the
of the central tendon, or between the right and middle pieces,
and its margins are attached to the vein by tendinous fibres.
It is described as being of a square form (foramen quadratum).
There is afissure in each pillar for the splanchnic nerves,
pillars. with one in the left for the small azygos vein. Sometimes
the large azygos vein pierces the right pillar instead of
passing with the aorta.
Take away greater
Dissection. -
After the diaphragm has been learnt, cut through
the ribs that support it on each side, and take away the pieces ofthe
part of ribs together with all the diaphragm, except the pillars and arches at
phragm. the posterior part. On the right side of the body the following
muscles are to be seen ; on the left, the fascia covering them.
the diaPsoas magnus ;
tion ;
origin.
The PSOAS MAGNUS reaches from the lumbar vertebræ to
situa- the femur, and is situate partly in the abdomen and partly
in the thigh. The muscle arises from the anterior aspect of
the transverse processes of the lumbar vertebræ, and from
the side of the bodies of the last dorsal and all the lumbar
vertebræ by five processes, which are connected each to the
upper and lower border of two contiguous vertebræ, and to
Direc- their intervertebral substance. The fibres are directed downwards, and give rise to a roundish muscle, which gradually
diminishes towards Poupart's ligament. Inferiorly the
muscle ends in a tendon on the outer aspect, which receives
the fibres of the iliacus, and passes beneath Poupart's ligaInser- ment to be inserted behind the small trochanter of the femur,
and into the contiguous part of the bone.
tion of the fibres.
tion.
Connec- tions in front,
-
The abdominal part of the muscle has the following connections : - in front of it are the internal arch of the diaphragm, the kidney with its vessels and duct, the spermatic
vessels and the genito-crural nerve, and, near Poupart's
behind ; ligament, the external iliac artery. Posteriorly the muscle
is in contact with the transverse processes, with part of the
of outer quadratus lumborum, and with the innominate bone. The border,
outer border touches the quadratus and iliacus, and branches
DEEP MUSCLES OF THE ABDOMEN. 525
border ;
pelvic
of the lumbar plexus issue from beneath it. The inner ofinner
border is partly connected to the vertebræ, and is partly free
along the margin of the pelvis. Along the vertebral part of along
this border lie the sympathetic nerve and some lumbar
glands, with the cava on the right, and the aorta on the left
side ; along the pelvic part of the muscle are the external
iliac artery and vein, and the obturator nerve is below it.
It has been before said that the muscle is connected only and verwith the margins of the vertebræ ; and it may be seen that part.
opposite the centre of those bones the fibres are attached to
tendinous arches over the lumbar vessels.
tebral
parvus ;
PSOAS PARVUS is a small muscle with a flat tendon, which Psoas
is placed on the front of the large psoas. Its fibres arise origin ;
from the last dorsal and from the upper lumbar vertebra,
and the intervening fibro-cartilage, and end in a tendon,
which becomes broader inferiorly, and is inserted into the inserilio-pectinal eminence and brim of the pelvis. The tendon
is connected with the fascia covering the iliacus muscle. often
This muscle is rarely present.
tion ;
absent.
has the
the iliac
tion ;
The ILIACUS MUSCLE occupies the hollow (iliac fossa) on Iliacus
the inner aspect of the os ilii, and is blended inferiorly with form of
the psoas muscle. It is triangular in form, and has a fleshy fossa.
origin from the iliac fossa and ilio-lumbar ligament, some- origin ;
times from the base of the sacrum, and in front from the
capsule of the hip-joint. The fibres pass inwards to the
tendon of the psoas, uniting with it even to its insertion into inserthe femur, and some reach separately that bone. Above parts
Poupart's ligament the muscle is covered on both sides by fo
the iliac fascia ; but on the right side the cæcum is in front sides.
of it, whilst on the left the sigmoid flexure conceals it.
Beneath it are the innominate bone and the capsule of the
hip-joint. The inner margin is in contact with the psoas Tothe
and the anterior crural nerve. The connections of the united side is
psoas and iliacus below Poupart's ligament are given with psoas.
the dissection of the thigh.
covering
opposite
inner
the
muscle
parts ;-
The QUADRATUS LUMBORUM is a short thick muscle inter- This
vening between the crest of the ilium and the last rib, which has two
consists of two parts, inner and outer. The outer part arises outer,
inferiorly from the ilio-vertebral ligament, and from two largest,
which is
526 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
and pos- inches of the crest of the ilium anterior to it. The fibres terior ; ascend, and are inserted by distinct fleshy and tendinous slips
into the apices of the transverse processes of the four upper
lumbar vertebræ, as well as into the body of the last dorsal
and in- vertebra and a small part of the last rib. The inner part is
anterior. situate before the other, and arises from the tips of the three ner, or
It is contain.
ed in a
sheath.
Fascia ofthe
tus
middle transverse processes of the lumbar vertebræ. Its
fibres are directed backwards across the posterior, and are
inserted into the lower border of the last rib. This muscle
is incased in a sheath derived from the fascia lumborum.
Crossing the surface are branches of the lumbar plexus,
together with the last dorsal nerve. Beneath the quadratus
is the mass of the erector spinæ muscle.
Fascia of the quadratus. Covering the surface of the
quadra- quadratus is a thin membrane which is derived from the
tendon of the transversalis abdominis (fascia lumborum,
p. 363.), and passes in front of the quadratus to be fixed to the
roots of the transverse processes, to the crest of the ilium,
and to the last rib. It is this fascia that forms the thickened
band called ligamentum arcuatum externum.
forms lig. arc.
extern.
Iliac fascia
tendon
psoas
Fascia ofthe iliacus and psoas.
- This fascia covers the
two muscles, and extends in different directions as far as
joinedby their attachments. Over the iliacus muscle the membrane is
ofsmall thickest ; and when the tendon of the small psoas muscle is
attach- present a strong accession is received from it. The disposition of the fascia at Poupart's ligament, and the part that it
takes in the formation of the femoral sheath have been before
internal- explained (p. 444. ) When traced inwards over the psoas
to pelvis the fascia is found to be inserted into the os ilii near the
ments below
ly both
brim of the pelvis ; and when followed upwards it is seen to
become thin, and to be fixed on the one side to the lumbar
vertebræ and the ligamentum arcuatum internum, whilst
on the other it is blended with the fascia on the quadratus.
and the At its attachment to the vertebræ the fascia has the same
digitate and arched condition as the muscle. The fascia
should be divided over the psoas on the left side, and reflected towards the brim of the pelvis.
verte- bræ.
Trace the lymph- atics.
- Dissection. The student is now to clean the lymphatic glands
along the vertebræ, and to trace upwards some lymphatic vessels
THORACIC DUCT. AZYGOS VEINS. 527
taculum.
to the thoracic duct. To expose the commencement of the duct
divide the diaphragm over the aorta, and throw its pillars to each
side, then cut through the aorta with care, and take out a piece of
it. Nowthe beginning of the duct (chyli receptaculum) and of Recepthe vena azygos will be well seen, and may be followed upwards Azygos into the thorax. On the left side the student may trace the veins .
splanchnic nerves and the small vena azygos through the pillar of Splanchthe diaphragm, and show the trunk of the sympathetic nerve entering the abdomen beneath the arch over the psoas muscle.
-
nic nerves.
lymphthe abone
enterLymphatic glands. A chain of glands is placed along Lumbar
the side of the external iliac artery, and along the front and atics of
sides of the lumbar vertebræ ; these are connected by short domen
tubes which increase in size and diminish in number until at
the upper part of the lumbar vertebræ only the three trunks end in
remain that unite to form the thoracic duct. Into these duct.
glands run the lymphatics of the lower limb, those of the Ducts
viscera and wall of the abdomen, and of the genital organs ing
and testicle.
Receptaculum chyli. -The thoracic duct begins in the Beginabdomen, by the union of three or four large lymphatic ves- the thosels. Its commencement is marked by a considerable dila- duct,
tation, which is named as above, and is placed on the right on right
side of the aorta, about opposite the second lumbar vertebra. at second lumbar,
The duct then enters the thorax by passing through the vertediaphragm with the aorta.
-
glands.
ning of
racic
of aorta,
bra.
azygos
into
Beginning of the azygos veins. The right vein (vena Large
azygos major) begins opposite the first or second lumbar vein;
vertebra by a small branch that is continuous with a lumbar
vein, or it may be with the vena cava or the renal vein.
Howeverformed, the vein enters the thorax with the thoracic entrance
duct and the aorta, to the right of which it lies. This vein thorax.
may pierce the crus of the diaphragm. The left or small Small
azygos vein begins on the left side of the spine, joining here vein.
one of the lumbar veins or the renal vein, and passes
through the pillar of the diaphragm, or through the aortic
opening. The anatomy of these veins is given with the thorax, p. 343.
azygos
528 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN,
SECTION VI.
LUMBAR PLEXUS AND THE CORD OF THE SYMPATHETIC.
Dissec- Dissection.
tion of
bar plexus,
-
To bring into view the lumbar plexus and the
the lum- nerves by which it is formed, the dissector should scrape away the
muscle on the left side. On the right side the psoas may be psoas
left untouched to see at what places the branches issue from it.
For the most part the fleshy fibres may be removed freely ; but a
small branch (accessory of the obturator) should be looked for at
the inner border of the muscle. Next follow along the lumbar
arteries the branches of the sympathetic that join the spinal nerves.
joining In the substance ofthe quadratus lumborum a communication may
sometimes be found between the last dorsal and the first lumbar
and of the nerves
it.
Four lumbar nerves enter the plexus,
and supply
nerve.
SPINAL LUMBAR NERVES. ― The anterior divisions of the
lumbar nerves, except the last, enter into the lumbar plexus.
Five in number, they increase in size from the first to the
last, and are joined by filaments of the sympathetic near the
intervertebral foramina. They supply branches also to the
muscles ; psoas and quadratus lumborum muscles.
fifth to the
plexus
The fifth or lowest nerve receives a communicating branch
sacral from the fourth nerve, and descends into the pelvis to enter
named the sacral plexus. After this nerve is joined by the offset
sacral. from the fourth, the name lumbo- sacral is applied to the
common trunk.
lumboPlexus how
tion.
The LUMBAR PLEXUS is formed by loops of communicaformed. tion between the four highest lumbar nerves. Contained in
the substance of the psoas, near its posterior part, the plexus Situa- increases in size from above downwards, like the individual
Connec- nerves. Superiorly a connection is sometimes found be- with tween the first lumbar and the last dorsal nerve, and inferiorly the large lumbo-sacral cord unites the lumbar and
sacral plexuses.
tions
nerves .
Six branch- The branches of the plexus supply the lower part of the
es, viz. abdominal wall, the fore part of the thigh, and the inner
side of the leg ; they are six in number, as below :
ilio-
--
1. The ilio-hypogastric branch comes from the first nerve,
gastric and appears at the outer border of the psoas muscle, near the hypo-
BRANCHES OF THE LUMBAR PLEXUS. 529
first
in abdoupper part. This branch is then directed over the quadratus is the
lumborum to the crest of the ilium, and enters the wall of branch.
the abdomen by piercing the transversalis abdominis. Its Course
termination in the integuments of the buttock and abdomen men.
by means of an iliac and a hypogastric branch has been
already seen (p. 417.).
with
ing,
2. The ilio-inguinal branch arises with the preceding Ilio.
inguinal from the first nerve, and issues from the psoas at the same arises
spot. Of smaller size than the ilio-hypogastric, and lower precedthan it, this branch courses outwards over the quadratus and
iliacus muscles towards the front of the crest of the ilium,
where it also pierces the transversalis abdominis. The far- and acther course of the nerve in the abdominal wall, and its dis- nies it .
tribution over the cord and groin, are before noticed (pp.
417. 429.).
compa.
absent. The size of this nerve depends upon that of the ilio - hypogastric May be
branch ; and the nerve may be absent if the latter is large.
crural 3. The genito-crural branch arises from the second lum- Genito.
bar nerve, and from the connecting loop between it and the
first nerve. It pierces the fibres of the psoas, and descend- pierces
ing on the surface of the muscle divides into a genital and a
crural branch. Sometimes the nerve is divided in the psoas, and
and the branches perforate the muscle separately.
psoas,
divides into
and a. The genital branch descends on the external iliac ar- genital
tery, and furnishes offsets around it ; it passes from the
abdomen with the spermatic vessels, to be distributed in
the cremaster muscle. In the female the nerve is lost in the
round ligament.
branch.
b. The crural branch issues beneath Poupart's ligament crural
to supply the integument of the thigh. See Cutaneous
Nerves of the Thigh.
of this
the ab4. The external cutaneous nerve of the thigh arises from Course
the second nerve of the plexus, or from the loop between it nerve in
and the third, and appears at the outer border of the psoas, domen
about its middle. The nerve then takes an oblique course to
across the iliacus to the interval between the anterior spinous the
processes of the ilium, and leaves the abdomen beneath
M M
reach
thigh.
530 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Origin of this Derve.
in the
Poupart's ligament, to be distributed on the outer aspect of
the thigh.
5. The anterior crural nerve is by far the largest offset of
the plexus. Taking origin from the third and fourth nerves,
and receiving a fasciculus also from the second, this large
Position nerve appears at the lower part of the psoas. Here it lies abdo- in the hollow between that muscle and the iliacus, and passes
to the thigh beneath Poupart's ligament. Before its final
branching in the thigh, the nerve furnishes the following
small twigs :
men ;
its branches here
to ilia- cus,
to femo- ral ar-
-
Some small branches are given to the iliacus muscle from the
outer side of the nerve whilst it is placed in the abdomen.
A branch to the femoral artery is distributed around the upper
tery. part of that vessel. Its place of origin varies much.
Obtura- tor
the ab6. The obturator nerve is derived from the third and fourth
nerve in nerves in the plexus, and is directed beneath the psoas to its
domen ; inner or pelvic border. Escaped from beneath the muscle,
the nerve crosses the pelvic cavity below the external iliac,
to reach but above the obturator vessels, and enters the thigh by
means of the aperture in the upper part of the thyroid foramen. Occasionally the obturator gives origin to the following branch :
the thigh ;
its ac- cessory
ཏ ་
The accessory obturator nerve arises near the beginning of the
branch trunk of the obturator, or from the third and fourth nerves ofthe
plexus. Its course is along the inner border of the psoas, beneath
the investing fascia, and over the surface of the os pubis to the
supplies thigh, where it ends by joining the obturator nerve, and supplying
joint. the hip joint.
hip
Sympa- thetic GANGLIATED CORD OF THE SYMPATHETIC. The lumbar
cord in part of the gangliated cord of the sympathetic in the abdomen
domen is placed on each side of the spinal column, and is continuous the abthat in
upwards, beneath the inner arch of the diaphragm, with the
thoracic part of that cord, and downwards with the pelvic
joins part of the same. It lies along the inner border of the
thorax ; psoas muscle, nearer the front of the vertebræ than in the
thorax, and is partly concealed on the right side by the vena
cava. Each cord presents four or five oblong ganglia oppoganglia ; site the bodies of the vertebræ ; and from these are supplied
has four or five
LUMBAR ARTERIES AND VEINS. 531
connecting branches to the spinal nerves, and branches of
distribution.
--- branches
the
a. Connecting branches.. From the outer part of each gan- their
glion two small branches are directed backwards along the centre to either
of the body of the vertebra with the lumbar artery, to unite with spinal
the anterior division of a spinal nerve near the intervertebral nerves
foramen. These branches are often divided between two spinal
nerves. The connecting branches are longest in the lumbar region
in consequence of the cord being carried forwards by the psoas
muscle to the fore part of the vertebræ,
b. Branches of distribution. - Most of the internal branches or the
throw themselves into the aortic and hypogastric plexuses, and by for the plexuses
these means reach the viscera. Some filaments enter the vertebræ supply
and their connecting ligaments.
of the viscera .
nerve is
interto wall
Last dorsal nerve. -The anterior division of the last dorsal This
nerve resembles the other intercostal nerves in its distri- like the
bution, but differs from them in being placed below the last costal.
rib. The nerve is directed outwards across the upper part
of the quadratus lumborum, beneath the fascia covering it.
At the outer border of that muscle it pierces the posterior Course
aponeurosis of the transversalis abdominis (fascia lumborum), of the
and enters the wall of the abdomen, where it ends in an men.
abdominal and a cutaneous branch (p. 428). A small branch
from the first lumbar artery accompanies the nerve. Near
the spine it furnishes a small branch to the quadratus muscle,
which may communicate with the first lumbar nerve.
abdo .
number
side,
canal on each
aortic like the
Com- costal.
interThe LUMBAR ARTERIES are some of the parietal branches Five in
of the aorta (p. 516.) , and are furnished to the spinal
and the wall of the abdomen. They resemble the
intercostal branches in their course and distribution.
monly five in number on each side, these arteries arise opposite the centre of the vertebræ, and the vessels of opposite
sides are sometimes joined in a common trunk : they then Course
pass backwards in the hollow of the vertebræ, the upper
two beneath the pillar of the diaphragm, and the lower ones
beneath the psoas, to reach the intervals between the trans- and terverse processes, where each ends in an abdominal and a tion in
dorsal branch. The arteries of the right side pass beneath
the cava.
minaMM 2
532 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
a branch to the back,
and a
branch to the wall of the aba. The dorsal branch continues onwards to the back between
the transverse processes, and supplies a spinal branch to the spinal
canal. The distribution of the artery is described with the vessels
ofthe back and of the spinal cord (p. 373. 387.).
b. The abdominal branch is directed outwards beneath the quadratus lumborum, except that of the first, and sometimes that of the
last nerve, which are or may be superficial to the muscle. The
domen. branches then enter the posterior part of the abdominal wall, the
first beingthe largest, and anastomose with the lower intercostal, the
circumflex iliac, and the ilio-lumbar arteries. These arteries
supply the psoas and quadratus muscles. The size of the last
two varies with that of the ilio -lumbar branch of the internal iliac
artery.
The veins rethe arte- ries,
into the cava ;
The LUMBAR VEINS are the same in number, and have the
semble same course as the arteries. Commencing by the union of
a dorsal and an abdominal branch at the root of the transverse process, the trunk of the vein is directed forwards with
and open the artery to the vena cava. These vessels open into the
posterior part of the vena cava, either singly or conjointly
with those of the opposite side. The veins of the left side
are longer than those of the right, and pass beneath the aorta.
Beneath the psoas muscle the lumbar veins communicate freely
around the transverse processes with one other, with the ilio-lumaround bar vein, and sometimes with the common iliac, so as to form a
plexus of veins. Issuing from the plexus is a venous trunk
process (ascending lumbar vein) , which joins on each side the azygos vein.
left longest.
Aplexus is form- ed
the trans- verse
es.
FASCIA OF THE PELVIS. 533
CAVITY OF THE PELVIS.
tion of
space
meant,
situaand
aries.
The cavity of the pelvis is but a part of the general space Definiof the abdomen. It is situate below the brim or inlet of the the
true pelvis, and is bounded behind by the sacrum and coccyx, here
and, laterally and in front, by the innominate bones. In- with its
feriorly, or towards the perinæum, the floor of the cavity is tion
formed by the fascia reflected from the wall to the viscera, boundand by some muscles that will be afterwards seen. In the
interior are contained the urinary bladder, the lower end of Conthe rectum, and some of the generative organs, according to
the sex. All these parts have vessels, nerves, and lymphatics
connected with them, and the serous membrane is reflected
over them.
tents.
SECTION I.
FASCIA OF THE PELVIS AND MUSCLES OF THE OUTLET.
ofthe
the
On the wall of the pelvis is a thin fascia (pelvic), which ex- Outline
tends from the brim to the outlet, and covers the obturator fascia of
muscle. At a certain level a visceral layer is directed in- pelvis.
wards from that membrane lining the wall, and is named
recto-vesical fascia, from its attachment to the rectum and
the bladder.
define
vic
Dissection. To expose the parietal layer, or the pelvic fascia, Steps to
take away the external iliac vessels on the left side of the body, the peland the psoas if it has not been removed in the dissection of the fascia.
lumbar plexus. Cut across the obturator vessels and nerve, and
the peritoneum being detached from the wall of the pelvis, scrape
away a large quantity of fat with the handle of the scalpel.
The fascia will now be seen as low as the situation of the piece of
the membrane that is prolonged to the viscera, whilst the part of
the fascia below the origin of the visceral layer has been seen in
the examination of the perinæum ; but if the perinæum has not MM 3
534 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Fascia of the
the vis. pelIts at tach- ment around
turator
been dissected, raise the lower aperture of the pelvis, and take the
fat from the ischio-rectal fossa. If the scalpel is pushed upwards
in the fossa, it will pierce the visceral layer (recto- vesical) close to
its origin, and will mark the position of the levator ani muscle
between the pelvic and recto- vesical fasciæ.
The pelvic fascia is a thin membrane that is in close conwallof tact with the obturator muscle, and is fixed to the bone
around its circumference, so that it might be called the
special fascia (obturator) of that muscle. Superiorly its
attachment to bone is determined by the extent of the muscle.
the ob- Thus it reaches the brim of the pelvis for a short distance at
muscle ; the lateral aspect of the cavity ; but in front of this it quits
the brim, and still following the muscle forms an arch below
the obturator vessels ; and from the last spot inwards it is
fixed along an oblique line that reaches to the lower part of
the symphysis pubis. Inferiorly the fascia is attached to the
margin of the great sacro- sciatic ligament, and to the rami
of the ischium and pubes ; but below the pubic arch it is
continued from one bone to the other for a certain distance,
partly so as to join the recto-vesical piece at that spot, and to close
aperture the cavity of the pelvis in that direction. At a certain level,
of pronit ; that of a line prolonged from the lower part of the symphysis
pubis to the spine of the ischium, the fascia sends inwards
gives off the recto- vesical layer to the viscera of the pelvis ; the
vesical origin of this offset is indicated by a whitish band, which piece. marks the attachment of the levator ani muscle beneath.
Connec- The outer surface of the fascia is in contact with the obturator muscle. The inner surface, above the origin of the
recto-vesical fascia, is in the cavity of the pelvis, but below
that spot it enters into the ischio-rectal fossa. At the posterior border of the obturator muscle a thin membrane is
continued backwards to the front of the sacrum, over the
sacral plexus and the pyriformis muscle, but beneath the
vessels by which it is perforated.
closes
in
rectotions of the fascia.
Differ- ent terms
It may here be remarked that the term " pelvic" is not applied
always, as in the previous description, to the fascia in its whole
applied extent from the brim to the outlet of the pelvis, but that the name
" obturator" is given to the part of it below the recto- vesical
piece. Those who make this distinction describe the pelvic fascia
to the fascia.
MUSCLES OF THE OUTLET OF THE PELVIS. 535
as dividing into obturator and recto - vesical layers at the level of
the line mentioned.
vesical
alter.
The recto-vesical fascia may be seen extending from the Rectowall of the pelvis to the viscera ; but it will be better ex- layer
amined after the innominate bone has been taken away for
the purpose of obtaining a side view of the pelvis.
-
remove ,
nomiDissection. To obtain a side view of the pelvis it will be ne- How to
cessary to separate one innominate bone, say the left. Detach then the inthe pelvic fascia from the same side of the pelvis, separating it nate.
carefully from the obturator muscle, but without destroying the bone.
attachments of the white band of the fascia both before and behind.
Saw through the innominate bone in front external to the symphysis, and afterwards saw through the lateral part of the sacrum.
Cut off with a bone forceps the spine of the ischium with the pelvic
fascia attached to it, and then take away the rest of the innominate
bone by cutting through the pyriformis muscle and the vessels and
nerves accompanying it through the sacro-ischiatic notch.
tion of
parts.
Place now a small block beneath the pelvis ; partly distend the Preparabladder, and introduce tow into the rectum or into the vagina of the
the female, as well as a small piece into the pouch of the perito- neum between the bladder and the rectum. If the bladder is
empty half fill it with air. After the viscera are thus made prominent, the surfaces of the levator ani and coccygeus muscles are
to be cleaned by taking away the cellular membrane from them.
In this proceeding the recto-vesical fascia and the spine of the
ischium should be raised with hooks.
-
by
formis,
coccygesacroligaParts closing the outlet of the pelvis. In addition to the Outlet ofpelvis recto-vesical fascia, the following parts assist to fill the large is closed
outlet of the pelvis that remains in the dried bones. Beginning behind, the student will first meet the pyriformis pyrimuscle, with the gluteal artery and nerve above it. Next by
comes the coccygeus muscle, with the sacro- sciatic ligaments us, and stretched between the spine of the ischium and the соссух, sciatic
one border of the muscle reaching towards the pyriformis, ments,
and the other to the levator ani ; and between its posterior with
border and the pyriformis are placed the sacral plexus of and
nerves and the sciatic and pudic vessels. The greater part
of the rest of the space is closed by the levator ani, which by levaextends from the coccygeus and the spine of the ischium,
to the posterior part of the symphysis pubis, and meets its
vessels
nerves ;
tor ani,
M M4
536 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
pelvic fascia below
and by fellow inferiorly ; but as the anterior fibres of opposite muscles are separated by the urethra and the prostate gland, the
interval between them is closed by the fascia lining the
pelvis.
the pubes.
Coccy- geus ;
origin
sertion.
The COCCYGEUS MUSCLE is flat and triangular, and assists
to close the outlet of the pelvis. It arises by a narrow part
from the spine of the ischium, and some fibres are attached
to the small sacro- sciatic ligament. Widening as it passes
and in- inwards, the muscle is inserted into the side of the coccyx
and into the lower part of the sacrum. The inner surface
tionsof looks to the pelvis, and is in contact with the rectum ; the
opposite surface rests on the small sacro- sciatic ligament.
The posterior border is contiguous to the pyriformis muscle,
only vessels and nerves intervening, and the anterior or
lower border is parallel to the levator ani muscle.
Connecsurfaces
and borders .
Levator ani ;
situa- tion.
partly bony,
and partly mem- bran- ous.
Inser- tion along middle line of
-
The LEVATOR ANI is a thin flat muscle, which is situate in
the angular interval between the pelvic and the recto-vesical
fascia, and descends to support the viscera of the pelvis by
joining below them with the muscle of the opposite side. It
Origin arises anteriorly by fleshy fibres from an oblique line on the
posterior aspect of the pubes, and posteriorly from the inner
surface of the spine of the ischium ; but between those two
points of bone the muscle takes origin from the under part
of the recto-vesical fascia, along the line of the white band
before alluded to. All the fibres are directed downwards to
the middle line of the body, to be inserted after the following
manner : -The anterior are the longest, and descend by the
side of the prostate to join, anterior to the rectum, with the the peri- næum. muscle of the opposite side in the central point of the
perinæum ; the middle fibres are inserted into the side of
the rectum ; whilst the posterior meet the opposite muscle
behind the gut, and are also attached to the side of the
coccyx, as before described in the dissection of the perinæum
Borders (p. 398.) The anterior fibres of the levator are in contact and with the fascia that closes the arch of the pubes, and the
muscle. surfaces . posterior are parallel to the coccygeus The upper
surface is contiguous to the recto-vesical fascia, and the
viscera of the pelvis ; and the outer surface looks to the perinæum (ischio-rectal fossa). The two muscles, by their union,
RECTO-VESICAL FASCIA. 537
muscles
fleshy
phragm.
form a fleshy layer across the outlet of the pelvis, similar to Two
that (diaphragm ) which separates the abdomen from the form a
chest. This partition is convex below and concave above, diaand gives passage to the rectum, and in the female to the
vagina ; in front there is also an interval between the most
anterior fibres, which allows the urethra to pass from the
pelvis.
fibres The anterior part of the muscle which descends by the side of Anterior
the prostate, and unites with its fellow below the membranous named
part of the urethra, thus supporting that canal as in a sling, has prosbeen named levator seu compressor prostatæ.
-
levator
tatæ .
tion for
rectoDissection. —Detach the fleshy fibres of the levator ani at their Dissecorigin, also the coccygeus muscle from the spine of the ischium, the
and throw both downwards, so as to leave uncut the recto-vesical vesical fascia and its reflections on the viscera. The fascia will now be fascia.
seen to be connected to the side of the bladder and rectum, and
to give sheaths to those viscera below the spot at which it reaches
them. To demonstrate these sheaths make one incision along the
prostate, and another along the lower part of the rectum below
the attachment of the fascia, and separate the membranous covering from each viscus.
vesical
fron
fascia,
reflected
viscera
ing
The recto-vesical fascia is derived from the pelvic fascia, Rectoand supports and partly invests the viscera of the pelvis. fascia
Arising, as before said, on a level with a band that extends arises
from the pubes to the spine of the ischium, the fascia is pelvic
directed inwards on the levator ani, and has the following
disposition on the viscera : - In the middle line in front, it and is
is continued from the back of the pubes to the upper surface on tothe
of the prostate ; here it closes the pelvis before the levatores supportani, and forms on each side of the middle line a roundish them.
band, named the anterior ligament of the bladder. More to
the side, the fascia is attached to the lateral part of the prostate and to the side of the bladder, giving rise to the lateral
vesical ligament ; and still farther back it reaches the side of
the rectum. The fascia, however, does not cease where it It gives
meets the viscera by becoming blended with their coats, but to the
is continued downwards around the prostate and the rectum, tate and
so as to form sheaths for them. The tube that is prolonged
on the gut becomes thin and cellular towards the anus ;
sheaths
prosrectum,
538 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
and forms
the floor
whilst that on the prostate is separated from its viscus by a
plexus of veins (prostatic), and has an offset directed backwards to incase the vesiculæ seminales. The recto- vesical
part of fascia of opposite sides form a partition, like the levatores
ani muscles, across the pelvis, which is perforated by the
prostate and the rectum ; but in the case of the fascia the
viscera receive sheaths from the membrane as they pass
through it.
ofthe pelvis.
Fascia in the In the female the fascia has much the same arrangement
female. as in the male ; but the vagina, instead of the prostate, receives a tube of membrane after perforating it.
the Pieces of The true ligaments of the bladder are two on each side,
anterior and lateral, and are derived from the recto- vesical
fascia.
fascia
form the anterior
and lateral liga- ments of the bladder.
ligaa. The anterior is a fold of the fascia that reaches from
the posterior aspect of the pubes to the upper surface of the
prostate, and to the neck of the bladder. It is a narrow
white band, and encloses some muscular fibres of the bladder.
Between the ligaments of opposite sides the recto- vesical
fascia dips down to reach the prostate.
b. The lateral ligament is but a piece of the same fascia,
that is fixed, as before said, to the lateral part of the prostate
gland, at its upper border, and to the side of the bladder on
the same level.
False There are other ligaments of the bladder (false ligaments),
ments of which are derived from the peritoneum investing it, and will bladder. be seen in the following section.
tion of
SECTION II.
CONNECTIONS OF THE VISCERA IN THE MALE.
Dissec- IF the student should be dissecting a female pelvis, he will
female find the description of it farther on at page 547 .
pelvis.
Con- tents of the pel- vis.
The viscera in the pelvis have been already specified to be
the lower end of the large intestine (rectum), together with
the bladder and part of the generative organs. Most posterior of all is the rectum, which takes a curved course with
FOLDS OF THE PERITONEUM. 539
oftheir the convexity backwards, and receives into its concavity the Outline
bladder, with the prostate and the vesiculæ seminales. These position.
organs are partly surrounded by the peritoneum.
several
are to be cleaned.
Dissection. To expose the viscera take away from them the The
recto-vesical fascia, except the anterior ligament of the bladder. viscera
Follow forwards from the back of the pelvis to the bladder the
obliterated remains of the internal iliac artery (hypogastric), and
remove the other branches of the same artery to the lower limb.
When the fat and vessels are cleared away, the pouch of the
peritoneum, in which wool has been placed, is brought into
view, with the ureter passing to the bladder. Now clean the
prostate, and define the vesiculæ seminales which are behind it.
Clean at the same time the part of the bladder below the perito- neum, and follow downwards the vas deferens which lies on the
lateral aspect of that viscus. Lastly, remove the cellular layer
from the lower part of the rectum, viz. the part below the peritoneum, but preserve the branches to it from the inferior mesenteric
artery. If the bladder is flaccid half fill it with air, in order that
its connections may be studied.
ritonecovers
rectum
The peritoneum does not envelop the viscera of the pelvis The peso completely as those of the upper part of the abdomen. um
After partly surrounding the upper portion of the rectum,
and fixing it by a process, meso- rectum, the membrane can partly
be traced to the back of the bladder, where it projects for thet
some way between this viscus and the rectum, forming the
recto-vesical pouch. On each side of the rectum the serous
membrane is arrested by the internal iliac-artery, and gives
rise to a fold, posterior ligament of the bladder. Tracing
the peritoneum upwards on the bladder, the student will find and
it cover all the posterior aspect, and the posterior part of the
each lateral region as far forwards as the position of the
obliterated hypogastric artery, but at that vessel it is reflected from the sides and summit of the bladder to the wall
of the pelvis and abdomen. All the anterior surface is there- leaving
fore uncovered by peritoneum ; and when the bladder is and
distended it rises above the pubes so as to allow of its being part
opened at this aspect without risk of injury to the serous vered.
membrane.
partly
bladder,
front
lower
uncoThe recto-vesical pouch is wide behind, where it corresponds to The pouch the interval between the iliac arteries, and is narrow in front be- between
540 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
tum and
forthe rec- tween the rectum and the bladder. Anteriorly it extends as far
bladder, as, or even into the interval between the vesiculæ seminales, and
Extent ends usually about one inch and a half from the tip of the coccyx,
wards but sometimes it reaches the prostate gland. The distance of the
tance pouch from the anus is commonly about four inches ; but this will
vary with the state of the bladder, for if this viscus is distended
the pouch of the peritoneum is raised with it, and is therefore
removed farther from the end ofthe intestine.
and disfrom the anus vary.
Folds of it, false - Ligaments of the bladder. Where the peritoneum is
liga- reflected from the bladder to the wall of the cavity, it gives
ofthe rise to the false ligaments of that viscus. These are five in
number : two posterior, two lateral, and one superior.
ments
bladder,
viz.-
two pos- terior,
two lateral,
and one
The posterior ligament (one on each side) reaches from the back
of the pelvis to the bladder, and contains the obliterated hypogas- tric artery, the ureter, and some vessels and nerves. Between
these is the hollow ofthe recto- vesical pouch.
The lateral ligament, also one on a side, is a wide piece of peritoneum, that is reflected from the side of the bladder to the iliac
fossa and the wall of the pelvis. Along its line of attachment to
the bladder is the obliterated hypogastric artery.
The superior ligament is reflected from the upper part of the superi- bladder to the abdominal wall along the same obliterated vessel.
or.
Extent ofthe The RECTUM, or the lower part of the great intestine, exrectum, tends from the junction between the sacrum and ilium to
the anus, and is kept in place by the peritoneum and the
length, recto- vesical fascia. The intestine is about eight inches
long, and takes a winding course, for it follows the curve
and di- of the sacrum and coccyx ; it is divided into three parts,
upper, middle, and lower.
visions.
First piece
covered
The upper part, longer than the others, extends obliquely
from the junction of the sacrum and ilium to the centre of
most the third piece of the sacrum. It is surrounded almost enby peri- tirely by the peritoneum which forms the meso-rectum toneum. behind it ; and it lies on the sacrum, and on the pyriformis
muscle and the sacral plexus of the left side. In contact
with its left side are the branches of the internal iliac artery
and the left ureter. In some bodies this part of the intestine
is much curved to the right side.
Middle piece The middle piece lies beneath the bladder, and reaches to
THE RECTUM AND BLADDER. 541
covered
the tip of the coccyx : it is about three inches in length, and
is covered by peritoneum on the upper aspect, but only for
about two thirds of its extent. Resting on it is the lower only
or triangular part of the bladder, with the vesiculæ seminales in front.
and the prostate gland ; and behind it is only the bone.
On the side is the coccygeus muscle.
vered.
tions
parts
The lower part is about an inch and a half in length, and Last piece is curved from the tip of the coccyx to the anus : at first it is uncois much dilated, but at the anus it is contracted.
This part
of the intestine is without peritoneal covering, and is supported by the lower part of the triangular ligament of the
urethra, and by the levatores ani muscles. Above the lower Connecend of the rectum (in this position of the body) are the with
prostate, the membranous part of the urethra, and the bulb around .
of the corpus spongiosum ; but as the gut gradually recedes
from the urethra, an angular interval is left between the
two. The levatores ani muscles descend on its sides, and
unite beneath it, supporting it in a sling, and the sphincter
muscles surround the lower end. Sometimes this end of Somethe intestine is very much enlarged, especially in women or dilated .
old men, and rises up on each side of the prostate, so as to
surround it except above.
times
is in
when
jects
when
The URINARY BLADDER (vesica urinaria) is situate in Bladder
the pelvis, and is the receptacle for the urine secreted by pelvis
the kidneys. When the bladder is contracted it is of a empty,
triangular form, and lies within the pelvis against the anterior wall of the cavity. But when it is distended it be- and procomes of a conical shape, with the larger part directed above
towards the rectum and the apex to the abdominal wall, and full.
is slightly curved over the anterior part of the pelvis as
it projects beyond it. If a line through its centre were pro- Axis..
longed, it would touch the abdominal wall somewhere (according to the distension) between the umbilicus and the
pubes in the one direction, and the end of the coccyx in the
other direction. The organ is maintained in its position by
the recto-vesical fascia, and by the peritoneum, which form
its ligaments. See pages 538. 540.
For the purpose ofstudying its connections the bladder is Divi- sions.
542 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Apex has cords on it.
Base
divided into the following parts : viz. a summit and base, a
body and neck.
The summit or apex of the bladder is rounded, and from
its anterior part three ligamentous cords are prolonged to
the umbilicus : the central one of these is the remains
of the urachus, and the two lateral are formed by the obliterated hypogastric arteries. If the bladder is full, the
apex is above the pubes, but otherwise below it. All the
part behind the obliterated vessels is covered by peritoneum.
The base (fundus) is large, and rests on the middle piece
of the rectum. In the state of emptiness of the bladder the
alters in base is scarcely prominent ; but in distension of the viscus,
shape ; this part extends lower, and is flattened. Connected with
with it . the under part of the bladder are the vesiculæ seminales and
the vasa deferentia, and between these is a triangular space
from which the peritoneum is absent.
parts in contact
Surfaces
and pos- terior ;
Surfaces of the body. — The anterior part of the bladder anterior is in contact with the posterior surface of the symphysis
pubis, or with the lower part of the abdominal wall if it
is distended, and is altogether free from peritoneum ; whilst
the posterior surface on the other hand is entirely covered
lateral . by serous membrane. Each lateral region is crossed by the
vas deferens, and extending along its upper part is the
obliterated hypogastric vessel ; near the lower part is seen
the entrance of the ureter into the bladder. All the side of
the bladder behind the obliterated vessel is covered by peritoneum, but the rest is uncovered.
Neck.
Position in pelvis
with age.
The neck (cervix) is the narrow anterior part of the
bladder that joins the urethra. It is surrounded by the
prostate gland.
The position of the bladder in the pelvis is not the same
varies in adult as in early life. For in the child ( to the twelfth or
the sixteenth year) this viscus projects above the brim of
the pelvis into the hypogastric region of the abdomen, and
the cervix is the lowest part. But in the adult the bladder
is concealed by the larger pelvic bones, and the base or
fundus projects inferiorly.
Ureter The ureter enters the posterior ligament of the bladder,
in pelvis,
THE PROSTATE AND VESICULE. 543
after crossing the common or the external iliac artery, and
forms an arch below the level of the obliterated hypogastric
vessel ; it reaches forwards to enter into the bladder near and enthe lower part, and somewhat on the side, or about two into
inches and a half from the prostate gland.
trance
bladder.
ofthe
tate ;
The PROSTATE GLAND surrounds the neck of the bladder. Position
It is placed below the level of the symphysis pubis, as well prosas posterior to it, and is supported by the rectum. Its shape form;
is that of a cone with the base turned backwards, and its
size equals a large horse chesnut. In this position of the axis ;
pelvis, the direction of a line through the middle of the
gland would be oblique downwards and backwards, though
in the erect state of the body it would be almost horizontal.
surface ;
The upper surface is about three quarters of an inch be- upper
low the symphysis pubis, and is connected to it by the
anterior ligaments of the bladder. On this aspect are the
dorsal veins of the penis.
surface. The under surface is of greatest extent, and is con- under.
tiguous to the rectum ; it is this part that is felt by the
finger introduced into the bowel through the anus.
andbase. The apex touches the fascia of the pelvis that closes the Apex
interval between the rami of the pubes ; and the base surrounds the vesiculæ seminales with the vasa deferentia, and
limits anteriorly the triangular space at the base of the
bladder.
containsheath ;
The prostate is enveloped by a sheath obtained from the It is
recto-vesical fascia (p. 537. ), and a plexus of veins (prostatic) ed in a
surrounds it. Through the middle of the gland the urethra
takes its course to the penis ; but this will be afterwards demonstrated. The size of the prostate alters much with size may
increasing age, and in old people it may acquire a considerable magnitude.
increase.
vesicles ;
connecThe VESICULE SEMINALES are two small elongated sacs, Seminal
each about two inches long, between the under part of the
bladder and the rectum. Each is pyramidal in form, and their
the larger end is turned backwards towards the ureter, whilst tions.
the smaller is surrounded by the prostate. Along the inner
side is the vas deferens. At the prostate gland the vesiculæ
544 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Vas de- ferens ;
course
unites with duct
are almost close together ; but farther backwards they diverge,
one from another, and enclose with the pouch of the peritoneum a triangular space at the under part of the bladder.
The vesiculæ are contained in a membranous sheath, which
is derived from the recto-vesical fascia.
The VAS DEFERENS or the excretory duct of the testis, in
its course to the urethra, enters the abdomen by the internal abdominal ring, and is then directed inwards along
the side and under part of the bladder to the base of the
prostate, where it forms the common ejaculatory duct by
joining with the duct from the vesicula. The position of
vesicula. this tube to the external iliac artery has been noticed ; on
the bladder it may now be seen to lie internal to the ureter,
and internal to the vesicula of the same side. By the side
of the vesicula the duct is much enlarged, and is sacculated.
from
The
curved
ing to
The URETHRA is the excretory passage for the urine and urethra ; semen, and reaches from the bladder to the end of the penis.
length ; Its length varies from seven and a half to nine inches and a
half, and it presents one or two curves according to the state
it is of the penis. At first the canal is directed forwards through
accord the triangular ligament of the perinæum, and next upwards
the con- to the body ofthe penis, forming a large curve with the concavity to the pubes. Thence to its termination the urethra
is applied to the penis, and whilst this body remains pendent,
it forms a second bend with the concavity downwards ; but if
the penis is raised, the canal makes but one curve throughits divi- out. The canal is divided into three parts, prostatic, membranous, and spongy.
dition of the penis ;
sions.
Pros.
tatic,
mem- branous,
The prostatic part is contained in the prostate gland, and
receives its name from that circumstance. Its length and
connections are the same as those of the gland (p. 543.).
The membranous part is nearly an inch long, and intervenes between the apex of the prostate and the front of the
triangular ligament. It is somewhat curved upwards, and
the bulb of the corpus spongiosum is directed backwards
below it, so that the under part appears to measure less than
the upper. Surrounding it are the muscular fibres of the
THE URETHRA AND PENIS. 545
constrictor urethra, and close below are Cowper's glands ;
beneath it is the rectum. This division of the urethra is
the least supported and the weakest.
The spongy part spongy.
is surrounded by the corpus spongiosum and
urethræ, and ends at the extremity of the penis, in the orifice
in the glans (meatus urinarius). It is the longest part of
the urethra, and measures about six inches. At its commencement this division of the excretory canal is surrounded
by the ejaculator urinæ muscle.
tion. Dissection.—If the penis is not sufficiently dissected to see its Dissecform, let the student clean away its cellular covering. The spongy
part ofthe urethra will also be better seen when that is done.
stituents
situation
penis.
The PENIS is a cylindrical body which is attached to the Confront of the pubes, and depends therefrom in front of the and
scrotum. It consists of a firm fibrous mass (corpora caver- of the
nosa) that forms the principal part of the organ ; of a soft
spongy substance that surrounds the urethra ( corpus spongiosum), and forms the head, or the glans penis ; and of an
integumentary investment for the whole, together with vessels and nerves.
ment
prepuce
The integumentary covering is continued from that of the A cover- ing of abdomen, but the fat that is present in the superficial fascia integuin other parts is absent from this investing the penis.
Around the end of the penis it forms the loose sheath of the
prepuce, which is constructed by two layers in the following
way : - at the end of the penis the skin is reflected backwards as far as around the base of the glans, constituting forms
thus the prepuce ; but it is afterwards continued over the
glans, and joins the mucous membrane of the urethra at the
orifice on the surface. At the under part of the glans, and
behind the aperture of the urethra, the integument forms a
small triangular fold, frænum preputii. Where the integu- and
ment covers the glans it is very thin, and in some cases
assumes the character of a mucous membrane ; and behind Sebacethe glans are some small sebaceous follicles -glandulæodoriferæ.
frænum.
ous glands.
The corpora cavernosa form the bulk of the penis, and Corpora
are two dense, fibrous, almost cylindrical tubes, which are nosa
NN
caver-
546 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
is sepa.
behind.
Form
form filled with vascular structure. Each is fixed posteriorly to body of penis, the rami of the ischium and os pubis by a thick pointed process, the crus penis ; but after a distance of an inch and a
half it becomes blended with its fellow in the body of the
but each penis. The body of the penis thus constructed is grooved rate above and belowalong the middle line, and presents anteriorly
a narrowed but truncated extremity that is covered by the
glans penis ; along its under surface the urethra is conducted. Besides the attachment of the corpora cavernosa
attach- by the crura, the body of the penis is connected with the
penis. front of the symphysis pubis by its suspensory ligament.
Corpus The corpus spongiosum urethra encloses the urethral
canal, and forms the head of the penis. It is a vascular and
erectile structure, like the corpus cavernosum, but is much
less strong. Commencing posteriorly by a dilated parturethra, the bulb, this structure extends forwards around the urethra
swells to the extremity of the penis, where it swells out into the
conical glans penis.
and
ment of
spongio- sum
sur- rounds
and
into
the bulb, The bulb is in front of the triangular ligament of the
urethra, and opposite the junction of the crura of the corpora cavernosa. It is directed backwards slightly below
the membranous part of the urethra, and is fixed by fibrous
which is tissue to the front of the triangular ligament. The accele- lobed,
and the conical glans penis.
rator urinæ muscle covers it ; and the enlargement usually
presents a central constriction, with a bulging on each side,
that marks its subdivision into two lobes.
The glans penis is a somewhat conical mass, which covers
the blunt end of the corpus cavernosum. Its base is directed
backwards, and is marked by a slightly prominent bordercorona glandis, which is sloped obliquely along the under
aspect, from the apex to the base. In the apex is a vertical
slit, in which the urethral canal terminates, and below that
aperture is an excavation that contains the frænum preputii.
VISCERA IN THE FEMALE PELVIS. 547
SECTION III.
CONNECTIONS OF THE VISCERA IN THE FEMALE.
tents of
female
In the pelvis of the female is contained the lower end ofthe Conintestinal tube, with the bladder and the urethra as in the the
male ; but there are in addition the uterus, with its accesso- pelvis,
ries, and the vagina. The rectum is most posterior, and the
uterus and vagina lie in the concavity of its bend. The
bladder and urethra are altogether in front of the other and their
parts. In this sex there are three tubes connected with the tion.
viscera that are directed forwards, one above another, to
the surface, viz. the tube of the rectum, that of the vagina,
and that of the urethra.
situadescrip .
male
Directions for removing the innominate bone are given Use
with the dissection of the male pelvis, and the student should tion of
use the description in Section I. ( p. 533. ) to learn the fascia pelvis .
and the muscles of the pelvis, that are common to both
sexes, before he makes the special dissection of the viscera
of the female pelvis, as below.
clean
female pelvis.
Dissection. On taking away the recto-vesical fascia and some Then
cellular membrane, the several viscera will come into view. Tothe
maintain the position of the uterus it should be held up with a viscera
piece of string passed through the upper part. The reflections of
the peritoneum on the viscera are to be preserved, and a piece of
cotton wool is to be placed between the rectum and uterus.
The obliterated part of the internal iliac artery is to be followed
forwards to the bladder, but all the other branches may be cut
away on this the left side ; the ureter will be found passing to the
bladder close to that artery. Afterwards clean, and partly separate the urethra, the vagina, and the rectum at the anterior part
ofthe pelvis, but preserve the arteries on the rectum.
tions of
tɔneum .
The peritoneum partly covers the viscera, as in the male. ReflecInvesting the upper part of the rectum, and forming behind the periit the meso-rectum, the membrane is continued for a short
distance on the front of the intestine to the posterior part of
the vagina, and to the back of the uterus. It covers the
posterior, and the greater part of the anterior aspect of the
NN 2
548 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN,
uterus, and can be traced to the bladder without again touching the vagina. On each side of the uterus it forms a wide
fold (broad ligament), which attaches that viscus to the
wall of the abdomen and pelvis. As the peritoneum is followed upwards to the wall of the abdomen, it will be found
to cover the posterior aspect of the bladder, but only a part
of each lateral aspect, viz. that behind the position of the
obliterated hypogastric artery. In the female, the pouch
corresponding to that in the male between the rectum and
bladder, can scarcely be said to exist, because the vagina intervenes between the two, and arrests, so to speak, the passFolds or ing forwards of the peritoneum. In the pelvis the serous
membrane forms the following ligaments :-
liga- ments arebroad liga- ment ofthe uterus,
that is subinto three
The broad ligament of the uterus passes from the side ofthe
uterus to the wall of the abdomen, and supports this organ in the
cavity of the pelvis. By its position across the pelvis it divides
the cavity into an anterior and a posterior part ; in the former are
placed the bladder, urethra, and vagina ; in the latter the upper
divided part of the rectum, and the small intestines when they reach the
pelvis. Each ligament shows traces of a subdivision into three parts ; pieces, corresponding to the parts contained between its two layers ;
thus there is a posterior piece that belongs to the ovary and its
ligament ; an anterior, near the upper part, which is appropriated
to the round ligament ; and a middle piece, the highest of all, that
surrounds the Fallopian tube. It is at the free extremity of the
Fallopian tube that the peritoneum is continuous with the mucous membrane.
and an- terior liga- ment.
Five li- gaments of the bladder.
Connec- tions of
Between the neck of the uterus and the back of the bladder is
a small fold on each side, which is sometimes described as a ligament (anterior ligament) of the uterus.
In
The ligaments of the bladder (false ligaments) are the same as in
the male, and are five in number, two posterior, two lateral, and a
superior : they are all blended in one large piece of peritoneum
reaching from the bladder to the side and front of the pelvis.
the female the posterior ligament containing the ureter and the
vessels of the bladder is less marked than in the male, because the
uterus intervenes and pushes aside the vessels.
The RECTUM is not so curved in the female as in the male,
the rec- and is generally larger. Descending along the middle of the tum , viz.
CONNECTIONS OF THE FEMALE VISCERA. 549
sacrum and coccyx to the anus, the intestine is divided into
three parts : ――
The first part extends to the third piece of the sacrum, of upper,
and is enveloped by the peritoneum, except posteriorly : its
connexions are the same as in the male.
The middle part reaches to the tip of the coccyx, and has middle,
the vagina above and in contact with it. The peritoneum
covers the front for a short distance.
The lower part curves to the anus away from the vagina, lower and
so as to leave a space between the two which corresponds on part.
the surface to the part of the perinæum between the anus
and the vulva. The levatores ani are on each side, and
unite below it.
and situto the
pelvis.
The UTERUS is somewhat of a conical shape, flattened Form
from before backwards, with the wider end placed upwards, ation.
and the lower end communicating with the vagina. It is Position
situate in the pelvis, between the bladder and rectum, and is brim of
retained in place by the broad ligaments. Unless enlarged,
it is below the brim of the pelvis. This viscus is tilted forwards, so that its position is oblique in the cavity of the pelvis,
and a line through the centre of the organ would correspond
to the axis of the inlet of the pelvic cavity, but not to that Axis.
of the vagina.
The anterior surface is covered by peritoneum, except in Surfaces,
the lower fourth, where it is in contact with the under part
of the bladder, and is connected to it by cellular membrane.
The posterior surface is altogether invested by the serous
membrane.
mities. The upper end (fundus vel basis uteri) is the largest part Extreof the organ, and is in contact with the small intestines.
The lower end, or the neck (cervix uteri) is received into
the upper part of the vagina.
side are To each side is attached the broad ligament which encloses On the
the Fallopian tube, the round ligament, and the ovary.
pian a. The Fallopian tube is contained in the free border of Fallothe ligament, and is connected by the one end to the upper tube,
angle of the uterus, whilst the other is loose in the cavity of
the pelvis. At its attachment to the uterus the tube is of
NN 3
550 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
round ligament
and the Ovary and
small size, but it increases towards the opposite end, where
it is dilated like the end of a trumpet, and fringed (corpus
fimbriatum).
b. The round or suspensory ligament is a fibrous cord,
that is directed outwards through the internal abdominal
ring, and the inguinal canal, to the groin. This cord lies
over the obliterated hypogastric, and the external iliac artery,
and is surrounded by peritoneum, which accompanies it a
short way into the canal.
c. The ovary is placed nearly horizontally, bulging at the
posterior aspect of the broad ligament, and is connected to
its liga- the uterus at the inner end by a special fibrous band, ligament
of the ovary. Its form is oval, and its margins are turned
forwards and backwards. Its size is very variable.
ment.
Extent and form ;
axis ;
The VAGINA is the tube between the uterus and the exterior of the body. It is somewhat cylindrical in shape,
length ; though flattened on the front and back. Its length is from
four to five inches. The vagina is slightly curved as it follows
the bend of the rectum, and its axis therefore corresponds at
first to that of the outlet of the pelvis, but higher up to
the axis of the cavity of the pelvis. In front the vagina
is in contact with the base of the bladder, and with the
urethra ; and beneath or below it is the rectum. To the side
connec- is attached the recto-vesical fascia, which sends a sheath
along the lower part of the tube. The upper end receives
the neck of the uterus by an aperture in the anterior or
upper wall ; and the lower end is the narrowest part of the
canal, and is surrounded by the sphincter vaginæ muscle. In
Lower children, and in the virgin, the external aperture is closed by closed the hymen. The vagina is surrounded by a large plexus of
veins.
tions.
end
some- times.
Bladder The BLADDER is placed at the anterior part of the pelvis,
above the vagina, and in contact with the back of the pubes.
resem. Its form, position, and connections, so closely approach those
of the bladder in the male body, as to render it unnecessary
to repeat them again here ( see p. 541. ). The chief differences
in the bladder of the two sexes are the following :
bles that of the male.
Differ- ences In the female the bladder is larger than in the male, and
VESSELS OF THE PELVIS. 551
in the
sexes.
its transverse exceeds its vertical measurement. The base is between
of less extent ; it is in contact with the vagina and the lower two
part of the uterus ; but it does not project below the level of
the urethra, so as to form a pouch as in the male. On the
side of the viscus there is not any vas deferens, and the
prostate is absent from the neck.
The of ure- ureter has a longer course in the pelvis of the female Course
than in that of the male before it reaches the bladder. After ter.
crossing the internal iliac vessels it passes by the neck of the
uterus ere it arrives at its destination.
form ;
tions with
around.
The urethra is a small narrow tube about one inch and a Urethra;
length half long, which curves slightly below the symphysis pubis, and
the concavity being upwards. Its situation is above the vagina, connec
and its external opening is placed within the vulva. In its t
course to the surface it is imbedded in the tissue of the parts
vaginal wall, and perforates the triangular ligament of the
perinæum, but before reaching the last structure it is surrounded by muscular fibres (constrictor urethræ, p. 412. ) .
A plexus of veins surrounds the urethra as well as the
vagina.
SECTION IV.
VESSELS AND NERVES OF THE PELVIS.
THIS section is to be used by the dissectors of both the male
and female pelvis.
and In the pelvis are the internal iliac vessels and their vessels
branches to the viscera ; the sacral nerves and the sacral nerves
plexus ; and the sympathetic nerve, consisting both of a pelvis .
gangliated cord, and of offsets of the hypogastric plexus.
of the
sect the
pelvis.
Dissection. The internal iliac vessels are to be dissected on To disthe opposite side, the right. Let now the air escape from the vessels
bladder, and draw it and the rectum, together with the uterus and off .
vagina in the female, from their situation in the centre of the
pelvis . Remove the peritoneum and cellular membrane from the
viscera and from the trunks of the vessels, and follow onwards the
branches that leave the pelvis or supply the viscera ; the obliterated
cord of the artery is to be traced on the bladder to the umbilicus.
NN 4
552 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Nerves. With the vessels are offsets of the hypogastric plexus of nerves,
but in the present state of the body these will probably not be
seen ; and in dissecting the vessels to the bladder and rectum
branches of the sacral spinal nerves will come into view. The
veins in a general dissection may be removed to make clean the
arteries. When the vessels are quite prepared the bladder may
be again distended, and the viscera replaced.
Veins.
Destina- tion of The INTERNAL ILIAC ARTERY is one of the trunks rethe sulting from the division of the common iliac artery, and
artery ; furnishes branches to the viscera of the pelvis, to the generative organs, and to the thigh.
size and length;
termi- nation;
In the adult the vessel is a short trunk, of large capacity,
which measures about an inch and a half in length. Directed
downwards, as far as the sacro- sciatic notch, the artery
terminates in two large trunks, from which the several
branches are furnished. From its extremity a partly obliterated vessel (obliterated hypogastric) extends forwards to the
position bladder. In entering the pelvis the artery lies in front of
the lumbo-sacral nerve and the pyriformis muscle, and is
contained in the fold of peritoneum that forms the posterior
ligament of the bladder. It is accompanied by the internal
iliac vein, which is posterior to it, and somewhat on the
outer part on the right side.
ofvein;
connec- tions.
Branch- es.
Trunk
-
The branches of the artery are numerous, and arise from
the large trunks of the internal iliac usually in the following
manner : - from the posterior trunk arise the ilio-lumbar,
lateral sacral, and gluteal branches ; and from the anterior
trunk come the vesical (upper and lower) obturator, sciatic,
and pudic, and, in the female, the uterine and vaginal
branches.
Peculiarities. - The length of the internal iliac varies from half an
varies in inch to three inches, its extreme measurements, but in two thirds of a
length,
certain number of instances ( Quain) it ranged from an inch to an inch
and a half. The increased length of the internal iliac is dependent upon
the spot the shortening of the common iliac artery. The ending of the vessel
may be at any spot between the usual place of origin and termination.
and in
at which it ends.
Condi.
tion of the ar- tery in thefetus,
In the fetus the internal iliac becomes the hypogastric artery,
and leaves the abdomen by the umbilicus. Larger than the external iliac artery, and entering but slightly into the cavity of the
BRANCHES OF THE INTERNAL ILIAC. 553
pelvis, the vessel is directed forwards to the back of the bladder,
and then upwards along the side of that viscus to its apex. Beyond the bladder the vessel ascends along the posterior aspect of
the abdominal wall with the urachus, and converges to its fellow,
to reach the umbilicus. Here the vessels of opposite sides come
into contact with the umbilical vein, and passing from the abdomen
through the aperture in that spot, enter into the placental cord,
and receive the name umbilical. In the fetus, as in the adult, the
same branches are furnished by the artery, though the relative size
at the two periods is very different.
transforinto that
adult.
When uterine life has ceased the hypogastric artery diminishes and its
in consequence of the arrest of the current of blood through it, mation
and finally becomes obliterated more or less completely as far back of the
as to an inch and a half of its commencement, only a cord remaining in the position of the former vessel ; commonly, however, the
cord is pervious by means of a very small canal as far as the upper
part of the bladder, and gives origin to the vesical arteries.
The branches arising from the posterior part of the in- Branchternal iliac, are, ilio-lumbar, lateral sacral, and gluteal.
es ofthe posterior trunk.
an
1. The ilio-lumbar branch passes outwards beneath the Ilio-lumpsoas muscle and obturator nerve, but in front of the lumbo- bar has
sacral nerve, and divides into an ascending and a transverse
branch in the iliac fossa.
ing and a. The ascending or lumbar offset which is beneath the psoas, ascendsupplies that muscle and the quadratus lumborum, and anastomoses
with the last lumbar artery : it sends also a small spinal branch
through the foramen between the sacrum and the last lumbar
vertebra.
verse b. The transverse or iliac part divides into branches that ramify a transin the iliacus muscle, some running over and some beneath it. At branch.
the crest of the ilium these branches anastomose with the lumbar
and circumflex iliac arteries, and some twigs from the deep branches
enter the innominate bone.
sacral The lateral sacral branches are two in number, superior Lateral
and inferior ; they correspond in situation to the lumbar ar- arteries
teries, and form a chain of communication by the side of the
apertures in the front of the sacrum. These branches supply
the muscles (pyriformis and coccygeus), and anastomose with
the preceding, as well as with the middle sacral branch. A supply
small spinal branch enters the spinal canal through each branch.
spinal
554 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Gluteal artery.
Small offsets.
Branch- es of the
aperture in the sacrum. The upper of the two arteries is
the largest.
3. The gluteal artery is a short thick trunk, that appears
to be the continuation of the posterior division of the internal
iliac. Its destination is to the gluteal muscles on the dorsum
of the innominate bone, and it is transmitted from the pelvis
above the border of the pyriformis muscle, with its accompanying vein and the superior gluteal nerve.
In the pelvis this artery gives small branches to the contiguous
muscles (iliacus pyriformis and obturator), and a nutritious artery
to the bone.
The branches from the anterior division of the internal
anterior iliac artery are the following : trunk.
Vesical 1. The vesical arteries are named superior and inferior,
arteries ; and are distributed to the upper and lower parts of the
three or four upper,
and a
lower,
with an
the recbladder.
a. The upper vesical are three or four in number, and arise at
intervals from the partly obliterated hypogastric trunk ; the lowest
is sometimes called middle vesical branch. Offsets are distributed
from these branches to all the body and upper part of the bladder.
b. The lower vesical artery arises from the front of the internal
iliac in common with a branch to the rectum, or with one to the
vagina in the female. It is distributed to the base of the bladder,
to the vesiculæ seminales, and to the prostate. A small offset from
this artery, or from the upper vesical, is furnished to the vas deferens, and ascends on it as far as the inguinal canal.
Thebranchto the rectum ( middle hæmorrhoidal) is either supplied offset to by the inferior vesical, as before said, or by the pudic. It ramifies
on the anterior and lower part of the rectum, and on the vagina in
the female, and anastomoses with the superior and inferior hæmorrhoidal arteries.
tum .
Obtura- tor ar- 2. The obturator artery is distributed outside the pelvis,
tery and merely crosses this cavity to reach its aperture of exit.
courses This branch springs usually from the anterior division of the
pelvis . internal iliac artery, and is directed forwards below the brim across
of the pelvis to the aperture in the upper part of the thyroid
foramen. Passing from the pelvis by that opening, the
artery ends in two branches that encircle the obturator
Offsets foramen. In the pelvis the artery has its companion nerve in pelvis ;
BRANCHES OF THE INTERNAL ILIAC. 555
above, and the vein below it, and it distributes the following
small branches :
a. Iliac branch. -Amongst other small offsets the obturator fur- iliac and
nishes a twig to the iliac fossa to supply the bone and the iliacus
muscle ; this anastomoses with the ilio -lumbar artery.
branch. b. The pubic branch, arising as the artery is about to leave the pubic
pelvis, ascends on the posterior aspect of the pubes, and communicates with the corresponding branch of the opposite side, as well as
with the offset sent downwards from the epigastric artery. There
may be more than one branch to the pubes.
―
both.
Peculiarities. The obturator artery may arise at the front of the Its ori gin from pelvis, from the epigastric instead of the internal iliac trunk, and turn epigas- tric,
down almost vertically to the thyroid aperture. Or it may arise by two or iliac,
roots, one from the epigastric, another from the internal iliac, the roots or from
varying in size in different instances : thus they may be nearly equal in
size, that from the internal iliac may be the larger of the two, or that
from the epigastric may be the largest (Quain) . The position of the
obturator to the internal crural ring, in the instances of origin from the
epigastric, has been before alluded to ( p. 445 ).
Further, the obturator may take origin from the external iliac external From
artery.
iliac.
of the
The frequency with which these different peculiarities occur will be Frefound in Mr. Quain's work on the “ Anatomy of the Arteries." Suffice quee
it to say here that the origin from the internal iliac is the most fre- different origins.
quent, that from the epigastric next, and the origin from the two sources,
or from the external iliac artery, the least frequent.
artery 3. The sciatic artery is the next largest branch to the Sciatic
gluteal, and may be considered the offset by which the internal iliac artery terminates. The artery is continued over in the
the pyriformis muscle and the sacral plexus to the lower pelvis ,
part of the sacro- sciatic notch, where it leaves the pelvis
between the pyriformis and coccygeus. External to the and outpelvis it divides into branches beneath the gluteus maximus
muscle. In the pelvis it supplies the pyriformis and coccygeus muscles.
side it.
artery in
vis.
4. The pudic artery has nearly the same connections in Pudic
the pelvis as the sciatic, from which it often springs ; es- the pelcaping from the pelvis it ends in the perinæum and in the
genital organs. If the artery arises by a separate trunk
from the internal iliac, it accompanies the sciatic, though
external to it, and leaves the pelvis between the pyriformis
556 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Some small offsets.
When smaller than usual,
an acces- sory branch comes from internal iliac.
Branch- es in the
and coccygeus. At the back of the pelvis it winds over the
spine of the ischium, and enters the perinæum. ( See p. 407. )
In the pelvic part of its course the artery gives some unimportant branches, and frequently the middle hæmorrhoidal branch arises from it.
Peculiarities. —The pudic artery is sometimes smaller than usual,
and fails to supply some of its ordinary branches, especially the last to
the penis. In those cases the deficient branches are derived from an
artery, accessory pudic (Quain) , which takes origin mostly from the
pudic inside the pelvis, and courses forwards by the side of the lower
part of the bladder, and the upper part of the prostate gland, to leave
the pelvis below the pubic arch. It furnishes branches to supply the
place ofthose that are wanting.
The branches of the internal iliac artery that are peculiar
female. to the female are two, the uterine and vaginal.
Uterine 5. The uterine artery passes inwards between the layers artery of the broad ligament, to the neck of the uterus. At that
part the vessel changes its direction, and ascends along the
side of the uterus to the fundus, where it anastomoses with
the ovarian artery ( spermatic) of the aorta. Numerous
supplies branches enter the substance of the uterus, ramifying in it,
uterus. and anastomose with those of the opposite side.
This artery
Offsets to va- gina,
and in the broad liga- ment.
Vaginal artery.
Branchand its branches are remarkable for their tortuous condition.
a. At the neck of the uterus some small twigs are supplied to
the vagina and bladder, and the special vaginal artery may arise
from it at that spot.
b. Branches in the broad ligament. -One branch accompanies
the round ligament into the inguinal canal and anastomoses with a
branch ofthe epigastric. Another extends on the Fallopian tube,
and divides into long branches that reach the end. And a third,
according to J. Webber, is distributed to the ovary.
6. The vaginal artery seldom arises separately from the
internal iliac. Combined with the preceding, or with the
branch to the rectum, this artery extends to the vagina, and
ramifies in its wall as low as the outer orifice.
The remaining arteries in the pelvis that are not derived
es of the from the internal iliac are the ovarian, superior hæmorrhoidal,
and middle sacral.
aorta.
Ovarian artery.
The ovarian artery has been described in part with the
INTERNAL ILIAC VEIN. 557
branches of the aorta, and has been traced to the pelvis (p.
516.). After passing the brim of the pelvis it becomes tortuous, and enters the broad ligament to be distributed to the
ovary. In the broad ligament there is a free anastomosis
between the ovarian and uterine arteries.
hæmor- The superior hæmorrhoidal artery is the continuation of Superior
the trunk of the inferior mesenteric behind the rectum, and rhoidal.
divides into two branches opposite the middle of the sacrum.
From the point of the division of the trunk these branches
are continued along the rectum, one on each side, to the
lower part of the gut, and anastomose with its other vessels,
viz. the middle and inferior hæmorrhoidal arteries.
sacral,
The middle sacral artery, a small branch from the bifur- Middle
cation of the aorta, descends along the middle line of the which
body, over the last lumbar vertebra, the sacrum, and coccyx,
and terminates at the lower part of the spinal column, by
anastomosing with the lateral sacral arteries.
these In its course the artery gives small branches laterally opposite has
each vertebral element of the sacrum to anastomose with the lateral offsets.
sacral arteries, and supply the nerves and the bones with their
periosteum. Sometimes a small branch is furnished by it to the
lower end of the rectum, which takes the place of the middle hæmorrhoidal artery.
trunk ;
The INTERNAL ILIAC VEIN receives the blood from the wall Veins uniting of the pelvis and from the pelvic viscera by branches corre- in this
sponding for the most part to the arteries. The vein is a
short and thick trunk, which is situate at first on the inner position
side of the internal iliac artery; but as it ascends to join with artery.
the external iliac it passes behind the artery, and on the right
side reaches even the outer aspect of that vessel.
to its
branches
peculiar
Some of the branches that form the trunk of the internal Its
iliac vein, viz. the gluteal, obturator, and sciatic, have the that are
same anatomy as the arteries ; but the following branches, are
the pudic, vesical, uterine, and vaginal, have some peculiarities.
The vein, pudic vein receives roots corresponding to the pudic
branches of the artery, with the exception of the dorsal vein.
Its hæmorrhoidal branch commences in a large plexus around
558 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
dorsal vein of penis,
vesical ,
uterine,
and
vaginal veins.
Dissec- tion of the
of the
sacral and cocthe lower end of the rectum (plexus hæmorrhoidalis) with
which the superior hæmorrhoidal vein communicates.
The dorsal vein of the penis receives vessels from the corpora cavernosa and corpus spongiosum, pierces the triangular
ligament of the urethra, and divides into two, a right and
left branch, which enter a plexus around the membranous
part of the urethra and the prostate.
The vesical veins commence in a plexus about the lower
part of the bladder, that anastomoses with the prostatic and
hæmorrhoidal veins.
The uterine veins are numerous, and form a plexus in and
by the side of the uterus. This plexus inosculates above
with the ovarian plexus, and below with one on the vagina.
The vaginal veins also surround the vagina with a large
vascular plexus.
The other veins of the pelvis (ilio-lumbar, lateral sacral,
and middle sacral) open into the common iliac vein.
Dissection -. To dissect the nerves of the pelvis it will be necessary to detach the urethra from the arch of the pubes. Next, the
nerves, recto-vesical fascia and the levator ani, together with the vessels
pelvis ofthe viscera, should be cut through on the right side, in order
that the viscera may be drawn aside from the pelvis. Ifthe bladder
is distended let the air escape from it. The sacral nerves will be
cygeal, exposed as they issue from the sacral foramina ; the dissector
should follow the first four into the sacral plexus, and some
branches from the fourth to the viscera. A branch of nerve (superior gluteal) arises from the lumbo- sacral cord as this passes to
the sacral plexus. The last sacral and the coccygeal nerve are of
small size, and will be found coming through the coccygeus muscle
close to the coccyx ; these are to be dissected with care.
student will best find these last nerves by tracing connecting filaments that pass from one to another, beginning with the offset
from the fourth nerve.
and sym- pathe- tic.
The
At the lower part of the rectum, bladder, and vagina is a large
plexus ofthe sympathetic (pelvic plexus, Beck) which gives offsets
to the viscera along the arteries. This plexus is generally destroyed
in this stage of the dissection ; but if it remains the student should
trace the offsets from it, and its communicating branches with the
spinal nerves.
SACRAL NERVES AND PLEXUS. 559
nerves SPINAL SACRAL NERVES. -The anterior divisions of the Sacral
five sacral nerves decrease suddenly in size from above down- are five ;
wards ; for whilst the first two are large trunks, the last two
are small and slender. Issuing by the apertures in the front
of the sacrum (the fifth nerve excepted), the nerves receive
short filaments of communication from the gangliated cord of
the sympathetic. The three first nerves, and part of the those
fourth enter the sacral plexus, but the fifth ends on the back peculiar
of the coccyx.
that are
are
The fourth nerve divides into two parts, as above stated : fourth,
one communicates with the sacral plexus ; the other distributes the following branches to the viscera and the sur- which gives rounding muscles, and joins the fifth nerve.
a. The visceral branches supply chiefly the bladder and the vagina, visceral
and communicate with the sympathetic nerve to form the pelvic
plexus. Sometimes these branches come from the third sacral
nerve.
muscu- b. The muscular branches are three in number. One rather long and
branch enters the levator ani on its visceral aspect ; another sup- lar offplies the coccygeus ; and the third reaches the perinæum by piercing the coccygeus muscle. (See page 399.)
sets ;
below
tures in
The fifth nerve comes forwards from the lower end of the fifth is
spinal canal through the coccygeus muscle. As soon as aperit appears in the pelvis it receives the communicating branch sacrum,
from the fourth nerve ; the nerve is then directed downwards in front of the coccygeus, where it is joined by the
coccygeal nerve, and perforates the muscle near the tip of ends on
the coccyx, to end on the posterior surface of that bone.
coccyx .
geal The coccygeal nerve (sixth sacral), after leaving the lower Coccyend of the spinal canal, appears through the coccygeus nerve.
muscle, and joins the fifth sacral nerve.
-
plexus ; SACRAL PLEXUS. - This plexus is a large flat band, in Sacral
which are united the lumbo- sacral, and the first three sacral
nerves, with part of the fourth sacral nerve. It is situate situation
on the pyriformis muscle, and beneath the sciatic and pudic
branches of the internal iliac artery. From the spot where and
the nerves join, the plexus becomes gradually smaller towards the lower end, and leaving the pelvis below the pyriformis, terminates in branches for the lower limb.
form.
560 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Its branch- es
to mus- cles inpelvis ;
one to obturaMost of the branches of the plexus arise outside the
pelvis, and are distributed to the back of the lower limb.
Only two internal muscles of the pelvis ( pyriformis and obside the turator internus) receive their nerves from the sacral plexus.
The nerve to the obturator internus muscle arises from
the part of the plexus resulting from the union of the lumbosacral with the first sacral nerve ; it leaves the pelvis with
the pudic artery, and winds over the spine of the ischium
and through the small sacro-sciatic notch to enter the visceral
surface of the muscle.
tor,
two to pyrifor- mis.
Pudic nerve
The nerves to the pyriformis are commonly two in number, and arise from separate parts of the plexus : they also
enter the muscle at its visceral aspect.
The pudic nerve, like the artery of the same name, supplies the rectum, the perinæum, and the genital organs.
now seen The nerve arises at the lower part of the plexus as this is
origin. about to pass from the pelvis, and then accompanies its
artery through the small sacro- sciatic notch to the perinæum.
(See p. 408. )
at its
Branch- es to the lower limb after.
gluteal nerve
The remaining branches of the plexus, viz . the small and
great sciatic nerves, with small muscular offsets to the gemelli
and quadratus femoris, are described with the lower limb.
- See DISSECTION OF THE BUTTOCK.
Superior The superior gluteal nerve is a branch of the lumbo- sacral
cord, and arises from it opposite the upper part of the large
ends in sacro- sciatic notch. It passes outwards above the pyrimuscles. formis muscle to the back of the pelvis, where it ends in
branches for the two smaller gluteal muscles.
gluteal
Trace out the sympa- thetic.
Sympa- thetic in
Dissection. - Besides the large plexus of the sympathetic by the
side of the bladder, the student will have to expose the part of the
gangliated cord that lies in front of the sacrum. The several
ganglia (three or four) and their branches will come into view
after the cellular membrane is removed.
SYMPATHETIC -
NERVE. In the pelvis the sympathetic
the pel- nerve consists of a gangliated cord (on each side) and of two
lateral plexuses for the supply of the viscera.
vis.
The A. The gangliated cord lies on the front of the sacrur!
ated and internal to the series of apertures in that bone. It i
gangli.
cord
SYMPATHETIC IN THE PELVIS. 561
ofoppobelow,
there is
continuous superiorly with the lumbar part of the cord by a
single or double internodal piece ; and inferiorly the cords joins one
of opposite sides converge, and are united in front of the site side
coccyx by means of a loop, on which is situate a single me- where
dian ganglion, gang. impar. Each cord is marked by gan- a gan
glia at intervals, the number varying from three to five.
From the ganglia branches of communication pass to the offsets
spinal nerves, and some filaments are directed inwards in ganglia
front of the sacrum.
glion.
of the
a. The connecting branches are two to each ganglion, and are to the spinal very short. Like the branches of the lumbar ganglia they may nerves ;
enter two sacral nerves instead of one.
hypogas- ,
viscera.
b. The internal branches are smaller than those of other parts of to the
the cord, and communicate in front of the sacrum and around the tric plexus middle sacral artery with branches from the opposite side. From and the
the first, or two first ganglia some filaments are furnished to the
hypogastric plexus ; and from the terminal connecting branches and
the ganglion impar, in front of the coccyx, offsets descend over that bone.
ofthe
thetic :
tion ;
B. The visceral or pelvic plexuses (lateral inferior hypo- Plexuses
gastric) are two in number ( right and left), and are derived sympamainly from the lateral prolongations of the hypogastric
plexus (p. 463.) . Each lateral part of the hypogastric situaplexus is continued downwards to the side of the bladder
and rectum, or to the side of the vagina in the female, where
it becomes united with offsets from the third and fourth how
sacral nerves, and constitutes the above-named plexus. Numerous ganglia are found in the plexus, especially at the
points of union of the spinal and sympathetic nerves.
formed.
to the
of the
viz.-
From each plexus offsets are furnished to the viscera of Offsets
the pelvis, and to the genital organs, along the branches of viscera
the internal iliac artery. These different secondary plexuses male,
have the same name as the vessels on which they are placed ;
but as they may not be seen in the dissection, a mere enumeration of them will be sufficient.
rectum ;
1. The inferior hæmorrhoidal plexus is an offset to the rectum to the
from the back of the pelvic plexus, and joins the sympathetic on
the superior hæmorrhoidal artery.
2. The vesical plexus contains large nerves and many spinal tobladder the ;
562 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
to the prostate gland
nerves, and passes forwards to the side and lower part of the
bladder. It gives one offset, to the vesicula seminalis, and another
to the vas deferens.
3. The prostatic plexus leaves the lower part of the pelvic plexus
and is distributed to the substance of the prostate gland. At the
front of the prostate an offset of the nerves (cavernous) is conand the tinued onwards to the dorsum of the penis, to supply the caver- penis.
nous structure. On the penis the cavernous nerves join the pudic
Offsets
nerve.
In the female there are the following additional plexuses,
female for the supply of the viscera peculiar to that sex :-
in the
to the Ovary ;
to the vagina ;
and to the
::
Ovarian plexus. -The principal nerves to the ovary are derived
from the renal and aortic plexuses, and accompany the artery to
that body ; but the uterine nerves also supply some filaments to it.
Vaginal plexus. -The nerves to the vagina are of large size, and
are not plexiform, but consist in greater part of spinal nerve fibres :
they end in the lower part of that tube.
The uterine nerves are furnished to the uterus without admixture
uterus. with the spinal nerves. The nerves ascend along the side of the
uterus, and are, for the most part, long slender filaments, without
ganglia or communications until they terminate in the substance
of the viscus. Some few nerves that surround the arteries are
plexiform and ganglionic. -Beck. * The Fallopian tube receives
its branches from the uterine nerves.
Chain of glands in The lymphatic glands of the pelvis form a chain in front
pelvis ; of the sacrum and along the internal iliac artery. The efferent ducts of these bodies join the lumbar glands. Into these
lympha- glands the deep lymphatics of the penis, and of the genital tics en- tering organs in the female, and the lymphatics of the viscera and
wall of the pelvis, are collected .
them .
* The distribution of the sympathetic nerve in the pelvis has been
greatly certified by the excellent dissections of Mr. Beck. See Philosophical Transactions ( Part II. ) for 1846.
THE PROSTATE GLAND. 563
SECTION V.
ANATOMY OF THE VISCERA OF THE MALE.
THE bladder and the parts at its base, viz. the vesiculæ
seminales and the prostate gland, are to be taken first for
examination.
the vis- cera.
Dissection. To study the form and structure of the viscera it Take out
will be necessary to dislodge them from the cavity of the pelvis.
In this step the student should carry the scalpel around the pelvic
outlet, close to the osseous boundaries, so as to detach carefully
the crura of the penis from the bones, and to divide the parts connected with the end of the rectum. After the viscera are removed,
separate the rectum from the others, but leave together the bladder
and the penis and urethra. Distend again the bladder, and dissect Clean
the peritoneum and cellular membrane from the muscular fibres. bladder
Clean afterwards the prostate and vesiculæ seminales, and follow and the duct of the latter and the vas deferens into the gland. If tate. any
of the integument of the scrotum has been left attached to the
penis it is to be removed, and the penis and urethra are to be made
clean.
the
prosTHE PROSTATE GLAND AND SEMINAL VESICLES.
situa- PROSTATE GLAND. -This is a firm glandular body that Use and
secretes a special fluid. It surrounds the neck of the bladder tion.
and the beginning of the urethra, but its connections with
the surrounding parts have been enumerated (p. 543.) .
The gland is conical in form, with the base or larger end Form,
directed backwards, and is usually likened to a chesnut,
which it much resembles. Its dimensions in different direc- dimen- sions ,
tions are the following : transversely at the base it measures about an inch and a half, from apex to base rather
more than an inch, and in depth about three quarters of an
inch or an inch ; so that an incision directed obliquely
downwards and outwards from the apex to the lateral part
of the base of the gland, will be the longest that can be
practised in this body. Its weight is about an ounce, but in and
this respect it varies greatly.
weight,
002
564 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Sur- faces ;
On the upper surface the prostate is rounded, but a slight
groove lies along the centre ; and on the under surface,
which is larger and flatter, there is a median hollow indibase and cating its division into lobes. The posterior part, or the base
is thick, and in its centre is an excavation which receives
the common ejaculatory ducts. The sides are rounded, and
are prolonged backwards beyond the notch in the base.
sides.
Threel lobes ;
two lateral
and a
central.
Gland
three tubes.
Three lobes are described in the prostate, viz. a middle
and two lateral, though there is little division of the glandular
mass. The lateral lobes are similar on each side, and,
forming the chief part of the gland, are prolonged back beyond the notch in the base. The middle lobe will be brought
into view by detaching and throwing down the vesiculæ
seminales and the ejaculatory ducts from the bladder : it is
a small piece of the gland between the neck of the bladder
and the ejaculatory ducts, which extends transversely between the lateral lobes. Oftentimes this middle lobe is
enlarged in old people, and projects upwards into the bladder,
so as to interfere with the flow of the urine from that viscus,
or the passage of a catheter into it.
The urethra and the two common ejaculatory ducts are contains contained in the substance of the gland : the former is
transmitted through the gland from base to apex ; and
the latter perforate it obliquely to terminate in the urethral
canal.
Appear- ance on On a section being made into the gland the mass appears
asection. reddish in colour ; to the feel it is firm though lacerable ;
and it is enveloped by a thin fibrous covering that sends
processes into the interior.
Struc- ture.
end in
Structure. This gland resembles others in its general
structure, but the excretory ducts are not united into one
Ducts canal. On tracing inwards one of the ducts, after the urevesicles ; thra has been laid open, it will be found to divide as it sinks
into the gland, and its final branches to give origin to small
sessile vesicles, which are arranged around, and open into
them. On the exterior of the vesicles and ducts the bloodare ves- vessels ramify ; and lining the interior of the tubes is an
epithelium of the columnar kind, which becomes pavemental
in the vesicles. The ducts of the gland vary in number
onwhich
sels.
THE VESICULE SEMINALES. 565
from twelve to twenty, and open into the prostatic part of Number
the urethra (p. 570.).
of ducts.
form a
Blood-vessels. The arteries are unimportant, and are furnished Arteries.
by the vesical and hæmorrhoidal (p. 554.) . The veins form a Veins
plexus around the gland, which communicates in front with the plexus.
dorsal vein of the penis, and behind with a plexus of veins at the
base of the bladder. In old men this vascular communication gives
rise to considerable hæmorrhage when it is freely cut in the operation of lithotomy.
-
tion .
SituaVESICULE SEMINALES. These vesicles are two membra- Defininous, sacculated reservoirs for the secreted semen. They
are placed on the under part of the bladder behind the pro- tion.
state, and diverge from one another so as to limit laterally a
triangular surface at this aspect of the viscus : their form
and connections have been already described (p. 543.).
Though sacculated behind, the vesicula becomes straight and Wavy
somewhat narrowed in front ; and at the base of the prostate it is blended with the vas deferens to form the common
ejaculatory duct.
sac.
of a
tube.
The vesicula seminalis consists, like the epididymis, of a Formed
tube bent into a zigzag form, so as to produce lateral sacs or coiled
pouches, which are bound together by fibrous tissue ; this
cellular structure will be shown by means of a cut into it.
When the bends of the vesicle are undone, its formative tube,
which is about the size of a quill, measures from four to six Length.
inches, and ends posteriorly in a closed extremity. Connected with the tube, at intervals, are some lateral cæcal
processes.
-
vas End of vas deferens. Opposite the vesicula the vas End of
deferens is increased in capacity, and is rather sacculated deferens.
like the contiguous vesicle ; but before it joins with the tube
of that body to form the common ejaculatory duct, it diminishes in size, and becomes straight.
-
has a
and a
Structure. The seminal vesicle has the same number of Vesicle
coats as the vas deferens (p . 513. ) , besides the case of the
recto-vesical fascia. Its special elastic coat is formed of special
fibres that are supposed to be muscular. The mucous mem- mucous
brane is thrown into ridges by the bending of the tube, and coat.
presents an areolar or honeycomb appearance : it is lined 003
566 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Vas deferens same.
How formed.
by a laminar epithelium. In the sacculated part of the vas
deferens the mucous lining resembles in a slight degree that
in the vesicula.
Common - seminal ducts. These tubes (right and left)
are formed by the junction of the canal of one vesicula
seminalis with the vas deferens of the same side, and convey
Extent, the semen from its reservoir to the urethra. They begin
opposite the base of the prostate, and are directed upwards
course, and forwards through the glandular mass, and along the sides
of a depression ( sinus pocularis) , to open within it, one on
length, each side. Their length is rather less than an inch, and
and their course is convergent to their termination, where they
are close together in the floor of the urethra (p. 570.) .
termina- tion.
Struc- ture.
Structure. - -The wall of the common duct is thinner
than that of the vas deferens, and in the prostate gland the
special coat is almost wanting.
Bladder out of the body.
Form.
THE BLADDER.
After the bladder has been separated from the surrounding
parts, its form and the extent of its different regions can be
more conveniently observed.
Whilst it is in the body, the bladder is conical in shape, and
is rather flattened from before backwards ; but it is now more
circular than when in its natural position, and has lost that
arched form by which it adapts itself in distension to the
Dimen- axis of the pelvis. If this viscus is moderately dilated, it
measures about five inches in length, and about three inches
across (Hüschke). Its capacity is greatly influenced by the
age and sex, and by the habits of the individual. Ordinarily
the bladder holds about a pint, and as a general rule it is
larger in the female than in the male.
sions.
Coats of the STRUCTURE. ― A muscular and a mucous coat, with an
bladder. intervening cellular layer, exist in the wall of the bladder : at
parts the peritoneum may also be enumerated as a constituent
of the wall. The vessels and nerves are large.
Perito- neal.
The imperfect covering of peritoneum has been described
(p. 539.), and has been removed.
THE URINARY BLADDER. 567
lar has The muscular coat is formed of two layers of unstriped Muscumuscular fibres, viz. an external or longitudinal, and an two
internal or circular ; there are also some special fibres connected with the ends of the ureters.
strata ;
or longi- a. The longitudinal fibres surround the bladder, and extend from external
the apex to the base : above they are connected with the urachus, tudinal,
and below they are attached to the upper part of the prostate
gland, with the exception of an anterior fasciculus on each side,
which is united to the back of the os pubis, through the anterior
true ligament of the bladder. On the front and back of the bladder
the muscular layer is stronger, and its fibres more vertical, than
on the lateral parts. Sometimes this layer of fibres has been called, form
from its action in expelling the urine from the bladder, detrusor urinæ ;
urinæ muscle.
detrusor'
or circurise to
ter.
b. The circular fibres are thin, and scattered on the body of the internal
bladder, but around the cervix they are collected into a thick bundle, lar give
which is called the sphincter vesica. In some instances the fibres sphincare hypertrophied, and project into the interior of the organ,
forming the fasciculated bladder ; and in other cases the mucous
coat may be forced outwards here and there between the fibres,
producing little sacs, or the sacculated bladder.
muscu- c. The third set of muscular fibres is continued from the openings Other
of the ureters to the prostate gland, and will be seen when the lar bladder is opened.
fibres.
coat.
Cellular coat. This stratum is placed between the mus- Cellular
cular and mucous layers, and is enumerated amongst the
coats of the bladder ; it is composed of areolar and elastic
tissues as in other hollow viscera.
-
bladder.
Dissection. The bladder is now to be opened by an incision Openthe
down the front, and the same cut is to be continued along the
upper part ofthe prostate gland.
coat The mucous membrane of the bladder is continuous pos- Mucous
teriorly with that lining the ureters, and anteriorly with that
of the urethra. It is very slightly united to the muscular has folds
layer in consequence of the intervention of the submucous
stratum, and is thrown into numerous folds in the flaccid
state of the viscus, except over a small triangular surface except
behind the opening into the urethra. The membrane is soft spot.
and smooth to the feel, and of a pale rose colour in the healthy
state. Its surface is studded with small mucous follicles, Follicles.
on one
004
568 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Epithe particularly towards the neck of the bladder. A spheroidal
or transitional epithelium covers the surface.
lium .
Interior of the
Opening of ure- thra
uvula.
-
Interior of the bladder.-Within the bladder the following
bladder. parts are to be remarked, viz. , the orifices of the ureters and
urethra, the triangular space, and the muscles of the ureters.
Orifices. - At the lower and anterior part of the bladder
is the orifice of the urethra, surrounded by the prostate
gland. The mucous membrane here presents some longitudinal folds, and the aperture is partly closed by a small
with its prominence below, uvula vesica, occasioned by a thickening
of the submucous tissue. This eminence is placed in front
of the middle lobe of the prostate, and from its anterior part
a slight ridge is continued to the floor of the urethra. About
an inch and a half behind the orifice of the urethra, and
rather more than that distance apart, are the two narrow
openings of the ureters. These excretory tubes for the urine
perforate the wall of the bladder obliquely, lying in it for the
distance of nearly an inch, and therefore the reflux of fluid
through them towards the kidney is prevented, as the bladder
is distended they terminate on each side by a contracted
slit-like opening in the centre of a prominence.
Open- ings of the ureters .
of the
how bound- ed ;
Trigone Triangular surface. -Immediately behind the orifice of
bladder ; the urethra is a smooth triangularly- shaped part of the
bladder, which is named trigone (trigonum vesica). Its
apex reaches the prostate, and its base the ureters ; or its
boundaries may be marked out by a line on each side from
the urethra to the ureter, and by a transverse one between
part cor- the ureters. This space corresponds to the interval at the
ing ex- base of the bladder, between the prostate in front and the ternally.
vesiculæ and vasa deferentia on the sides ; and over it the
mucous coat is closely united to the muscular, so as to prevent the accidental folds found in the other parts of the
empty bladder.
respondTo ex- pose Dissection. - The muscles of the ureters will come into view
muscles on the removal of the mucous membrane in a line from the urethra
ters. to the opening of the ureter of each side : the fibres are best
marked in a muscular bladder.
of ureThese The muscles ofthe ureters are " two strong fleshy columns,
muscles which descend from the orifices of the ureters towards the pass
THE MALE URETHRA. 569
ureters orifice of the bladder," where they become blended into one. from
"Where these columns unite, they are most fleshy, and their
fibres are more intricate ; then directing their course towards
the lower and backmost part of the prostate, they degenerate to the
into tendon, and are inserted into the portion called the third tate.
lobe of the prostate.” *
-
prosBlood- vessels and nerves. The source of the vesical arteries and Arteries;
the termination of the veins are before detailed (pp. 554. 558. ) . veins ;
In the bladder they are disposed in greatest number about its base and neck. Most of the nerves that are distributed to the bladder, nerves.
though supplied from the pelvic plexus of the sympathetic (p. 561.) ,
are derived directly from the spinal nerves.
――
THE URETHRA AND PENIS.
and
fibrous
URETHRA. The tube of the urethra extends from the Extent
neck of the bladder to the end of the penis, and has an length ;
average length of about eight inches. It is deficient in the no
strong fibrous coat that surrounds the mucous lining in other coat.
excretory ducts, but is supported by the structures that here
and there surround it. The size of the canal varies at different spots, and the tube is divided, as before said ( p. 544.), Division
into a prostatic, a membranous, and a spongy part.
into parts.
open the Dissection. - To open the urethra, let the incision through the How to
upper part of the prostate be continued onwards to the extremity urethra.
of the penis, so as to cut through the corpus cavernosum of that
body rather on one side of the middle line, and to leave undivided
its septum.
sions and
The prostatic part is nearer the upper than the lower Prosta- tic part.
aspect of the gland that surrounds it, and lies at first above
the middle lobe of the prostate. It is about one inch and a Dimenquarter in length, and is altogether the widest and most extensible division of the urethral canal. The form of this
part of the tube is spindle- shaped, for it is larger in the
middle than at either end. Its transverse measurement, at diamethe neck of the bladder, is about a quarter of an inch ; at its
* From a Paper by Sir C. Bell, in the third vol. of the Med. Chir.
Transactions : " Account of the Muscles of the Ureters."
shape ;
ter.
570 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
On the floor is
centre a line or two more ; and at the front rather less than
at the beginning.
On the floor of the urethral passage, at the neck of the
a crest. bladder, is the eminence of the uvula vesicæ. In front of
this is a central longitudinal ridge of the mucous lining,
which is prolonged anteriorly towards the membranous part
of the canal, and is named crest of the urethra (verumontanum, caput galinaginis) ; it is formed, like the uvula, by a
thickening of the submucous tissue.
In the crest is a
which
into the pro- state,
and in which
In the central fold or crest of the mucous membrane, near
pouch, its posterior extremity, is a slight hollow named utricle, or
projects sinus pocularis. This depression is about a line wide at its
orifice in the urethra ; but from that spot it is directed backwards and downwards in the prostate, for the distance of a
quarter of an inch or rather more, passing beneath the
middle and between the lateral lobes, and ends by a cæcal
and somewhat dilated extremity. In its wall, on each side,
is contained the common ejaculatory duct, which opens by a
are the narrow slit on or within the free margin of the mouth of the
sac. Small glands likewise open on the surface of the
mucous membrane lining it. Some bristles should be introduced into the ejaculatory ducts, to render evident their
Prosta- position and apertures. On each side of the central ridge or
crest is an excavation of the glandular substance, named the
prostatic sinus. Into this hollow the ducts of the lateral
lobes of the prostate open, whilst the apertures of those of
the middle lobe are seen at the posterior part of the central
ridge, behind the hollow in it.
ejacula- tory ducts.
tic sinus- es also in floor.
Mem- branous The membranous part of the urethra is nearly an inch in
part. length, and intervenes between the apex of the prostate
gland and the bulb of the corpus spongiosum urethræ. This
Dimen- is the narrowest portion of the whole canal, with the excep- sions.
Parts around.
Spongy part.
tion of the orifice, and measures rather less than a quarter of
an inch. It is the weakest of the three divisions of the
canal, and is supported only by a thin stratum of erectile
tissue, by some vessels, and by the compressor urethræ
muscle.
The spongy part includes the rest of the urethra, viz. to
the end of the penis. It is about six inches in length, and
STRUCTURE OF THE PENIS. 571
sions.
Two Two di- lata- -one is tions ;
one in
one in
its strength depends upon an enveloping material, named
corpus spongiosum urethræ. The average size of the canal Dimenis about a quarter of an inch in diameter, though at the
vertical slit, by which it terminates on the glans penis, the
tube is smaller than at any other part of the urethra.
dilatations exist in the floor of the spongy portion :
contained in the bulb or bulbous part of the urethra, and is bulb,
named sinus of the bulb ; the other is situate in the glans glans .
penis, and has been called fossa navicularis from its shape.
Mucous lining of the urethra.. The mucous membrane of Extent ;
the urethra is continued into the bladder, as well as into the
ducts opening into the canal, and joins in front the tegumentary covering of the glans penis. It is of a reddish colour ;
colour as far back as the prostate, where it becomes whiter,
and is thrown into longitudinal folds during the contracted folds ;
state of the penis. Its surface is studded with follicles, and glands ;
with the apertures of mucous glands ; and its epithelial epithecovering is of the columnar kind, but near the orifice this
becomes laminar.
-
lium.
larger
rest.
Some small pouches or lacunæ are seen in the interior of Lacunæ.
the canal, chiefly along the floor, which have their apertures
turned towards the outer orifice of the urethra. One of
these is larger than the rest, lacuna magna, and is placed One
on the upper aspect or roof of the urethra, opposite the than the
fossa navicularis. The ducts of the prostate and of Cowper's Ducts of
glands open on the mucous membrane : the former have glands
been described above ; the latter are two in number, and per.
terminate, one on each side, on the floor of the urethra near
the front of the bulb ; but in the ordinary examination they
are seldom recognised.
of Cowcous Submucous tissue. A stratum of common submucous Submutissue exists between the lining membrane of the urethra tissue
and the structures that surround that tube ; but along the
prostatic and membranous portions there is, in addition, a
thin enveloping layer of erectile tissue, that is continued and erecbackwards from the corpus spongiosum urethra to the neck tissue.
of the bladder.
tile
STRUCTURE OF THE PENIS. -The form and the connec- Penis formed
572 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
vascular
bodies.
of two tions of the penis having been described at page 545., it reerectile mains now to notice the tissues of which it is composed. By
means of the section already made through the penis, this
body can be observed to be made up of two spongy and vascular substances -one filling the corpora cavernosa, the
other constituting the corpus spongiosum urethræ.
Cavern- Corpora cavernosa.
ous mathe struc- tures of
-
-Each corpus cavernosum is conterial ; structed of a firm fibrous tunic, which encloses a cavernous
or trabecular structure, and contains a plexus of vessels in
which it the intervals of the spongy mass in the interior. An incomplete median septum exists along the body of the penis
between the corpora cavernosa.
consists.
Afibrous case
that
The fibrous case of the corpus cavernosum is a white,
strong, elastic covering, from half a line to a line in thickness.
Along the middle line of the penis a septal process is sent
sends in inwards from it ; and numerous other finer offsets or traes, viz. beculæ project inwards to give origin to the spongy structure. It is formed of white shining fibres that are mostly
disposed longitudinally.
process1
One septal piece,
The septal process extends along the body of the penis,
and is thicker and more perfect behind than in front. At
the point ofjunction of the crura of the penis, this partition
separates the enclosed cavity of the organ into two parts ;
which is but as it reaches forwards it becomes less strong, and is
pierced by elongated apertures, which give it the appearance of a comb, whence the name septum pectiniforme.
Through the intervals in the septum the vascular tissue of
one corpus cavernosum communicates with that of the
other.
imper- fect,
and nu- merous
and
form a
net- work.
The cavernous or trabecular structure is formed by fibrous
bands bands and cords that cross in all directions the enclosed
cords to cavity of the corpus cavernosum, giving rise to a network in
the interior. The fibrous processes are thinner towards the
centre than at the circumference of the fibrous case ; and the
areolar spaces are larger in the centre and at the fore part
of the 'contained cavity, than at the circumference or in the
crura penis. In addition to white fibrous tissue, the trabeculæ contain some elastic fibres, together with a reddish
structure supposed to be pale muscular fibres ( Müller). The
In the cords some pale bres.
STRUCTURE OF THE PENIS. 573
are ereccellular structure of the penis may be demonstrated by
means of sections of that body distended with air and dried,
or injected with tallow that has been afterwards removed.
Blood- vessels. -The blood- vessels of the penis are large in Vessels
size, and serve to nourish as well as minister to the function tile ;
of the organ. Having entered the cavernous mass, they
ramify in the interstices of the trabecular structure, and produce the erectile tissue.
dilated
es.
The veins commence by dilatations or venous cells, that fill the veins are
interspaces of the areolar structure, and anastomose freely together and form
to form venous plexuses. In these spaces the walls of the veins plexusare very thin, because they receive support from the surrounding
fibrous structure. Into the large radicles of the veins the arterial
capillaries pour their contents, and thus produce the erectile condition of the corpus cavernosum by the dilatation of those receptacles. By means of the apertures in the septum the veins of
opposite sides communicate freely.
of the Most ofthe veins of the corpus cavernosum issue along the upper Ending
and under aspects of the penis, to end in the dorsal vein ; but some veins.
escape near the roots of that body, and join the pudic vein and the
prostatic plexus.
--
of the
ries.
nation
either in
The arteries of the corpora cavernosa are offsets of the pudic, Source
both at the root and along the body of the penis. Entering the artecavernous structure, they divide into branches, which ramify in
the trabeculæ until they cease in one of the two following ways :-
The greater number of the vessels terminate in capillaries, as in Termiother parts, which open into the dilated veins in the intertrabecular
spaces ; but others of the terminal twigs end in tufts of short, dilated
slightly curled vessels -the helicine arteries of Müller, which pro- or as the
ject into the intertrabecular spaces, and become imbedded in the helicine
thin veins. These twisted vascular bodies have dilated cæcal
extremities, and do not communicate with the veins. The helicine
arteries exist in greatest number at the posterior part of each
corpus cavernosum.
-
veins,
arteries.
material
penis ;
Corpus spongiosum urethræ. This constituent part of Spongy
the penis surrounds the urethra, and forms alone the bulb of the
and the glans penis (p. 546. ) . The urethra is not enveloped
equally on all sides by this tissue, for, at the bulb, only a
thin stratum is above the canal. Posteriorly an offset of the
corpus spongiosum is continued beyond the bulb, around the
urethra.
574 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Its struc- ture like Structure.
- The tissue of the corpus spongiosum is
cavern- similar to that of the corpus cavernosum : thus it consists of
a fibrous tunic, that encloses a trabecular structure, and a
plexiform arrangement of the blood-vessels.
ous.
The fibrous case.
fect
The fibrous covering is less dense and strong than in the
corpus cavernosum, but it sends inwards processes to form a
Imper- network. Moreover a piece projects inwards in the middle
septum. line, opposite the bulb, which reaches forwards a short distance, and assists in dividing that body into two lobes. The
trabecular bands are much finer, and more uniform in size,
than those of the corpus cavernosum.
Blood- vessels Blood-vessels.
- The terminal arrangement of the bloodlikewise vessels to produce the erectile structure of the corpus spon- erectile, giosum is the same as in the corpora cavernosa ; but the
licine.
and he- helicine terminations of the arteries are absent from the
glans penis, where the veins form a very close and regular
plexus.
Source of arte- ries.
Termi- nation of the veins.
Nerves.
The chief artery on each side (artery of the bulb) is derived
from the pudic, and enters the spongy structure at the bulb.
Kobelt describes another branch to the same part, at its upper
aspect.
Most of the veins, including those of the glans, end in the large
dorsal vein of the penis, some communicating with the veins of the
cavernous body ; but others issue from the bulb, and terminate in
the pudic vein, and in the prostatic plexus.
Nerves and lymphatics. -The nerves of the penis are large, and
are furnished both by the spinal and sympathetic nerves (pp. 560
Lymph-- 562) . The superficial lymphatics join the inguinal glands ; the
deep ones accompany the veins beneath the arch of the pubes, to
end in the glands in the pelvis.
atics.
Rectum
THE RECTUM.
The lower end of the large intestine, that is contained in
smooth. the pelvis, is not sacculated like the colon, but is smooth on is
To pre- pare the gut.
the surface.
Dissection. The rectum is to be washed out, and then distended
with air. Afterwards, the peritoneum and the loose cellular membrane are to be removed from it.
THE RECTUM. 575
sions.
The rectum is about eight inches in length, and its Length ;
average diameter is that of the sigmoid flexure of the colon.
Its size is uniform till towards the lower extremity, where it dimenis dilated, particularly in old people, but at the aperture of
termination in the anus the gut is smaller than in any other
part of its extent. The longitudinal bands of the colon are
absent from this portion of the alimentary canal, and the
fibres are spread over the surface.
-
coats as
a in the rest of
Structure. The rectum, like the rest of the large in- Same
testine, contains in its wall a peritoneal, a muscular,
mucous, and a submucous stratum ; and further, the mus- the incular and the mucous layers have certain peculiarities that
serve to distinguish the rectum from other parts of the in- testinal tube.
testine.
The neum.
peritoneum forms but an incomplete covering, and Peritoits extent is referred to in the description of the connections
of the pelvic viscera (p. 540.).
lar coat The muscular coat consists of two planes of fibres, as in Muscu
the œsophagus, viz. a superficial or longitudinal, and a deep
or circular.
gitudinal The longitudinal fibres are continuous with those in the has lonbands on the colon, but are here diffused to form a stratum
around the gut.
cular The circular fibres describe arches on the intestine, and and cirbecome thicker and stronger towards its lower extremity, fibres.
where they are collected into the band of the internal
sphincter muscle. These fibres belong to the pale or unstriped kind, but in the sphincter some striped or voluntary
fibres are present.
coat
vascular.
The mucous coat is here more movable than in the colon, Mucous
and resembles in that respect the lining of the œsophagus ;
it is also thicker and more vascular than that of the rest ofthick and
the large intestine. When the bowel is contracted the
mucous lining is thrown into numerous accidental folds, Folds in
some of which near the anus are longitudinal. But there
are other permanent folds (three or four), described by Mr.
Houston, which are about half an inch in width, and contain
it :
some are per- manent.
576 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Struc- ture ;
Arteries.
are with.
some of the circular fibres of the gut. * The most constant
of these is about three inches from the anus, on the front of
the rectum, opposite the base of the bladder ; another is
found on the right side of the intestine near the top ; and
the third is on the left side, midway between the other two :
occasionally there is a fourth on the back of the rectum,
about an inch from the anus. These folds are not seen unless the gut has been hardened in spirit, whilst in its natural
condition in the pelvis.
The mucous membrane has the same general structure as
in the colon, but towards the anus the secretory apparatus
gradually disappears.
Blood- vessels. -The arteries are supplied from three different
sources they are, superior hæmorrhoidal, from the inferior mesenteric ; middle hæmorrhoidal, from the internal iliac artery ; and
Veins inferior hæmorrhoidal, from the internal pudic. The veins are
deficient in valves, and communicate freely around the lower end
of the gut. Above, they join the inferior mesenteric vein, and,
through it, reach the vena portæ ; and, posteriorly, they pour
some blood into the internal iliac vein by branches corresponding
to the middle hæmorrhoidal artery.
out valves.
Nerves ; Nerves and lymphatics. -The nerves are obtained from both the
lymph sympathetic and the spinal system. The lymphatics terminate in
the chain of glands on the sacrum.
atics.
SECTION VI.
ANATOMY OF THE VISCERA OF THE FEMALE.
in the pelvis.
Viscera THE viscera of the female pelvis consist of those common to
the male and female, viz. the bladder and urethra, with the
rectum ; and of those that are special to the female, viz. the
organs of generation.
To re- movethe Dissection. The contents of the pelvis are to be removed toviscera gether with the genital organs. In this proceeding, the student
* Vol. v. of the Dublin Hospital Reports, "Observations on the
Mucous Membrane of the Rectum. "
FEMALE GENITAL ORGANS. 577
parepre.
is to keep the scalpel close to the osseous boundary of the pelvic
outlet, to avoid the end of the rectum, and the crura of the clitoris
that are connected to the bone. After the parts referred to are and
taken from the body, the rectum is to be detached from the uterus them.
and vagina, but the rest of the viscera may remain united until
the genital organs have been examined. The bladder may be
moderately distended, and all the parts are to be freed from cellular
membrane and vessels.
ORGANS OF GENERATION.
The generative organs of the female are classed, from their
position with respect to the pelvis, into external and internal.
organs The external organs are included in the term vulva, or Externa
pudendum ; they consist of the mons Veneris and external are
labia, of the clitoris and internal labia, of the vestibule with
the meatus urinarius, and of the aperture of the vagina, with
the hymen or the remnants of it.
-
Veneris
majora.
Mons Veneris and labia pudendi. — In front of the os mons
pubis the integument is covered with hair, and is raised into and
a slight eminence, mons Veneris, by a layer of subjacent
fat. Extending downwards from the prominence mentioned
are two folds of integument, the labia pudendi (labia ma- labia
jora), which correspond to the scrotum in the male. Above
and below, the labia are united, the points of junction being
named commissures, but between them is an interval called
rima. The labia decrease in thickness inferiorly ; they are
covered externally with a few hairs, but are lined internally
with a mucous membrane provided with follicles and sebaceous glands. In them is a tissue resembling the dartos of the male scrotum. Within the lower commissure of the labia
is a small thin transverse fold of integuments named Fourfourchette, or frænulum ; and between this fold and the and
lower commissure is the interval of the fossa navicularis.
chette
fossa.
Clitoris and nymphæ. Beneath the upper commissure Clitoris
of the labia majora the small projection of the clitoris will
be found, with the nymphæ descending from it.
PP
578 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
dissec- tion to see it.
It is like the penis ;
has a
glans and
caver nosa,
Dissection. To see the clitoris, remove the integument forming
the upper commissure, and, having exposed the body of the organ,
follow outwards the crura, one to each side.
The clitoris is a small erectile organ, and is the analogue
of the penis in the male, which it resembles in structure, except that the urethra and its spongy enveloping substance
are not applied below it. Its anterior extremity is termiprepuce, nated by a rounded part or glans, and is covered by a fold
of the skin, corresponding to the prepuce of the male, which
is provided with sebaceous glands. In structure this organ
resembles the penis in the following particulars : - it concorpora sists of corpora cavernosa, which are attached by crura (one
on each side) to the rami of the ischium and pubis, and are
then blended to form one body, with an imperfect pectiniform
septum ; and further, the glans is composed of the tissue of
the corpus spongiosum. In the interior is an erectile tissue,
tissue. like that of the male (p. 573. ) . The nymphæ (labia minora)
Labia are two folds of mucous membrane that descend from the end
descend of the clitoris, one on each side of the orifice of the vagina :
prepuce. they are continuous above with the preputial covering of the
clitoris, and extend down about one inch and a half. The
inner surface is continuous with the lining of the vagina,
and the outer with the covering of the external labium.
plexus of blood- vessels is contained in each fold.
and erectile
minora
from
Vesti- bule.
A
Vestibule and orifice of the urethra. —Within the nymphæ,
between the clitoris above and the vagina below, is an angular interval, about one inch and a half deep, which is called
Opening the vestibule. In the middle line of the vestibular space is
urethra. the round orifice of the urethra, which is contained in an
eminence about one inch below the clitoris, and near the
aperture of the vagina.
ofthe
Aperture of the Orifice of the vagina and the hymen. The aperture of
vagina. the vagina is close below the meatus urinarius, and varies
much in size. In the child and in the virgin it is partly
closed below by a thin semilunar fold of mucous membrane
Hymen named the hymen. After destruction of the fold, small
runcula. irregularly- shaped projections, carunculæ myrtiformes, remain around the opening of the vagina.
and ca-
THE VAGINA. 579.
The internal generative organs are the uterus and vagina,
with the ovaries, and the Fallopian tubes.
uterus.
Dissection. The bladder is to be separated from the uterus, Separate vagina and the urethra to be detached from the substance of the vagina. and
The surface of the vagina, and of the lower part of the uterus,
should be cleaned, but the peritoneal investment of the latter is
to be left untouched for the present.
THE VAGINA.
The vagina is a dilatable tube, that is connected with the Extent
uterus at one end, and terminates in the vulva at the other.
It has a curved course between the two points mentioned, andved
and the anterior and posterior parts do not equal one another course.
in length, for whilst the former measures about four inches,
the latter is about five or six in extent.
In its position in the body the tube is flattened from above Form
downwards, so that the opposite surfaces may be in contact,
but the upper end is rounded where it is joined to the uterus.
Its size varies at different spots : thus the external orifice and size.
which is surrounded by the constrictor vaginæ muscle is the
narrowest part, the middle portion is the largest, and the
upper end is intermediate in dimensions between the other
two.
After the vagina has been laid open by an incision along Interior
the upper wall, the position of the uterus in that wall, instead of the extremity, can be remarked ; and further, the
tube will be seen to extend higher on the posterior than the
anterior aspect of the cervix uteri. On the inner surface of
the vagina, towards the lower part, is a slight longitudinal
ridge both in front and behind, named columns of the vagina. has
Other transverse ridges or ruga may be seen passing be- and
tween the columns, before the tissue of the vagina has been
distended.
columns
rugæ.
The wall of the vagina is thicker anteriorly where the Wall.
urethra is situate than at any other part of the canal.
Structure. - The vaginal wall is formed by a spongy An erecerectile tissue, which is covered externally by a dilatable and structure tile
PP 2
580 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
in the wall.
Erectile tissue
forms semi- bulbs,
vascular fibro-cellular layer, and lined internally by mucous
membrane. At its lower end the tube is surrounded by a
band of the fibres of the sphincter vaginæ muscle (p. 411.).
The erectile tissue is most abundant at the lower part of
the vagina, where it gives the greater thickness to the wall.
Two masses of the erectile tissue, one on each side of the
vagina, have been described as the semi- bulbs by Taylor, and
as the bulbi vestibuli by Kobelt. They are elongated masses
of plexiform veins, about an inch in length, which are enclosed in fibrous membrane, and are situate one on each side
of the vestibule, where they are covered on the outer side by
the constrictor vaginæ. At its upper part each is pointed, is
continued to the clitoris, and communicates with the vessels
of that body ; whilst at the posterior rounded part it joins
the venous plexus of the vagina. These bodies are supposed
spond to by Kobelt to be analogous to the bulb of the corpus spongiosum urethræ in the male ; each lateral part into which it
has been divided being thrust aside in the female towards
the crus clitoridis by the aperture of the vagina, instead of
forming one piece in the middle line.
which correthe bulb ofthe male.
Mucous mem- brane ofthe
The mucous membrane is continued through the lower
aperture, over the vessels of the nymphæ, which it encloses,
vagina. to join the integument on the labia majora ; and through the
os uteri, at the opposite end, to the interior of the uterus.
Many muciparous glands and follicles abound on the surface,
but these are in greatest abundance at the upper part. A
laminar epithelium gives a lining to the membrane.
Arteries .
Veins are plexi- form.
Two glands analo- gous to Cow- per's.
Blood-vessels and nerves. - The arteries are derived from the
visceral branches of the internal iliac . The veins corresponding to
the arteries form a plexus around the vagina, as well as in the
external generative organs, and open into the internal iliac vein.
For a description of the nerves see page 562.
Glands ofBartholine. On the outer part of the vagina,
near the aperture at the lower end, may be found a small
yellowish glandular body on each side, that is analogous to
Cowper's gland in the male. Each is about the size of a
small bean, and is provided with a duct that is directed
forwards to open on the inner aspect of the corresponding
nympha.
FORM OF THE UTERUS. 581
THE UTERUS.
tion ;
The uterus or womb is an organ formed chiefly of invo- Definiluntary muscular fibres, which receives and retains for a
fixed period the developing ovum.
This viscus, in the virgin state, is pear- shaped, or rather form ;
triangular in consequence of the body being flattened, and
presents inferiorly a rounded narrow part or neck. Deviations from the standard shape will be found in the infant, in how
which the neck is larger than the body, and in the aged
female, in whom there is little separation between the same
two parts.
changed.
sions. Commonly the uterus measures about three inches in Dimenlength, two in breadth at the upper part, and an inch in
greatest thickness. Its weight varies from an ounce to an
ounce and a half, but after gestation its size and volume
always exceed the specification here made of them.
end.
lower
small ;
opening.
The upper end or fundus is convex, and comprises the Upper
part of the organ above the attachment of the Fallopian
tube : it is covered by peritoneum. The lower, small and The
rounded end, which is named the neck of the uterus (cervix end is
uteri), is surrounded by the vagina, and is covered by it to a
greater extent behind than in front. It is about half an inch
in length, and gradually tapers towards the extremity. In
the lower end is a transverse aperture of communication
between the uterus and the vagina, named os uteri (os tinca), has an
whose margins or lips ( labia) are smooth, and anterior and
posterior in situation of these the hinder one is the longest.
The body, or the intervening part of the uterus, is more con- Body ;
vex posteriorly than anteriorly, and decreases in size down
to the neck. It is covered on both aspects by the peritoneum, except about half an inch in front, at the lower part,
where it is connected to the bladder. To each side, which is sides.
straight, are attached the parts contained in the broad fold
of peritoneum, viz. the Fallopian tube at the top, the round
ligament rather below and before it, and the ovary and its
ligament below and behind the others.
PP 3
582 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Openthe uterus.
Its thick- ness.
In the interior
the body,
narrow- ed be- low,
Dissection. -To examine the interior of the uterus, make a cut
along the anterior wall, from the fundus to the os uteri, and then
take away enough of the tissue on each side of the middle line to
expose the contained cavity.
The thickness of the uterine wall is greatest opposite the
middle of the body and at the centre of the fundus ; but
from those spots the wall becomes thinner towards the attachment of the Fallopian tubes.
-
Interior of the uterus. —Within the uterus is a small
space, which is divided into two parts one of the body,
is a tri- another of the neck of that organ. The space occupying
angular the body of the viscus is triangular in form, and is larger
than the other. Its base is at the fundus of the uterus,
where it is convex towards the cavity, and the angles thereof
are prolonged towards the Fallopian tube, that opens into
which is the cavity on each side. The apex is directed downwards,
and joins the cavity in the cervix by a narrowed circular
part, isthmus (os uteri internum) ; and this communicating
aperture may be smaller than the opening from the cervix
into the vagina. The space within the neck terminates inshaped feriorly at the os uteri ; it is larger at the middle than at
either end, being spindle- shaped, and is somewhat flattened,
like the cavity of the body. Along both the anterior and
the posterior wall is a longitudinal ridge, and from these
other ridges (ruga) are directed obliquely on each side : this
ridges appearance has been named arbor vitæ uterinus. In the
intervals between the rugæ are some mucous follicles, which
sometimes become enlarged with fluid, giving rise to the
ovula of Naboth.
and a
spindlespace in the neck.
In the neck are
or the arbor vitæ.
Uterus
cular
STRUCTURE. The dense wall of the uterus is composed
isamus of layers of unstriped muscular fibre, intermixed with fibro- organ. cellular structure, and large blood- vessels. On the exterior
is the peritoneum, and lining the interior is a thin mucous
membrane.
There are three strata :
The muscular fibres can be demonstrated at the full period
of gestation to form three strata in the wall of the uterus,
external, viz. external, internal, and middle. The external layer contains fibres which are mostly transverse, and are more
STRUCTURE OF THE UTERUS. 583
marked at the fundus and at the sides than along the middle
of the organ. Externally the fibres converge towards the
broad ligament, into which some are inserted, whilst others
are prolonged on the Fallopian tube, the round ligament, and
the ligament of the ovary. The internal set describe circles internal,
around the openings of the Fallopian tubes, and spread
therefrom till they meet at the middle line of the uterus.
The middle or intervening set of fibres are more indistinct and
than the others, and have a less determinate direction .
middle.
with
The mucous lining is continued into the vagina at one end Mucous lining is
of the uterus, and into the Fallopian tubes at the other. In
the interior of the uterus it is thin, smooth, and adherent,
and, like the mucous membrane of the intestine, its surface
is covered with the apertures of tubular glands, which may covered
be either straight and simple, or may be twisted or branched. glands.
Between the rugæ of the cervix uteri mucous follicles are in the
collected. The epithelial covering of the mucous membrane neck
is columnar and ciliated as far as the middle of the cavity of lium.
the neck, but laminar beyond that point.
Follicles
Epitheare The blood-vessels of the uterus are large and tortuous, and occupy Vessels
canals in the uterine substance, in which they communicate freely large.
together. The arteries are furnished from the uterine and ovarian Arteries;
branches ; and the veins correspond with the arteries in name and veins ;
number. The nerves are derived from the sympathetic, and are nerves.
very small in proportion to the size of the uterus. They are not
enlarged in pregnancy, according to Mr. Beck. *
cord
ment to
Round ligament of the uterus. —This firm cord supports This
the uterus, and is contained partly in the broad ligament and ends in groin.
partly in the inguinal canal (p . 432.). It is about four or
five inches in length, and is attached to the upper part of the Attachuterus close below, and anterior to the Fallopian tube. A uterus ;
tube of the peritoneum accompanies the part of the cord in
the inguinal canal, and sometimes remains pervious for a
short distance. The ligament is composed of unstriped mus- how
cular fibres, derived from the uterus, together with vessels
and cellular membrane.
formed .
* See a Paper in the Philosophical Transactions for 1846.
PP 4
584 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Position;
orm and colour ;
OVARIES AND FALLOPIAN TUBES.
OVARY. -The ovaries are two bodies, analogous to the
testes of the male, which are contained in the broad ligaments of the uterus, one in each, and at the posterior aspect.
Each ovary is of an elongated form, somewhat flattened
from above down, and of a whitish colour ; with either a
dimen- smooth or a scarred surface. Its volume is variable, but in
the virgin state it is about one inch and a half in length, half
that size in width, and a third in thickness ; its weight is
nearly a quarter of an ounce.
sions
and weight.
Connec- tions.
Glandu- lar in struc- ture.
ligament by its
Its outer end is
The ovary is connected with the broad
anterior margin, where the vessels enter it.
rounded, and is connected with one of the fimbria at the
mouth of the Fallopian tube ; but the inner extremity is
narrowed, and is attached to the side of the uterus by a
fibrous cord (ligament of the ovary) below the level of both
the Fallopian tube and round ligament.
Structure. The ovary consists of a spongy vascular
tissue or stroma, which contains small vesicles, named
Graafian, and is enclosed within a fibrous tunic. The peritoneum surrounds the whole, except at the attached margin.
Afibrous The special fibrous coat (tunica albuginea) is of some
rounds thickness and of a whitish colour, whence its name, and is
adherent to the contained stroma. Sometimes a yellow spot
(corpus luteum) or some fibrous cicatrices may be seen in
this covering.
coat surstroma.
In the
are small
The Graafian vesicles are small round transparent bodies,
stroma from eight to twenty in number, which vary in size from a
vesicles. pin's head to a pea, and are scattered through the stroma of
Size and the ovary. They are largest in size towards the circum- number; ference of the organ, and sometimes may be seen projecting
coats ;
con- tents.
through the fibrous coat. Each consists of two transparent
coats, external and internal : the outer is a vascular covering ;
and the inner membrane, named ovi capsule, is lined by a
granular epithelial layer (membr. granulosa of Baer). In
the interior is a transparent albuminous fluid in which is
OVARY AND FALLOPIAN TUBE. 585
suspended the minute vesicular ovum, together with molecular granules.
ding ofa
When the Graafian vesicle is matured it bursts on the Shedsurface of the ovary, and the contained ovum escapes into vesicle .
the Fallopian tube. After the shedding of the ovum the
ruptured vesicle gives origin to a yellow substance, corpus Formluteum, which changes finally into a cicatrix.
―
ation of corpus luteum.
Blood- vessels and nerves. - The ovarian artery pierces the ovary Artery ;
at the anterior or attached border, and its branches run in zig- zag
lines through the stroma. The veins of this body, after escaping veins ;
from its substance, form a plexus (pampiniform) near the ovary,
and within the folds of the broad ligament. The nerves are derived nerves.
from the sympathetic on the ovarian and uterine vessels.
FALLOPIAN TUBES. -The tubes thus named convey the Use,
ova from the ovaries to the uterus, and perform for those
secretory organs the same office as the vasa deferentia discharge for the testes in the male.
form .
lated exThe tubes are two in number, one on each side, and are length,
about four inches in length. Each is cord-like at the inner
end, where it is attached to the upper part of the uterus, and
but increases in size towards the outward part, and terminates in a wide extremity, like the mouth of a trumpet. This It is didilated end is fringed and named corpus fimbriatum, and the ternally,
serrations of its circumference are called fimbriæ. If the
fimbriated end is floated out in water, one of the processes and fimmay be seen to be connected with the outer end of the ovary ;
whilst in the centre of them is a groove that leads to the
orifice of the Fallopian tube.
briated.
the tube
the ends
On opening the tube with care the size of the contained size of
space, and the small aperture into the uterus, can be ob- is least at
served. Its canal varies in size at different spots ; the
narrowest part is at the orifice into the uterus, where it
scarcely gives passage to a fine bristle ; towards the outer
end it increases a little, but it is again rather diminished in
diameter at the outer aperture.
-
cular Structure. This excretory tube has the same component A musparts as the uterus with which it is connected, viz. a muscular struc- ture.
586 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Fibres prolongtunic, covered externally by peritoneum, and lined by mucous
membrane.
The muscular coat is formed of an external or longitudiuterus ed from. tinuous nal, andwith of ansimilar internal or circular layer, and both are con- strata in the wall of the uterus.
Mucous The mucous membrane forms some longitudinal folds,
particularly at the outer end. At the inner extremity of
the canal it joins the mucous lining of the uterus, but at the
outer end it is continuous with the peritoneal covering. A
columnar ciliated epithelium covers the surface, as in the
coat
is con- tinuous with pe- ritone- um.
Vessels.
uterus.
The blood- vessels and nerves are furnished from those that supply
the uterus and ovary.
Anatomy of the
given
THE BLADDER, URETHRA, AND RECTUM.
BLADDER.
-
—The peculiarities in the form and size of the
bladder, female bladder have been noticed in the description of the
before. connections of the viscera of the female pelvis ( p. 550.) . For
a notice of its structure the anatomy of the male bladder is
to be referred to (p. 566.).
Prepara- tion of it.
Length of ure- thra ;
size ;
Dissection. — To prepare the bladder, distend it with air, and
remove the peritoneal covering and the cellular membrane from
the muscular fibres.
URETHRA. - The length and the connections of this excretory tube are stated in page 551 .
When the canal is opened along the upper part, its diameter will be found to be rather more than a quarter of an
inch, though it is enlarged and funnel- shaped towards the
neck of the bladder. Near the external aperture there is a
it can be hollow in the floor of the tube. In consequence of not being
dilated. surrounded by any resistant structure the urethra is much
more dilatable than the corresponding passage in the male.
much
Tube like that in the male.
Structure. This tube, like the urethra of the male,
consists of a mucous coat, which is enveloped by a plexus of
blood-vessels, also in one spot by muscular fibre, and is supported by the parts through which it passes.
INTERNAL PELVIC MUSCLES. '587
coat.
floor.
The mucous coat is generally pale till near the outer Mucous
orifice. It is marked by longitudinal folds, one of which in
the floor of the canal resembles the median crest in the male Afold in
urethra (p. 570.) . Around the outer orifice are some mucous
follicles ; towards the inner end are some tubular mucous Follicles
glands, whose apertures are arranged in lines between the glands.
folds of the membrane, and are turned towards the bladder.
A laminar epithelium is spread over the surface, which be- Epithecomes irregular in form (spheroidal) at the bladder.
and
lium.
mucous A submucous stratum of areolar and elastic tissues inter- subvenes between the mucous coat and the vascular and erec- tissue.
tile structure that envelops the canal of the urethra.
like that
male.
RECTUM. -The structure of the rectum is so similar in the Rectum
two sexes, that the student may use the description given of the
with the anatomy of the viscera of the male pelvis ( p. 574.).
Dissection. -The rectum may be prepared for examination by Preparadistending it, and removing the peritoneal covering and the cellular rectum
membrane from it.
-
tion of rectum .
SECTION VII.
INTERNAL MUSCLES AND THE LIGAMENTS OF THE PELVIS.
muscles.
MUSCLES. The two following muscles, pyriformis and obtu- Two
rator internus, are lodged in the cavity of the pelvis at their
origin.
mis.
tion.
The PYRIFORMIS MUSCLE arises within the pelvis by a Pyriforwide fleshy part, and is directed outwards through the great Situasacro-sciatic notch to be inserted into the great trochanter
of the femur. Narrowing in its progress, the muscle has
received its name from its form.
in the In the pelvis the pyriformis is attached by three slips to Origin
the second, third, and fourth pieces of the sacrum, both be- pelvis.
tween the anterior apertures and external to them ; as it
passes from the pelvis it takes origin also from the surface
of the ilium which forms the upper part of the great sacro-
588 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Inser- tion .
Its con- nections with parts around.
Obtura- tor
sciatic notch, and from the great sacro- sciatic ligament.
From this origin the fibres converge to the tendon of insertion into the trochanter. ( See DISSECTION OF THE BUTтоск. ) The anterior surface is in contact with the rectum, with the sacral plexus, and with the sciatic and pudic
branches of the internal iliac vessels ; whilst the opposite
surface rests on the sacrum, and is covered by the great
gluteal muscle outside the pelvis. The upper border is near
the ilium, but separated from it by the gluteal vessels and the
superior gluteal nerve ; and the lower is contiguous to the
coccygeus muscle, only the sciatic and pudic vessels and
nerves intervening.
The OBTURATOR INTERNUS MUSCLE, like the preceding,
muscle has its origin in the pelvis, and its insertion outside the
cavity into the great trochanter of the femur ; but the part
outside the pelvis is almost parallel in direction with the
portion inside.
is bent over
pelvis.
Origin The muscle arises by a broad fleshy attachment from the in the pelvis. inner surface of the obturator membrane, and from the
fibrous arch bounding the notch containing the obturator
vessels and nerve ; from the surface of bone internal to the
membrane ; and from the os ischii between the foramen
and the ischiatic notch, as high as the brim of the pelvis.
Arching The fibres are directed backwards and somewhat downwards,
tendons and end in four or five tendinous pieces, which turn over the
ischium. sharp pulley-like surface ofthe ischium, corresponding to the
space of the small sacro- sciatic notch. Outside the pelvis
Inser- these tendons are blended into one, which is fixed into the
of its
over the
tion.
Part of muscle is in pelvic cavity,
part in perinæal space.
great trochanter : its connections are described with the
dissection of the buttock. By one side the muscle is in contact with the wall of the pelvis and with the obturator membrane ; by the other side with the fascia lining the pelvic
wall, and containing the pudic vessels and nerve towards
the lower border of the obturator. Above the level of the
levator ani, viz. from the lower part of the symphysis pubis
to the spine of the ischium, the muscle corresponds to the
cavity of the pelvis, but below that line, to the ischio-rectal
fossa.
LIGAMENTS OF THE PELVIS. 589
ARTICULATIONS OF THE PELVIS.
ofthe
tions.
The several bones of the pelvis have the following articu- Outline
lations with one another. The sacrum is joined by its base articulato the last lumbar vertebra, and by its apex to the coccyx,
by special ligaments. Laterally, this central bone is united
with the two innominate bones. And the innominate bones
are further connected together in front, as well as to the
sacrum and the spinal column posteriorly.
sacrum SACRO-VERTEBRAL ARTICULATION. The base of the Union of
sacrum is articulated with the last lumbar vertebra by the with last
same ligaments as unite one vertebra to another (p. 354.) and
by one special ligament-the sacro-vertebral.
vertebra.
tion.
Dissection. For the best manner of bringing these different Dissecligaments into view, the dissector must consult what is written
respecting the ligaments ofthe vertebræ.
ments as
verteThe common ligaments between the bodies of the two bones Byligaare an anterior and a posterior ligament, with an intervening in the
fibro-cartilaginous substance. Between the processes are the bræ,
ligamenta subflava, interspinous bands, and capsular ligaments
and synovial membranes for the articular processes.
sacrobral.
The sacro-vertebral ligament is a strong bundle of fibres, and by a
special
that reaches from the under aspect of the tip of the trans- band,
verse process of the last lumbar vertebra, to the lateral part verteof the base of the sacrum. Widening as it descends, the
ligament spreads and joins the fibres in front of the lateral
articulation between the sacrum and the innominate bone.
-
sacrum SACRO-COCCYGEAL ARTICULATION. The sacrum and coc- Union of
cyx are united by a fibro- cartilage, and by an anterior and a and
posterior common ligament.
соссух.
Dissection. -- For these ligaments little dissection is
When the cellular membrane has been removed altogether from
the bones, the ligaments will be apparent.
Dissec- necessary. tion .
The anterior ligament (sacro-coccygeal) consists of a few terior An an and
590 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
a poste- rior liga.
ment,
and a
fibro carti- lage.
Union of the pieces ofthe
fibres that pass between the bones in front of the fibro-cartilage.
The posterior ligament is wide at its attachment to the
lower margin of the orifice of the sacral canal, but narrows
as it descends to be inserted into the coccyx.
The fibro-cartilage resembles that between the vertebræ,
and is attached to the surface of the bones.
When the several pieces of the coccyx are not united by
bone they are connected together by anterior and posterior
coccyx. bands, and by intervening thin fibro-cartilage. But in the
male adult the bones are generally joined by ossific matter.
Union between the sa- crum and ilium.
To dis- sect the liga- ments.
Anterior
and pos- terior liSACRO-ILIAC ARTICULATION ―. The irregular surfaces by
which the sacrum and innominate bones touch, are covered
with cartilage, and maintained in contact by anterior and
posterior ligaments. Inferiorly the bones are further connected, without being in contact, by the strong sacro- sciatic
ligaments.
Dissection. ― It will be necessary to remove the mass of muscle
at the back of the sacrum, on the side on which the innominate
bone remains, to see the posterior ligaments ; but the anterior will
be visible on the removal of some cellular membrane. The great
sacro-sciatic ligament is dissected with the lower limb, and the
small ligament will be brought into view by removing the coccygeus.
The anterior sacro-iliac ligament consists of a few thin
scattered fibres, that are attached to the sacrum and ilium
near their articular surfaces.
The posterior ligaments (sacro-iliac) are much stronger
gaments; than the anterior, and the fibres are collected into bundles.
These ligaments pass from the rough inner surface of the
posterior extremity of the innominate bone to the first two
pieces of the sacrum. One bundle, which is distinct from
distinct the others, and more superficial, is named the oblique or long
rest, posterior ligament ; it is attached to the posterior superior
spinous process of the ilium and descends almost vertically
to the third piece of the sacrum.
one more
than the
with ar.
ticular carti.
lage.
-
Articular cartilage. Between the irregular surfaces of
the bones in this articulation (sacro-iliac symphysis) is a thin
LIGAMENTS OF THE PELVIS. 591
uneven layer of cartilage. This will be seen by forcibly
separating the bones, after the other ligaments are examined.
sciatic
ments
Two sacro-sciatic ligaments pass from the lateral part of Sacrothe sacrum and coccyx to the spine and tuberosity of the ligaischium, across the space at the back of the pelvis, between are two ;
the innominate bone and the sacrum ; by their position they
convert the large sacro- sciatic excavation into two apertures or foramina ( sacro- sciatic), which are described in the
dissection of the buttock. These ligaments are named large
and small.
The large ligament reaches from the side of the sacrum large,
and coccyx to the tuberosity of the ischium ; but it may have
been cut in the dissection of the gluteal region, with which
it is examined.
ments
The small ligament is attached internally by a wide part small .
to the border of the sacrum and coccyx, where it is united
with the origin of the preceding ligament. The fibres are
directed outwards to the spine of the ischium, and are in- Attachserted into it by a narrowed part. Its pelvic surface is
covered by the coccygeus muscle, and its opposite aspect and conby the great sacro- sciatic ligament. Above this ligament,
between it and the bone, is the large sacro-sciatic foramen,
and below it is the small foramen of the same name.
-
nections.
the lateofthe
LIGAMENTS OF THE INNOMINATE BONES. The innomi- Special
liga- nate bones are united in front at the pubic symphysis, by an ments of
interposed fibro- cartilage and special ligaments ; and behind ral bones
they are connected with the transverse process of the last pelvis.
lumbar vertebra by a ligament on each side. In the centre
of the bone is a membranous structure closing the obturator
aperture.
lumbar
bone beThe ilio-lumbar ligament is triangular in form and is lio
divided into fasciculi. Internally it is attached by its apex
to the tip of the transverse process of the last lumbar ver- fixes the
tebra, and externally the fibres spread out, and are inserted hind.
into the crest of the ilium opposite the posterior part of the
iliac fossa. To the upper border of this ligament is attached
part of the fascia lumborum ; its posterior surface is covered
by the erector spinæ, and its anterior by the iliacus muscle.
592 DISSECTION OF THE ABDOMEN.
Obtura- tor memcloses an
in front.
The obturator membrane closes the foramen of the same
brane name, and is composed of fibres crossing in different direcaperture tions. It is attached to the bony margin of the foramen,
except above where the obturator vessels lie, and is connected towards the inner part to the pelvic aspect of the
bone. The surfaces of the ligament give attachment to the
obturator muscles, and branches of the obturator artery and
nerve perforate it.
Union of the Ossa pubis.
Anterior band.
Posteri- or band.
Sub- pubic liga- ment.
Fibro- carti- lage.
PUBIC ARTICULATION (symphysis pubis).-The oval surfaces of the ossa pubis are united by fibro- cartilage, and by
scattered fibres in front, behind, and above the bones. They
are also connected by a strong sub-pubic ligament.
The anterior pubic ligament is formed of different layers
of fibres : the superficial ones are oblique between the bones,
and cross one another, uniting with the aponeurosis of the
external oblique muscle of the abdomen ; but the deeper
fibres are transverse, and are connected with the fibrocartilage.
The posterior and superior ligamentous bands of fibres are
placed as their names express, but are indistinct.
The sub-pubic ligament (ligam. arcuatum) is a strong
triangularly-shaped band below the symphysis, and occupies
the upper part of the pubic arch. Its fibres curve downwards, and are attached on each side to the upper part of the
rami of the pubes. The apex of the ligament touches the
fibro-cartilage, and the base is turned to the membranous
part of the urethra and the muscle around it.
-
Fibro-cartilage. When the articulation of the symphysis
is forcibly separated, each pubic bone will be covered by a
white elastic piece of fibro-cartilage. These pieces consist of
concentric layers ; and when the two are in contact, they
give rise to a mass, which is thicker anteriorly than posteriorly, and widest above and below. One half is connected
with the other by transverse fibres near the anterior part,
and at the upper and lower edges ; but near the centre and
at the posterior part a synovial membrane often intervenes
between them.
ARTERIES OF THE ABDOMEN. 593
ABDOMINAL THE AORTA gives off
1. Phrenic
TABLE OF THE ARTERIES OF THE ABDOMEN.
Coronary { Esophageal gastric.
[ Superior pylo2. cœliac axis *
3. superior mesenteric*
4. middle capsular 5. renal 6. spermatic
· hepatic
7. inferior mesenteric*
8. lumbar 9. middle sacral*
splenic
Pancreatic intestinal ilio-colic right colic middle colic.
[ Left colic sigmoid superior hæmorrhoidal.
ric.
Inferior pyloric gastro duo- denal -
left hepatic branch
right gastro- epiploic pancreatico- duodenal.
right hepatic Cystic.
branch [pancreatic vasa brevia splenic left gastro- i epiploic.
10. common'
iliac.
External iliac ( Epigastric
circumflex iliac
internal iliac
Pubic branch anastomotic -cremasteric .
r Ilio-lumbar lateral sacral
gluteal
sciatic
-Parietal branches
pudic
Lobturator -
Middle hæmor-
· Superficial deep.
Coccygeal comes nervi ischiadici muscular.
Visceral inferior hæmor- rhoidal superficial perinæal transverse perinæal artery ofthe bulb to corpus caver- nosum ldorsal artery.
Articular.
rhoidal visceral vesical branches uterine vaginal.
* The branches marked with an asterisk are single.
૨૨
594 1 VEINS OF THE ABDOMEN.
TABLE OF THE VEINS OF THE ABDOMEN.
1. Common iliac ·
Internal iliac · ·
Hæmorrhoidal plexus.
Vesical
Visceral vesico-prostatic dorsal ofthe branches plexus penis deep veins ofthe penis.
uterine vaginal.
Obturator
parietal branches
pudic
Veins of corpus cavernosum ofthe bulb transverse peri- næal superficial peri- næal inferior hæmor- rhoidal.
coccygeal
ischiadici muscular.
sciatic comes nervi
gluteal.
external iliac Epigastric circumflex iliac.
ilio-lumbar lateral sacral middle sa- cral into
INFERIOR VENA CAVA receives
2. vertebro- lumbar.
3. right spermatic.
4. renal ·
5. right capsular 6. diaphragm- atic
7. vena portæ by means of the hepatic veins
the left.
Left cap- sular left sperma- tic.
Splenic
Splenic branches vasa brevia pancreatic left gastro- epiploic.
inferior me- senteric
Intestinal ilio-colic right colic superior middle colic mesenteric right gastro- epiploic pancreatic .
Left colic sigmoid superior hæmor- rhoidal.
coronary
cystic.
SPINAL NERVES IN THE ABDOMEN. 595
TABLE OF THE SPINAL NERVES IN THE ABDOMEN.
LUMBAR SPINAL NERVES divide into
SACRAL SPINAL NERVES divide into
Posterior branches Internal
external
Muscular.
Muscular
Anterior branches;
of these thefour
cutaneous.
Cutaneous of the ilium Ilio-hypogastric hypogastric branch.
Ilio-inguinal -{ the groin. To integuments of
external cutane- To integuments ous ofthe thigh .
Genital branch first end in the genito- crural -{ crural branch.
LUMBAR PLEX- Us*, which sup- plies Branches the pelvis inside
anterior-crural -
To the iliacus muscle.
To the femoral artery.
Branches outsides are noticed in the the pelvis
obturator Accessory
}
thigh.
Other offsets are described in the thigh.
Posterior branches, Muscular and unite together and give off cutaneous fila- ments.
Branches inside the pelvis
Visceral to levator ani to obturator inter- nus to the pyriformis
Inferior hæmorThe anterior branches of the four superior unite with the lumbo-sacral in the SACRAL PLEX- ust, andfurnish
branches out- side the pelvis
pudic
inferior hæmor- rhoidal (some- times).
To the superior ]
gemellus to the inferior ge- mellus and the quadratus articular small sciatic great sciatic
* The lumbo-sacral gives off the superior gluteal nerve.
† The other nerves are described at p. 559.
rhoidal superficial peri- næal-(anterior and posterior)
muscular to the bulb dorsal of the penis .
these are described in the thigh.
QQ 2
596 NERVES OF THE ABDOMEN.
TABLE OF THE SYMPATHETIC NERVE OF THE ABDOMEN.
Diaphragmatic
coeliac
SOLAR PLEXUS * or prevertebral centre of the abdomen,. furnishes the follow.
ing plexuses :
superior mesenteric
supra-renal renal
·
· ·
aortic ·
Coronary plexus
hepatic ·
splenic
Pyloric right gastro-epiploic gastro-duodenal Lcystic.
Left gastro-epiploic -{pancreatic.
Offsets to small and large intestine.
Spermatic plexus, filaments to the.
- Hypogastric.
HYPOGASTRIC PLEX- ust, ends inthe pel- vic plexus on each side, which gives the following plexuses :
spermatic Offsets to the large intestine inferior mesenteric -{ Superior hæmorrhoidal.
Inferior hæmorrhoidal
vesical -
uterine vaginal.
Prostatic cavernous deferential to vesiculæ seminales.
To the lumbar and sacral External branches -{ spinal nerves.
GANGLIATED CORD of the sympathetic in the abdomen sup- plies. internal
Great splanchnic nerves *This receives' part of small splanchnic Loffset of pneumo- gastric.
To aortic plexus to hypogastric plexus to join around middle sacral artery between the cords on the coccyx,
in the ganglion impar.
The aortic plexus This is joined filaments from the lumbar above by ·
ganglia.
PNEUMO-GASTRIC NERVE IN THE ABDOMEN.
Right ·
Pneumo-gastric
Cleft ·
Coronary branches to the back of the stomach filaments to join the cæliac and splenic plexuses.
Coronary branches to the front of the stomach and to the hepatic plexus.
CHAPTER IX.
DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
SECTION I.
THE FRONT OF THE THIGH.
ALL the parts described in Section I. are to be examined Direcbefore the time for turning the body has arrived.
Position. -
tions.
of the During the dissection of the front of the Position
thigh the body should lie on the back, with a block of a body.
suitable size beneath the pelvis, and the lower limbs should
hang over the end of the dissecting table. Each limb is to
be rotated outwards, so as to make evident a hollow at the
upper part of the thigh, and is to be supported in a half bent
position by means of a stool beneath the foot.
Surface marking. -Before any of the integument is re- Objects
moved from the limb, the student is to observe the chief on the
markings and eminences on the surface of the thigh.
surface.
limiting
above.
The limit between the thigh and the abdomen is marked Promion the outer side by the convexity of the crest of the inno- nences
minate bone, which subsides behind in the sacrum and the thigh
coccyx ; and on the inner side by the projection of the os
pubis, from which a line of bone (rami of the pubis and
ischium) may be traced backwards along the inner and upper
part of the limb to the tuberosity ofthe ischium. Whilst in
front the line of division is indicated by the firm band of
Poupart's ligament intervening between the crest of the
ilium and the pubes. On the anterior aspect of the thigh,
and close to Poupart's ligament, is a slight hollow, corre- pa's
sponding to the triangular space of this part, in which the space.
Hollow of ScarQ Q 3
598 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Groove over femoral
Position
trochan.
ter.
large vessels of the limb are contained ; and extending thence
obliquely along the inner side of the limb, is a slight depression marking the situation of the femoral artery, where
it is covered by the sartorius muscle. But the position of
artery. this arterial trunk may be indicated on the surface by a line
from the centre of Poupart's ligament to the inner side of
the patella. On the outer side of the thigh, about four
of great inches below the crest of the ilium and the same distance
from its anterior part, the student will be able to recognise
easily the well marked projection of the great trochanter,
which is so valuable a guide to the surgeon in ascertaining
the existence of fracture of the upper part of the femur, or
the dislocation of the head of that bone from its articular
Head of cavity. In a thin body the head of the femur may be felt
femur. by rotating the limb inwards and outwards, whilst the thumb
of one hand is placed in the hollow below Poupart's ligament, and the fingers behind the great trochanter.
the
Bony
ces of knee.
Patella.
Conthe fe- mur.
At the knee the outline of the several bones that enter eminen- into the formation of the joint may be traced with ease.
Thus, in front of the joint, when it is half bent, is the
rounded prominent patella, which is firmly fixed whilst the
limb is kept in the same position, but is moved with great
freedom when the joint is extended so as to relax the muscles that are inserted into it. On each side of the patella is
dyles of the projection of the condyle of the femur, but that on the
inner side is the largest. If the fingers are passed along the
sides of the patella whilst the joint is half bent, they will
be conducted by the condyles of the femur to the tuberosities
sities of of the head of the tibia, and will recognise a slight hollow
between the two. Behind the joint is a slight depression
over the situation of the ham or popliteal space, whose firm
lateral boundaries are formed chiefly by the tendons of the
flexor muscles of the leg (ham-strings) .
Tuberothe tibia.
The ham be- hind.
Take up
at the
---- Dissection. With the position of the limb the same as before
the skin directed, the student begins the dissection with the examination of
top of the the subcutaneous cellular layer and its vessels ; and he is to be thigh.
careful, whilst making the cuts in the skin, not to sink the scalpel
too deeply. At first the integument is to be reflected only from
the hollow on the front ofthe thigh close below Poupart's ligament.
SUPERFICIAL FASCIA. 599
To raise the skin from this part an incision of about four inches in
length is to be made from the spine of the pubes along the inner
border of the thigh : from its lower end another cut is to be directed
outwards across the front of the limb to the outer aspect ; and
from its upper end the knife is to be carried along the line of
Poupart's ligament as far as the crest of the innominate bone.
The piece of skin included by the lines above stated is to be raised
and turned outwards, without taking with it the subcutaneous fat
The superficial fascia now seen cial is only part of the struc- Superfi
ture that forms a general investment for the limb, and is fascia,
constructed of a network of areolar tissue, with fat or adi- how formed ;
pose tissue amongst the meshes thereof. As a part of the
common covering, it will be found continuous with that of
the contiguous regions, so that it may be followed inwards to
the scrotum or labium, and upwards on the abdomen. Its
thickness varies in different bodies, according to the quantity thickof fat deposited in it ; and at the upper part of the thigh it varies ;
is divided into two strata (superficial and deep) by some it is
cutaneous vessels and inguinal glands. The superficial of into two
the two layers is now apparent by the removal of the skin, vessels.
but its connections will be made more evident after the following dissection.
ness
divided
strata by
Dissection. To reflect the superficial stratum of the fascia, use To raise
the same incisions as those in the skin ; and begin the separation the su- perficial from the subjacent structures at the lower part, where the large stratum.
saphenous vein, and a condensed or membranous appearance on
the under surface, will mark the depth of the stratum. The handle
of the scalpel may be advantageously employed in raising the
faseia along the middle line of the limb ; but, where vessels and
glands are not found, viz. , along the outer and inner borders of
the thigh, the separation of the superficial fascia into two layers cannot be made.
taneous layer of the
The subcutaneous layer of this fascia decreases in thick- Subcuness near Poupart's ligament, becoming more fibrous at the
same spot ; and on its under aspect is a smooth and mem- fascia
branous surface. It conceals the superficial vessels and inguinal glands, and is separated by these from Poupart's is not
ligament, so that it is unconnected to that band as it passes with united
QQ 4
600 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Pou- upwards to the abdomen, and is readily moved on it either
upwards or downwards.
part's liga.
ment.
The suvessels in the fascia to
Dissection. - The inguinal glands and the superficial vessels are
perficial next to be laid bare by the removal of the surrounding fat, but
the student is to be careful not to destroy the deeper, very thin
be seen. layer of the superficial fascia which is beneath them, chiefly to the
inner side of the centre of the limb. Three sets of vessels will be
found in this dissection : one set (artery and vein) are directed
inwards to the pubes, and named external pudic ; another, upwards
over Poupart's ligament, viz. , the superficial epigastric ; and the
third, or the superficial circumflex iliac, appear near the outer
border of the limb. The large vein in the middle line of the limb
to which the branches converge, is the internal saphenous. A
small nerve, the ilio - inguinal, is to be sought on the inner side of
the saphenous vein, and close to the pubes ; and one of the terminal
branches of the genito- crural nerve may be found a little outside
the vein. Some of the small lymphatic vessels may be traced from
gland to gland.
The arteries SUPERFICIAL VESSELS. —The small cutaneous arteries that
from the are now laid bare are the highest branches of the femoral
artery, and are furnished by that trunk as soon as it appears
in the thigh.
femoral.
Veins join the saphe- nous.
One ex- ternal
artery ;
They pierce the deep fascia of the limb ( fascia lata), and
are distributed in the integuments. A vein accompanies
each artery, having the same name as its companion vessel,
and ends in the upper part of the saphenous vein ; but the
description of these veins will be given in a subsequent
page.
The external pudic artery (superior) crosses the spermatic cord
pudic in its course inwards, and ends in the integument of the penis and
scrotum, anastomosing in those parts with offsets of the internal
another pudic artery. Another external pudic branch (inferior) pierces
the the fascia lata at the inner border of the thigh, and ramifies also
in the scrotum. In the female these branches supply the labium
pudendi.
beneath
fascia.
Super- ficial epi- The superficial epigastric artery passes over Poupart's ligament
gastric . to the lower part of the abdomen ( p. 418.) , and anastomoses with
branches of the deep epigastric artery.
Super.
ficial iliac.
The superficial circumflex iliac artery is the smallest of the
three branches, and appears commonly on the outer border of the
SUPERFICIAL VESSELS. 601
thigh, near the crest of the ilium, where it is distributed in the
integument.
glands ;
receive
The superficial inguinal glands are arranged in two lines ; Inguinal
one set lies across the thigh, near Poupart's ligament, and two sets,
the other along the side of the saphenous vein. In the
lower or longitudinal collection the glands are larger than which
in the other, and receive the lymphatic vessels from the different
surface of the lower limb ; whilst the upper or transverse tics .
set are joined by the lymphatics of the penis and of the
lower part of the abdomen. The glands vary much in both
number and size, and not unfrequently those by the side of
the vein are united together.
lymphathe deep
of the
ficial
Dissection. -Separate now the deeper layer of the superficial Raise
fascia from the subjacent strong fascia (fascia lata) , using the same stratum
incisions as for the detaching of the subcutaneous stratum, except superthat the lower cut across the thigh is not to be made so far down. fascia.
The handle of the scalpel is to be employed in the separation, and
the dissector is to endeavour to avoid cutting the nerves and
vessels. Internal to the saphenous vein a thin membrane can be
easily raised, so as to expose the margin of an aperture in the
fascia lata (saphenous) that is concealed by it, but external to that
vessel there scarcely exists a continuous layer distinct from the
fascia lata.
part of
perficial
sapheThe deeper layer of the superficial fascia is a very thin Deep
membraniform stratum, which is most apparent near Pou- the su
part's ligament, and on the inner side of the saphenous vein. fascia
About one inch below the ligament it conceals the large
opening in the fascia lata, that transmits the saphenous vein
and some of the ducts of the lymphatic glands. As it
stretches across the opening it is connected to the circum- covers
ference internally by a loose cellular membrane, but ex- nous
ternally by firm fibrous bands ; and it is also connected with
the side of the loose sheath of the femoral vessels that
appears through that aperture. The part of the fascia that
is placed over the opening for the saphenous vein is perforated by many small apertures for the transmission of the
ducts of the glands, and is sometimes named cribriform and is
fascia, from its sieve-like appearance. In a femoral hernia named
opening,
thus
602 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
form cribri- the part of this deep layer of the fascia that is over the
opening referred to, is projected forwards by the protruding
gut, and forms one of the coverings.
fascia.
To take the skin Dissection. Now the student has observed the disposition of
from the the superficial fascia near Poupart's ligament, he may proceed to front of the thigh,
and fol. low saphe- nous vein .
Cuta- neous
front of thigh,
examine the remainder of this subcutaneous covering of the thigh,
together with the vessels and nerves in it. To raise the skin from
the front of the thigh, make a cut along the centre of the limb,
continuing the same over the knee-joint to rather below the
tuberosity of the tibia, and at its extremity make a transverse
incision, which is to reach farthest on the inner side. The saphenous vein is first to be traced out as far as the skin is reflected,
but in removing the tissue from it the student should be careful
of branches of the internal cutaneous nerve that lie along it.
- The cutaneous nerves of the front of the thigh will be found in
nerves of the fat in the following positions : On the outer margin is the
external cutaneous nerve ; in the centre are the branches of the
middle cutaneous nerve ; whilst at the inner margin lie the ramifications of the internal cutaneous nerve, one small offset appearing
near the upper part of the thigh, one or more about the middle,
and one of the terminal branches (anterior) about the lower third.
On the inner side of the knee three other offsets of cutaneous
nerves are to be looked for : one is a branch of the great saphenous, which is directed to the front of the patella ; another is
the trunk of the great saphenous nerve, which lies by the side of
the vein of the same name, close to the lower part of the space
now dissected ; and the third is a terminal branch (inner) of the
internal cutaneous nerve, that is close behind the preceding, and
communicates with it. Small cutaneous arteries accompany the
and on side of the knee.
nerves.
Super- ficial veins.
Internal saphe- nous vein in thigh
SUPERFICIAL VEINS. - All the veins on the anterior and
inner aspects of the thigh are collected into one trunk, that
is named saphenous from the readiness with which it is
detected on the surface.
The internal saphenous vein is the cutaneous vessel of
the inner side and front of the lower limb, and extends from
the foot to the upper part of the thigh, where it joins the
femoral vein. In the part of its course now seen the vessel,
inferiorly, is somewhat behind the knee-joint ; but as it
CUTANEOUS NERVES OF THE THIGH. 603
fascia
join the
joining
ascends to its termination it is directed along the inner side
and the front of the thigh. Near Poupart's ligament it pierces
pierces the fascia lata by a special opening named saphenous, lata to
and enters the deep vein of the limb. Superficial branches femoral.
join it both externally and internally, but some deep veins veins
likewise open into it ; and near Poupart's ligament three it
superficial veins, corresponding to the arteries in that situation, viz. superficial pudic, epigastric, and circumflex iliac,
terminate in it. Most frequently the veins of the inner side may
and back of the thigh are united into one branch that enters large
the saphenous trunk near the aperture in the fascia lata ; at the
and sometimes those on the outer side of the thigh are the thigh.
collected together in a similar way, so as to give origin to
three large veins on the front of the thigh at its upper
part.
form
trunks
top of
cutane- Some unnamed cutaneous arteries are distributed to the integu- Other
ments along with the nerves ; and the superficial branch of the ous aranastomotic artery (p. 619.) accompanies the saphenous nerve.
teries.
neous nerves.
CUTANEOUS NERVES. -The cutaneous nerves of the thigh Cutaare derived from branches of the lumbar plexus (p. 528.),
and are distributed in greater abundance on the inner than
on the outer margin of the limb.
The ilio -inguinal nerve is small in size, and reaches the surface Ilio- in- by passing through the external abdominal ring ; it supplies the guinal
scrotum, and ends in the contiguous part of the thigh, internal to is near
the saphenous vein.
scrotum .
crural
front of
the midThe crural branch of the genito- crural nerve pierces the fascia Genitolata near Poupart's ligament, and rather external to the line of the is on
femoral artery. After the nerve has become superficial, it com- thigh
municates with the middle cutaneous nerve, and extends on the as far as
anterior aspect of the thigh as far as midway between the knee and dle.
the pelvis. Occasionally this branch is of large size, and, reaching
the outer side of the limb, takes the place of branches of the ex- ternal cutaneous nerve.
cutane- The external cutaneous nerve is distributed on the outer aspect External
of the limb. At first it is contained in a prominent ridge of the ous
fascia lata on the outer margin of the thigh, where it divides into
an anterior and a posterior branch. The posterior branch is soon is spent
subdivided into two or three others, which arch backwards, sup- outer on the
604 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB,
the
two branch- es.
part of plying the integuments of the outer part of the thigh as low as the
thigh by middle, and the highest offsets are crossed by branches of the last dorsal nerve. The anterior branch extends to the outer surface of
the thigh in its lower half. It appears on the surface of the fascia
lata, about four inches from Poupart's ligament, and as it is continued to the knee, it distributes branches laterally, but the most
numerous and the largest in size towards the outer and posterior surfaces. Near the knee it sometimes communicates with the
branch of the great saphenous nerve.
Middle
ous
The middle cutaneous nerve is an offset from the anterior crural
cutane to the centre of the anterior part of the thigh, and divides into
two branches that may pierce the fascia at separate spots. The
nerve is transmitted through the fascia lata about three inches
from Poupart's ligament, and its branches are continued along the
front of the thigh to the knee, where it communicates with the
offset of the great saphenous nerve over the patella. In the superficial fascia this nerve is united with the genito-crural and internal
cutaneous nerves. In some instances the nerve is inclined to the
inner side of the knee, and is substituted for a branch (anterior) of
the following nerve.
is on front of the thigh,
and reaches theknee.
Internal cutane- ous
The internal cutaneous nerve is derived from the anterior crural
trunk, like the preceding, and is furnished to all the inner side of
is divided the thigh. It is divided into two branches (anterior and inner)
that perforate the fascia in separate places.
into two.
The an- terior branch
a. The anterior branch becomes cutaneous in the lower third of
the thigh in the line of the inner intermuscular septum, along or
somewhat behind which it is continued to the knee. This branch
extends is distributed in the integument of the lower third of the thigh at
alongthe its inner part, and in that over the patella and the inner side of
septum. the knee-joint, and is united with the branch of the internal
to knee
The inner
saphenous nerve. Occasionally this part of the nerve is found
below the level of the joint in the position of the branch to the
patella from the internal saphenous, whose place it takes ; and in
that case it is larger than usual, and is joined by a small offset from
the saphenous nerve.
b. The inner branch perforates the fascia at the inner side of the
ends in knee behind the internal saphenous nerve, with which it communicates, and furnishes offsets to the lower part of the thigh and to the
upper half ofthe leg on the inner surface.
upper part of the leg.
Other small Other small cutaneous branches come either from the trunk, or from
the two final branches of the internal cutaneous nerve, and appear by the twigs to inner side of the saphenous vein, after piercing the fascia lata. One or two
THE FASCIA LATA. 605
part of the come into view near the upper part of the vein, and reach as far as the
middle of the thigh ; and one, of larger size than the rest, appears thigh.
where the others cease, and extends as far as the knee. These cutaneous
offsets usually communicate.
saphe The internal saphenous nerve is also a branch of the anterior Internal
crural, and is continued to the foot, but only a little part of the nous
nerve is now visible. The nerve pierces the fascia on the inner appears by the
side of the knee, and after communicating with the inner branch knee and
of the internal cutaneous, gives forwards some offsets to the front the leg.
of the knee, and then accompanies the saphenous vein to the leg
and foot.
passes to
from it One branch of the saphenous nerve (patellar) appears on the Abranch
surface of the fascia, higher on the side of the joint than the trunk over the patella from which it springs. It is soon joined by the internal cutaneous
nerve, and ends in many branches over the patella ; its ramifications communicate with offsets from the external and middle cutaneous nerves, and from the trunk of the saphenous nerve, and
form an interlacement ( plexus patella) over the joint. When forms
this branch is small its place is taken by the internal cutaneous a plexus
nerve.
Dissection.
with others.
the surthe
fine
-Let the fat be now removed from the surface of Clean
the fascia lata, without however destroying the cutaneous nerves, face of
and let the inguinal glands be likewise taken away. At the upper fascia
part of the thigh the student should endeavour to define the mar- lata,
gin of the saphenous opening by detaching the bands of fibrous and detissue that pass from the outer side of that aperture to be blended saphewith the superficial fascia. After those bands are broken through, opening.
the handle of the scalpel being chiefly used for the purpose, the
outer semilunar margin of the saphenous opening comes into view,
but the student is not to expect it to be so defined as it is represented in drawings.
nous
lata
rounds
The fascia lata is the special deep aponeurosis of the Fascia
thigh which surrounds the limb, giving it a firm sheath, and sursends inwards septa between the different muscles. This limb;
membranous investment is of a bluish white colour, and of
very variable thickness, though it is always stronger on the strength
outer than on the inner aspect of the limb, in consequence
of the insertion into it of the gluteus maximus and tensor
vaginæ femoris muscles. In fat bodies it is sometimes so
slight as to be taken away with the superficial fascia.
varies.
Numerous apertures exist in the fascia for the trans- Aper-
606 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
"
it.
Pro- cesses
the mustures in mission of the cutaneous nerves and vessels, of which the
largest is the opening near Poupart's ligament for the
passage of the internal saphenous vein. Most of the probetween cesses, prolonged from the under surface, form fibrous
cles. sheaths for the several muscles. But some of these are
larger than the rest, and are named specially intermuscular
septa ; thus two, outer and inner, are fixed to the femur, so
as to limit on each side the extensors of the leg, and a third
intervenes between the adductors and the flexors of the leg.
The position of these partitions is marked on the surface by
lines somewhat whiter than the rest of the membrane.
Con.
nected with
At the upper part of the thigh the fascia is fixed to the
prominent bony parts of the pelvis. Around the circumference of the limb it will be found connected externally with
thigh. the crest of the ilium ; in the middle line behind with the
bone at upper part of
ence at
lower end of the sacrum and with the coccyx ; internally
with the ramus of the ischium and with the os pubis ; and in
front with Poupart's ligament, between the pubes and the
Differ- iliac crest. At the lower part of the thigh the fascia lata
passes uninterruptedly to the leg behind the knee-joint, but
in front of the articulation it is blended with an expansion
from the extensor muscles, and is continued over the patella,
but separated by a bursa, to be inserted into the heads ofthe
tibia and fibula.
lower part.
Cover the fascia except above.
nous
situaform ,
Dissection. The flaps of skin that were removed from the front
of the thigh to follow the cutaneous vessels and nerves are now to
be replaced, and the saphenous opening is to be next looked to.
Saphe- The saphenous opening in the fascia lata receives its apopening ; pellation from transmitting the saphenous vein. The aperture
tion, is oval in form, and is situate rather to the inner side of the
and size. middle line of the thigh ; it measures about half an inch in
width and one inch and a half in length. Its upper part
(superior cornu) is at Poupart's ligament ; and its lower part
(inferior cornu) is distant from that structure about one inch
and a half, and presents a well defined margin.
Inner margin is not sharp ;
On the inner side the opening is deficient in a firm or
sharp border, for the fascia that constructs it at this spot is
stretched over a flat subjacent muscle (pectineus), and is
THE SAPHENOUS OPENING. 607
firm and
lunar,
arches to
Gimbergament.
posterior to the level of the femoral vessels, beneath which it
lies. But the outer side is much stronger, and has a semilunar border, whose concavity is turned downwards and
inwards. This outer edge is named, from its shape, falciform outer is
border or margin of the saphenous opening (falciform process semiof Burns) ; it is superficial to the femoral vessels, and is
connected by fibrous bands to their sheath, and to the deep
layer of the superficial fascia. If the outer edge is traced and
upwards, it will be found to arch over the femoral vessels to join
their inner side, and to be blended with the base of Gimber- nat's linat's ligament (part of the insertion of Poupart's ligament) ;
its upper end, or that internal to the vessels, viz. about one
fourth, has been known as the femoral ligament. The rigidity of the margin of the saphenous opening is much in- Tensefluenced by the position of the limb ; for if the finger is the
placed beneath the upper part of the falciform border whilst depends
the limb is moved in different directions, the dissector will position
perceive that this band is most unyielding when the limb is limb.
extended and rotated outwards, and most relaxed when the
thigh is flexed and turned in the opposite direction.
ness of
margins
on the
ofthe
transthrough
Through the lower part of the saphenous opening the Parts
saphenous vein and the ducts of the inguinal glands are mitted
transmitted ; and through the upper part, close to the falci- the
form edge, the femoral hernia projects from the canal by
which it leaves the cavity of the abdomen.
opening.
tion of the fasthe top of the
From the importance of a knowledge of the form, situation, Descripand construction of the saphenous opening anatomists have
been led to describe with much minuteness the fascia lata in cia at
the upper third of the thigh. For instance, they have given thigh,
different names to the fascia on opposite sides ofthe opening,
as if there was a distinct structure in each place ; thus the
piece external to the opening has been called iliac part of the
fascia lata, from its attachment to the os ilii ; whilst that on
the inner side, which is fixed to the os pubis, has been named
the pubic part of the same fascia, and has been described as
passing outwards over the pectineus muscle to be blended
with that covering the psoas. Lastly, the opening itself is and of
said to be formed by the splitting of the fascia lata into the form- the
608 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
ation of two parts above mentioned ; and the attachments and destiopening. nation of these are specially detailed.
the
Anato- my of
concernfemoral
Parts concerned in femoral hernia. -Besides the saphe- parts nous opening, which is the aperture of exit of a femoral
ed in a hernia from the canal through which it leaves the abdomen,
hernia. the dissector has to study the under- mentioned parts to
obtain a knowledge of the structures amongst which the
hernial protrusion is situate, viz. the crural arch and Gimbernat's ligament, the crural sheath, the crural canal and
the crural ring, together with a partition between the thigh
and the abdomen.
Dissec- tion to see a
sheath around
vessels.
Dissection. To examine Poupart's ligament and a loose sheath
of membrane that surrounds the femoral vessels, reflect the piece
of the fascia lata that forms the falciform border of the saphenous
femoral opening by the following incisions. One cut should be begun
close to Poupart's ligament, near the edge of the falciform border,
and be carried outwards parallel to the ligament for one inch and
a half ; the other should be directed obliquely downwards, from
the termination of the first to a little below the inferior cornu of
the opening. When the fascia is turned inwards and some fat
removed, the tube of membrane (crural sheath) is brought into
view as it descends beneath Poupart's ligament. With the handle
of the scalpel separate carefully the sheath from the fascia lata
beneath, and from the ligament in front of it ; and define Gimbernat's ligament on the inner side of the sheath, to which the
upper end ofthe falciform border is united.
The crural arch ;
ments ;!
Poupart's ligament, or the crural arch, is a firm band of
the aponeurosis of the external oblique muscle of the abattach- domen, which stretches from the front of the crest of the
ilium (anterior superior spinous process) to the os pubis (p.
form ; 423.). When viewed from the surface of the body, the
direction of the arch is not straight between its bony attachments, but is curved downwards towards the thigh. Its
outer half is oblique as long as the fascia lata remains uncut ;
but its inner half is almost horizontal, and widens as it approaches the pubes, where it is inserted into the spine, as
well as into the pectineal line of that bone for about an inch,
forming Gimbernat's ligament. The space beneath the
crural arch, between it and the innominate bone, is closed
parts closing hollow beneath .
CRURAL OR FEMORAL SHEATH. 609
by parts passing from the abdomen to the thigh, and is larger
in the female than in the male. The outer half of the interval
is filled by the fleshy psoas and iliacus muscles, to which the
arch is closely bound by fascia, so as almost to prevent any
protrusion of intestine at this spot ; and the inner half of the
space is occupied by the femoral vessels and their sheath.
nat's li
is part
insertion
part's.
tion,
nections.
Gimbernat's ligament. -Between the posterior border of Gimberthe crural arch and the pubes is a piece of the tendinous in- gament
sertion of that structure into the bone, which is named Gim- of the
bernat's ligament. When Poupart's ligament is in its natural of Pouposition, this piece of the tendon appears triangular in form, Form,
and about one inch in length. Its apex is at the spine of the situapubes, and its base, which is in contact with the femoral and consheath, is blended with the fascia lata, the part that forms
the outer margin of the saphenous opening. By one margin
(anterior) it is continuous with the crural arch, and by the
opposite it is fixed to the pectineal line of the pubes. In the
erect position of the body the ligament is almost horizontal,
and one surface is directed upwards to the abdominal cavity,
whilst the other is turned towards the thigh. On forcibly
raising the crural arch, the continuation of Gimbernat's
ligament with that band will plainly appear.
sheath.
nections;
Thefemoral or crural sheath is a loose tube of membrane Crural
surrounding the femoral vessels, that has the form of a
funnel sloped unequally on the sides. The wide part of the Shape
tube is turned upwards, and the narrow part ceases about
two inches below Poupart's ligament, by being blended with and conthe common cellular sheath of the blood-vessels. Its outer
border is nearly straight, and is perforated by the genitocrural nerve. Its inner border is oblique, and is pierced by
the lymphatics and the saphenous vein ; it is this part of the
sheath that is seen through the saphenous opening, and is
connected to both the falciform margin and the superficial
fascia. In front of the sheath and behind it is the fascia
lata of the thigh. The tube of membrane is derived in this how
way from the fascia that line the abdomen ; the anterior
part is prolonged beneath Poupart's ligament into the fascia
transversalis, and the posterior half is continued into the
fascia iliaca (p. 444.).
formed.
R R
610 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Deep '
crural Across the front of the crural sheath and below the arch
arch. of Poupart's ligament, is a thickened band of the fascia
transversalis, which has been named deep crural arch. This
band has been supposed to occasion sometimes the stricture
of the subjacent gut in a femoral hernia. A notice of it is
given with the description of the fascia transversalis (p. 433.).
Open the crural sheath.
Contents of the
Dissection. The student should open the sheath by an incision
across the front, and should raise the loose anterior part with
hooks. A piece of the cellular investment of the femoral vessels
is to be cut out over the situation of each, and two thin partitions
are to be defined ; one of these is internal to the vein separating
it from a gland, the other is between the vein and artery. A cellular stratum may be seen to be placed over the upper aperture
of the sheath, which closes it towards the abdomen.
The interior of the crural sheath is occupied by the femosheath. ral vessels, and is divided into three compartments by two
partitions that pass from the front to the back, one being
internal to the femoral vein, and the other between the two
Space large vessels. In the outer compartment is the femoral
artery, close to the side of the sheath ; in the middle one is
the femoral vein ; and in the inner one is only a lymphatic
gland. The femoral vessels are further surrounded by their
own cellular covering, which is distinct from the crural or
femoral sheath now described.
divided into three parts.
The in- ner of
spaces is
and parts
it.
Crural canal.
-
— This term is applied to the innermost
the three space in the interior of the crural sheath, which is occupied
the cru- by a lymphatic gland. Its extent is about a quarter of an ral canal .' inch, for it reaches only from the base of Gimbernat's ligament to the upper cornu of the saphenous opening. AnExtent terior to the sheath at this part are Poupart's ligament and
around the upper end of the falciform margin of the saphenous
opening, whilst behind it is the pectineus muscle, covered by
fascia lata. On the inner side is Gimbernat's ligament, and
on the outer side is situate the femoral vein. The aperture
by which it communicates above with the
abdomen is named the crural ring. Through this canal or
space the intestine in femoral hernia passes from the abdomen.
cavity of the
FEMORAL HERNIA. 611
term
canal
Some writers apply the term crural canal to the whole of the Definispace in the interior of the crural or femoral sheath, and describe tion of
therefore the femoral vessels as being in the crural canal ; but the crural
appellation is here confined, as above stated, to the space inside here em- ployed.
the sheath which is internal to the vessels, and through which a
piece of intestine descends.
* ring.
Situaform .
tures
The crural or femoral ring is the upper opening of the Crural
crural canal towards the abdominal cavity.* It is on a level
with the base of Gimbernat's ligament, and is larger in the tion and
female than in the male. It is oval in shape ; and its
greatest measurement is from side to side, in which direction
it equals about half an inch. The structures that surround structhe opening are nearly the same as those bounding the crural around.
canal, viz. in front is the crural arch with the spermatic cord
in the male, and the round ligament in the female ; behind is
the os pubis, covered by fascia lata ; on the outside is the
femoral vein ; and on the inside is Gimbernat's ligament.
The position of the several vessels along the sides of the ring
is stated at p. 445.
-
septum ;
how
Septum crurale. The small part of the subperitoneal Crural
layer of fat, which is placed over the opening of the crural position :
ring, has been named crural septum by M. Cloquet, from its formed.
position between the thigh and the abdomen. The situation
of the partition is now visible, but its characters are ascertained in the dissection of the abdomen (p. 444.).
After having learnt the anatomy of the parts in the thigh
amongst which a femoral hernia lies, the student is prepared
to understand the course this takes, the coverings it receives,
and the seat of its stricture.
-
hernia.
FEMORAL HERNIA. A protrusion of the intestine into Femoral
the thigh beneath Poupart's ligament constitutes this kind of
hernia. In this affection, the gut descends always in the Definifemoral or crural sheath, and commonly on the inner side of
* Gimbernat used the name crural ring, and Mr. Lawrence proposes
to call it femoral aperture. Might not the nomenclature employed be made to resemble more that used in describing inguinal hernia, by
calling this the internal crural aperture, and the saphenous opening the external crural aperture ?
tion ;
RR 2
612 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
course ;
the vein, though occasionally on the outer side of the
artery.
Course. The course of the intestine from the abdomen
first ver- to the surface of the body is vertical, at first, through the tical, crural ring and along the crural canal as far as the saphenous
next directed
wards,
opening, but it here changes its direction, and comes forfor- wards. If a larger piece of the gut is protruded the hernia
and then again alters its direction and ascends on the abdomen, almost upwards. parallel to the first part of its course, in consequence of its
means it
progress being easier upwards than downwards on the front
of the thigh. A slight consideration of the winding course
of the hernia will suggest to the dissector the direction in
which attempts should be made to replace the intestine in
By what the abdominal cavity. With the view ofmaking the bowel
is to be retrace its course, it will be necessary first to press it down pushed back. towards the saphenous opening, and afterwards backwards
and upwards towards the crural canal and ring. It will be
likewise evident, from the previous dissection, that the limb
should be raised and rotated inwards during the manipulation, in order that the margin of the saphenous opening, and
the other tissues may be relaxed.
Cover- ings for
from the
neum,
crural septum,
sheath,
cribri- form fascia,
Coverings.
- In the course above specified the intestine
the gut is clothed by the following structures that are elongated and
pushed before it : they are here enumerated from within
outwards, in the order in which they are received. First is
perito- a covering of the peritoneum lining the abdomen ; next one
from the crural septum across the crural ring ; after this crural comes a stratum from the femoral sheath, unless the hernia
bursts through an aperture in its side ; still farther out is
a layer of the cribriform fascia ; and, lastly, there is an investment of the superficial fat or fascia, together with the
skin. From without inwards the order of the different
The co- strata will be reversed. The coverings may vary, or be conmay be joined in different degrees according to the condition of the
hernia ; for in some instances, as above explained, the prolongation from the femoral sheath is wanting ; and in an
old hernia the covering derived from the septum crurale is
usually united with that from the crural sheath, so as to form
one layer, the fascia propria of Sir A. Cooper. In general,
fat and skin.
verings
altered.
SCARPA'S TRIANGULAR SPACE. 613
surgeon
find so
the anastricin an operation for the relief of the strangulated bowel, the The
surgeon, after dividing the subcutaneous fat, may be able to does not
recognise but little of the coverings enumerated by ana- many as
tomists until he meets with that of the sub-peritoneal fat, tomist.
or the septum crurale.
Seat ofstricture. -The strangulation of a femoral hernia Place of
is situate either at the crural ring or at the saphenous ture.
opening. If it is in the former spot it is occasioned by the
base of Gimbernat's ligament, and will be relieved by an incision into that structure, of a few lines in extent, with the
knife directed horizontally. If the constriction is in the How it
lower opening, it will be removed by dividing upwards and removinwards the firm band of the falciform margin of that aperture, which arches over the neck of the hernia. The several
vessels that may be wounded in attempting to relieve the
strangulated intestine are enumerated at page 446.
is to be
ed.
out
lar
Dissection.-Remove the fascia lata from the hollow in the upper Clean
part of the thigh, Scarpa's triangular space, and clean the muscles Scarpa's
that bound the space on each side. The remains of the crural triangusheath are then to be taken from the femoral vessels, and these space.
are to be followed downwards as far as the sartorius muscle. On
the outer side of the vessels the divisions of the anterior crural
nerve are to be sought, together with the branches of an artery
(profunda) which are buried in the fat. All the cellular tissue is
to be cleared out of the space ; and, in removing it from beneath
the femoral artery, the student is to seek for one or two small
nerves to the pectineus muscle.
gular
top of
thigh ;
The triangular space in the upper part of the thigh is Trianbeneath the hollow observable on the anterior aspect, near space at
Poupart's ligament, and corresponds to the axillary space in the
the upper limb. Commonly it equals the upper third of the
thigh in extent, but its length varies according to the breadth extent ;
of the sartorius, and the height at which this muscle crosses
inwards. The base of the space is at Poupart's ligament, boundand the apex at the meeting of the sartorius with the adductor longus muscle. Bounding the hollow on the outer
side are the conjoined psoas and iliacus for about two inches,
and below these is the sartorius ; but on its inner side are
the pectineus and adductor longus muscles, with a small
aries ;
RR 3
614 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
part of the adductor brevis lying between and behind them
contents. near the femur. In this interval are contained the femoral
artery and vein and the anterior crural nerve, with a convessels Femoral siderable quantity of cellular tissue. The femoral artery . runs through the centre of the hollow, and supplies some
small cutaneous branches, as well as a large deep offset,
named profunda. On the inner side of the artery is the
vein, which is here joined by the saphenous and profunda
Anterior veins ; and half an inch external to the vessel is the large crural anterior crural nerve, which is hidden at first between the
iliacus and psoas, but afterwards becomes more superficial
and their and divides into branches. Asmall artery (superficial pudic)
is directed inwards across the inner boundary of the triangular space.
nerve
branch- es.
Femoral
extent ;
course.
FEMORAL ARTERY. -This vessel is a continuation of the
artery ; external iliac artery of the abdomen, and reaches from the
lower border of Poupart's ligament to the margin of the
opening in the adductor magnus muscle. It occupies the
front and the inner part of the thigh for only two- thirds of
its length, for at the spot mentioned it turns backwards into
the ham, and takes the name popliteal. The course of the
vessel will be indicated during rotation outwards of the limb,
by a line drawn to the inner side of the patella from a point
midway between the symphysis pubis and the anterior spine
Position of the ilium. In the upper part of its course the artery is
femur. placed in front of the head of the femur, and is comparatively
Division superficial, being uncovered by muscle ; but, in the lower
parts. part, it lies along the side of the femur, and is beneath the
sartorius muscle. This difference in its connections allows
of a division of the arterial trunk into two parts ; viz. , one
in the upper, and one in the middle third of the thigh.
to the
into two
The upper
the ar- tery is superfiThe artery in the upper third of the thigh is contained in
part of Scarpa's triangular space, where it is enveloped by the femoral
sheath for about two inches, and is covered only by the
cial. skin and superficial fascia, and by the fascia lata, with some
inguinal glands. At first the artery rests on the psoas
it. muscle ; but it is subsequently placed over the pectineus,
though at some distance from it in this position of the
Parts behind
UPPER PART OF THE FEMORAL VESSELS. 615
of vein
nerve.
limb, and is separated by cellular tissue, and by the profunda
vessels and femoral vein. On the inner side of the vessel Position
and behind it, is the femoral vein ; and on the outer side is and
the anterior crural nerve, distant about half an inch near
Poupart's ligament, but some of its branches approach the
artery near the apex of the containing space.
es ofthis The branches of this part of the artery are the superficial Branchepigastric and circumflex iliac, two superficial pudic, and part already the deep femoral branch : the cutaneous offsets have been seen,
dissected (p. 600.), with the exception of the following, which except
is beneath the fascia lata.
ternal
which is
The external or superficial pudic artery (inferior) arises sepa- one exrately from, or in common with the other pudic branch (superior) pudic,
(p. 600.) . The course of this artery is inwards over the pectineus beneath
muscle to the scrotum or the labium pudendi, according to the the
sex ; it perforates the fascia lata at the inner border of the thigh to
reach its destination. In the integument it anastomoses with
branches of the superficial perinæal arteries.
fascia,
profun- The deep femoral branch, or the profunda, is the largest and the
offset of the femoral artery *, and arises from the outer part da.
of that vessel, about one inch and a half below Poupart's Origin
ligament (one inch to two inches, Quain). This branch is
consumed in the muscles of the thigh, and its distribution
will be afterwards ascertained. In the present dissection it and pois seen to be placed at first over the psoas muscle, where it Scarpa's
gives the external circumflex artery to the outer part of the
thigh, and then to be directed, with a large vein, beneath
the trunks of the femoral vessels to the inner side of the
femur.
---
sition in
triangle.
vein :
side the
FEMORAL VEIN. The principal vein of the limb has Femoral
almost the same relative anatomy as the artery in the trian- first ingular space in the upper part of the thigh. Its position to artery,
the artery is not the same, however, throughout : for beneath
Poupart's ligament it is on the inner side of that trunk, and
on the same level, and is supported on the os pubis between
* Some anatomists apply the term common femoral to the part of
the vessel above the origin of the profunda, and give the names superficial and deep femoral to the nearly equal parts into which it divides.
RR 4
616 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
after- wards
it.
the psoas and pectineus muscles ; but it soon winds beneath
outside the artery, and appears on the outer side, opposite the upper
border of the adductor longus muscle. In this situation the
vein receives the internal saphenous and the deep femoral
branches.
Pecu- Peculiarities in the vessels. The deviations from the common conliarities dition of the vessels in the triangular space, which will here be noted,
refer to change in their position, or to unusual origin of the chief branch
ofthe artery.
in the
of the vein,
The position of the vein with respect to the artery may be altered ;
position for the venous trunk may be placed on the inner side through all the
triangular space, or it may be slit so as to present a large vein on each
vein may side of the artery for a greater or less extent, or one of the two veins
may lie over the arterial tube.
or the
be di- vided.
Origin offunda provaries from Pou- part's liga- ment to four inches below.
Takethe fascia
front of
The profunda branch, though arising commonly from the femoral
artery between one inch and two inches from Poupart's ligament, may
approach nearer to that band, or recede farther from it till, as in one
example (Quain), it left the parent trunk at the distance of four inches
from the ligament ; so that in ligaturing the femoral artery in the upper part of the thigh, the thread should be placed four inches below
Poupart's ligament, to be free from the disturbing influence of an occasional large offset.
Dissection.
-To proceed with the deep dissection, open again
from the the flaps of skin down to the knee, and take away the fascia lata
to the same extent as the skin. With the leg still in the same
position as in the dissection of the other parts, the student is to
cut the fascia along the middle line of the thigh and knee, and to
reflect it to each side.
the thigh .
Follow out sar- torius,
In raising the inner piece of the membrane the sartorius muscle
should be followed to its insertion into the tibia, and care should
be taken of the small nerves along its inner border, viz.: the two
and pre- branches of the internal cutaneous above ; the great saphenous and
nerves in its branch below ; and the plexus between the saphenous, internal
with it . cutaneous, and obturator, at the middle of the thigh. The dissector is to avoid displacing the muscle whilst he is removing its
sheath of fascia.
serve
contact
Dissect the ad- The adductor muscles that are internal to the sartorius are
ductors, then to be laid bare, and the student is to seek a branch of the
obturator nerve, to the plexus before mentioned, beneath the adductor longus muscle, near where this touches the sartorius .
and clean the ex- For the dissection of the extensor muscles of the leg, on the
outer side of the sartorius, the knee is to be bent to make tense
SARTORIUS MUSCLE. 617
muscles.
their fibres. Whilst removing the fascia lata over the knee-joint, tensor
the student will find it inseparably united with an expansion from
the tendons of the extensor muscles. One little muscle at the
upper part of the thigh, tensor of the fascia, is to be cleaned, and
a strip ofthe fascia lata, corresponding to its width, should be left
along the outer aspect of the thigh : behind this slip the fascia is
to be divided by one or two transverse cuts, and to be followed
backwards to its attachment to the linea aspera of the femur.
on the
the The front of
in a thigh.
Muscles on the front ofthe thigh. —In these muscles are Muscles
included the sartorius, and the extensors of the leg.
most superficial muscle is the sartorius, which arches
wavy manner over the front of the thigh, passing from the
outer to the inner side of the limb, and lies in a hollow
between the extensor muscles on the one side, and the adductors on the other. In the set of extensor muscles of the
leg are comprised the rectus, vastus externus, and vastus
internus and crureus, all which closely surround the femur.
rius ;
over the
tion .
tions of
or obThe SARTORIUS is the longest muscle in the body, and Sartoextends from the pelvis to the leg. It arises from the upper origin ;
anterior spinous process of the ilium, and from the interval
between this and the inferior process ; its fibres constitute a course
thin, riband-like muscle, which is directed obliquely across thigh ;
the front, but vertically on the inner side of the thigh, as far
as the knee, where it ends in a tendon, and is inserted into inserthe inner surface of the tibia close to the tuberosity. The
muscle is superficial throughout, and is perforated by some
cutaneous nerves and vessels. Its upper oblique part forms Connec
the outer boundary of the triangular space that contains the the first
femoral artery, and rests on the iliacus, rectus, and adductor lique
longus muscles, as well as on the anterior crural nerve and
the femoral vessels. The middle or vertical part of the sar- of the
torius lies in a hollow between the vastus internus and the part ;
adductor muscles, as low as the opening for the femoral
artery ; but beyond that point, between the vastus and the
inner hamstring muscles, where it bounds the popliteal space
at the inner side. Beneath this part of the muscle are the femoral vessels and their accompanying nerves. The lower and of
or tendinous part lies on the internal lateral ligament of the part .
knee-joint, above the tendons of the gracilis and semitendipart ;
middle
thelower
618 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Divide the sar- torius,
nosus, and separated from them by a synovial membrane.
From its upper border an aponeurotic expansion is given to
join that from the extensors over the knee, and from its
lower border another to blend with the fascia of the leg.
Below the tendon the great saphenous nerve appears with
its artery, and piercing it is the branch of the same nerve.
Dissection. The sartorius is to be turned aside, or cut through
if it is necessary, to follow the remaining part of the femoral
artery. Beneath the muscle is an aponeurosis between the adducand dis- tor and extensor muscles, and when this is divided the internal
1
sect nerves and vessels.
Aponeu- rosis
femoral
saphenous nerve, and a nerve to the vastus internus muscle that
sends an offset to the knee-joint, will come into view. Now the
plexus of nerves on the inner side of the thigh can be more completely dissected . Where the femoral artery passes to the back of
the limb its small anastomotic branch arises ; this is to be pursued in the vastus internus to the knee, and a branch of it is to be
traced with the saphenous nerve.
The aponeurotic covering of the femoral vessels exists over
over the those blood-vessels where they are crossed by the sartorius.
artery ; It is formed of strong fibres that are directed transversely
between the vastus internus and the tendons of the adductor
ends muscles. Inferiorly the membranous structure ceases at the
a defined opening in the adductor magnus by a defined border, beneath border. which the saphenous nerve and its artery escape.
below by
Deep part of
moral
Femoral artery in the middle of the thigh. -In the middle
the fe- third of the thigh the femoral artery is more deeply placed
artery. than in the upper third, and is covered by the sartorius
tions Connec- .
muscle and the subjacent aponeurosis, in addition to the
of vein
integuments and the superficial and deep fasciæ. The artery
here lies in a hollow, bounded on the one side by the vastus
internus, and on the other by the adductor longus and adductor
magnus, by which it is conducted to the opening in the last
Position muscle. On the outer side of the artery and close to it is the
femoral vein ; also on the outer part is the internal saphenous
nerve, which is beneath the aponeurosis before described,
but is not contained within the cellular sheath of the vessels.
Branches. Only one named branch, anastomotic, springs
from this part of the artery, for the other offsets belong to
the muscles..
and sa- phenous nerve.
Branch- es.
-
LOWER PART OF THE FEMORAL VESSELS. 619
motic,
The anastomotic branch (arter. anastomotica magna) arises Anastoclose to the opening in the adductor muscle, and splits at which
once into two parts, superficial and deep.
into a
a deep
a. The superficial offset continues with the saphenous nerve to divides
the lower border of the sartorius, and, piercing the fascia lata, superfi- ramifies in the integument. b. The deep or anterior branch is cial and
concealed in the fibres of the vastus internus, and descends therein branch.
in front of the tendon of the adductor magnus to the inner side of
the knee-joint, where it anastomoses with the articular branches of
the popliteal and anterior tibial arteries. From it a branch is
sent outwards in the substance of the vastus, which forms an arch in front ofthe lower end of the femur with an offset of the external articular artery, and supplies the joint. The two pieces of the
anastomotic artery may be separate at their origin, and spring
from distinct parts of the parent trunk.
lar Muscular branches. —The branches for the supply of the Muscumuscles leave the outer part of the femoral artery, and belong branchmostly to the sartorius and vastus internus.
es.
Thefemoral vein, in its connections with the parts around vein Femoral .
and in its branches, corresponds closely to the femoral
artery. Its position with respect to the artery is, as above
said, external and close to it.
moral Peculiarities in the trunks of the vessels. — Occasionally the femoral The fe
artery is split into two below the origin of the profunda. Four ex- artery may be amples of this peculiarity have been met with, but, in all , the trunks divided.
became blended into one above the opening in the adductor muscle.
The femoral vein may change its position here, as in the upper part Thevein may be ( p. 616. ), and be found on the inner side of the artery ; or it may be inside
divided into two trunks that lie on the sides of its companion vessel. In the
some bodies this part of the femoral vein is very small in size, in con- or split ;
sequence of the popliteal entering the profunda vein, instead of ac- small.
companying the main artery of the limb through the aperture in the
adductor magnus.
-
artery ;
or very
pose
on front
Dissection. The femoral artery and vein are to be cut across To exbelow the origin of the profunda, and thrown downwards, prepa- muscles
ratory to dissecting the upper part of the vastus internus and ofthe
crureus. After these are cut, take away all the cellular membrane and the veins from amongst the branches of the profunda
artery and anterior crural nerve.
femur.
620 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Tensor vaginæ
arises from pelvis,
ends in fascia lata.
The TENSOR VAGINÆ FEMORIS is the smallest and the
femoris most external of the outer set of muscles. It takes origin
from the front of the crest of the ilium, at its outer aspect,
and from the superior of the two spinous processes of the
same bone, and is inserted into the fascia lata about three
inches below the great trochanter of the femur. At its
origin the muscle is situate between the sartorius and gluteus
medius, and its fibres are blended with the latter. Beneath
it are the ascending branches of the external circumflex
artery, and a branch of the superior gluteal nerve that enters
it at the under aspect. A strong sheath of fascia surrounds
the muscle.
Parts around.
Cut through Dissection.
-—After the muscle has been learnt, cut through the
the last slip of fascia extending from it to the knee, and, detaching the
tensor of the fascia lata from the muscles around, follow the head
ofthe rectus muscle to the pelvis.
muscle.
Rectus has an
at the
which is
and an insertion
The RECTUS FEMORIS forms a fleshy prominence on the
front of the thigh, and reaches from the pelvis to the head
origin of the tibia. At its origin from the pelvis the muscle has
pelvis , two tendinous processes or heads : one arises from the
double, anterior inferior spinous process of the ilium ; the other (to
be afterwards seen) is fixed into a depression on the back of
the ilium, close above the brim of the acetabulum. Fleshy
fibres succeed to the tendon, and end inferiorly in another
tendon which joins those of the muscles beneath it, and is
inserted with them into the head of the tibia. The rectus
into the is larger at the middle than at the ends ; and the fibres are
the tibia. directed from the centre to the sides, like the feather of a
The quill, giving rise to that condition called penniform. It is
is penni- subcutaneous except above, where it is overlaid by the
and su- sartorius ; but it conceals branches of the external circumflex perficial,
except artery and anterior crural nerve, and rests on the muscular
mass of the vastus and crureus. The upper tendon of the
muscle reaches farthest on the anterior surface, where the
sartorius lies on it, whilst the lower tendon is most extensive on the posterior aspect, or towards the subjacent
muscles.
head of
muscle
form ,
above.
Cut Dissection.-To see the remaining muscles, cut across the rectus
near its lower end, and raise it without injuring the branches of
MUSCLES IN FRONT OF THE THIGH. 621
separate
vessels and nerves beneath it. The muscular mass on the front the rectus,
of the femur is to be divided into two along the situation of some
descending vessels and nerves. The muscle external to those
vessels is the vastus externus, and the larger mass internal to them and
is composed of the vastus internus and crureus : the two last the exmuscles are inseparably united ; but if the student wishes to make muscles.
two distinct parts, he must carry the scalpel through the fibres in
a line with the inner border of the patella.
tensor
externus
at the
The VASTUS EXTERNUS is one of the parts of the strong Vastus
extensor muscle of the leg, and its attachment to the femur
is very narrow in comparison with its size and thickness.
It has a lengthened origin from the outer aspect of the root is thin
of the great trochanter ; from the outer margin of the linea origin ;
aspera, as well as from all the line connecting this upwards
with the trochanter, but from only two-thirds of the line
extending downwards from it to the outer condyle ; and,
lastly, from the external intermuscular septum. Inferiorly
the fibres of the muscle end in an aponeurosis, which is but is
blended with the tendons of the rectus and vastus internus below,
to form a common tendon of insertion into the tibia.
muscle is pointed at the upper part, but enlarged below,
where it produces the prominence on the outer side of the
thigh. Its cutaneous surface is aponeurotic at the upper Parts in
part, and is covered by the rectus and tensor vaginæ femoris with the
muscles ; but the deep surface rests on the vastus and
crureus, and on branches of the external circumflex artery
and anterior crural nerve.
thicker
at its in- The sertion.
contact
surfaces.
internus
reus.
on the front of
mur.
The VASTUS INTERNUS and CRUREUS are inseparably Vastus
united, and will be here described as one muscle. The fleshy and crumass covers the anterior and inner surfaces of the femur, onemass
and its extent may be indicated by the following lines :
Upwards it reaches as far as the anterior intertrochanteric the feline, and downwards to about two inches from the articular Its ori gin ;
end of the femur ; outwards, it extends nearly to the linea
aspera, but inwards it is fixed to the inner margin of that
line as well as to the lines continued from it towards the ends
of the bone, viz. to the small trochanter in one direction, and
the inner condyle of the femur in the opposite direction. At
the lower end of the muscle the fibres terminate in a cuta- insertion
622 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
by a
common neous aponeurosis that blends in the common tendon of
tendon. insertion. The upper part of the muscular mass is buried
Upper beneath the sartorius and rectus muscles ; but the lower part is deep, part is superficial, and projects more than the vastus exlower is ternus at the opposite side of the thigh. The adductor
muscles are almost inseparably joined with the vastus along
its attachment to the linea aspera.
but the
super- ficial.
Small subcru- reus muscle ;
ends on capsule ofthe joint.
Lay bare
mon
ofthe extenSubcrureus muscle. Beneath the united vastus and
crureus, near the knee-joint, is a thin band of pale fibres
named as above. It is but a part of the muscle on the front
of the femur, which is separated therefrom by a cellular
layer. Attached therefore to the front of the femur in its
lower third, it ends in aponeurotic fibres on the outer surface
of the capsule of the knee-joint.
- Dissection. — The common tendon of the vasti and rectus, with
the com- the expansion from it over the knee-joint, can be demonstrated
tendon by means of an incision along the middle of the patella to the head
of the tibia. This cut will allow the thin expansion to be reflected inwards and outwards, so as to lay bare the tendon. A
strong transverse band will be likewise seen on each side of the
patella ; the outer of the two is the strongest.
sors.
Tendon of the exten- sors ;
ments ;
The tendon of the extensor muscles of the leg is common
to the rectus, the vastus externus, and the united vastus internus and crureus. Its position is in front of the knee-joint,
to which it serves the office of an anterior ligament. Wide
attach- above where the muscular fibres terminate, it narrows as it
descends over the joint and the patella, and is inserted inferiorly into the prominence of the tuberosity of the tibia.
Close to its attachment to the tibia a synovial bursa is beneath it, and in its fibres the patella is contained, like a sesamoid bone in other situations. (See Ligament of the PaExpan- tella. ) From the upper part of the tendon an aponeurotic
expansion is derived : this prolongation, which is strongest on
the inner side, is united with the fascia lata and the other
tendinous offsets to form a capsule around the joint, and is
fixed below to the heads of the tibia and fibula.
bursa beneath.
sionfrom it.
Inter- muscular septa.
Intermuscular septa.
- The processes of the fascia lata
that limit laterally the extensor muscles of the leg are thus
ANTERIOR CRURAL NERVE. 623
named, and are fixed to the linea aspera, and the lines leading are two :
from it to the condyles of the femur.
is the
est ;
The external septum is the strongest, and reaches from theouter
the outer condyle of the femur to the insertion of the gluteus strongmaximus. It is situate between the vastus externus and
the short head of the biceps, and is perforated near the outer
condyle by the upper external articular artery. The innerthe inner
partition is very thin along the side of the vastus internus, tinct.
and, between the inner condyle and the linea aspera, its
place is supplied by the strong tendon of the adductor magnus. The internal articular artery is transmitted through
it to the front of the knee-joint.
is indisto the
on the
the
The external circumflex artery is the chief vessel for the Artery
supply of the muscles of the front of the thigh. It arises muscles
from the outer side of the profunda (deep femoral) artery, front of
and is directed horizontally outwards through the divisions thigh.
of the anterior crural nerve, and beneath the sartorius and
rectus muscles, to the under surface of the vastus externus,
where it ends in branches. Offsets are given from this Its
artery to the rectus and sartorius, and its terminal branches areconsist of an ascending, a transverse, and a descending set.
branches
cending The ascending branches are about three in number, and are an asdirected beneath the tensor vaginæ femoris to the back of the set,
ilium, where they anastomose with the gluteal artery.
verse ,
The transverse or middle set, the least numerous and the a transsmallest in size, perforate the vastus externus, and anastomose on
the back of the thigh with the sciatic and perforating arteries.
The descending branches are the largest, and are distributed descend- and a
to the vasti muscles. One considerable offset enters the vastus ing set.
externus, and reaches the knee, on which it anastomoses with the
external articular arteries.
ties in
trunk
Peculiarities in this artery are very frequent, both in the trunk and Varie- in the branches. Thus the vessel may arise as one trunk from the the
superficial instead of the deep femoral artery ; or as two pieces, which
may spring from either of the two femoral trunks, or from both by a
branch obtained from each.
and branch- es.
the fron !
The ANTERIOR CRURAL NERVE is derived from the lumbar Nerve o
plexus (p. 530. ) , and supplies the muscles and the integu- of the
ment of the front of the thigh, and the integument of the thigh
624 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
ded.
is divi- inner side of the leg. Soon after the trunk of the nerve
leaves the abdomen beneath Poupart's ligament it is flattened,
and divided into a superficial or cutaneous, and a deep or
muscular part.
From its superfi- A. The superficial part of the nerve ends in these three
cial part branches : the internal and middle cutaneous of the thigh,
and the great saphenous.
arisemiddle cutane- ous ;
internal cutane- ous ;
which has
anterior and
inner branch
Internal
The middle cutaneous nerve perforates the fascia lata,
sometimes also the sartorius, about three inches below Poupart's ligament, and extends on the surface of the thigh to
the knee. Its cutaneous distribution is described at page
604.
The internal cutaneous nerve sends two or more small
twigs through the fascia lata to the integument of the upper
third of the thigh, and then divides in front of the femoral
artery, or on its inner side, into the two following branches,
anterior and inner. Sometimes these branches, into which
the nerve ordinarily divides, arise from the anterior crural
trunk at separate spots. *
The anterior branch is directed to the inner side of the kneejoint. As far as the middle of the thigh it lies over the sartorius,
but it then pierces the fascia lata, and ramifies in the integument
as before said (p. 604.) .
The inner branch is distributed in the integument of the inner
side of the leg, just below the knee, but it remains beneath the
fascia lata as far as the knee (p. 604. ) . Whilst underneath the
fascia the nerve lies along the inner border of the sartorius, and
joins about the middle of the thigh with branches of the obturator
and internal saphenous nerves to form a plexus. When this branch
is small it ends in the plexus just mentioned, and in offsets to the
inner part of the thigh, instead of being continued onwards to
the leg.
The internal saphenous nerve is the largest of the three
* The description here given ofthe distribution of the internal cutaneous
nerve has been derived from facts ascertained by repeated careful dissections. It differs from the one in ordinary use, though the same
arrangement has been described by me before in the fifth edition of
Quain's " Anatomy," but without any statement in support of its correct- ness.
-
G. V. E.
BRANCHES OF THE CRURAL NERVE. 625
nous superficial branches ; it becomes cutaneous on the inner side sapheof the knee, and accompanies the vein of the same name to nerve
the foot (p. 605. ). In the thigh the nerve approaches the
femoral artery, where this is concealed by the sartorius, and
is continued along the outer side of that vessel, beneath the
aponeurosis covering the same, as far as the opening in the
adductor magnus muscle. At that spot the nerve passes
from beneath the aponeurosis, and is continued under the becomes
sartorius muscle to the upper part of the leg, to become ous at
cutaneous as before said. It supplies two cutaneous offsets
whilst it is contained in the thigh beneath the fascia.
cutanetheknee;
commu- One of these offsets (communicating branch) arises about the has a
middle of the thigh, and crosses inwards beneath the sartorius to nicating
join in the plexus between it, the internal cutaneous, and the obturator : this branch is sometimes absent. The other branch
to the front of the patella springs from the nerve near the knee- and a
joint, and perforates the sartorius muscle and the fascia lata to offset .
end in the integument over the knee (p. 605.) .
patellar
thedeep
arise
B. The deep or muscular part of the anterior crural nerve From
gives branches to all the muscles of the front of the thigh, part
except the tensor vaginæ femoris, and to one of the adductor
muscles, viz. the pectineus.
Two slender nerves cross beneath the femoral artery and branchenter the anterior surface of the pectineus.
es to pecti- neus,
rius, Branches to the sartorius are furnished by the middle or sartoby the internal cutaneous nerve, whilst it is in contact
with that muscle.
Anerve enters the under surface of the rectus muscle at rectus,
the upper part, and divides into branches as it is about to
penetrate the fibres.
exterkneeThe nerve to the vastus externus divides into two or more vastus
branches as it enters the muscle. From one of these an nus and
articular filament is continued downwards to the knee-joint, joint,
which it enters on the anterior aspect.
vastus
nus.
The nerve to the vastus internus is nearly as large in size and
as the internal saphenous, in common with which it often interarises. To the upper part of the muscle it furnishes one or
more branches, and is then continued beneath the aponeurosis covering the femoral vessels as far as the centre of the
SS
626 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Its ar- ticular
to knee.
thigh, where it ends in offsets to the muscle, and in an
articular branch to the knee-joint.
The articular branch is prolonged to the inner side of the kneebranch joint on or in the vastus, and on the tendon of the adductor magnus, and is distributed over the synovial membrane of the front of
the articulation : this small nerve accompanies the deep branch of
the anastomotic artery.
tensor Nerve of The branch of nerve to the tensor vaginæ femoris is
vagina. derived from the superior gluteal (p. 640.), and enters the
under surface of the muscle. In the fibres it extends nearly
to the lower end.
Dissec- tion of adductor
Dissection. - After the examination of the muscles of the front
of the thigh with the vessels and nerves that are furnished to them,
muscles. the student should learn next the adductor muscles and their
vessels and nerves. To prepare the muscles, take the cellular
tissue from them, and separate the superficial adductors one from
another. Let the student be careful of the branches of the obturator nerve in connection with the muscles, those offsets entering
both the muscular fibres and the plexus on the inner side of the
thigh. Lastly, take the cellular tissue, and the veins that are left,
from the profunda and its branches.
The ad- ductor
position.
Muscles on the inner side ofthe thigh. -This set of musduscles cles consists of three adductors, viz. adductors longus, brevis,
and magnus, with the gracilis and the pectineus ; these have
the under-mentioned position with respect to one another.
and their Most internal of all and the longest, is the gracilis, which
may moreover be recognised by its slender, riband-like appearance. Superficial to the others, are the pectineus and
adductor longus, which are directed obliquely from the pubes
to the femur, and bound internally Scarpa's triangular space.
Beneath those two the short adductor is placed, and behind
all is the adductor magnus.
Gracilis The GRACILIS reaches from the pelvis to the tibia, and is
fleshy and riband-like above, but tendinous below. The
takes muscle arises by an aponeurosis, two to three inches in depth,
from the from the body and the descending ramus of the os pubis,
pelvis, and partly from the ascending ramus of the ischium ; and is
origin
is in- serted into tibia.
inserted by a flat tendon into the inner surface of the tibia ,
below the sartorius. At the upper part the muscle is super-
ADDUCTOR MUSCLE. 627
to other
ficial, and is flattened against the adductor magnus, so as to
have its borders directed forwards and backwards ; but in
the lower third of the thigh it intervenes between the sar- Position
torius and semi-membranosus muscles, and forms part of the muscles.
inner boundary of the popliteal space. Its tendon, near the
insertion, is above that of the semi- tendinosus, though on the
same level, and both lie over the internal lateral ligament,
but separated from it by a bursa. An expansion is continued from the tendon to the fascia of the leg, as in the
tendons of the sartorius and semi-tendinosus.
neus.
from
into
The PECTINEUS is the highest of the muscles that are Pectidirected from the pelvis to the inner side of the femur. It
has a fleshy origin from the line on the os pubis between the Origin
spine and pectineal eminence, and from the triangular surface pubes,
of bone in front of that line ; and it is inserted by a tendon inserted
into the upper half of the line on the femur, which extends femur.
from the linea aspera to the small trochanter. The muscle
is twisted, so that the surfaces which are directed forwards Muscle
and backwards near the pelvis, are turned inwards and outwards at its insertion . The pectineus lies between the psoas Part
and the adductor longus, and the internal circumflex vessels
pass between its outer border and the former muscle. One
surface is in contact with the fascia lata, and the opposite faces .
touches the obturator muscle and nerve, and the adductor
brevis.
istwisted.
on
and surtor lontends
pelvis to
nections
muscles
The ADDUCTOR LONGUS lies below the pectineus, and is Adductriangular in form, with the apex at the pelvis and the base gus exat the femur. It arises by a tendon from the spine of the from
os pubis, and from the body of the bone below that process, femur.
and is inserted into the linea aspera in the middle third of
the shaft of the femur. This muscle is situate between the Its congracilis and pectineus, and forms part of the inner boundary with
of the triangular space containing the femoral vessels. Its and
anterior surface is covered near the femur by the femoral
vessels and the sartorius ; and the posterior rests on the
other two adductors, on part of the obturator nerve, and on
the deep femoral artery. Aponeurotic bands connect the
tendon of the muscle at its insertion with those of the adductor magnus and vastus internus.
vessels.
SS 2
628 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
tor nerve
Dissect Dissection. -On cutting through the pectineus near the pubes
obtura- and throwing it down, the dissector will sometimes find the small
accessory nerve of the obturator that turns beneath its outer border ; if it is present, trace out its branches to the hip-joint and
the obturator nerve. The adductor longus is then to be divided
near its origin, and raised with care, so as not to destroy the
branches of the obturator nerve beneath ; its tendon is also to be
detached from that of the adductor magnus to see the branches of
the profunda artery. Now, the adductor brevis is laid bare, with a
part of the obturator nerve crossing it to enter the plexus at the
inner side of the thigh, and with a deeper part of the same nerve
beneath it ; the muscle should be separated from the subjacent
adductor magnus where the lower nerve and an artery are seen
Articu- to issue. In this last step of the dissection the student should seek lar nerve a small articular branch of the obturator nerve, that descends on
and in the fibres of the adductor magnus to the knee-joint.
and ad- ductor brevis.
to knee- joint.
Acces- sory ob- turator nerve
The accessory obturator nerve * ( Schmidt) is derived from the
trunk of the obturator in the abdomen (p. 530.) and passes from
that cavity over the brim of the pelvis . In the thigh this branch
turns beneath the pectineus and joins the superficial part of the
obturator nerve : at the same spot it supplies an offset to the under
absent. surface of the pectineus, and another to the hip-joint with the
articular artery. When the nerve is small, one or more of these
offsets is wanting.
is often
Adduc- tor brevis is thick at the origin
The ADDUCTOR BREVIS is thick and fleshy in the upper
part, but thinner and tendinous at the lower extremity, at its
attachment to the femur. The muscle arises below the
adductor longus from the anterior aspect of the os pubis,
between the attachments of the gracilis and obturator exterand wide nus, and is inserted behind the pectineus into all the line
leading from the linea aspera towards the small trochanter.
tion. In front of this muscle are the pectineus and the adductor
longus ; but it is gradually uncovered by the latter below,
and the borders of the two are contiguous at their insertion
into the femur : on this aspect, too, are the superficial part of
at the inserParts in front,
* This small nerve is often absent ; it was found only four or five
times in nine or ten bodies that were examined by its discoverer. The
name given to it by Schmidt refers to this irregularity, viz. nerv. ad obturatorem accessorius inconstans. - - Commentarius de Nervis lumbalibus.
-
OBTURATOR NERVE. 629
Behind the behind,
part of the
the obturator nerve and the profunda artery.
muscle is the adductor magnus, with the deep
obturator nerve. In contact with the upper border is the and at
obturator externus, and the internal circumflex artery passes border.
between the two.
upper
tor The OBTURATOR NERVE is a branch of the lumbar plexus Obtura-
(p. 530.) , and supplies the adductor muscles of the thigh, with nerve
the hip and knee-joints. The nerve issues from the pelvis
through the aperture in the upper part of the thyroid foramen, and divides therein into two parts, which are named is divisuperficial and deep, from their position with respect to the two:
adductor brevis muscle.
ded into
perficial
plexus
The anterior or superficial part of the nerve joins the the suplexus before referred to in the description of the internal part
cutaneous nerve, which is situate on the inner aspect of the
thigh. To reach its destination the nerve is directed over
the adductor brevis, but beneath the pectineus and the adductor longus. At the lower border of the last muscle it joins
furnishes an offset to join in the interlacement with the in- in the
ternal cutaneous, and the branch of the saphenous nerve, but
the remainder of the nerve is continued to the femoral artery, ends on
on which it is distributed. In addition to the branches be- artery.
fore mentioned, the nerve receives the communicating twig Branchfrom its accessory branch, and supplies the hip-joint, and
some of the surrounding muscles.
thigh,
femoral
es are
joint. Branches. - Near the pelvis or in the aperture of exit, this di- to hipvision of the nerve sends outwards an articular twig to the hipjoint with the artery to the same part. Muscular branches are Muscufurnished to the adductor longus, the adductor brevis, and
gracilis.
――
the lar to some ad- ductors.
tend to
Unusual condition of the nerve. - In some bodies this superficial This
division of the nerve is of large size, and extends beyond the plexus be larger partmay
in the middle of the thigh. In such instances the nerve joins
freely in the plexus, and gives cutaneous offsets to the integu- and exment of the thigh, but is afterwards continued along the inner theinner
border of the sartorius to the inner side of the knee, where it per- the
forates the fascia to end in the integument : it has, in fact, the knee.
same position and distribution as the inner branch of the internal
cutaneous nerve (p. 624.) , whose place it supplies.
side of
SS 3
630 ' DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Deep part of the a
nerve
ends in'
magnus,
The posterior or deep part of the obturator nerve pierces
the fibres of the external obturator muscle, and is continued
beneath the adductor brevis to be distributed chiefly in the
adductor magnus. Offsets are given from it to the contiguous muscles, and one to supply the knee-joint.
Branches. -Muscular branches enter the external obturator
adductor muscle as the nerve pierces it, and the others belong to the large
adductor, but sometimes also to the short one. A slender articular branch enters the fibres of the adductor magnus towards its
lower part, and is transmitted through them near the linea aspera
to reach the popliteal artery, by which it is conducted to the
back of the knee-joint : its termination will be found in the dissection of the popliteal space.
and gives branch
to knee joint.
Dissect pro-l
funda.
Pro- funda artery,
origin,
course,
Dissection. To prepare the profunda artery and its branches,
take from them the veins and the cellular membrane. Follow
backwards then the internal circumflex artery above the upper
border of the adductor brevis, and trace the perforating branches
through the tendons of the adductors near the femur.
The PROFUNDA ( deep femoral) is the chief muscular artery
of the thigh, and arises from the femoral trunk about one
inch and a half below Poupart's ligament (p. 615.). At its
origin this vessel is placed on the outer side of the parent
trunk, but it is then directed inwards beneath the femoral
vessels to the inner side of the femur. Here it again changes
the direction of its course, and descends parallel to the femoral artery, but deeper in position, to the lower third of the
thigh, where it ends in a small branch that pierces the ad- ending. ductor magnus. Where the vessel lies in the triangular
space of the thigh (near its origin) it rests on the iliacus
muscle, but internal to the femur it is placed over the adaround. ductor brevis, and from that spot to its termination between
the adductors longus and magnus.
and
Parts
Branch- es to
ofthe thigh join
Its branches are numerous to the surrounding muscles
muscles and the bone, and maintain free anastomoses with other
vessels supplied to the upper part of the thigh, as well as
freely. with those of the leg. It is through these communications
that the blood finds its way to the lower part of the limb,
when the tube of the chief artery is obliterated above the
origin of the profunda. Some of the branches to the adductor
PROFUNDA VESSELS. 631
- The named
es aremuscles are unnamed. The named branches are these :
external circumflex to the extensor muscles of the leg, in- branchternal circumflex round the inner side of the femur to the
back of the thigh, and perforating arteries through the adductors to the same destination.
The external circumflex artery has been described in the dissec- external
tion of the muscles of the front of the thigh (p. 623).
circum- flex ;
circumback of
The internal circumflex branch arises from the inner and posterior internal
part of the profunda, and turns backwards between the psoas and flex ;
pectineus, above the border of the adductor brevis, along the course
of the tendon of the external obturator muscle. Having reached ends on
the back of the thigh, it ends in two branches, which will be seen thigh,
in the dissection of the buttock. It supplies the under-mentioned branches to the inner side of the thigh : -An articular artery supplies hip-joint enters the hip-joint through the notch in the acetabulum. At the and
border of the adductor brevis two muscular branches arise : one muscles.
ascends to the obturator and the superficial adductor muscles, the
other, which is larger, descends beneath the adductor brevis, and
ends in this and the largest adductor.
variable.
Peculiarities. - The origin of the internal circumflex is very variable. Origin
At one time it may be from the femoral artery above the profunda ; at
another from the epigastric, the external iliac, or the circumflex iliac
artery.
perfobranchsecond
nutriartery,
The perforating branches are usually three in number, and pierce Three
the tendons of the adductor muscles close to the linea aspera ofrating
the femur. Thefirst is opposite the lower border of the pectineus, es ;
and perforates the short and long adductors. The second branch
arises lower down, and passes through the same muscles as the gives
preceding from it a nutritious artery is supplied to the femur. tious
The third artery springs from the deep femoral trunk below the
adductor brevis, and is transmitted through the adductor magnus.
The terminal branch of the profunda (fourth perforating) pierces and the
the adductor magnus. These several branches supply the muscles of proof the back of the thigh, and anastomose above with branches of a fourth.
the internal iliac, and below with those of the popliteal artery.
ending
funda is
funda The profunda vein results from the union of the different Probranches corresponding to those of the artery of the same vein
name. It closely accompanies its companion artery, to which
it is superficial, being between it and the femoral vessels.
Sometimes the vein is suddenly enlarged at the upper part is someSS 4
632 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
joined times by the union of a large trunk that is directed upwards from
bypopli- the popliteal vein, behind the adductor magnus, and then
pierces this muscle.
teal.
Cut through
brevis.
Dissection. To bring into view the remaining muscles, viz. the
adductor adductor magnus, the obturator externus, and the insertion of the
psoas and iliacus, the adductor brevis is to be cut through, and the
cellular membrane to be removed from each. After the adductor
magnus has been learnt, it will be needful to detach a few of its
upper fibres to examine the obturator externus.
Adduc- tor
narrow ;
fibres diverge
The ADDUCTOR MAGNUS is triangular in form, and is fixed
magnus ; by its apex to the pelvis, and by its base to the femur in
origin is nearly all the length of the bone. Its origin is from the
descending ramus of the os pubis, and from the ascending
ramus and tuberosity of the ischium, and its fibres are
directed, with different degrees of obliquity, to their attachment to the femur. Thus the upper fibres, from the rami
to their of the pubis and ischium, are horizontal above, but become
more and more oblique below, and are inserted into the linea
quadrata and the line continued from the great trochanter to
the linea aspera, also into all the linea aspera, and into a
horizon- small part of the line leading from that crest of bone to the
Whilst the remaining fibres
ischium, which are vertical in
inser- tion,
some being
tal,
others
inner condyle of the femur.
from the tuberosity of the vertical, direction, end about the lower third of the thigh in a tendon,
which is inserted into the inner condyle of the femur, and is
connected by a fibrous expansion to the line leading upwards
from that point of the bone to the linea aspera.
andform two
parts.
The muscle consists of the two parts above described,
different which differ in their characters. The upper one is thin
and muscular, and forms a septum between the other adductors and the muscles on the back of the thigh ; but the
inner or lower piece is partly fleshy and partly tendinous,
and consists of thick coarse fibres. On the anterior surface
tions of of the adductor magnus are the other two adductor muscles,
Connecthe an- terior
and poste- rior sur face ;
upper and
with the pectineus, and the obturator nerve and profunda
artery. The posterior surface is in connection with the
hamstring muscles and the great sciatic nerve. In contact
with the upper border are the obturator externus and the
quadratus femoris, with the internal circumflex artery ; and
OBTURATOR MUSCLE AND VESSELS. 633
borders ;
inseralong the lower or inner border are the gracilis and the sar- lower
torius. At its attachment to the femur the muscle is closely and its
united with the other adductors, particularly the adductor tion.
longus, and is there pierced by apertures for the femoral and
perforating arteries.
for the The opening in the adductor for the transmission of the Opening
femoral vessels into the popliteal space is tendinous on the vessels ;
anterior aspect, but fleshy at the posterior, and is situate at
the junction of the middle with the lower third of the thigh.
It is larger than is necessary for the passage of the vessels, ries.
and is bounded on the outside by the vastus internus, but on
the inside by the tendon of the adductor magnus, with some
fibres added from that of the long adductor.
boundaand ilithe
Inser- tion into femur.
around.
The PSOAS and ILIACUS arise separately in the abdomen Psoas
(p. 524.) , but are united in the part that is contained in the acus in
thigh. The conjoined crural portion of these muscles is seen thigh .
to come beneath Poupart's ligament, and to descend to be
inserted by a tendon into the back of the small trochanter of
the femur, as well as by fleshy fibres into a special surface of
the bone below that eminence. Beneath the ligament the Parts
muscles occupy the interval between the ilio-pectineal eminence and the anterior superior spinous process of the ilium.
On the front of the psoas is the femoral artery, and between
the two lies the anterior crural nerve ; whilst the fleshy mass
covers the capsule of the hip-joint and an intervening bursa.
The pectineus and the internal circumflex artery are contiguous to the inner border, and the sartorius and vastus
internus to the outer edge of the muscles.
The OBTURATOR EXTERNUS tor ex- is of a conical form, with the Obturabase of the cone at the pelvis and the apex at the femur. ternus ;
The fibres of the muscle take origin from the inner half of origin,
the obturator membrane, at the outer aspect, and from the
bone bounding internally the foramen of the same name :
from that spot they are directed obliquely outwards and
backwards to be inserted by a tendon into the pit at the root
of the great trochanter. This muscle is concealed by the The adpectineus, adductor brevis, and adductor magnus, and is cover it,
pierced by part of the obturator nerve ; it covers the obturator membrane and artery. As it turns back it is in coninser- tion.
634 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
and it touches hip- joint.
Detach obtura- tor.
Obtura- tor artact with the inner and the lower part of the hip-joint. The
insertion of the muscle will be seen in the dissection of the
buttock.
Dissection.
-
By detaching the obturator muscle in part from
the pelvis, the branches of the artery and nerve of the same name
will be seen amongst its fibres.
The obturator artery is a branch of the internal iliac
tery (p. 554.), and enters the thigh through the upper part of the
thyroid foramen ; whilst in its aperture the artery divides
divides into two parts that inosculate and form a circle around the into two, obturator membrane beneath the muscle.
upper and lower
The upper branch extends along the inner half of the membrane,
and anastomoses inferiorly with the other. The lower branch perbranch ; forates the membrane beneath the upper one, and turns down
along the outer part to form a circle near the circumference by
uniting with the preceding branch. This supplies an articular twig
to the hip-joint. Offsets of the obturator artery are furnished to
the muscle that covers it, and some small twigs extend even to the
upper part of the adductors.
this gives ar- ticular twig.
Branch- es ofthe nerve.
The branches of the nerve come from the deep division of
the obturator trunk, and perforate the membrane with the
lower branch of the artery. They are distributed to the
substance of the muscle.
Position Position.
ofthe
SECTION II.
THE BUTTOCK, OR THE GLUTEAL REGION.
-
DURING the dissection of the back of the thigh
body. the body is placed with the face down, and the pelvis is
raised by blocks until the lower limbs hang almost vertically
over the end of the dissecting table.
Direc- tions.
Now the body is turned, the student can better recognise
the points of bone that mark posteriorly the limit between
the thigh and the abdomen (p. 597.) . Both this section
and the following one are to be gone through in the time
appointed for the body to lie in its present position.
CUTANEOUS NERVES OF THE BUTTOCK. 635
-
-
the skin.
Dissection. The integument is to be raised from the buttock Take up
by means of these two incisions : - One is to be made along the
crest of the ilium, and to be continued in the middle line of the
sacrum to the tip of the coccyx ; another is to be begun where the
first terminates, and to be carried outwards on the thigh till about
six inches below the great trochanter. The flap of skin thus
marked out above and below is to be thrown downwards.
ous
from
where
Several of the cutaneous nerves of this region will be found in Cutanethe fat or beneath it, along the line of the crest of the ilium. Be- nerves
ginning in front, the student will first meet with branches of the above
external cutaneous rather below the crest. Crossing the crest, found.
near its front, is an offset of the last dorsal nerve, and, farther
back, another from the ilio-hypogastric nerve ; whilst in a line
with the outer border of the erector spinæ are two or three
branches of the lumbar nerves. By the side of the sacrum and
coccyx are two or three offsets of the sacral nerves.
nerves of
sciatic.
The remaining cutaneous nerves are derived from the small Other
sciatic, and will be found beneath the fat along the line of the small
lower incision, where they come from underneath the gluteus
maximus ; some turn upwards over that muscle, and others are
directed down to the thigh.
-
--
of the
ous nerves.
lumbar
CUTANEOUS NERVES. The nerves distributed in the in- Sources
tegument of the buttock are small but numerous, and are cutanederived from the spinal nerves (posterior divisions), from
the branches of the lumbar and sacral plexuses, and from
the last dorsal nerve.
Branches of the spinal nerves. The branches of the posterior From
divisions of the lumbar nerves are two or three in number, and
cross the crest of the ilium at the attachment of the erector spinæ.
They ramify in the integument covering the gluteus muscle, and
some branches may be traced nearly to the trochanter major. The
branches of the sacral nerves perforate the gluteus maximus near and
its origin, and are then directed outwards for a short distance in nerves.
the integument over it. These offsets are usually three in number ;
one, the largest, is opposite the lower end of the sacrum, another
is near the crest of the ilium, and the third is between the
other two.
sacral
lumbar Nerves from the lumbar plexus. - Parts of two nerves from the From
lumbar plexus, viz. ilio -hypogastric and external cutaneous, are plexus ,
spent in the integument of this region. The iliac branch of the through
ilio-hypogastric nerve crosses the crest of the ilium in front of the ilio-hy- pogas- tric.
636 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
branches from the lumbar nerves, and extends a short distance
below the crest : this branch is very variable in size, or it may be
Exter- wanting. Offsets ofthe external cutaneous nerve of the thigh bend
backwards to the integument above the great trochanter, and cross
the divisions of the branch of the last dorsal nerve.
nal cuta- neous.
From sacral
small
Nerves from the sacral plexus. — Only one nerve of the plexus,
plexus, the small sciatic, sends here superficial branches. The cutaneous
through offsets of this nerve appear along the lower border of the gluteus
sciatic . maximus ; two or three ascend round the edge of the muscle, and
are lost in the integument over its lower part ; but the remaining
branches descend to the thigh, and will be afterwards noticed
on it.
From last
nerve .
The last dorsal nerve supplies the buttock by means of its lateral
dorsal cutaneous branch (p. 417.) . This perforates the muscles of the
abdomen, and crosses the anterior part of the crest of the ilium to
be distributed over the fore part of the gluteal region as low as the
great trochanter.
Clean gluteus maxi- mus.
Dissection.
- In the dissection of this region it is customary to
disregard the deep fascia, which is here unimportant, in order that
the great gluteal muscle, which is the most difficult in the body to
make clean, may be well displayed . Supposing the student desirous to lay bare the muscle at once, let him turn aside the
cutaneous nerves, and draw away and rotate inwards the limb to
Mode of make tense the muscular fibres. Having cut through the fat and proceed- ing. fascia down to the muscle, let him carry the scalpel along one fibre
at a time, in the direction of a line from the sacrum to the femur,
until all the coarse fasciculi are cleaned . If it is the right limb,
the dissection should be begun at the upper border ; but if the
left, at the lower margin of the muscle.
Fascia ofthe
is thin
importThe thin fascia of the buttock is a prolongation of that
buttock enveloping the thigh, and is fixed to the crest of the ilium
and un- and to the sacrum and coccyx. It is much thicker in front
of the gluteus maximus than on it, and gives attachment at
that spot to the gluteus medius which it covers. At the
edge of the gluteus maximus the fascia is slit to encase this
muscle.
ant.
Gluteus maxi- mus.
The GLUTEUS MAXIMUS is the most superficial muscle of
the buttock, and reaches from the pelvis to the upper part
of the femur. Its highest and lowest fibres are attached to
Origin bone, but the central ones only to an aponeurosis. Thus the from muscle arises above from the posterior fifth of the crest of above
pelvis ;
GLUTEUS MAXIMUS. 637
inserted below
femur.
the ilium (its outer lip), and from a special impression on
the bone below ; inferiorly from the back of the last piece of
the sacrum, and from the coccyx and the great sacro- sciatic
ligament ; and between the iliac and sacral attachments
from the tendon of the erector spinæ muscle. From this
origin the fibres are directed outwards to their insertion :
two-thirds end in the fascia lata of the outer part of the intothe
thigh, and the remainder are fixed into the femur in the
lower part of the line leading from the linea aspera to the
great trochanter. The gluteus forms the prominence of the
buttock, and resembles the deltoid in situation and in coarseness of texture. Its cutaneous surface is covered by the Conneccommon investing fascia of the limb, and by the superficial the surnerves ; the parts in contact with the under surface will be
seen when the muscle is cut through. The upper border and boroverlays the gluteus medius ; and the lower border, which is
longer and thicker than the upper, assists to form the outer
boundary of the perinæal space. Beneath the lower border
the hamstring muscles and the sciatic vessels and nerves are
placed.
tions of
faces
ders.
the
maxi- mus.
Dissection. The gluteus maximus is to be cut across near the Divide
pelvis, but external to the sacral nerves perforating it, and without gluteus
injuring the subjacent sacro- sciatic ligament, when the lower fibres
are divided. The depth of the muscle will be ascertained by the
fascia beneath it, and by some vessels. When this intermuscular
layer is arrived at, the outer part of the gluteus is to be thrown
towards its insertion, and the sciatic artery and nerve are to be
detached from the under surface, though the branches that enter
the muscular substance must be cut.
parts Take away now the loose fat from the hollow between the pelvis Clean
and the trochanter, without injuring the vessels and nerves ; clean beneath .
the several muscles of this region, and let the fibres of each be
made tense at the time by rotating the femur. In removing the
fat from the tuberosity of the ischium and from the great trochanter, observe the bursa on each prominence of bone. The
vessels, nerves, and muscles to be made out in this region, are
noticed below in the enumeration of the parts beneath the gluteus.
out Lastly, the origin of the muscle is to be removed ; and the sacral Dissect
nerves to be dissected out of it, and followed to the surface of the sacral
great sacro-sciatic ligament, where they are united and concealed nerves.
by some aponeurotic fibres.
638 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Parts covered
teus at its ori- gin and
tion,
-
Parts beneath the gluteus. At its origin the gluteus
by glu- maximus rests on the pelvis, and conceals part of the ilium,
sacrum, and coccyx, the tuberosity of the ischium, and the
inser- origin of the hamstring muscles, as well as the great sacrosciatic ligament. At its insertion it covers the upper end
of the femur with the great trochanter, and the origin of the
vastus externus. Between the muscle and each prominence
of bone (tuberosity and trochanter) is a large, loose synovial
membrane, and the outer one extends over the upper part of
and by the vastus externus. In the hollow between the pelvis and
the femur the muscle conceals the undermentioned parts,
ingpart which are given here in their order from above downwards.
the in- tervenof the muscle.
The ex- ternal
of sacral nerves are
First is a part of the gluteus medius, and below it is the
pyriformis, with the superficial branch of the gluteal artery
between them. Coming from beneath the pyriformis are the
sciatic vessels and the sciatic nerves (large and small), which
descend to the back of the thigh between the great trochanter and the tuberosity of the ischium ; together with
the pudic vessels and nerve, and the nerve to the obturator
internus muscle, which are directed inwards through the
small sacro-sciatic notch. Still lower down is the tendon of
the obturator internus muscle, with a fleshy fasciculus (gemellus) above and below it. Next follow the thin quadratus
femoris muscle, and the upper part of the adductor magnus ;
at the upper border of the quadratus is the tendon of the
obturator externus, and at the lower border, between it and
the adductor, is one of the terminal branches of the internal
circumflex artery.
Sacral nerves. - The external branches of the posterior
branches divisions of the three first sacral nerves, after passing outwards beneath the multifidus spinæ (p. 378. ), are joined on
united the surface of the great sacro-sciatic ligament by loops.
gluteus. Two or three cutaneous offsets are derived from this intercommunication, and pierce the fibres of the gluteus maximus
to be distributed on the surface (p. 635.).
beneath
Gluteus medius The GLUTEUS MEDIUS is triangular in form, and has its
base at the innominate bone, and its apex at the femur. It arises arises from the outer surface of the os ilii, between the crest
ilii , and the superior curved line, except where the gluteus from os
GLUTEAL VESSELS. 639
serted
chanter.
maximus is attached, and from the strong fascia covering its
anterior part. The fibres of origin converge to a tendon
which is inserted into an impression on the outer surface of and inthe great trochanter, but between the tendon and the bone into trois a small bursa. The superficial surface is concealed in
part by the gluteus maximus, and the deep is in contact Connecwith the gluteus minimus, and with the gluteal vessels and
nerve. The anterior border is joined with the gluteus
minimus, and the posterior is contiguous to the pyriformis,
only the gluteal artery intervening.
-
tions.
gluteal
Dissection. When the gluteus medius is detached from the Detach gluteus ilium, and partly separated from the gluteus minimus beneath, the medius
gluteal vessels and nerve will come into view. The two chiefto see
branches of the artery and nerve, one being near the crest of the vessels
ilium, and the other lower down, are to be traced through the
fleshy fibres as the reflection of the gluteus is proceeded with, and
the nerve is to be followed on to the tensor vaginæ femoris muscle. and
A branch of the artery to the gluteus maximus has necessarily
been cut.
nerve.
artery is The gluteal artery is the largest branch of the internal Gluteal
iliac (p. 554. ), and issues from the pelvis above the pyriformis
muscle. On the dorsum of the ilium it ends in branches
that supply the gluteal muscles and the bone, and anastomose divided
with the other branches to this spot. Its named branches
are superficial and deep : -
into two:
a cial and . The superficial branch sends inwards a few twigs over the superfisacrum, and ends in the gluteus maximus, which it penetrates on
the under surface.
branch.
an upper
lower
b. The deep branch, which is the continuation of the artery, is deep subdivided into two. One (superior) courses along the origin of
the gluteus minimus with a branch of the nerve to the front of the This has
crest of the ilium, where it anastomoses with the ascending branches
of the external circumflex artery. The other division (inferior) is and a
directed forwards over the middle of the smallest gluteal muscle piece.
towards the lower anterior spine of the ilium and the great trochanter, and communicates also with the external circumflex
branches ; a few offsets from it pierce the muscle to supply the hipjoint.
Vein. The companion vein of this artery enters the Gluteal
pelvis, and ends in the internal iliac vein.
vein.
640 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Superior gluteal nerve
The superiorgluteal nerve is a branch of the lumbo- sacral
cord before this ends in the sacral plexus (p. 560.). It
is mus- accompanies the artery, and divides, like it, into two
branches that supply the two smallest gluteal muscles ; but
the lower branch may be traced into the tensor vaginæ
femoris.
cular.
Gluteus mini- mus.
ments.
The GLUTEUS MINIMUS is likewise conical in shape, and
arises from the dorsum of the ilium between the curved
Attach lines the fibres are collected on a tendon which is inserted
into the fore part of the great trochanter, where it is united
Is next with that of the gluteus medius. One surface is in contact
with the gluteus medius, and the gluteal vessels and nerve ;
the other with the hip-joint and the bone, and with the
outer head of the rectus femoris muscle. The anterior
border is blended with the other gluteus, and the posterior
touches the pyriformis muscle.
the bone,
and is joined with preced- ing.
Divide smallest gluteus.
Outer head of
tus ;
attached.
Dissection . — Divide the smallest gluteal muscle near the innominate bone, and define the tendinous part of the rectus femoris
which is close above the hip-joint. At the same time the deep
vessels to the articulation may be observed and followed.
The outer head of the rectus femoris is a slip of tendon
the rec- that reaches outwards, almost horizontally, above the margin
where of the acetabulum. In front it joins the other tendinous
piece of the rectus that is attached to the anterior inferior
spine of the ilium, and below it is connected by fibres with
the capsule of the hip-joint.
Origin in the pelvis.
Inser- tion into
femur ;
great
The PYRIFORMIS arises in the pelvis from the front of the
sacrum (p. 587.), and comes from that cavity through the
sacro-sciatic notch. Outside the pelvis it ends in a tendon,
that is inserted into the upper border of the great trothe chanter behind the gluteus minimus, with which it is frequently united. As the muscle passes through the sacrosciatic notch it divides that space into two parts : the upper
of these gives passage to the gluteal vesssels and nerve, and
the lower to the sciatic and pudic vessels and nerve.
Position upper border is contiguous to the gluteus medius, and its
parts . lower edge to the gemellus superior. Like the other rotator
lies in sacro- sciatic notch.
to other
Its
SCIATIC AND PUDIC VESSELS. 641
muscles in this situation it is covered by the gluteus
maximus, and rests on the hip-joint.
out the
nerves.
Dissection. The pyriformis may be cut across and raised to- Dissect
wards the sacrum, to allow the dissector to trace upwards the vessels
sciatic and pudic vessels, and the nerves of the same name to the and the
lower part ofthe sacral plexus. Some small offsets to the gemellus superior and to the hip-joint are to be sought at the lower
part of the plexus. A branch to the inferior gemellus and the
quadratus will be found by raising the trunk of the great sciatic
nerve ; but as it passes beneath those muscles it will be followed to
its termination after their examination.
vessels SCIATIC AND PUDIC VESSELS . The vessels on the back The
of the pelvis, below the pyriformis muscle, are branches ofhere
the internal iliac, like the gluteal artery (p. 552.).
come from the iliac.
The sciatic artery, after escaping from the pelvis below Sciatic
the pyriformis, descends over the gemelli and obturator artery ;
muscles, in the interval between the trochanter and the
tuberosity of the ischium, as far as the quadratus femoris ; course
here the artery ends in branches that supply the surrounding and
parts, and anastomose with the internal circumflex branch
of the profunda artery. In this course it furnishes muscular Branchoffsets to the great gluteus and the rotator muscles, and joint and
some articular branches to the hip-joint : it supplies also
the following named branches :
ending,
es to
muscles.
a. The coccygeal branch arising close to the pelvis perforates the Coccy- geal great sacro- sciatic ligament and the gluteus maximus, and ramifies branch.
in this muscle and on the back of the sacrum.
to the b. The branch to the great sciatic nerve (comes nervi ischiadici) is Branch
very slender, and enters the substance of the nerve near the pelvis ; sciatic
it extends in the nerve along the thigh, supplying offsets to it.
nerve.
c. The branch to the quadratus passes with the nerve of the same toBranch the
name beneath the gemelli and obturator internus, and gives quadrabranches to the hip -joint and the inferior gemellus before it ends
in its muscle.
tus.
artery The pudic artery is less than the sciatic, and internal to Pudic
it. Only a small part of the artery is seen on the back of
the pelvis, for, after winding over the spine of the ischium,
it enters the perinæal space through the small sacro-sciatic the isnotch to be there distributed (p . 407. ). It supplies a small
TT
crosses spine of
chium .
642 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Veins.
Nerves come from sacral
branch over the back of the sacrum, which anastomoses with
the gluteal and sciatic vessels, and another twig accompanies
the nerve to the obturator internus muscle.
The veins with the sciatic and pudic arteries receive contributing twigs corresponding to the branches of those arteries,
and open into the internal iliac vein.
SCIATIC AND PUDIC NERVES. -The nerves appearing at
the back of the pelvis, below the pyriformis, are branches of
plexus. the sacral plexus to the lower limb, or to parts exterior to
the pelvic cavity (p. 559.). Some small muscular branches
are present at the same spot.
Small sciatic nerve is chiefly a cuta- neous nerve ;
ends in the leg ;
gives branchThe small sciatic nerve springs from the lower part of the
sacral plexus generally by two parts, that sometimes remain
separate, and may be considered a cutaneous nerve of the
back of the thigh, for it supplies only the gluteus maximus
muscle. The nerve takes the course of the sciatic artery as
far as the lower border of the great gluteus, where it gives
many cutaneous branches upwards and downwards : much
diminished in size at that spot, the nerve is continued along
the back of the thigh beneath the fascia, and ends in the
integument of the posterior part of the leg. The branches
that are distributed above the region of the posterior part of
the thigh are muscular and cutaneous.
a. The muscular branches (inferior gluteal) enter the under surface of the gluteus maximus near its lower border. A separate gluteus offset of the sacral plexus is usually furnished to the upper part of es to
maxi- mus.
Cutane- ous nerves
buttock
the
the muscle.
b. The cutaneous branches are directed either upwards or downwards at the border of the gluteus. The upper set are distributed
over the in the superficial fascia over the lower part of the muscle, and the and to lower set supply the integument of the inner side of the thigh at
thigh ; the posterior aspect. One branch of the last set, which is larger
than the others, is distributed to the genital organs, and is named
inferior pudendal (p. 402. ) ; in its course to the perinæum it turns
below the tuberosity of the ischium, and perforates the fascia lata
only when it has nearly reached the perinæal space. Sometimes
the inferior pudendal is a distinct branch of the plexus.
one of the last set named puden- dal.
Great sciatic nerve ;
The great sciatic is the largest nerve in the body, and is
the source of all the muscular and most of the cutaneous
EXTERNAL ROTATOR MUSCLES. 643
of,
ing ;
in the
branches beyond the knee, as well as of the muscular branches outline
of the back of the thigh. At its origin from the sacral plexus
it appears to be a prolongation of this interlacement of nerves.
After leaving the pelvis, it is directed through the region of and endthe buttock to the posterior part of the thigh, where it
divides into two large trunks (internal and external popliteal),
that are continued to the leg. In the part of its course now course
dissected, viz., to the lower border of the gluteus maximus, buttock .
it lies on the external rotator muscles below the pyriformis,
in the hollow between the tuberosity of the ischium and the
great trochanter, where it is beneath the gluteus. Oftentimes the nerve is divided into two large trunks at its origin,
and one pierces the fibres of the pyriformis muscle. Com- No
monly it does not supply any branch to the buttock, but it in this
may give origin to a few filaments to the hip-joint.
branch
part.
nerve.
The pudic nerve winds over the spine of the ischium with Pudic
its companion artery and the nerve to the obturator internus
muscle, and is distributed with the vessel to the perinæum
and the genital organs (p. 408.). No branch is supplied by
it to the buttock.
The remaining muscular and articular branches are also Other
derived from the lower part of the sacral plexus.
branches of the plexus.
Some nerves to the hip-joint perforate the back of the capsular Nerves
ligament, and supply the articulation.
to the hip ;
Anerve to the superior gemellus is a very small twig, that arises to suseparately from the lower part of the plexus.
perior gemelNerve to
lus and
Anerve to the inferior gemellus and the quadratus is a slender lus .
branch, that passes with a companion artery beneath the gemelli gemel- and the obturator internus, and ends in the two muscles from quadrawhich it receives its designation. This nerve will be more fully
seen in a subsequent dissection, when articular filaments from it
to the hip-joint may be recognised.
-
tus.
rotator Dissection. -To see the remaining small rotator muscles, hook Clean
aside the great sciatic nerve, and take away the branches of the muscles.
sciatic artery if it may be necessary. In cleaning these muscles
keep the limb rotated inwards. The gemelli are to be turned
aside from the tendon of the obturator internus.
The SUPERIOR GEMELLUS is the highest of the two mus- Superior
cular slips along the tendon of the obturator muscle.
gemel- In- fus
TT 2
644 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
absent.
is often ternally it is attached to the spine of the ischium, and
externally it is inserted with the obturator into the great
trochanter. Oftentimes this muscle is absent.
Inferior gemel- lus
The INFERIOR GEMELLUS is larger and more constant than
its fellow. Its origin is connected with the upper and back
insert- part of the tuberosity of the ischium, and its insertion is the
same as that of the obturator tendon. This muscle is placed
between the obturator internus and quadratus muscles, but
near the femur the tendon of the obturator externus comes
into contact with its lower border.
ed with obtura- tor.
Obtura- tor in- ternus has part in
outside
latter part lies
The OBTURATOR INTERNUS arises inside the pelvis, and
passes to the exterior through the small sacro- sciatic notch
(p. 587.). The muscle is then directed outwards over the
articulation of the hip, and is inserted by a tendon with the
and part gemelli into the upper border of the great trochanter, in
pelvis ; front of the pyriformis, as well as into the inner surface of
that process above the pit at the root. Outside the pelvis the
over hip obturator is mostly tendinous, and is embraced by the gemelli joint ;
muscles ; crossing the muscle are the large and small sciatic
nerves and the sciatic vessels, and covering the whole is the
gluteus maximus. On cutting through the tendon, and
its ten- raising the inner end, it will be found divided into four or
five pieces as it turns over the margin of the pelvis ; at this
spot the pelvis is marked by ridges of cartilage that correspond to the intervals between the tendons, and the whole
is lubricated by a synovial membrane.
don is divided on the edge of the pelvis.
Quadraris ;
origin;
The QUADRATUS FEMORIS is of the form expressed by its tus femo- name, and is situate between the inferior gemellus and the
adductor magnus. Internally it arises from a ridge on the
outer part of the tuberosity of the ischium, close to the
inser- origin of the adductor magnus, and externally it is inserted
into the linea quadrata of the upper end of the femur, above
the attachment of the great adductor to the same line. By
one surface it is in contact with the sciatic vessels and
and be- nerves and the gluteus ; and by the other surface it rests on
neath it, the obturator externus, the internal circumflex artery, and
tion ;
parts above
the small branches of both the nerve and artery that supply
and at it. Between its lower border and the adductor magnus
SACRO- SCIATIC LIGAMENTS. 645
one of the terminal branches of the internal circumflex artery lower
issues.
―
border.
circum- flex
Dissection. The quadratus and the gemelli muscles may now Dissect
be cut across to dissect the obturator externus, the ending of the
internal circumflex artery, and the small nerve and artery to the artery.
same muscles.
circumartery
The internal circumflex branch of the profunda artery Internal
(p. 631.) divides finally into two parts. One ascends beneath flex
the quadratus, in this position of the body, to the pit of the
trochanter, where it anastomoses with the sciatic artery, and
supplies the bone. The other passes between the quadratus ends in
and adductor magnus to the hamstring muscles, and com- branchmunicates also with the sciatic artery.
two
es .
tor exinserted is insert- ed into
The OBTURATOR EXTERNUS has been dissected at its origin Obturain the front of the thigh ( p. 633. ). In the part of its course ternus
now laid bare, the muscle lies at first below the hip-joint,
but farther on it ascends from that position to be
into the pit at the root of the great trochanter.
back of the pelvis the obturator externus is covered by the Connec
quadratus, except near the femur, where the upper border is with
in contact with the inferior gemellus.
On the the chanter tro-.
tions
quadra- tus.
sciatic The SACRO- SCIATIC LIGAMENTS pass from the innominate Sacrobone to the sacrum and coccyx ; they are two in number, ligaand are named large and small.
ments.
ments
large
The large or posterior ligament is attached internally to Attachthe lower posterior spine of the ilium, and to the side of the ofthe
sacrum and coccyx ; and externally to the inner margin of one.
the tuberosity of the ischium. It is wide next the sacrum, Form;
but contracted towards its middle, and is expanded again at gives a
the ischial tuberosity, where it sends upwards a prolongation gation prolonalong the ramus of that bone. On the cutaneous surface
are the branches of the sacral nerves, and the gluteus maximus conceals and takes origin from it.
liga- The small ligament will be seen on dividing the other Small
near the tuberosity of the ischium. At the sacrum and ment ;
coccyx it is united with the large ligamentous band, but at attachthe opposite end it is inserted into the spine of the ischium.
ments ;
TT 3
646 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
they give rise to two notches :
with
It is less strong than the superficial ligament by which it is
concealed, and rests on the coccygeus muscle.
These ligaments convert the large sacro- sciatic notch of
the dried pelvis into two apertures or foramina by their
attachments to the bones. Between the insertion of the two
into the innominate bone (the spine and tuberosity) is the
small, small sacro- sciatic foramen, which contains the internal obcontents, turator muscle, the pudic vessels and nerve, and the nerve
to the same muscle. Whilst above the smaller ligament is
large, the large sacro-sciatic foramen, which gives passage to the and parts passing pyriformis muscle, and the several vessels and nerves above
through and below it, which have been already examined, viz. the
gluteal vessels, and the superior gluteal nerve above it ; and
the sciatic and pudic vessels and nerves, with some muscular
branches of the plexus below it.
it.
SECTION III.
THE BACK OF THE THIGH.
tions.
Direc- THE ham or the popliteal space may be taken next after the
buttock, in order that its size and boundaries may be less
disturbed than they would be after the examination of the
muscles at the back of the thigh. When this space has been
learnt the student will return to the dissection of the thigh.
Position. Position. The limb is to remain in the same position
as in the dissection of the buttock.
Takethe skin from
ham .
-- Dissection. To remove the skin from the part of the limb to
be examined, make an incision behind the knee-joint, beginning it
over the about six inches above the knee, and ending it four inches below
the joint. At each extremity of this longitudinal cut, let a transverse incision be made, so as to allow two flaps of skin to be raised,
the one outwards and the other inwards.
Seek the In the superficial fascia some small cutaneous nerves may be cutane- found, viz. one or two twigs in the middle line of the limb from
nerves. the small sciatic nerve beneath the fascia, and some offsets of the ous
internal cutaneous towards the inner part of the limb.
POPLITEAL SPACE. 647
of the
over the
After the fat is removed, the special fascia of the limb Fascia
(fascia lata) will be brought into view. Where it covers the limb
popliteal space it is strengthened by transverse fibres, par- ham.
ticularly on the outer side, and at each side it is connected
with the tendons bounding that interval. Sometimes the
short saphenous vein is seen to perforate it opposite the
knee, but usually at a spot lower down.
Dissection. -The fascia is now to be removed over the ham, Remove
fascia,
without injuring the small sciatic nerve and the short saphenous
vein, which are beneath it. A large quantity of fat is next to be and take
taken out of the ham, and the several vessels and nerves to be the fat made out. After the space has been cleaned, the sartorius and ham.
gracilis are to be replaced on the inner side.
from the
nerves in
space,
In the middle line the student will first come upon the large Seek the
internal popliteal nerve, and nearer the outer side on the external the
popliteal ; both give branches, and these will be recognised more
certainly by tracing them down the trunk of the nerve, than by
proceeding in the opposite direction. In fat bodies the small
nerves to the knee-joint are difficult to find. Under cover of the
outer boundary, and deep in the space, is an articular nerve (external), which sometimes arises from the great sciatic.
clean the In the bottom of the space are the popliteal vessels, and the vein and
is more superficial than the artery. The student is to seek an vessels.
articular branch (superior) on each side close above the condyle
of the femur. Numerous other branches of the vessels to the
muscles around, especially below, are to be cleaned. On the With obupper part of the artery the branch of nerve to the knee-joint
from the obturator may be found.
turator nerve.
ham ;
tion and
The POPLITEAL SPACE, or the ham, is a hollow behind the The
knee-joint, which contains the large vessels of the limb,
and allows of the free flexion of the joint. When dissected, situathis interval, which has the form of a lozenge, extends up- extent.
wards for one-third of the femur, and downwards for onesixth of the tibia ; but in the natural condition of the parts
the sides are approximated by the fascia of the limb, and the
space is limited almost to the region of the joint.
ries ;
The ham is situate between the attachments of the muscles Boundato the condyles of the femur, and the lateral boundaries are
therefore formed in part by the muscles of the thigh (hamstrings), and in part by those of the leg. Thus, on the
TT 4
648 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
outer
and inner.
Limit above
and below.
Deep bound- ary.
Greatest width and
contents .
outer side, is the biceps muscle, as far as the joint, and the
plantaris and the external head of the gastrocnemius are
below it ; but on the inner side, as low as the articulation,
are the semimembranosus and semitendinosus muscles, with
the gracilis and sartorius between these and the femur ; and
beyond that spot is the inner head of the gastrocnemius.
The upper point of the space is limited by the apposition of
the inner and outer hamstring muscles, in the middle line
of the thigh ; and the lower angle by the union of the heads
of the gastrocnemius. Stretched across this cavity is the
fascia lata ; and, forming the deep boundary, or the floor,
are the following parts, —the lower end of the posterior
surface of the femur included between the lines to the condyles, the posterior ligament of the joint, and the popliteus
muscle, with the upper end of the tibia.
The popliteal space is widest opposite the knee-joint, where
the muscles are most drawn to the sides, and is deepest above
depth ; the articular end of the femur. In it are contained, besides
the fat, the popliteal vessels and their branches, with lymphatics ; the popliteal divisions of the great sciatic nerve, and
some of their branches ; and the ending of the external
saphenous vein. The small sciatic nerve lies over the space,
and the branch of the obturator is on the artery in the bottom
of the cavity.
Popli- teal artery ;
The POPLITEAL ARTERY is the continuation of the femoral,
and reaches from the opening in the adductor magnus to the
extent ; lower border of the popliteus muscle, where it bifurcates
into the anterior and posterior tibial vessels. In a part of
part is in its extent this trunk lies in the ham, and is uncovered by
muscle ; but, inferiorly, it is beneath the gastrocnemius, and
and part beyond the limits of the popliteal space as above defined :
the description of the artery may, therefore, be divided into
two parts, corresponding with the difference in its connections.
the ham,
beyond.
The part
space ;
course
The part of the vessel in the ham is inclined obliquely in the from the inner side of the limb to the interval between the
condyles of the femur, and then along the middle of the
nections. space over the knee-joint. In this course it is overlaid at
first by the belly of the semimembranosus muscle, but thence
onwards to the gastrocnemius it is covered only by the fat,
and con-
POPLITEAL VESSELS. 649
of vein
the fascia lata, and the integuments ; behind it is the lower
part of the posterior surface of the femur, together with the
posterior ligament of the knee-joint. In contact with the
vessel, and somewhat on its outer side, lies the popliteal vein, Position
so that, on looking into the cavity, the arterial trunk is
almost covered by it ; but, lower down, in the interval between the heads of the gastrocnemius, the vein and its
branches altogether conceal the artery. More superficial
than the large vessels, and slightly external to them in posi- and of
tion, is placed the internal popliteal nerve, which, however, nerve.
like the vein, lies over the artery between the heads of the
gastrocnemius.
the
the head
nemius.
Dissection. —To see the artery beneath the gastrocnemius cut cut
through the inner head of the muscle, and, raising it, take away of the the cellular tissue from the vessels and nerves. The lower arti- gastroccular vessels and nerves are now brought into view ; the inner
artery is below the head of the tibia, and the outer higher up
between the tibia and fibula, with a vein and nerve.
tions of
artery
on.
of vein
nerve .
Whilst the artery is beneath the gastrocnemius it sinks Connecdeeply into the limb, and is crossed by a small muscle, the the
plantaris ; at this spot it rests on the popliteus muscle. farther
Both the vein and the nerve (internal popliteal) change their Position
position to the artery, and gradually cross over it, so as to and
lie on its inner side at the lower border of the popliteus.
Branches are furnished by the artery to the surrounding Branchmuscles, and to the articulation ; those that enter the joint
are five in number, and are called articular, viz. two superior,
inner and outer ; two inferior, also inner and outer ; and a
central or azygos branch.
es.
lar
es and
The muscular branches have not received separate names, Muscuwith the exception of those to the gastrocnemius and soleus, branchwhich are called sural arteries. One superficial or cutaneous cutanebranch accompanies the short saphenous nerve above the
muscles of the leg.
ous.
es to the
five ;
The superior articular arteries arise from the popliteal Branchtrunk, one from the inner and one from the outer side, above joint are
the condyles of the femur ; they are directed almost transversely beneath the hamstring muscles, and turn round the two subone to the front of the joint.
perior,
650 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
external
and in- ternal.
Two inferior ;
also ex- ternal
and in- ternal,
and one central
The external one perforates the intermuscular septum, and
divides in the substance of the vastus externus : some of the
branches end in that muscle, and anastomose with the external
circumflex ; others descend to the joint ; and one offset forms an
arch across the bone with the anastomotic artery.
The internal artery, oftentimes very small, winds beneath the
tendon of the adductor magnus, and ends in the vastus internus
in branches that supply it and the knee-joint, and communicate
with the anastomotic artery.
The inferior articular branches lie beneath the gastrocnemius, but are not on the same level on the two sides of the
limb, for the inner one descends below the head of the tibia,
whilst the outer one is placed between the tibia and the
fibula. Each lies beneath the lateral ligament of its own
side.
The external branch supplies the outer side of the knee-joint,
and anastomoses with the other vessels on the articulation, and
with the recurrent branch of the anterior tibial artery : it sends an
offset beneath the ligament of the patella to join a similar twig
from the corresponding artery of the opposite side.
The internal artery turns upwards to the joint at the anterior
border of the internal lateral ligament, and, after taking its share
in the free anastomoses over this part, ends in offsets for the joint
and the head ofthe tibia.
The azygos branch enters the back of the joint through
artery. the posterior ligament, and is distributed to the ligamentous
structures and the synovial membrane of the interior.
vein.
to the
Popliteal The POPLITEAL VEIN originates in the union of the venæ
comites of the anterior and posterior tibial vessels, and has
the same extent and connections as the artery it accompanies.
Position At the lower border of the popliteus muscle the vein is
artery. internal to the arterial trunk ; between the heads of the
gastrocnemius it is superficial to that vessel ; and thence to
the opening in the adductor magnus it is to the outer side,
Branch and close to the artery. It is joined by branches corresponding to those of the artery, as well as by the short saphenous
vein.
es.
Popliteal artery may
Peculiarities of the vessels. -The chief peculiarity of the popliteal
artery consists in its early division into its terminal branches. In some
POPLITEAL NERVES. 651
soon. bodies the artery is found divided as high as the back of the joint, and divide
in such instances the anterior tibial artery may lie beneath the popliteus
muscle.
leave
The popliteal vein may pass through the adductor magnus at a spot vein
higher than the common opening, to enter the profunda vein. Or there may
maybe a venous trunk on each side of the artery for a certain distance, the arin consequence of the venæ comites of the tibial arteries not being be split.
blended together as soon as usual.
tery or
nerves
and
ternal
The POPLITEAL NERVES are two large trunks that are Popliteal
derived from the division of the great sciatic in the thigh ; are two,
they are named internal and external from their relative
position. In the ham each furnishes cutaneous and articular inner
offsets, but only the inner one supplies branches to muscles. outer.
A. The internal popliteal nerve is larger than the The inexternal, and occupies the middle of the ham. Its connec- nerve
tions are the same as those of the artery, that is to say, it is space .
partly superficial and partly covered by the gastrocnemius :
like the vessel it extends through the back of the leg, and
retains the name popliteal only to the lower border of
the popliteus muscle. Its position with reference to the
vessels has been already noticed. The branches that arise Branchfrom it here are now to be described : -
in the
es are
three
lar ;
Two or three small articular twigs are furnished to the knee- two or
joint with the vessels. One is with the lower internal artery, and articu
is of considerable size ; and another takes the same course as the
azygos artery. Occasionally a third may be found with the upper
internal articular artery.
superfimuscles
Muscular branches arise from the nerve between the heads ofto the
the gastrocnemius. One supplies both heads of the gastrocnemius cial
and the plantaris ; another descends beneath that superficial muscle of the
of the leg to enter the cutaneous surface of the soleus ; and a and popthird penetrates the popliteus at the under aspect after turning round its lower border.
leg
liteus ;
saphenerve.
The external saphenous nerve (ram. communicans tibialis) is the external
largest branch, and is a cutaneous offset to the leg and foot. It nous
lies on the surface of the gastrocnemius, but beneath the fascia,
to about the middle of the leg, where it becomes cutaneous, as will
be afterwards seen (p. 658.) .
popliteal B. The external popliteal nerve (peroneal) lies along the External
outer boundary of the ham, and follows the biceps muscle to nerve.
652 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
the head of the fibula. Here the nerve enters the fibres of
the peroneus longus muscle, and divides beneath it into two,
Branch- musculo-cutaneous and anterior tibial. Its branches whilst es ;
one ar- ticular.
A com- municat- ing branch.
Cutane.
ous off.
sets.
Articu- lar
in the popliteal cavity are cutaneous and articular.
The articular nerve runs with the upper external artery to the
outer side of the knee, where it gives a twig to the lower articular
artery, and enters the joint.
The peroneal communicating branch (ram. communicans fibularis) is a cutaneous nerve, and joins the external saphenous
branch of the internal popliteal about the middle of the leg. It
arises near the head of the fibula, and soon pierces the deep fascia ;
cutaneous offsets are given by it to the back of the leg.
One or two other cutaneous offsets are furnished by the external
popliteal to the integument on the outer part of the upper half of
the leg.
The articular branch of the obturator nerve perforates the
nerve of adductor magnus, and is conducted by the popliteal artery to the
back of the knee-joint. After supplying filaments to the vessel,
the nerve enters the articulation through the posterior ligament.
the ob- turator.
Lymph- atic
around
The lymphatic glands of the popliteal space are joined by
glands the deep lymphatic vessels of the lower limb, and are situate
around the large arterial trunk. Two or three are ranged
on the sides, whilst one is superficial to, and another beneath the vessel.
the artery.
Dissect the back ofthe thigh .
cuDissection. Now the anatomy of the popliteal space has been
learnt, the student is to proceed with the dissection of the back of
the thigh. Divide therefore the piece of skin that remains between the buttock and the popliteal space, and reflect it to the
sides.
Seek out In the fat on the sides of the limb may be found offsets of the
taneous internal and external cutaneous nerves of the front of the thigh,
and along the middle line some filaments from the small sciatic nerves.
Clean muscles and nerves.
Three muscles
nerve.
Lastly, remove the deep fascia of the limb, taking care of the
small sciatic nerve ; and then clean the hamstring muscles, and
trace into them the branches of the great sciatic nerve.
The muscles on the back of the thigh act as flexors of the
On back leg. They extend from the pelvis to the bones of the leg,
of thigh . and are named hamstrings from their cord-like appearance on
the sides of the ham ; they are three in number, viz. biceps,
HAMSTRING MUSCLES. 653
tion. semitendinosus, and semimembranosus ; the first of these lies situaon the outer, and the others on the inner side of the popliteal
space.
arises by
short
The BICEPS has two heads of origin, long and short, which Biceps
are connected with the pelvis and the femur. The long head a long
arises from the back of the tuberosity of the ischium, in
common with the semitendinosus muscle : the short head is and a
fixed to the linea aspera, nearly as high as the gluteus max- head;
imus ; to nearly the whole of the line leading inferiorly to
the outer condyle ; and to the external intermuscular septum.
The fibres from these sources are collected together to form
the belly of the muscle, and end inferiorly in a tendon, which
is inserted into the head of the fibula by two processes that is insertembrace the external lateral ligament. The muscle is super-the fibuficial, except at the origin, where it is covered by the gluteus ;
and it rests on the upper part of the semimembranosus, on Connecthe great sciatic nerve, and on the adductor
ed into
la.
tions of magnus muscle. the
On the inner side is the semitendinosus muscle as far as the
ham. Its tendon gives offsets to the deep fascia of the
limb.
muscle.
tendiis attachpelvis
tibia.
The SEMITENDINOSUS is a slender muscle, and receives its Seminame from its appearance. It arises by fleshy fibres from nosus
the tuberosity of the ischium with the long head of the ed to
biceps, and is inserted into the inner surface of the tibia at and
the upper part, below the gracilis. This muscle, like the
biceps, is partly covered by the gluteus maximus, and rests
on the semimembranosus, and on the internal lateral ligament
of the knee-joint ; a tendinous intersection is to be observed
about its middle. The outer border is in contact with the Surbiceps as far as the popliteal space. As the tendon turns parts in
forwards to its insertion, an expansion is continued from it with it .
to the fascia of the leg.
rounding
contact
menibra- nosus
The SEMIMEMBRANOSUS muscle is tendinous at both ends, Semiand its name is taken from the membraniform appearance of
the upper tendon. Attached above to the tuberosity of the
ischium external to the semitendinosus and biceps, it is reaches
inserted below into the inner side of the head of the tibia. pelvis
The muscle presents a thick fleshy belly at the lower part,
where it bounds the popliteal space : on it is the semitenfrom
to tibia.
654 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Parts around it.
Great sciatic
the thigh
dinosus, which is lodged in a hollow in the upper tendon ; and
beneath it is the adductor magnus. Along the outer border
are placed the great sciatic nerve, and its inner branch (internal popliteal). The insertion of the muscle is dissected
with the tendons in connection with the knee-joint.
The great sciatic nerve lies on the adductor magnus
nerve in between the buttock and the popliteal space, and divides into
the two popliteal nerves about the middle of the thigh,
though its point of bifurcation may be carried upwards
as far as the pelvis. In this extent the nerve lies along
the outer border of the semimembranosus, and is crossed by
supplies the long head of the biceps. At its upper part it supplies
muscles. branches to the flexor muscles at the back of the thick, as
well as to the adductor magnus.
flexor
Small sciatic in the thigh ;
Small sciatic nerve. - Between the gluteus and the ham
this small nerve is close beneath the fascia, but it becomes
cutaneous below the knee, and runs with the external or
posterior saphenous vein for a short distance. Small
cutane- cutaneous filaments pierce the fascia, and the largest of
these is near the popliteal space.
ous off- sets.
Detach the ham- strings.
Poste- rior
adductor magnus.
Dissection.- Detach the hamstring muscles from the tuberosity
of the ischium, and throw them down, after cutting the branches
of arteries and nerves they receive. The posterior surface of the
adductor magnus, and the branches of the perforating arteries,
are then to be cleaned.
Adductor magnus.
-
At its posterior aspect the large
aspect of adductor is altogether fleshy, even to the opening for the
femoral artery ; and the fibres from the rami of the pubis
and ischium appear to form a part almost distinct from those
connected with the tuberosity of the ischium. In contact
with this surface are the hamstring muscles, and the great
sciatic nerve.
Hip- joint,
how formed ;
THE HIP-JOINT. ·-This articulation is a ball and socketjoint, in which the head of the femur is received into the
acetabulum, or the cup-shaped cavity of the innominate bone.
its liga Connecting the bones are the following ligaments : - one
to deepen the receiving cavity, which is named cotyloid ;
ments.
THE HIP-JOINT. 655
another between the articular surfaces of the bones, the
interarticular ; and a loose capsule around all.
Dissection.
-
bare the The muscles are to be taken away from the back Lay
of the hip- joint, and the upper and lower attachments of the capsule.
capsular ligament defined . Afterwards the front of the joint should be dissected after the same manner, with the body turned
over if it can be done.
ments
below.
The capsular ligament is a loose fibrous covering that is Capsule.
fixed by one end around the acetabulum, and by the other to
the neck of the femur. Its upper margin is attached to the Attachcircumference of the acetabular cavity at a short distance above
from the edge, as well as to a transverse ligamentous band
over the notch at the inner side of the hollow. Its lower
margin is inserted in front into the anterior trochanteric and
line, and behind into the neck of the femur about a finger's
breadth from the posterior trochanteric line, and the trochanters. The capsule is thinnest below, where it is in con- On the
tact with the obturator externus ; but in front it is thickened band of
by a band of fibres -ilio -femoral ligament, which crosses
from the lower of the two anterior spines of the ilium to the
trochanteric line. Posteriorly the joint is covered by the Muscles
external rotator muscles ; anteriorly by the psoas and iliacus,
and a bursa ; and below by the obturator externus.
front is a
fibres.
around.
the cap- Dissection -Divide the capsular ligament over the prominence Cut open
of the head of the femur, and disarticulate the bone to see the sule.
cotyloid and interarticular ligaments.
loid litransThe cotyloid ligament is a band of fibro-cartilage, which is Cotyfixed to the margin of the acetabulum, and is prolonged gament
across the notch on the inner side, so as to give rise to the forms
transverse ligament. It is thickest at its attachment to the verse,
bone, and becomes gradually thinner towards the free mar- attached
gin, which is applied to the head of the femur. This liga- acetabu
ment deepens the socket for the femur in the same manner
as the glenoid ligament increases the surface for the reception
of the head of the humerus.
around
lum .
The interarticular ligament (ligam. teres) is a strong band Round liga- which connects the femur with the innominate bone. One ment
extremity is roundish, and is inserted into the pit in the
656 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
is divid- head of the femur ; the other is bifid, and is connected to the
ternally. sides ofthe notch in the cotyloid cavity.
ed exmem- brane.
Synovial A synovial membrane lines the capsular ligament, and is
continued over the neck and head of the femur to the acetabulum. In the bottom of the cotyloid cavity it covers the
mass known as the synovial gland, and surrounds the ligaDetach the limb.
Articu- lar sur- faces of the bones.
mentum teres.
Dissection. ― The lower limb is now to be separated from the
trunk by dividing the interarticular ligament, and cutting through
any parts that attach it, to see the acetabulum.
Surfaces ofbone. —Thearticular surfaces of the bones are
for the most part covered with cartilage, but in the head of
the femur is a pit into which the round ligament is inserted ;
and in the bottom of the acetabulum is a space free from
cartilage, in which is lodged a reddish fatty mass with an
Synovial unctuous feel, called the synovial gland. Beneath the trans- gland.
verse ligament branches ofan artery and nerve enter the joint.
mine the
SECTION IV.
THE BACK OF THE LEG.
Exa- BEFORE the dissection of the leg is begun, the student should
surface. make himself acquainted, as in the thigh, with the prominences of bone or muscle on the surface, and with the markings that lead to the position of the subjacent vessels.
In the leg the Marks on the surface. The bones of the leg can be
tibia and traced beneath the skin from the knee to the ankle-joint.
fibula On the inner side of the limb the tibia is subcutaneous in
perficial . all its extent, and is limited internally and externally by a
are susharp ridge. Above, it presents in front a prominent tubercle into which the ligament of the patella is inserted ; and below, it ends on the inner side of the ankle in the internal
malleolar projection. On the outer side of the leg the fibula
may be felt with ease in the lower half of its length, but
with more difficulty in the upper half in consequence of the
prominence of the muscles of the calf : the head of the bone
SURFACE MARKING OF THE LEG. 657
the leg.
Achilmay be recognised below the knee ; and the lower end forms
the projection (malleolus) on the outer side of the anklejoint. The calf of the leg is formed by the superficial layer Calf of
of muscles, and from it descends the firm band of the tendo
Achillis, by which those muscles are connected with the heel. Tendo
Between the tendon and the edge of the tibia, but nearest the lis.
former, is the part of the posterior tibial artery that is super- Tibial
ficial. In front, between the tibia and fibula, are the exten- postesor muscles of the foot and toe, amongst which the anterior anterior.
tibial artery lies deeply : the position of the vessel will be
indicated by a line from the centre of the ankle-joint to a
point midway between the upper ends of the bones.
vessels
rior and
joint. On the sides of the ankle-joint are the prominent malleoli, Ankleand when the joint is extended the head of the astragalus
projects below the border of the tibia.
border of At the inner border of the foot, about an inch from the Inner
internal malleolus, is the prominent scaphoid bone pointing the foot.
out the spot at which an amputation (that of Chopart) is
made ; whilst farther forwards, by about one inch and a
half, is a slight depression that marks the articulation between the internal cuneiform bone and the metatarsal bone
of the great toe. About the centre of the outer border of Outer
the foot is the eminence of the tarsal end of the fifth metatarsal bone. A line over the dorsum of the foot, from the Dorsal
centre of the ankle-joint to the interval between the two
inner toes, will be over the position of the artery of this
part.
-
border.
artery.
of the Position. For the dissection of the back of the leg the Position
limb is to be placed on its front, with the foot over the side part.
of the dissecting table, and the muscles of the calf are to be
put on the stretch by fastening the foot.
―
away the Dissection. Divide the skin along the middle of the leg to the Take
sole of the foot, where a transverse cut is to be made over the skin.
heel. Raise the two flaps of skin, detaching the outer one as far
as the fibula, and the other to the inner margin of the tibia.
taneous In the superficial fascia the cutaneous nerves and vessels are to Seek cube followed. On the inner side, close to the tibia, is the internal nerves
saphenous vein with the nerve of the same name, together with
twigs of the internal cutaneous near the knee. In the centre is the
U U
in the fat.
658 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Super- ficial
external saphenous vein, with the small sciatic nerve above, and
with the external saphenous nerve below the middle of the leg.
On the outer side are the cutaneous offsets of the external
popliteal nerve.
The superficialfascia or the fatty layer of the back of the
fascia. leg is least in quantity over the tibia. Where the superficial vessels are situate it may be separated into two layers
as in the thigh.
Two su- perficial SUPERFICIAL VEINS. -Two veins appear in this dissecveins. tion of the back of the leg which are named saphenous, inner
and outer.
Internal saphe- nous.
External saphe- nous.
Cutane- ous nerves.
Internal saphethe leg.
The internal saphenous vein begins in an arch on the
dorsum of the foot, and ascends along the leg in front of
the inner ankle, and then behind the inner edge of the
tibia to reach the thigh, where it has been already noticed
(p. 602. ). In the leg the vein is joined by both superficial
and deep branches.
The external saphenous vein begins at the outer end of
the arch on the dorsum of the foot, and appears below the
outer ankle. The vein then courses along the back of the leg
to the ham, where it ends in the popliteal vein. It receives
large branches about the heel, and others on the back of the
leg.
-
CUTANOUS NERVES. The nerves in the superficial fascia
of the back of the leg are prolongations of branches already
examined in part, viz. the internal and external saphenous,
cutaneous offsets of the external popliteal, the small sciatic
nerve, and offsets of the internal cutaneous of the thigh.
The internal saphenous nerve, which has been traced before to
nous in the knee (p. 605.) , accompanies the vein of the same name in the
leg nearly to the end of the tibia, where it divides into two
branches :-one continues along the edge of the tibia to the integument about the inner ankle ; the other extends as far as the
Termi- middle of the inner border of the foot. In the leg the nerve gives
off lateral cutaneous offsets, and the outer of these turn over the
tibia to the anterior aspect.
nation.
External saphe- nous The external saphenous nerve is a branch of the internal popliteal
(p. 651.) ; perforating the deep fascia about the middle of the leg,
CUTANEOUS VESSELS AND NERVES. 659
the foot ;
it is continued with the external saphenous vein below the outer ends on
ankle, and is distributed to the outer side of the foot and little toe.
As soon as the nerve appears it is joined by the communicating branch- branch of the external popliteal, and near the heel it gives large leg.
long branches to the integuments.
es to the
es ofthe Cutaneous nerves of the external popliteal. —One branch of the Branchexternal popliteal trunk (r. communicans fibularis, p. 652.) joins popliteal
the external saphenous nerve usually about the middle of the leg, commu- but it is not uncommon to find this branch extend as a distinct nicating
nerve, unconnected with the other, as far as the heel. The other
small cutaneous offsets of the external popliteal are now dissected to and cutheir termination over the outer side of the leg.
taneous.
nation of
sciatic.
The small sciatic nerve perforates the fascia near the popliteal Termispace, and reaches with the external saphenous vein to about the small
middle of the leg ; it ramifies in the integuments, and joins the
external saphenous nerve.
Offsets ofthe internal cutaneous. -Behind the internal saphenous Terminerve, near the knee, are the terminal branches of the inner di- internal
vision of the internal cutaneous nerve of the thigh (p. 604.) ; these
extend to the middle or the lower third of the leg, and communicate with the internal saphenous nerve.
nation of
cutane- ous.
awaythe Dissection. The deep fascia will be seen by removing the fat. Take
The superficial vessels and nerves may either be cut or turned fat.
aside.
fascia.
nuation
The special or deep fascia on the posterior aspect of the Deep
leg covers the muscles, and sends a thick process between
the deep and superficial layers. Above it is continuous with Contithe investing membrane of the thigh, and receives offsets
from the tendons about the knee ; below it joins the internal
annular ligament. Externally it is continued uninterruptedly and
from one aspect of the limb to another, but internally it is
fixed tothe edge of the tibia. Veins are transmitted through
it from the superficial to the deep vessels.
-
attach- ment.
away the Dissection. -The fascia is to be divided along the centre of the Take
leg as far as the heel, and taken from the surface of the gastrocne- fascia.
mius muscle. The cleaning the fibres of the muscle will be facilitated by fixing with a stitch the inner head that has been cut.
in super- Superficial layer of muscles. —In the calf of the leg there Muscles
are three muscles, gastrocnemius, soleus, and plantaris : the ficial
two first are large, and give rise to the prominence on the layer.
UU 2
660 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Gastro- cnemius
by two
from the
surface, but the last is inconsiderable in size and is chiefly
tendinous.
The GASTROCNEMIUS is the most superficial muscle ; it
is united below in a common tendon, but has two heads
above, which connect it with the condyles of the femur.
arises The inner head of origin is attached by a tendon to the
heads inner condyle behind the insertion of the adductor magnus,
femur, and by fleshy fibres to the line above the condyle ; and the
outer head is fixed to the corresponding condyle above the
ends be- attachment of the popliteus muscle. These pieces are
tendo blended inferiorly in a large fleshy belly, and are terminated
by the common tendon of insertion of the muscles of the
superficial layer. One surface is covered by the fascia, and
the other is in contact with the soleus and plantaris, and
with the popliteal vessels and the internal popliteal nerve.
The heads by which the muscle arises assist to form the
lateral boundaries of the popliteal space.
low in
Achillis.
Parts covered by it.
Detach part of
- Dissection. To see the soleus, detach the remaining head of the
gastro- gastrocnemius, cutting across the vessels and nerves it receives.
cnemius. Throw down the muscle, and clean the soleus and the plantaris.
Soleus
is at- tached to the bones of
The SOLEUS is a large flat muscle that is attached to both
bones of the leg, and terminates, like the gastrocnemius, in
the strong common tendon. It arises from the head and
the upper third of the posterior surface of the fibula ; from
the leg, the oblique line across the tibia, and from the inner edge of
the bone in its middle third ; and between the bones from
an aponeurotic arch over the large blood-vessels. Its fibres
and joins are directed downwards and outwards to the aponeurotic
part of the muscle. The superficial part of the soleus is in
contact with the gastrocnemius, and the opposed surfaces of
the two are aponeurotic. Beneath the muscle are the bones
of the leg, the deep layer of flexors, and the vessels and
below the tendon.
Tendo Achillis.
nerves.
The common tendon of the gastrocnemius, soleus, and plantaris (tendo Achillis) is the strongest in the body ; it comExtent mences about the middle of the leg, though it receives fleshy
and in- fibres much lower, and is inserted into the lower part of the
os calcis at the posterior aspect, but a bursa intervenes be- sertion.
FLEXOR MUSCLES OF THE LEG. 661
tween it and the upper part of that bone. The tendon is
close beneath the fascia, and lying along its outer side, but
superficial to it, is the external saphenous vein.
taris
from
outer
The PLANTARIS is remarkable in having the longest ten- Plandon in the body, which has somewhat the appearance of a
riband when it is stretched laterally. The fibres of the
muscle arise from the line above the outer condyle of the arises
femur, and from the posterior ligament of the knee joint, the
and soon end in the tendon which is inserted into the os condyle,
calcis with or by the side of the tendo Achillis. The belly
of the muscle, which is about three inches in length, is con- and joins
cealed by the gastrocnemius, but the tendon appears on the tendon..
inner side of the tendo Achillis about the middle of the
leg. This little muscle crosses the popliteal vessels, and lies
on the soleus.
---
common
clean
Dissection. The soleus is to be detached from the bones of the Detach
leg, and the vessels and nerves it receives divided, but in raising it the soleus,
student should take care not to injure the fascia and the deep vessels and nerves. The gastrocnemius and soleus may next be removed
by cutting through their tendon near the os calcis. Then the piece and
of fascia between the muscles of the superficial and deep layer is to the deep
be cleaned; and the integuments between the inner ankle and the fascia.
heel are to be taken away to expose the annular ligament, but a
cutaneous nerve in this spot to the sole of the foot is not to be
destroyed. Lastly the student should open the bursa between the
tendo Achillis and the os calcis, if this has not been done.
part
fascia
leg.
Deep part ofthe fascia. —This intermuscular layer of the Deep
fascia of the leg is fixed to the tibia and fibula, and binds of the
down the deep layer of flexor muscles. Beneath the soleus of the
it is thin and indistinct, but below that muscle it is much
stronger, and is marked by some transverse fibres near the
malleoli, which give it the appearance of an annular ligament
in that situation. Inferiorly it joins the annular ligament
between the heel and the inner ankle.
muscles.
Dissection. -Remove the fascia, and clean the deep layer of Clean
muscles. At the same time follow carefully the trunks and offsets the deep of the posterior tibial and peroneal vessels, and of the nerve. The
muscle between the bones (tibialis posticus) is partly concealed by
an aponeurosis which gives origin to the flexors on its sides, and
will not fully appear till that is divided.
UU 3
662 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Four muscles in the deep
Deep layer ofmuscles. -The deep flexor muscles at the
back of the leg are four in number, viz. popliteus, flexor
layer. longus pollicis, flexor longus digitorum, and tibialis posticus.
tion and
tion.
teus arises within
The first of these is close to the knee-joint, covered by a
special aponeurosis. The flexors lie on the bones, that of the
Posi- great toe being on the fibula, and that of the other toes on
the tibia ; whilst the last muscle covers the membrane bedestina- tween the bones. With the exception of the popliteus, all
enter the sole of the foot, and have a fleshy part parallel to
the bones of the leg, and a tendinous part beneath the tarsus.
The POPLITEUS is attached within the capsule of the kneePopli- joint by a tendon to the fore part of a depression on the
outer condyle of the femur, below the external lateral ligaknee- ment. External to the joint the tendon gives attachment to
the fleshy fibres which spread out, and are inserted into the
tibia above the oblique line on the posterior surface. The
muscle lies on the tibia, and is covered by a fascia, derived
in great part from the tendon of the semimembranosus
muscle. On it lie the popliteal vessels and nerve, with the
gastrocnemius and plantaris. Along the upper border are
the lower articular vessels and nerve of the inner side of the
knee, but the insertion corresponds to the origin of the
soleus from the tibia. The origin of the muscle is seen with
the dissection of the ligaments of the knee-joint.
joint.
Inserted into tibia.
Parts around it.
Flexor longus
is atto fibuThe FLEXOR LONGUS POLLICIS PEDIS arises from the two
pollicis lower thirds of the posterior surface of the fibula, slightly
tached from the lower part of the interosseous membrane, and from
la, the aponeurosis over the tibialis. Inferiorly the tendon of
the muscle enters a groove in the astragalus, and afterwards
crosses the sole of the foot to reach the great toe. In part
is partly the muscle is covered by the soleus, but in part is supersuper- ficial and in contact with the fascia ; it rests on the fibula
and lower end of the tibia, and conceals the peroneal vessels.
Muscles Along the inner side are the posterior tibial nerve and vessels,
vessels and contiguous to the outer margin, but separated by fascia,
are the peronei muscles.
ficial.
and
on sides.
Flexor longus The FLEXOR LONGUS DIGITORUM PEDIS has some fibres of
digito- origin from the aponeurosis covering the tibialis muscle, and rum lies
on tibia ; is connected with the posterior surface of the tibia below the
POSTERIOR TIBIAL VESSELS. 663
liga- popliteus, as low as three inches from the extremity. Its inthe
tendon enters a partition in the annular ligament behind the ment ;
sheath for the tibialis, and escaped from the ligament divides
in the sole of the foot into tendons for the four outer toes.
Part of the muscle is beneath the soleus ; but below that it is part is
in contact with the fascia, and the posterior tibial nerve and ficial
vessels lie on it. The deep surface rests on the tibia, and on soleus.
the tibialis posticus.
superbelow
covers
seous mem- brane,
crosses beneath
flexor
The TIBIALIS POSTICUS occupies the interval between the Tibialis
bones of the leg, but inferiorly it crosses beneath the long interosflexor of the toes to reach the inner side of the foot. The
muscle arises from the posterior surface of the interosseous
membrane, from the contiguous surfaces of the tibia and
fibula, but most from the tibia, and from the aponeurosis that
covers it. Having crossed beneath the flexor digitorum, the
tendon enters the inner space in the annular ligament, and the
reaches the inner side of the foot to be inserted into the ofthe
scaphoid bone. The tibialis is concealed by the aponeurosis
before mentioned, and is overlapped by the contiguous Muscles
muscles, but in the lower fourth of the leg it is placed between
the tibia and the long flexor of the toes on the muscle too
are the posterior tibial vessels and nerve. The upper part
presents two pointed processes of attachment to the bones,
between which the anterior tibial vessels are directed
forwards.
toes.
and vessels in con- nection with it.
muscle The aponeurosis covering the tibialis is attached laterally The
to the bones, but has a defined border inferiorly over the covered
muscle. By one surface it gives origin to the flexors of the
toes, and by the other to the tibialis.
by an aponeu- rosis.
The POSTERIOR TIBIAL ARTERY is one of the branches resulting from the bifurcation of the popliteal trunk. The
trunk of the vessel extends from the lower border of the po- Extent.
pliteus muscle to the lower part of the internal annular
ligament, where it enters the sole of the foot, and ends in
two plantar branches. At its origin the artery lies midway Course.
between the tibia and fibula, but as it approaches the lower
part of the leg it gradually inclines inwards, and at its termination is placed below the tibia, in the centre of the hollow
between the heel and inner ankle.
UU 4
664 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Parts covering
per
half
and
Parts beneath it.
As far as the middle of the leg (in length) the vessel is
the up- concealed by two muscles of the calf, viz. the gastrocnemius
lower and soleus, but below them it is covered only by the integuments and the deep fascia as it lies between the tendo
Achillis and the inner edge of the tibia ; at its termination
it is beneath the annular ligament. For the greatest part of
its extent the arterial trunk lies over the tibialis posticus,
but afterwards on the flexor digitorum, and on the lower
end of the tibia. Venæ comites (posterior tibial veins) closely
surround the vessel. The posterior tibial nerve is at first
internal to the artery, but at the distance of one inch and a
half it is placed on the outer side, and retains that position
throughout.
Veins.
Nerve.
Branch- es .
Muscu- lar.
Nutri- tious to
This artery supplies branches to the muscles and the
tibia, and a large peroneal trunk to the outer side of the leg.
Muscular branches supply the deep layer of muscles and the
soleus ; an offset from a branch to the latter muscle pierces the
fleshy attachment to the tibia, and ascends to the knee-joint.
Anutritious artery of the tibia is uncertain in its place of origin,
tibia. but it enters the canal on the posterior surface of the bone, and
ramifies in the interior.
Commu- nicating.
Pero- neal artery
tained in
pollicis .
A communicating branch to the peroneal arises opposite the lower
end of the tibia, and passes outwards beneath the flexor pollicis, to
unite in an arch with a corresponding offset of the peroneal artery.
The peroneal artery is often as large as the posterior
tibial, and arises from that vessel about one inch and a half
from the beginning. It takes the fibula as its guide, and
is con- lying close to the bone in the fibres of the flexor pollicis,
flexor reaches the lower part ofthe interosseous membrane. At this
spot it sends forwards a branch to the front of the leg (anterior peroneal), and continues over the articulation between
the tibia and fibula to the outer side of the foot, where it
Termi- terminates in branches that anastomose with the tarsal and
external plantar arteries. Two companion veins surround
the artery.
nation.
Branch- es .
Muscu- lar.
Branches. Besides the anterior peroneal, it furnishes
muscular, nutritious, and communicating offsets.
Muscular branches are distributed to the soleus and the deep
flexors, and some turn round the fibula to the peronei muscles.
POSTERIOR TIBIAL NERVE. 665
The nutritious artery is smaller than that to the tibia, and enters Nutrithe aperture about the middle of the fibula.
tious to fibula.
The anterior peroneal branch passes forwards through an aper- Anterior
ture in the lower part of the interosseous membrane, and is directed peroneal
in front of the fibula to the dorsum and outer part of the foot : on
the front of the leg and foot it anastomoses with the external mal- to front leolar and tarsal branches of the anterior tibial artery.
offoot.
nicating.
Acommunicating offset near the ankle joint joins in an arch, as Commubefore described, with a similar branch of the posterior tibial ;
sometimes there is a second arch between the same vessels.
changes.
varies.
Peculiarities in the arteries. The posterior tibial artery may be Size of
smaller than usual, or absent ; its place will then be supplied in the foot tibial
by a large peroneal artery, that is directed inwards at the lower end of Origin ofpero- the tibia, and either joins the small tibial vessel, or runs alone to the neal foot. The peroneal artery may arise from the popliteal, or from the
anterior tibial artery ; and its anterior peroneal branch may take the tutions.
place of the anterior tibial artery on the dorsum of the foot. Thus the
deficiency in one of the arteries of the foot is supplied by a large offset ofthe other.
Substiterior
veins.
The posterior tibial veins begin on the inner side of the Posfoot by the union of the plantar veins ; they ascend one on tibial
each side of their artery, and unite with the anterior tibial
veins at the lower border of the popliteus to form the large
popliteal vein. They receive the peroneal veins, and branches
corresponding to the offsets of the artery : further, branches
connect them with the saphenous veins.
rior
nerve.
The posterior tibial nerve is a continuation of the internal Postepopliteal, and reaches, like the artery, from the lower border tibial
of the popliteus muscle to the interval between the os calcis
and the inner malleolus. Near this spot, whilst beneath the
annular ligament or somewhat higher than it, the nerve Extent
divides into the internal and external plantar branches of
the foot. Its connections with surrounding parts are the and consame as those of the artery ; but its position to the vessels
changes, for it lies on the inner side of the posterior tibial Position
artery above the origin of the peroneal offset, but on the artery.
outer side thence to its termination. Its lateral branches Branchare chiefly muscular.
nections.
to the
es.
lar tothe Muscular branches enter the deep flexors, and arise either at Muscuseparate points along the trunk, or together from the popliteal deep flexors.
666 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Cutanerve. There is an offset for each muscle, except the popliteus,
but the branch for the tibialis is the largest, and that for the flexor
pollicis lies on the peroneal artery.
A cutaneous nerve of the sole of the foot pierces the internal anneous of nular ligament, and ends in the integument of the inner and under
part of the heel ; this nerve will be followed to its termination in
the dissection of the foot.
the foot.
Internal annular The internal annular ligament is placed between the heel
liga- and inner ankle, and serves to confine the tendons of the ment. deep flexor muscles of the foot and toes. Attached by a
Attach- pointed part to the internal malleolus, the fibres diverge ments.
Protherefrom to be inserted into the os calcis. One border
(upper) is continuous with the fascia of the leg, and the opposite one gives attachment to the abductor pollicis muscle
of the foot. From the under or deep surface are given off
it sepa- processes, that separate and form sheaths for the tendons.
When the sheaths are opened, the innermost will be found to
contain the tibialis posticus, which is lodged in a groove in
their po- the malleolus : immediately behind this is another
cesses of
rate the tendons,
forming sheaths ;
sition ;
for space
the flexor digitorum ; and about three quarters of an inch
nearer the os calcis, is the interval in which the flexor
lined by pollicis lies contained in a groove in the astragalus. Each synovial sheath is lined by a synovial membrane.
mem- brane.
Tibial
nerve beneath
ment.
-
Vessels beneath the ligament. The posterior tibial vessels
vessels in passing beneath the ligament lie between the tendons of
the flexor pollicis and flexor digitorum, but rather nearer
the liga- the latter ; and the artery here supplies small offsets to the
tarsus and the ankle-joint. Occasionally the artery divides
beneath, or even above the ligament. The nerve is nearer
than the artery to the os calcis, and is sometimes bifurcated
beneath the ligament, so that a trunk may lie on each side
of the tibial vessels.
THE PLANTAR FASCIA. 667
SECTION V.
THE SOLE OF THE FOOT.
of the Position. THE foot is to be placed over a block of some Position
thickness with the sole towards the dissector, and the part is part.
to be made tense by fastening down, and separating the
toes.
the Dissection. The skin is to be raised as two flaps, inner and Raise
outer, by means of one incision along the centre of the sole from skin
the heel to the anterior part, and by another across the foot at the
root of the toes. Afterwards the skin is to be removed from each
toe, and the lateral digital vessels and nerves are to be dissected
out at the same time. In the fat near the heel the student should and disfollow the cutaneous nerve of the sole of the foot, and trace out, at cutaa little distance from each border of the foot, some small branches neous
of the plantar nerves and arteries.
sect
nerves.
taneous The subcutaneous fat of the sole of the foot is very Subcuabundant, and forms the thickest cushion over the parts that fat.
press most on the ground in standing, viz. over the os calcis,
and the line of the metatarso-phalangeal articulations.
the Dissection. -The fat is now to be removed, and the plantar Lay bare
fascia laid bare. Begin the dissection near the heel, and follow plantar
forwards the fascia towards the toes, to each of which a process is fascia,
to be traced. In the intervals between these processes the digital
nerves and arteries will be found, covered by much cellular and and the digital fibrous tissue ; but the vessels and nerves to the inner side of the vessels
great toe and outer side of the little toe pierce the fascia farther and
back than the rest.
nerves.
ment of
The student is next to define a transverse fibrous band between Define the liga- the toes over the digital vessels and nerves ; and when this is dissected, to remove the fat from the toes to see the sheaths of the
tendons.
-
the toes.
fascia.
Plantar fascia. The special fascia of the sole of the Plantar
foot is of a pearly white colour and great strength, and sends
septa between the muscles. Its thickness varies in different
parts of the foot, and from this circumstance, and from the
existence of longitudinal hollows where the two chief inter-
668 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Division muscular septa are attached, the fascia is divided into a
parts. central and two lateral parts.
into
Central part
into five
The central part, which is much the thickest, is pointed
at its attachment to the os calcis, but widens and becomes
thinner as it extends forwards. Opposite the heads of the
divides metatarsal bones it divides into five processes which are conpieces. tinued onwards to the toes, one to each. If one of the
processes is divided longitudinally, and its parts reflected to
Termi. the sides, it will be seen to join in the centre the sheath of
of the the flexor tendons, whilst on the sides it is attached to the pieces.
margins of the metatarsal bone, and to the ligament uniting
Arched one bone to another. Where the processes separate from
over ves- one another, the digital vessels and nerves and the lumnation
fibres
sels.
Inner part of the fascia ;
outer part.
Expose the septa.
Two interlar
inner
bricales muscles become superficial, and transverse fibres
arch over them in these intervals. A slight depression,
corresponding to an intermuscular septum, marks on each
side the limit of the central piece.
The lateral parts of the fascia are thinner than the central one. On the inner margin of the foot the fascia has
but little strength, and is continued to the dorsum ; but on
the outer side it is increased in thickness, and presents a
strong band between the os calcis and the projection of the
fifth metatarsal bone.
Dissection. -To examine the septa make a longitudinal incision
along the centre of the foot, and a transverse one near the calcaOn detaching the fascia from the subjacent flexor brevis
digitorum, by carrying the scalpel from before backwards, the
processes will appear on the sides of that muscle.
neum.
The intermuscular septa pass down on the sides of the
muscu- flexor brevis digitorum, and separate the three muscles in the
septa ; superficial layer of the sole of the foot. The inner one lies
between the short flexor and the abductor pollicis, and is
perforated by the internal plantar nerve, and by the tendon
of the flexor pollicis longus. The outer one, between the
short flexor and the abductor minimi digiti, is pierced by
the digital nerve and artery for the outer side of the little
toe. A piece of fascia reaches across the foot from one
septum to the other, beneath the short flexor.
and outer.
FIRST LAYER OF MUSCLES. 669
verse
of the
The transverse ligament crosses the roots of the toes, and Transis contained in the skin forming the web of the foot. It is ligament
a band of fibres which is attached at the extremities to the toes.
great and little toes, and is connected with the sheath of the
tendons of each of the others, as it passes over it. Beneath
it are the digital nerves and vessels.
of flexor The sheaths of the flexor tendons are similar to those of Sheaths
the fingers though not so distinct, and serve to confine the tendons.
tendons against the grooved bones. The sheath is weak
opposite the articulations between the phalanges, but is
strengthened by a band opposite the centre ofboth the metatarsal and the next phalanx. Each is lubricated by a synovial membrane, and contains a tendon of both the long and
short flexor muscle.
first
muscles .
Dissection. To prepare the first layer of muscles of the foot, Dissect
take away all the fascia, and be careful of the digital branches of layer of
the plantar nerves, which become superficial to the muscles towards
the toes. Follow the tendons of the short flexor muscle to the
toes, and open the sheaths in which they are contained.
-
are in
layers ;
muscles
Muscles ofthe foot. In the sole of the foot the muscles Muscles,
are numerous, and have been arranged in four layers. In four
the first layer, which is now visible, are three muscles, viz. , three
theflexor brevis digitorum, the abductor pollicis, and abductor in the
minimi digiti. One of these, the short flexor of the toes, is
in the centre of the foot, and each of the others is in a line
with the toe on which it acts.
first.
The ABDUCTOR POLLICIS is the most internal of the muscles Abduc- tor pol- of the superficial layer, and is bifurcated at its posterior at- licis
tachment. It takes origin from the internal annular liga- origin ;
ment, from the larger tubercle on the under part of the
os calcis, and from the fascia of the foot. In front the muscle
ends in a tendon, which is joined by fibres of the short flexor
of the great toe, and is inserted, with the tendon of the
into the inner side of the metatarsal phalanx of the great
toe, at the base. The cutaneous surface of the muscle is in conneccontact with the plantar fascia ; and the other touches the
plantar vessels and nerves, the tendons of the long flexors of
the toes, and the accessory muscle.
same,
inser- tion ;
tions .
670 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Flexor brevis
rum
divides
The FLEXOR BREVIS DIGITORUM (flexor perforatus) arises
digito- posteriorly by a pointed part from the inner side of the larger
tubercle of the os calcis, and from the plantar fascia and its
septa. About the centre of the foot the muscle ends in four
small tendons, which are directed forwards over the tendons
of the long flexor, and enter the sheaths of the four smaller
toes to be inserted into the middle phalanges. In the sheath
of the toe the tendon of this muscle lies at first on that of
the long flexor (in this position), but opposite the middle of
the metatarsal phalanx it is slit for the passage of the other,
and is attached by two processes to the sides of the middle
phalanx. The short flexor of the toes is contained in a
sheath of the plantar fascia, and occupies the middle of the
foot it conceals the tendon of the long flexor of the toes,
the accessory muscle, and the external plantar vessels and
into tendons for the toes ;
these are slit.
Connec- tions.
Abduclittletoe.
Origin and in- sertion.
nerve.
The ABDUCTOR MINIMI DIGITI has a wide origin behind
tor of the from the outer and inner tubercles of the os calcis, and from
the plantar fascia and the external intermuscular septum.
It ends anteriorly in a tendon which is inserted, with the
short flexor of the little toe, into the outer side of the metatarsal phalanx of that toe at the base. The muscle lies along
the outer border of the foot, and conceals the flexor accesthe foot. sorius and the tendon of the peroneus longus. On its inner
side are the external plantar vessels and nerve.
Is at side of
Dissect
vessels and nerves.
Dissection. To bring into view the second layer of muscles and
plantar the plantar vessels and nerves, reflect the muscles already examined. Cut through, therefore, the flexor brevis at the os calcis,
and as it is raised notice a branch of nerve and artery to it ; divide
the abductor minimi digiti near its origin, and turn it to the outer
side ofthe foot, and seek a small nerve and vessel to it close to the
bone. The abductor pollicis may be drawn aside if it is necessary,
but it may remain uncut till afterwards. Now follow the plantar
vessels and nerves forwards to their termination, and backwards to
their origin, and clean the tendons of the long flexors of the toes,
the accessory muscle, and the small lumbricales.
Two plantar
The PLANTAR ARTERIES are the terminal branches of the
arteries : posterior tibial trunk in the hollow of the heel. They are
two in number, and are named external and internal from
PLANTAR VESSELS AND NERVES. 671
and their relative position in the sole of the foot. Of the two inner
the former is the largest, and forms the plantar arch of outer.
arteries, from which digital branches are furnished to the
toes.
small ;
side of
artery
curved
The internal artery is commonly inconsiderable in size, Internal
and is directed forwards under cover of the abductor pollicis
to the root of the great toe ; here it ends either in small ends on
branches to the side of the foot, or in the interval between the foot .
the two inner toes by supplying digital branches to these,
and anastomosing with an offset of the external plantar artery.
The external artery has an arched course in the foot, with External
the concavity of the arch turned inwards. Starting from the has
inner part of the foot, the vessel is first directed outwards course ;
across the sole, and then obliquely forwards towards the root
of the great toe, or to the side on which it began, so that the
vessel crosses twice the foot. In the first half of its extent,
the artery is comparatively superficial, and extends from the partly
inner side of the calcaneum to the base of the metatarsal ficial,
bone of the little toe ; in the other half it lies deeply in the partly
foot, in contact with the interosseous muscles, and forms the
plantar arch between the little and the great toe.
superdeep.
ficial
nections.
Only the first part of the artery is now laid bare ; the re- Supermaining part, that supplies the digital branches, will be part.
noticed after the examination of the third layer of muscles
(p.676. ). As far as the metatarsal bone of the little toe, the Convessel is concealed at first by the abductor pollicis and the
flexor brevis digitorum, but it then lies for a short distance
in the interval between the last muscle and the abductor
minimi digiti. In this part it is placed on the os calcis, and Veins
on the flexor accessorius ; and is accompanied by venæ nerve.
comites, and by the external plantar nerve. It supplies offsets to the muscles between which it lies, and some branches Branchto the outer side of the foot to anastomose with the peroneal
artery.
and
es .
nerves The PLANTAR NERVES are derived from the bifurcation of Plantar
the posterior tibial nerve behind the inner ankle. They are also two
two in number, like the arteries, and have the same connections as those vessels, for one accompanies a plantar
672 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
but the artery to the side of the foot ; but the larger nerve is found inner is
largest. with the smaller artery.
Internal nerve to
toes and a half.
The internal plantar nerve courses with its artery between three the short flexor and the abductor pollicis, and divides into
four digital nerves for the supply of both sides of the three
inner toes and half the fourth, thus resembling the median
nerve in the hand in the number and distribution of its
Other digital branches. Offsets are given by it to the short flexor
and the abductor pollicis, and a few superficial twigs perforate
the fascia.
branch- es.
Digital nerves are di.
cept first ;
The digital nerves have a numerical designation, and the first is
nearest the inner border of the foot. The branch to the inner
vided ex- side of the great toe is undivided, but the others are bifurcated at
the cleft between the toes. Each of the three outer nerves, being
give cu- divided at the spot mentioned, supplies cutaneous offsets to the
taneous, contiguous sides of two toes, and to the cutis beneath the nail ;
also articular filaments to the joints, as in the fingers. Moreover,
muscular branches are furnished by the nerves before they reach
muscu- the toes ; thus, the first ( most internal) supplies the flexor brevis
branch- pollicis, the second the inner lumbrical muscle, and the third the
next lumbrical muscle.
articu.
lar,
and
lar
es.
External nerve to
and a
half;
The external plantar nerve furnishes the remaining digital
one toe nerves, viz., to both sides of the little toe, and the outer side
of the next, and ends in the deep muscles of the sole of the
foot, like the ulnar nerve in the hand. It has the same
course as the external plantar artery, and divides at the outer
has su margin of the flexor brevis digitorum into a superficial and a
perficial deep part the former gives origin to two digital nerves,
but the latter accompanies the arch of the plantar artery
deeply into the foot, and will be afterwards dissected. Whilst
the external plantar nerve is concealed by the short flexor of
Branch- the toes, it gives muscular branches to the abductor minimi
digiti and flexor accessorius.
and deep part.
es.
Two digital branches from super- ficial part.
One is undi.
vided .
The digital branches of the external plantar nerve are but two,
and resemble those of the ulnar nerve in the hand. One, which is
undivided, is distributed to the outer side of the little toe, and
gives branches to the flexor brevis minimi digiti, and to the interosseous muscles of the fourth space. The other bifurcates at the
cleft between the two outer toes, and supplies their collateral
SECOND LAYER OF MUSCLES. 673
parts. This nerve communicates in the foot with the last digital
branch of the internal plantar nerve. On the sides of the toes the Distridigital nerves have the same distribution as those from the other
plantar trunk.
bution like others .
bare
muscles.
Dissection. —To complete the preparation of the second layer of Lay
muscles, detach the origin of the abductor pollicis from the os second
calcis, and turn inwards the muscle. Cut across the internal layer of
plantar nerve and artery, also the superficial portion of the external plantar nerve, but not the deep part with the artery, and
throw them forwards. Lastly, remove all the cellular membrane
and the fascia from near the toes.
―
and musthe
Second layer of muscles. In this layer are the tendons Tendons
of the two flexor muscles of the leg, viz., the flexor longus cles of
digitorum and flexor longus pollicis, which cross one another second connected with the former, soon after it enters the foot, is an layer.
accessory muscular slip, and at its division into pieces are
four slender muscles named lumbricales.
of the
the toes.
divides into
The tendon of the FLEXOR LONGUS DIGITORUM, whilst Tendon
entering the foot beneath the internal annular ligament, lies dexor of
on the internal lateral ligament of the ankle-joint. In the
foot it is directed obliquely towards the centre, where it is
joined by the flexor longus pollicis and the accessory muscle,
and divides into tendons for the four outer toes. Each tendon
enters the sheath of the toe with and beneath a tendon from
the flexor brevis. About the centre of the metatarsal pha- These
lanx the tendon of the long flexor is transmitted through the
other, and passes onwards to be inserted into the base of the
ungual phalanx. The tendon of the flexor longus digitorum toes and
is sometimes increased in size by its junction with that of
the long flexor of the great toe,
four.
enter the sheaths ofthe outer
pierce the other tendons.
lumbriment to
The LUMBRICALES are four small muscles between the Four
tendons of the flexor longus digitorum. Each arises from cales.
two tendons, with the exception of the most internal, which Attachis connected with the inner side of the tendon to the second toes and long toe ; and is inserted into the tibial side of the base of the flexor.
metatarsal phalanx of the four outer toes.
tion an expansion is prolonged to the
From the inserdorsum of the
phalanx to join the aponeurotic covering on it. These
X X
674 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Flexor accesmuscles decrease in size from the inner to the outer side of
the foot.
is joined neum.
with flexor
The FLEXOR ACCESSORIUS MUSCLE has one origin from the sorius under surface of the os calcis and ligamentum longum plantæ,
and another from the inner or concave surface of the calcaThe fibres end on the tendon of the flexor longus
digitorum about the centre of the foot, so as to form a kind
of groove for it. The muscle is bifurcated behind, and the
heads of origin are separated by the long plantar ligament.
On it are the external plantar vessels and nerve, and the
flexor brevis digitorum conceals it.
longus.
Inser- tion of tendon of flexor pollicis.
Dissect third layer of muscles.
'Third layer of
The tendon of the FLEXOR LONGUS POLLICIS in the sole of
the foot is deeper than that of the flexor longus digitorum,
to which it is united by a strong tendinous process it is
then directed to the root of the great toe, enters the digital
sheath, and is inserted into the base of the ungual phalanx.
Between the calcaneum and the internal malleolus this
tendon lies in a groove in the astragalus, and then in one
below the tubercle ( sustentaculum tali ) of the os calcis.
Dissection. - - For the dissection of the third layer of muscles,
the accessorius and the tendons of the long flexor are to be cut
through near the calcaneum, and turned towards the toes, but
without injuring the external plantar nerve and artery, or small filaments of nerves to the two external lumbricales. Afterwards
the cellular membrane is to be taken from the muscles now brought
into view.
--- Third layer of muscles. Only the short muscles of the
muscles. great and little toe enter into this layer. On the metatarsal
bone of the great toe the flexor brevis pollicis lies, and external to it is the adductor pollicis, whilst on the metatarsal
bone of the little toe is the flexor brevis minimi digiti.
Position. Crossing the heads of the metatarsal bones is the transversalis pedis muscle. The fleshy mass between the adductor pollicis and the short flexor of the little toe consists
of the interossei muscles of the next layer.
Flexor brevis The FLEXOR BREVIS POLLICIS muscle is tendinous and
pollicis pointed at the posterior part, but bifurcated in front. It is
cated abur attached posteriorly to the cuboid bone, and to a prolonga before
THIRD LAYER OF MUSCLES. 675
other tion of the tendon of the tibialis posticus to the external and joins
cuneiform bone ; near the front of the metatarsal bone of muscles.
the great toe it divides into two heads, which are inserted
into the sides of the base of the metatarsal phalanx. Resting
on the muscle, and in the interval between the heads, is the
tendon of the flexor longus pollicis. The inner head joins
the abductor, and the outer is united with the adductor
pollicis of the same toe. A sesamoid bone is developed in
the tendon connected with each head.
tor pol- The ADDUCTOR POLLICIS, which is larger than the pre- Adducceding muscle, and external to it, arises from the sheath of licis
the tendon of the peroneus longus, and from the base of the
third and fourth metatarsal bones. Anteriorly the muscle
is united with the outer head of the short flexor, and is joins
inserted with it into the base of the metatarsal phalanx of head of
the great toe. To the inner side is the flexor brevis, and flexor.
beneath the outer border the external plantar artery and Covers
nerve are directed inwards.
outer
short
plantar arch .
minimi
like an
The FLEXOR BREVIS MINIMI DIGITI is a small narrow Flexor
muscle, which lies on the metatarsal bone of the little toe, digiti is
and resembles one of the interossei. Attached to the meta- intertarsal bone, and slightly to the sheath of the peroneus
longus, it is inserted into the outer side of the base of the
metatarsal phalanx of the same toe.
osseous.
versalis The TRANSVERSALIS PEDIS is placed transversely over the Transheads of the metatarsal bones. Its origin is by fleshy pedis
bundles from the four outer bones, and its insertion is united
with that of the adductor pollicis. The cutaneous surface
is covered by the tendons, and the vessels and nerves of the
toes ; and the opposite surface is in contact with the interossei muscles.
-
attached to ends of the toes.
the deep
and nerves.
Dissection. In order that the deep vessels and nerves may be Dissect
seen, the flexor brevis and adductor pollicis are to be cut through vessels
at their posterior part, and thrown towards the toes, but the nerves
that supply them are to be preserved. Beneath the adductor is
the plantar arch, with the external plantar nerve, which, ' with
their branches, together with the part of the dorsal artery of the
foot that enters the sole by the first interosseous space, should next
be cleaned. The flexor brevis minimi digiti may be detached and X X 2
676 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Arch of the
and conwith
thrown forwards. The muscles projecting between the metatarsal
bones are the interossei.
The plantar arch is the part ofthe external plantar artery
plantar that extends obliquely forwards from the base of the meta- artery. tarsal bone of the little toe to the posterior part of the first
Extent interosseous space. It is placed across the tarsal ends of
nections the metatarsal bones in contact with the interossei, or bemuscles. tween the third and fourth layers of muscles in the foot.
Internally the arch is completed by a communicating branch
from the dorsal artery of the foot. From the front or conBranch- vexity of the arch the digital branches are supplied, and
from the opposite side small muscular branches arise. From
Poste- the under part are given off three small arteries (posterior
forating. perforating), which pass to the dorsum of the foot through
the three outer interosseous spaces, and anastomose with the
interosseous branches of the anterior tibial artery.
es.
rior perDigital branches to three outer toes and
next.
The digital branches are four in number, and supply both sides
of the three outer toes, and half the next. The one to the outer
side of the little toe is single ; the others lie in the three outer inhalf the terosseous spaces, and bifurcate in front to supply the contiguous
sides of two toes. Where they divide they send small communiAnterior cating branches (anterior perforating) to the interosseous arteries perforat- on the dorsum of the foot. On the sides of the toes the disposition
of the arteries is the same as in the hand : they extend to the last
Distri- phalanx, where they unite in an arch, from which offsets are given
to the ball of the toe ; and they further form anastomotic loops
beneath the tendons, near the front of both the metatarsal and the
next phalanx, which supply the phalangeal articulations.
ing off- sets .
bution.
Ending of the
artery of
The dorsal artery of the foot enters the sole at the posdorsal terior part of the first interosseous space, and supplies
the foot ; digital offsets to both sides of the great toe and to half the
next, in the same manner as the radial artery in the hand is
distributed to one digit and a half. Besides these it furnishes
a communicating branch to join the plantar arch.
its digital The digital branch (art. magna pollicis) extends to the front of
branch . the first interosseous space, and divides into collateral branches for
the great toe and the next. Near the front of the metatarsal bone
it sends inwards, beneath the flexor muscles, the digital branch fo
PLANTAR VESSELS AND NERVE. 677
the inner side of the great toe. These arteries have the same arrangement along the toes as the rest.
plantar
ends in
The deep branch of the external plantar nerve passes External
with the arch of the artery, and ends internally in branches nerve
to the adductor pollicis. Moreover, it furnishes branches to the deep
all the interossei, one or both in the external space excepted ;
to the transversalis pedis ; and to the two external lumbrical muscles.
-
muscles .
tion .
Dissection. Remove the transversalis pedis muscle to expose a Dissecligamentous band that is placed across the heads of the metatarsal bones.
verse
tarsal
The transverse metatarsal ligament is a strong fibrous Transband that connects together the anterior extremities of all metathe metatarsal bones, and resembles a similar structure in ligament
the hand. To its hinder part is connected a thin fascia that
covers the interossei muscles. It is concealed by the transversalis pedis, and by the tendons, vessels, and nerves of the
toes.
-
muscles.
Dissection. To complete the dissection of the last layer of Dissect
muscles, divide the metatarsal ligament between the bones, and the last layer carry the knife directly backwards in the centre of the interosseous of the
spaces except the first, in order to separate the two interossei muscles one from another. Take away the fascia covering these
muscles, and follow the branches of the external plantar nerve
to them. All the interossei are visible in the dissection of the sole
of the foot.
-
layer of Fourth layer ofmuscles. — In the fourth and last layer of Fourth
the foot are contained the interossei muscles, and the tendons muscles.
of the tibialis posticus and peroneus longus muscles.
The INTEROSSEI MUSCLES are situate in the intervals be- Interos- sei , are tween the metatarsal bones. Their anatomy corresponds
closely to that of the interossei in the hand, and like them
they are arranged in two sets, plantar and dorsal. They are plantar
seven in number, three plantar and four dorsal ; and two dorsal .
are found in each space, except in the most internal one.
and
plantar The plantar interossei arise from the three outer meta- Three
tarsal bones, their under and inner surfaces, and are inserted for three
into the tibial side of the base of the metatarsal phalanx of toes.
outer
X X 3
678 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Four dorsal lie be- tween the bones ;
the same toes. An expansion is continued from each to the
extensor tendon on the dorsum of the phalanx. These
muscles are smaller than the dorsal, and are placed more in
the sole of the foot.
The dorsal interossei, one in each space, arise by two
parts from the lateral surfaces of the bones between which
they lie, and are inserted into the side of the metatarsal
phalanx of certain toes. Thus, the two internal muscles go
to the second toe, one to each side, the next to the outer
side of the third toe, and the remaining one to the outer
side of the fourth toe. An expansion is continued from
their tendons to the extensor tendons on the dorsum of the
phalanges. The posterior perforating arteries pierce the
into. hinder extremities of this set of muscles. These small
muscles will be partly seen on the dorsum of the foot.
toes inserted
Trace
deep
Dissection. Follow the tendon of the tibialis posticus muscle
out the from its position behind the inner malleolus to its insertion into the
tendons. scaphoid bone, and trace the processes that it sends forwards and
outwards. Open also the fibrous sheath of the tendon of the
peroneus longus, which crosses from the outer to the inner side of
the foot.
Insertion of ten- don of tibialis posticus.
Insertion of ten- don of peroneus
The tendon of the TIBIALIS POSTICUS, after leaving the
groove in the inner malleolus, is continued forwards over
the internal lateral ligament of the ankle-joint, and beneath
the articulation between the astragalus and os scaphoides,
to be inserted into the prominence of the latter bone. From
its insertion three or four processes are continued to other
bones. One passes to the internal, and another to the external cuneiform bone ; and a third is directed backwards
to the margin of the groove in the os calcis for the tendon
of the flexor longus pollicis. Where the tendon is placed
beneath the articulation of the astragalus, it often contains a
sesamoid bone.
The tendon of the PERONEUS LONGUS MUSCLE turns
round the cuboid bone, and placed in the groove on the
longus. under surface is continued inwards to be inserted into the
outer side of the base of the metatarsal bone of the great
toe. The tendon is contained in a fibrous sheath, formed
SUPERFICIAL VEINS AND NERVES. 679
for the most part by fibres of the long plantar ligament,
which pass from the ridge on the cuboid bone to the tarsal
ends of the third and fourth metatarsal bones. A synovial
membrane lubricates the sheath.
SECTION VI.
-
THE FRONT OF THE LEG.
of the Position. THE limb is to be raised to a convenient Position
height by blocks placed beneath the knee, and the foot is to limb.
be extended in order that the muscles on the front of the leg
may be put on the stretch .
Dissection. To enable the dissector to raise the skin from the Raise
leg and foot, make one incision along the middle line from the knee the skin .
to the toes, and intersect it by cross cuts at the ankle and at the
web ofthe foot.
cutanenerves in
After the skin is raised from the leg and foot, the cutaneous Seek the
vessels and nerves should be looked for. At the inner part of the ous
leg are some filaments from the great saphenous nerve, and at the the leg ;
outer side others from the cutaneous ramifications of the external
popliteal nerve. Perforating the fascia in the lower third, and on
the anterior aspect, is the musculo- cutaneous nerve, whose branches
should be traced to the toes. On the dorsum of the foot is an arch on the foot both of veins, which ends at the sides in the saphenous veins ; on the vessels
outer side is the short saphenous nerve, and in the interval, nerves.
between the great toe and the next, is the cutaneous part of the anterior tibial nerve. Remove next the integuments from the
toes. After the several vessels and nerves are dissected, the fat is
to be taken away, in order that the fascia may be seen.
and
ous The venous arch on the dorsum ofthe foot has its con- Cutanevexity turned forwards, and receives digital branches from veins.
the toes ; but at the opposite side it is joined by small veins
from the instep. Internally and externally it ends in the
saphenous veins.
saphe.
The internal saphenous vein begins at the inner side of Internal
the great toe, and in the arch of veins ; it ascends along the nous. ,
inner side of the foot, and in front of the inner ankle to the
X X 4
680 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
External saphe- nous.
Source ofthe
ous nerves.
inner part of the leg, where it has been before seen. It
receives branches from the inner side and sole of the foot.
The external saphenous vein begins on the outside of the
little toe and foot, and in the venous arch : it is then continued below the outer ankle to the back of the leg.
CUTANEOUS NERVES. All the superficial nerves on the
cutane- front of the leg and foot are derived from branches of the
popliteal trunks, viz., from the musculo-cutaneous and anterior tibial nerves of the external popliteal, and from the
external saphenous nerve of the internal popliteal. Some
inconsiderable offsets to the sides of the leg from the internal
and external saphenous do not require separate notice.
Muscu- lo- cuta- neous
certain toes ;
The musculo-cutaneous nerve has a cutaneous termination, and
its destination is to the dorsum of the foot and toes . Perforating
supplies the fascia in the lower third of the leg, it divides into two principal
branches (inner and outer) , which give digital nerves to the sides
of all the toes, except the outer part of the little toe, and the condivides tiguous sides of the great toe and the next. The digital branches
may be traced in the integument as far as the end of the last
phalanx.
into
inner and
outer branch.
Anterior tibial ,
where found.
External saphe- nous.
Deep fascía of
a. The inner branch communicates with the internal saphenous
nerve, and supplies the inner side of the foot and great toe : it also
joins the anterior tibial nerve.
b. The outer branch divides into three nerves, which lie over the
three outer interosseous spaces, and bifurcate at the web of the
foot for the supply of the contiguous sides of the four toes corresponding to those spaces : it joins the external saphenous nerve
on the outer part of the foot.
The anterior tibial nerve becomes cutaneous in the first interosseous space, and is distributed to the opposed sides of the great
toe and the next. The musculo- cutaneous nerve joins it, and
sometimes assists in supplying the same toes.
The external saphenous nerve comes from the back of the leg
below the outer ankle, and is continued along the foot to the outside of the little toe. Occasionally it supplies both sides of the
little toe, and part or more of the next.
Thefascia ofthe front of the leg is thickest at the upper
the leg ; part where it gives origin to muscles. It is fixed internally
attach and externally to the tibia and fibula. Intermuscular septa
are prolonged from the deep surface, and one of these that is ments ;
ANTERIOR ANNULAR LIGAMENT. 681
verse
attached to the fibula, separates the muscles on the front
from those on the outer side of the leg. Superiorly the
fascia is connected to the heads of the bones, but inferiorly
it is continued to the dorsum of the foot. Above and be- translow the ankle-joint are some strong transverse fibres, mark- fibres at
ing the position of the two parts of the anterior annular ankle.
ligament ; and below the end of the fibula is another band,
the external annular ligament.
-
the
awaythe Dissection. The fascia is to be removed from the leg, and from Take
the dorsum of the foot, without cutting away the thickened band fascia.
of the annular ligament above and below the end of the tibia. On
separating the fascia from the anterior muscles, let the edge of the
scalpel be directed upwards. Take away the fascia from the peronei muscles on the outside of the fibula, but leave the band below
that bone. On the dorsum of the foot the short extensor of the
toes is to be made clean.
annular
ment ;
The anterior annular ligament consists of two parts, Anterior
upper and lower, which confine the muscles in their position ; ligathe former serving to bind their vertical part to the bones
of the leg, and the latter to keep down the tendons on the
dorsum of the foot.
The upper part is attached laterally to the bones of the its upper
leg, and is divided into two sheaths, one for the tibialis anticus, and the other for the extensor longus digitorum.
The lower lowerpart is in front of the tarsal bones ; it is inserted and
externally into the upper surface of the os calcis, in front of part.
the depression for the interosseous ligament, and, internally,
by a thin and widened piece into the plantar fascia and the
inner malleolus. In this part of the ligament there are three Sheaths
sheaths first, on the inner side, is one for the tibialis anti- each.
cus ; next, one for the extensor pollicis ; and, lastly, another
for the extensor longus digitorum. Separate synovial membranes lubricate the sheaths.
differ in
annular
ment.
The external annular ligament is attached on the one External
side to the outer malleolus, and on the other to the outer liga
part of the os calcis ; it contains the tendons of the peronei
muscles in one sheath, which is lined by synovial membrane.
The muscles on the fore part of the leg are the following : Muscles
- Next the tibia is the tibialis anticus ; next the fibula the front of
on the
682 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
and foot.
the leg extensor longus digitorum, its lower part with a separate
tendon to the fifth metatarsal bone, being called peroneus
tertius ; and between these, in the lower half of the leg, is
the extensor pollicis. On the dorsum of the foot is one
muscle, the extensor brevis digitorum.
Tibialis anticus ;
The TIBIALIS ANTICUS is thick and fleshy in the upper
part, but tendinous in the lower part of the leg. It arises
origin, from the outer tuberosity and two upper thirds of the tibia,
from the contiguous part of the interosseous ligament, and
from the fascia of the leg, and the intermuscular septum
between it and the next muscle. After passing through the
innermost compartment in the annular ligament, the tendon
is inserted into the under surface of the internal cuneiform
bone, and into the metatarsal bone of the great toe, to which
a process is continued. The muscle is subfascial : it is at first
external to the tibia, resting on the interosseous membrane,
but it is then placed successively over the end of the tibia,
the ankle-joint, and the inner line of the tarsal bones. The
outer border touches the extensor muscles of the toes, and
partly conceals the anterior tibial vessels as low as the foot.
inser- tion.
Parts beneath the muscle,
and on the sides.
Extensor pollicis
to fibula,
The EXTENSOR PROPRIUS POLLICIS is deeply placed at its
origin, between the former muscle and the extensor longus
digitorum, but its tendon becomes superficial on the dorsum
of the foot. The muscle arises from the middle part of the
attached inner surface of the fibula, and from the interosseous ligament near it the tendon comes to the surface through a
sheath in the lower part of the annular ligament, and then
continues over the inner part of the tarsus to be inserted
into the last phalanx of the great toe. The anterior tibial
vessels are to the inner side of the muscle as low as the
vessels . sheath in the ligament, but afterwards to the outer side of
the tendon, so that they cross it beneath the ligament.
and greattoe,
crosses the
Extensor longus
from tibia ;
The EXTENSOR LONGUS DIGITORUM, like the tibial muscle,
arises is fleshy in the leg and tendinous on the foot. Its origin
is from the tuberosity of the tibia (the outer part), from the
head and three fourths of the inner surface of the fibula,
from the contiguous interosseous membrane, and from the
fascia of the leg and the intermuscular septum on each side.
ted The tendon enters its sheath in the annular ligament with
MUSCLES IN FRONT OF THE LEG. 683
Below into four outer outer toes.
the peroneus tertius, and divides into four pieces.
the ligament these tendons are continued to the four
toes, and are inserted by processes into the middle and
ungual phalanges.
ment of
dons on
On the phalanges of the toes the tendons have the same Arrange
arrangement as in the hand ; for on the metatarsal phalanx the tenthe tendons of the long and short extensor join with pro- the toes.
longations from the interossei and lumbricales to form a
membranous expansion. At the further end of this phalanx
the expansion divides into three parts a central and two
lateral ; the central piece is inserted into the base of the
middle phalanx, while the lateral ones unite at the front, and
are fixed into the ungual phalanx.
-
tions of
muscle.
In the leg the muscle is placed between the peroneus on Connecthe one side, and the tibialis anticus and extensor proprius the
pollicis on the other ; it lies on the fibula, on the lower end
of the tibia, and on the interosseous membrane and the anklejoint. On the foot the tendons rest on the extensor brevis
digitorum, and the vessels and nerve of this part are internal
to them.
neus
is the
part of
tensor.
The peroneus tertius is but a part of the extensor longus Perodigitorum, from which it is seldom separate. Arising from tertius
the lower fourth of the inner surface of the fibula, and from lower
the intermuscular septum between the extensor and the the experonei muscles, it is inserted by a tendon into the tarsal
end of the metatarsal bone of the little toe. This muscle
has the same connections as the lower part of the long extensor, and is contained in the same space in the annular
ligament.
and exThe ANTERIOR TIBIAL ARTERY extends from the bifurca- Anterior tibial tion of the popliteal trunk to the front of the ankle-joint, artery ;
where it becomes the dorsal artery of the foot. The course course
of the artery is at first forwards, through the aperture in tent;
the upper part of the interosseous membrane, and then along
the front of that membrane and the tibia to the foot. A
line from the inner side of the head of the fibula to the
centre of the ankle will mark the position of the vessel.
tions In the upper third of the leg the artery lies between the connectibialis anticus and the extensor longus digitorum, and in with
684 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
parts around.
the lower two thirds between the tibial muscle and the
extensor proprius pollicis, but the last muscle becomes
superficial to the lower end of the vessel, and crosses to the
inner side of it. The artery rests on the interosseous membrane in two thirds of its extent, and is overlapped by the
fleshy bellies of the contiguous muscles, so that it is at a
great depth from the surface ; but in the lower third it is in
front of the tibia and ankle-joint, and is comparatively
superficial, for it here lies between only the tendons of
Position the muscles. Venæ comites closely entwine around the
artery, covering it with cross branches on the upper part.
The anterior tibial nerve approaches the tibial vessels about
the middle third of the leg, and continues with them,
crossing once or twice. At the lower end of the artery the
nerve is on the outer side.
of veins
and nerve ;
branch- es .
Recur- rent.
Malleo- lar,
inner
and outer.
Articu- lar.
artery ;
and
Branches.
- In the leg the anterior tibial artery furnishes
for the most part muscular offsets, but near the knee and
ankle-joints other named branches take origin, and a cutaneous branch moreover accompanies the musculo- cutaneous
nerve.
A recurrent branch leaves the trunk as soon as it appears above
the interosseous membrane, and ascends in the tibialis anticus
muscle to the knee-joint. On the joint it anastomoses with the
other articular arteries.
Malleolar arteries (internal and external) arise near the anklejoint, and, as their name expresses, are distributed over the ends
of the tibia and fibula. The internal is the least regular in size
and origin ; the external anastomoses with the anterior peroneal
artery.
Some small articular arteries are supplied from the lower end of
the artery to the ankle-joint.
Dorsal The DORSAL ARTERY of the foot is the continuation of the
extent anterior tibial, and extends from the front of the anklecourse; joint to the posterior part of the first interosseous space,
where it passes downwards between the heads of the interosseous muscle, to end in the sole as before described
(p. 676.).
connec- tions.
The artery is supported by the inner row of the tarsus
and their articulations, viz., the astragalus and the scaphoid
ANTERIOR TIBIAL VESSELS. 685
and cuneiform bones ; and is covered here by the integuments and the deep fascia, but near its termination it is
crossed by the inner tendon of the extensor brevis muscle.
The tendon of the extensor pollicis is on the inner side, and
that of the extensor brevis digitorum on the outer side
except for about half an inch before the artery dips into the
sole of the foot, at which spot the tendon of the latter
muscle then crosses to the inner side of the vessel. The
veins have the same position with respect to the artery as Pfveins
in the leg, and the nerve is external to it.
Position
and nerve.
es.
Branches.- Offsets are given to the bones and the liga- Branchments of the foot : those from the outer side of the vessel
have received the names tarsal and metatarsal from their
destination. A small interosseous branch is likewise furnished to the first interosseous space.
The tarsal branch arises opposite the scaphoid bone, and runs Tarsal.
beneath the extensor brevis digitorum to the outer side ofthe foot,
where it divides into twigs that inosculate with the metatarsal,
plantar, and peroneal arteries : it supplies offsets to the extensor
muscle, beneath which it lies.
The metatarsal branch takes an arched course to the outer part Metatar- sal,
of the foot near the base of the metatarsal bones, and beneath the
extensor muscle, and its terminal branches anastomose with the
external plantar and tarsal arteries.
ous.
From the convexity of this arch, which is turned forwards, three which gives in- interosseous arteries are furnished to the three outer spaces : these terossesupply the interosseous muscles, and divide at the cleft of the toes
into two dorsal collateral branches. At the fore part and back of
each space the interosseous arteries receive the anterior and posterior perforating branches from the plantar arch and digital arteries
in the sole of the foot.
interos- Thefirst interosseous branch (arteria dorsalis pollicis pedis) arises First
from the trunk of the artery as it is about to leave the dorsum of seous.
the foot ; it extends forwards in the space between the first two
toes, and is distributed like the other interosseous branches of the
metatarsal artery.
tibial The anterior tibial veins have the same extent and con- Anterior
nections as the artery they accompany. They have their veins .
usual position along the artery, one on each side, around
which they form loops by cross branches, and end in the
686 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Varie- ties in
tibial
popliteal vein ; they receive branches corresponding to those
of the artery, and communicate with the internal saphenous
vein.
Peculiarities in the vessels. The anterior tibial may be small, or even
anterior wanting, in which case the place of its diminished or deficient part will
be supplied by the posterior tibial or the peroneal artery. On the dorsum
of the foot it is often removed farther outwards than the direction of a
line from the centre of the ankle to the posterior part of the first interand dor- osseous space. The place of the dorsal artery of the foot may be taken sal ar- tery.
Divide exten- sor lon- gus.
Exten- sor bre- vis
sends tendons
inner toes ;
by a large anterior peroneal artery.
Dissection. To examine the extensor brevis digitorum on the
dorsum ofthe foot, cut through the tendons of the extensor longus
and peroneus tertius below the annular ligament, and throw them
towards the toes. Dissect out the attachment of the muscle to the
os calcis.
The EXTENSOR BREVIS DIGITORUM is a short thin muscle
on the dorsum of the foot. Arising from the outer surface
of the os calcis in front of the groove for the peroneus
brevis muscle, and from the anterior annular ligament (the
lower band), the muscle ends in four tendons, which spring
to four from as many fleshy bellies, and are inserted into the four
inner toes. The tendon to the great toe has a distinct
attachment to the base of the metatarsal phalanx, but the
rest are united to the outer side of the tendons of the long
extensor, and assist to form the expansion on the metatarsal
insertion phalanx (p. 683.). The muscle lies on the tarsus, and is of these. partly concealed by the tendons of the long extensor. Its
inner tendon crosses the dorsal artery of the foot.
Cut through
brevis.
Dissection. -Divide the extensor brevis near its front, and turn
extensor it upwards with care so as to avoid injuring the branches of artery
and nerve that are beneath it. The lower band of the annular
ligament is to be cut through over the tendon of the extensor pollicis, and the external half of it to be thrown outwards. Examine
next the different sheaths of the ligament, the attachment of it to
the os calcis, and the origin of the extensor brevis digitorum from
Follow it. Follow upwards the anterior tibial and musculo-cutaneous up the nerves to their origin from the external popliteal, and trace a small
branch from the same nerve through the tibialis anticus to the
knee-joint.
nerves.
EXTERNAL MUSCLES OF THE LEG. 687
of the Nerves to the front of the leg. — Between the fibula and Nerves
the peroneus longus muscle the external popliteal nerve front of
divides into the recurrent articular, musculo- cutaneous, and
anterior tibial branches.
the leg.
rent.
The recurrent articular branch is very small, and takes Recurthe course of the artery of the same name through the
tibialis anticus muscle to the knee-joint.
lo- cuta- The musculo-cutaneous nerve is beneath the fascia in the Muscufirst part of its course, and is continued between the extensor neous
longus digitorum and peronei muscles to the lower third of
the leg, where it pierces the fascia, and is distributed to the
dorsum of the foot and the toes ( p. 680.). Before the nerve supplies
becomes cutaneous, it furnishes branches to the peronei
muscles.
peronei.
tibial is
artery.
The anterior tibial nerve ( interosseous) is directed in- Anterior
wards beneath the extensor longus digitorum, and reaches with the
the artery of the same name about the middle of the leg.
From this spot it takes the course of the vessel along the
foot to the first interosseous space, in which it ends on the
surface (see p. 680.). Its position is external to the dorsal
artery of the foot, but in the leg it crosses the anterior
tibial artery once or more.
es .
In the leg the nerve supplies the anterior tibial muscle and the Branchextensor of the toes. On the dorsum of the foot it gives a large
branch to the short extensor, which increases and gives offsets to
the articulations of the foot.
-
muscles
leg.
Muscles on the outer part of the leg. Only two muscles External
are found in this situation : they are named peronei from of the
their attachment to the fibula, and are distinguished by
terms expressive of their relative length (longus and brevis).
Intermuscular processes of fascia, which are attached to the
fibula, isolate these two muscles from others, viz. from the
soleus and flexor pollicis behind, and from the extensor
longus digitorum in front.
neus lon- gus.
The PERONEUS LONGUS is the more superficial of the two Peromuscles, and arises from the head of the fibula, from the
upper half of the outer surface of the shaft of this bone, and origin from the fascia and intermuscular septa. Inferiorly it ends fibula ;
from the
688 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
into
in a tendon which is contained with that of the peroneus
brevis in the groove at the back of the external malleolus,
and in the sheath of the external annular ligament. Afterwards the tendon is continued in a separate sheath, below
that of the peroneus brevis, along the side of the os calcis to
the groove in the outer border of the cuboid bone, by which
insertion it enters the sole of the foot. Its position in the foot, and
insertion into the metatarsal bone of the great toe, are described in page 678. In the leg the muscle is immediately
beneath the fascia, and lies on the peroneus brevis. BePosition neath the annular ligament it is on the middle part of the
external lateral ligament of the ankle, with the next muscle,
and surrounded by a single synovial membrane. The extensor longus digitorum and soleus muscles are fixed to the
fibula laterally with respect to it, one being on each side.
great toe.
in the leg.
Perone- us brevis The PERONEUS BREVIS is smaller than the preceding muscle,
is attach- and inferior to it in position. It arises from the lower half
of the outer surface of the fibula, and from the intermuscular ed to fibula
septa. With the tendon of the peroneus longus, it passes
beneath the external annular ligament, and is placed next
the fibula as it turns below that bone. Escaped from the
ligament, its tendon enters a distinct fibrous sheath, which
and bone conducts it along the tarsus to its insertion into the base of
the metatarsal bone of the little toe. In the leg the muscle
is beneath the peroneus longus. On the outer side of the
connec foot it is contained in a sheath above the tendon of the
former muscle, and each sheath is lined by a prolongation
from the synovial membrane behind the outer ankle.
ofthe little toe ;
tions.
first the
joint.
SECTION VII.
LIGAMENTS OF THE KNEE, ANKLE, AND FOOT.
Examine THE student may now examine the remaining articulations
knee- of the limb, and may take first the knee-joint, unless this
has become somewhat dry, in which case the ankle-joint and
the ligaments of the foot may be dissected whilst the other
is being moistened.
ARTICULATION OF THE KNEE. 689
tion to see
sule
external
Dissection. In the dissection ofthe ligaments ofthe articulations, Dissecit is necessary to detach the muscles and tendons from the particular
joint, and to remove the cellular or fibrous structure that may obscure or conceal the ligamentous bands. In the knee-joint a kind of a capcapsule is to be defined around the articular surfaces of the bones ; and the
and there are four other ligaments, anterior and posterior, internal ligaand external, which will be found as thickened bands at their
respective parts of the articulation. Some tendons, namely, those
of the biceps, popliteus, adductor magnus, and semimembranosus,
are to be followed to their insertion, so that a part of each sufficient for the purpose should be left.
—
ments.
the knee- THE ARTICULATION OF THe Knee. The knee is the Bones in
largest hinge joint in the body, and is formed by the conti- joint.
guous ends of the tibia and femur with the patella. The
articular surfaces of the bones are covered with cartilage,
and lubricated by synovial membrane, and are maintained
in apposition by the following ligaments : -
only an
fect coA kind of capsule surrounds the ends of the bones, and Capsule
fills the intervals between the stronger special ligaments. imperIn front it receives accessory fibres from the vasti and cru- vering .
reus, and from the biceps and sartorius ; and, behind, from
the tendon of the semimembranosus. It is connected, as will
be afterwards seen, with the interarticular cartilages, and
the tendon of the popliteus muscle perforates it.
lateral
ment
The external lateral ligament is round and cord-like ; it External
is attached to the outer condyle of the femur below the ten- ligadon of the gastrocnemius, and descends vertically between is small.
two pieces of the tendon of the biceps to the outer part of
the head of the fibula. A second fasciculus, short external
lateral ligament is sometimes found behind the other. Beneath the ligament are the tendon of the popliteus and the
upper external articular vessels and nerve.
of the
divided .
The tendon of the biceps is inserted into the upper part of Tendon
the head of the fibula by two processes, and from one of biceps is
these there is a prolongation to the head of the tibia. The
external lateral ligament passes between the pieces into which
the tendon splits.
of the The tendon of the popliteus may be followed to the femur Tendon
by dividing the external lateral and capsular ligaments. It popliteus
Y Y
690 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
ed to is attach- arises from the fore part of the depression on the outer surouter face of the external condyle of the femur, and in its course condyle,
to the outside of the joint crosses the external semilunar
cartilage and the upper tibio-peroneal articulation. When
the joint is bent, the tendon lies in the hollow on the condyle.
The tendon of the adductor magnus is inserted into a
tubercle on the inner surface of the internal condyle above
the attachments of the gastrocnemius, and internal lateral
ligament.
Adduc- tor mag nus to the inner.
Internal lateral liga- ment ;
ments ;
The internal lateral ligament is scarcely distinguishable
from the capsule at its attachment to the condyle of the
attach- femur, but it becomes thicker inferiorly, and is fixed to the
inner border and surface of the tibia as low as the popliteus
muscle. The tendons of the sartorius, gracilis, and semitendinosus muscles lie over the ligament ; and the tendon of the
is joined semimembranosus, and the lower internal articular vessels are
beneath it to the posterior edge some fibres of the tendon
of the semimembranosus are added.
by semi-:
mem- brano- sus.
Inser- tion of thesemi- mem- brano- sus.
Poste- rior liga- ment.
The tendon of the semimembranosus muscle is to be followed beneath the internal lateral ligament. It is inserted
beneath the ligament into the inner side of the tibia, and
sends some fibres to that band ; it gives also one membranous
prolongation to join the fascia covering the popliteus muscle,
and another to the posterior ligament of the knee-joint.
The posterior ligament (ligament of Winslow) is formed
in great part of the fibres from the tendon of the semimembranosus, which are directed across the joint to the outer
Two sets condyle, but a deeper set of fibres is continuous with the of fibres. general capsule. Numerous apertures exist in it for the
passage of vessels and nerves to the interior of the articulation.
Anterior liga- The anterior ligament (ligamentum patella) or the tendon
ment, or of insertion of the extensor muscles of the leg, is about three
inches long, and is narrower in the middle than at the ends.
tendon Superiorly, it is attached to the lower part of the patella and
the depression on the inner surface ; and, inferiorly, it is
inserted into the tuberosity of the tibia. The expansion of
the vasti covers it, and a bursa intervenes between it and
the tibia (see p. 622.).
of the exten- sors.
LIGAMENTS OF THE KNEE-JOINT. 691
knee Dissection. To see the reflections of the synovial membrane Open the
raise the knee on blocks, and open the joint by an incision on each joint,
side from the front to the back. When the anterior part of the
capsule with the patella is thrown down, a fold (mucous ligament)
is seen extending from the end of the femur to below the patella.
On each side of the patella is a similar fold (alar ligament), containing some fat. The limb is afterwards to be taken from this and disposition, and part of the posterior ligament is to be removed, to cial ligaexpose the crucial ligaments at the back of the joint ; but the ments.
limb is to be replaced before these structures are learnt.
sect crumemabove arsurfaces ;
The synovial membrane lines the interior of the capsule, Synovial
and is continued uninterruptedly over the articular ends of brane
the femur and tibia. It is likewise reflected over the strong
crucial ligaments at the back of the joint. On the front of
the femur the sac of the membrane extends two inches above extends
the articular surface. Besides covering the head of the tibia, ticular
it invests both surfaces of two interarticular cartilages, and
sends a pouch between the tendon of the popliteus and the
external semilunar cartilage and the head of the tibia. In
the centre of the joint is a fold (mucous ligament) which is
contains a small vessel and some cellular tissue, and extends into folds
from the interval between the condyles to the fat below the
patella. On each side of the patella is another fold (alar ligaligament), occasioned also by the fat at this spot, which is
continuous with the former below the patella.
-
thrown
named mucous and alar
ments.
semi.
carti.
lages.
Dissection. With the limb still in the same position, detach Dissect
the patella and its ligament, and clear away the fat that is behind lunar
it ; but in doing this be careful of a small transverse band that
connects anteriorly the interarticular cartilages. Take away the
remains of the capsule and the synovial membrane from both the
crucial ligaments and the interarticular cartilages.
gaments
the capLigaments within the capsule. The remaining ligamentous Other listructures, although within the capsule, are external to the within
sac of the synovial membrane which is reflected over them : sule.
they consist of the crucial ligaments in the middle line ; of
two flat plates of cartilage, the interarticular or semilunar,
on the head of the tibia ; and of the transverse ligament between the fore part of the last.
The crucial ligaments are two strong fibrous processes, Two YY 2
692 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
liga- crucial which intervene between the ends of the tibia and femur, and
ments. chiefly maintain these bones in contact. They cross one
another somewhat like the legs of the letter X, from which
circumstance they have received their name. One is anterior to the other in position.
Anterior is ob- lique ;
its ata. The anterior ligament is oblique in direction, and
smaller than the posterior. Inferiorly it is attached to a
tach- depression in front of the spine of the tibia ; and superiorly
it is inserted into the inner surface of the outer condyle of
the femur (its back part) , and slightly into the interval between the condyles.
ments ;
is verti cal.
posterior b. The posterior ligament is almost vertical between the
bones at the back of the joint. By the lower end it is fixed
to the depression behind the spine of the tibia, and by the
upper it is inserted into the fore part of the hollow between
the condyles of the femur, and into the contiguous surface of
the inner condyle.
Their use in limiting the move- ments ofthe joint,
The use of these ligaments in the movements of the joint,
after the other ligaments are taken away, may now be
studied. When the joint is much flexed, the anterior ligament is made tense, and the displacement of the femur from
the tibia is prevented by it ; but if the joint is forcibly extended, the posterior ligament is put on the stretch. Rotation
inwards of the tibia is limited by the anterior ligament, but keeping the bones rotation outwards may be performed to such an extent as to
allow the hinder part of that bone to be turned forwards.
If the anterior ligament is divided, motion in either direction
is equally free, and the femur can be readily displaced from
the articular surface of the tibia.
and
in con- tact.
Semi- lunar carti- lages are two.
is semiThe interarticular or semilunar cartilages are two fibrocartilaginous plates which partly cover the articular surface
of the tibia. They are thickest at the outer margin, where
they are united by fibres to the capsule ; and are hollowed on
the upper surface, so as to assist in giving depth to the fossæ
for the reception of the condyles of the femur. The synovial
membrane covers both surfaces.
Internal a. The internal cartilage is semicircular in form, and is a
circular. segment of a larger circle than the external. In front it is
attached by a pointed part to a tubercle anterior to the inner
ARTICULATION OF THE FIBULA. 693
articular surface of the tibia ; and at the back, where it is
much wider, it is fixed behind the spine of the tibia, between
this process and the posterior crucial ligament.
nal,
circular
b. The external cartilage is nearly circular in form, and is Exterconnected to the bone within the points of attachment of its nearly
fellow. Its anterior part is fixed to the depression in front in form,
of the spine of the tibia, where it is united with the anterior
crucial ligament, and its posterior extremity is inserted into
the middle of the spine of that bone. From the posterior has a
part of this cartilage a ligamentous fasciculus ascends to the ligainner condyle of the femur, to be inserted before or behind
the posterior crucial ligament.
band of
ment.
The transverse ligament verse li- is a narrow band of fibres be- Transtween the semilunar cartilages at the front of the joint. gament.
Sometimes it is scarcely perceptible.
lar end
femur,
Articular surface of the bones. The lower end of the Articufemur presents on each side a large convex condyle, and of the
between them a slightly hollowed part ; of these two, the
articular surface on the external condyle is the largest and
extends highest. On the head of the tibia are two articular tibia,
surfaces, but the inner one has the greatest extent. The
surface of the patella is divided into two parts, but unequally, and paby a vertical ridge, so that the outer, which corresponds to
the wider face on the external condyle of the femur, is the
largest in size.
-
tella.
lation
and fibuPERONEO-TIBIAL ARTICULATIONS. The tibia and fibula Articuare united by ligamentous bands at the ends where they oftibia
touch, and by an interosseous ligament between the shafts ofla.
the bones. The surfaces in contact are tipped with cartilage
and covered by a synovial membrane.
tion of Dissection. The muscles are to be removed from the front Dissecand back of the interosseous ligament, and the cellular mem- the ligabrane is to be taken from a small band in front of, and behind ments.
both the upper and lower articulations between the tibia and
fibula. A strong interosseous ligament at the lower part of the
bones can be seen only by tearing the bones away from one
another after the examination of the ankle-joint.
a. The upper articulation, like the lower, is immoveable, Upper YY 3
694 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
tion,
articula- and therefore the structures between the ends of the bones
are simple. Only two small bands, anterior and posterior,
are present here.
by an- terior
terior
The anterior ligament extends before the joint from the
outer tuberosity of the tibia, to the head of the fibula. The
and pos- posterior ligament, thinner than the anterior, is attached to
corresponding parts of the bones behind the joint, and is
covered by the tendon of the popliteus muscle. Asynovial
membrane lines the articular surfaces of the bones, and projects upwards so as to touch that of the knee-joint.
band.
Lower articula- b. The lower articulation is continuous with the ankletion has joint, for the same synovial membrane serves the two. Besides an anterior and a posterior band, there is an inferior
ligament between the lower ends of the bones.
anterior
or
rior liga.
The anterior ligament reaches obliquely from the lower
posteri- end of the tibia to the fibula, and the posterior has attachments behind the joint, similar to those of the band in front.
and infe. The inferior ligament is continuous with the fibres of the ment. posterior, but is stronger than it. It is fixed on the one side
to the end of the fibula, and on the other along the posterior
edge of the articular surface of the tibia, so as to assist in
deepening this hollow.
Inter- osseous
ment
the
The interosseous ligament is an aponeurotic partition beliga- tween the muscles on the front and back of the leg. Its
between fibres are for the most part directed downwards from the
bones, outer border of the tibia to the ridge on the inner surface of
the fibula ; but some few cross in the opposite direction.
Both superiorly and inferiorly is an aperture which transmits
vessels, viz. the anterior tibial at the one spot, and the anterior peroneal at the other. Some strong irregular bundles
inferior of fibres, which constitute the inferior interosseous ligament,
extend between the bones below the aperture for the anterior
peroneal artery ; these take different directions like the fibres
of the rest of the interosseous membrane.
liga- ment.
Bones of the ankle- joint.
ARTICULATION OF THE ANKLE -. -Like the knee, the ankle
is a ginglymoid or hinge joint. In this instance the upper
surface of the astragalus is received into an arch formed by
the lower ends of the tibia and fibula, and the four ligaments
LIGAMENTS OF THE ANKLE- JOINT. 695
belonging to this kind of articulation connect together the
bones.
-
tion of Dissection. To make the dissection required for the ligaments Dissecof the ankle-joint, remove the cellular membrane and vessels from the an- kle-joint.
the front and back of that articulation. For the purpose of defining the lateral ligaments, the limb must be placed first on one
side and then on the other : the internal ligament is wide and
strong, and is beneath the tendon of the tibialis posticus ; the
external is divided into three separate pieces, and to find these the
peronei muscles and the remains of the annular ligament below
the outer malleolus should be taken away.
ligathin and
fect.
The anterior or tibio-tarsal ligament is a thin fibrous Anterior
membrane, which is attached to the tibia near the articular ment is
surface, and to the upper part of the astragalus near the arti- imperculation with the scaphoid bone. The ligament is not usually
a continuous membrane, for in it are some cellular intervals
and apertures for vessels. On the sides it joins the lateral
ligaments.
rior liga- The posterior ligament is formed chiefly of transverse Postefibres, which seem to be continuous with the posterior piece ment.
of the external lateral ligament. It is inserted into the tibia
and astragalus, close to the articular surfaces.
or delments.
The internal lateral or deltoid ligament is attached by its Internal
upper or pointed part to the inner malleolus, and by its base toid;
to the astragalus, the os calcis, and the scaphoid bone. From
its upper attachment the fibres radiate to their insertion be- attachlow in this manner ; the posterior are directed to the back
part of the inner surface of the astragalus ; the middle pass
vertically to the side of the sustentaculum tali of the os calcis ;
and the anterior, which are thin and oblique, join the inferior
calcaneo-scaphoid ligament, and the inner part of the scaphoid
bone. The tendons of the tibialis posticus and flexor longus
digitorum are in contact with this ligament.
has three The external lateral ligament consists of three separate External
pieces, anterior, middle, and posterior : two of these (anterior parts :
and posterior) are attached to the astragalus, and the other
to the os calcis. The anterior piece is a short flat band, anterior,
which is directed from the fore part of the malleolus to the
astragalus, in front of the lateral articular surface. The
YY 4
696 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
terior.
middle, middle portion is round and cord-like, and descends from the
tip of the malleolus to the os calcis at the middle of the outer
and pos- surface. The posterior part is the strongest, and is almost
horizontal in direction ; it is connected externally to the pit on
the under surface of the malleolus, and is inserted into the
posterior surface of the astragalus, extending to the groove
for the flexor proprius pollicis tendon. The posterior and
Connec- middle fasciculi are in contact with the peronei muscles ; but
the middle part is altogether removed from the synovial
membrane of the ankle-joint, and both it and the under surface of the posterior piece are in contact with the synovial
membrane between the astragalus and os calcis.
tions.
Openthe ankle- joint.
Surfaces of the
the joint.
Dissection. -Divide the ligaments of the ankle-joint, and separate the astragalus from the bones of the leg, to see the surfaces
ofthe bones forming the joint.
Articular surfaces. —On the tibia there are two articular
bones in faces, one of which corresponds to the end of its shaft, and
the other to the malleolus ; but on the fibula only the surface
of the malleolus that is turned to the astragalus is tipped
with cartilage. The astragalus has a central articular surface that touches the end of the tibia, and on the sides are
similar articular parts in contact with the malleoli, but the
outer one is the largest.
Synovial sac.
Articula- tions of the
The synovial membrane of the joint lines the capsule, and
is continued over the articular faces of the bones ; a process
of it is sent upwards to the lower peroneo-tibial articulation.
ARTICULATIONS OF THE ASTRAGALUS AND OS CALCIS.-
These two chief bones of the tarsus are united to one another,
lus and as well as to the bones in front of them, by means of the
undermentioned articulations.
astragaos calcis.
Dissec- tion for
of the
Dissection. -The articulations of the foot will be demonstrated
thejoints by removing from both the dorsum and sole of the foot all the
tarsus. parts that have been already examined. Between the different
tarsal bones bands of ligament extend, which will be defined by
removing the cellular membrane from intervals between them.
Astraga- lus and scaphoid bone.
a. Articulation of the astragalus with the scaphoid bone.
The large head of the astragalus is received into the hol-
ARTICULATIONS OF THE TARSUS. 697
low of the scaphoid bone, and is united to it only by a dorsal
ligament, for the place of a plantar ligament is supplied by a
strong band between the os calcis and the scaphoid bone,
which will be afterwards seen.
liga- The dorsal or astragalo-scaphoid ligament is attached to Dorsal
the astragalus close to the articular surface, and to the dorsal ment.
part of the scaphoid bone : its attachments will be better
seen when it is cut through. The synovial membrane of the
joint is the same as that between the astragalus and the
anterior part of the os calcis.
―
Syno- vial mem- brane.
galus
calcis,
b. Articulation of the astragalus and os calcis. -These Astrabones are kept together by a strong interosseous ligament, and os
and there is also a thin band both on the outer side and by
behind.
or, exand
seous liThe posterior ligament consists of a few fibres between posterithe bones, where they are grooved by the tendon of the ternal,
flexor pollicis ; and the external ligament is connected to the
sides of the astragalus and os calcis, near the middle piece of
the external lateral ligament of the ankle-joint. The inter- interososseous ligament, which will be brought into view by sawing gament.
off the part of the astragalus in front of it, and removing
some fat, consists of strong vertical and oblique fibres, that
are attached above and below to the depression on the contiguous surfaces of the two bones. This band extends across
the bones, and its depth is greatest at the outer side. After
the ligament is divided, and the astragalus removed, the
bones will be seen to have articular surfaces where
touch, viz. behind the ligament, and in front of it.
synovial membranes exist between the bones, one for each novial
articular surface, and the one in front of the interosseous branes.
ligament is continued between the head of the astragalus and
the scaphoid bone.
they Articu- Two faces lar surand symemand scaby
c. Articulation ofthe os calcis and scaphoid bone. These os calcis
bones are not in contact, but ligamentous bands extend be- phoid,
tween them both below, and on the outer side of the head of
the astragalus, and thus make more perfect the socket for the
reception of the fore part of this bone.
The and inferior ligament (calcaneo- scaphoid) will be better inferior
defined by removing some cartilaginous substance from it in
698 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
liga- ments that
the sole of the foot ; it is attached by one extremity to the
anterior part of the os calcis, and by the other to a groove
on the under surface of the scaphoid bone. The tendon of
the tibialis posticus is beneath the ligament in the sole of the
external foot, and on it the head of the astragalus rests. The external
calcaneo-scaphoid or interosseous ligament is outside the head
of the astragalus, and is about half an inch deep ; it is fixed
to the os calcis, between the articular surfaces for the cuboid
bone and the astragalus, and is attached in front to the outer
side of the os scaphoides. These ligaments enter into the
tragalo articulation of the astragalus with the scaphoid bone, and are scaphoid articula- lined by the same synovial membrane.
enter into astion.
Os cal- cis and -
d. Articulation of the os calcis with the cuboid bone.
cuboid The ligaments in this articulation are plantar and dorsal,
and the former are much the strongest.
bone,
by
dorsal
rior liThe dorsal ligament (superior calcaneo- cuboid) is a thin
fasciculus of fibres, which is attached to the upper surface of
the contiguous ends of the os calcis and cuboid bone, and is
divided into one or two parts. At the inner side of the os
cuboides is another rather strong interosseous band from the
and infe- Os calcis. The inferior calcaneo- cuboid ligament in the sole
gament. of the foot is the strongest, and is divided into a superficial
and a deep part : -The superficial portion (ligamentum
The last longum plantæ) is attached to the under surface of the os
strong calcis, and its fibres pass forwards to be connected to the
divided ridge on the under part of the cuboid bone, while some are
parts. prolonged over the tendon of the peroneus longus muscle to
the tarsal ends of the third and fourth metatarsal bones.
The deep piece of the ligament will be seen, after the
superficial is divided, to extend from the eminence on the
fore part of the under surface of the os calcis, to the portion
of the cuboid bone behind the ridge on it. A single synovial membrane is found between the bones.
is
est, and
into two
Syno.
vial sac.
Union of the
bone
ARTICULATIONS OF THE SCAPHOID BONE.
-The scaphoid
scaphoid bone articulates in front with the three cuneiform bones, and
laterally with the os cuboides, by dorsal and plantar bands.
a. In the articulation with the cuneiform bones there are
three small dorsal ligaments, one to each bone, but the into the cunei.
form
ARTICULATIONS OF THE METATARSUS. 699
nermost is the strongest. The place of plantar bands is
supplied by processes of the tendon of the tibialis posticus.
A synovial membrane lines the articulation, and sends forwards a prolongation between the cuneiform bones.
cuboid b. In the articulation with the os cuboides there is a dorsal and the
band of fibres ; a plantar band, which is concealed by the bone.
tendon of the tibialis posticus ; and a strong interosseous ligament between the contiguous surfaces of the two. At the
points of contact of the scaphoid and cuboid bones the surfaces
are tipped with cartilage, and covered by a separate synovial
membrane.
ARTICULATIONS OF THE CUNEIFORM BONES. These bones Union of the are united to one another by cross bands, and the external cuneione also articulates with the os cuboides after a similar bones
manner.
a. The three cuneiform bones are connected together by
short transverse dorsal bands between the upper surfaces.
Similar plantar ligaments are wanting, except between the
two innermost. There are also interosseous ligaments between the contiguous surfaces of the bones.
form
one with another,
the
bone.
b. Where the external cuneiform touches the cuboid bone and with
the surfaces are covered with cartilage, and furnished with cuboid
a synovial membrane. A dorsal ligament passes transversely
between the two, and a plantar ligament takes a similar
direction. Between the bones there is also an interosseous
ligament.
sac . The synovial membrane of the articulation of the cuneiform Synovial
bones is derived from that between the astragalus and the os
scaphoides.
lation of
sus and
sus.
ARTICULATIONS OF THE TARSAL AND METATARSAL BONES. ArticuThe last row of the tarsus articulates with the metatarsus the tarin the following manner, namely, the three cuneiform with metatarthe three inner metatarsal, and the cuboid with the two
outer metatarsal bones ; but their line of union across the
foot is very irregular. The bones are tipped with cartilage
where they are in contact, and have, moreover, dorsal, plantar,
and interosseous ligaments.
700 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
liga- ment.
Dorsal a. The dorsal ligaments are thin bands of fibres, that are
either longitudinal or oblique, as they extend from the tarsal
to the metatarsal bones. Each metatarsal bone has the following number : —the first has one band from the inner
cuneiform bone ; the second has three bands, one from each
cuneiform ; the third has a ligament from the external cuneiform ; and the third and fourth have a fasciculus to each
from the os cuboides.
Plantar are
dinal or
b. The plantar ligaments are mostly longitudinal ; there
longitu. is one from each of the cuneiform to the corresponding meoblique, tatarsal bone, but between the cuboid and the remaining
metatarsal bones there are only some scattered fibres. Oblique
ligaments are also present in the sole of the foot : thus a
superficial fasciculus of fibres extends from the front of the
internal cuneiform to the second and third metatarsal bones,
but a deeper and stronger ligament reaches from the same
part to the inner side of the base of the second metatarsal ;
whilst from the external cuneiform there is a superficial band
to the metatarsal bone of the little toe.
Longi- c. The interosseous ligaments are longitudinal, and limit
tudinal the extent of the different synovial membranes. There is
seous one on the outer side of the articulation between the third liga- ments. metatarsal and the external cuneiform bone, to both of which
interossynovial mem- branes.
it is attached ; and a second on the inner side of the articulation of the fourth metatarsal with the os cuboides.
Three The synovial membranes in the articulation are three in
number, and will be seen by dividing the dorsal ligaments.
There is one between the internal cuneiform and its metatarsal bone ; a second for the cuboid and the two outer bones
ofthe metatarsus ; but the third, between the middle and
external cuneiform and the corresponding ( second and third)
metatarsal bones, is an offset of the synovial membrane that
belongs to the articulation of the astragalus and os scaphoides,
which is prolonged between the two inner cuneiform bones.
Line ofthe articulation. In consequence of the unequal
ticula- lengths of the cuneiform bones, the line of the articulation
between the tarsus and metatarsus is zig-zag opposite them.
Το open the articulations the knife should be carried obliquely
forwards from the tuberosity of the fifth to the base of the
Line of the artion across the foot.
- -
ARTICULATIONS OF THE PHALANGES. 701
second metatarsal bone, then about two lines further back for
the union of the second metatarsal with the middle cuneiform,
and, finally, half an inch in front of this for the joint of the
internal cuneiform and the first metatarsal bone.
cunei.
Dissection. -Let the cuneiform bones be forcibly separated Separate
from one another and from the cuboid, also the latter from the form and
os scaphoides, to see the interosseous ligaments between them. bones.
The dissector will find the bones sometimes tear sooner than the
ligaments give way. Afterwards the different structures are
to be removed from the ligaments uniting together the metatarsal bones.
cuboid
ofthe
tarsus,
ARTICULATION OF THE METATARSAL BONES. -The tarsal Union
ends of these bones are connected together by dorsal, plantar, metaand interosseous ligaments, and where the contiguous parts by
touch they are covered with cartilage.
The dorsal ligaments are small transverse bands that pass dorsal,
from the base of one metatarsal bone to the next on the upper
surface, except between the first two. The plantar liga- plantar,
ments are similar to the dorsal, but there is not any between
the two inner bones. The interosseous ligaments are short, and intransverse fibres between the rough lateral surfaces of the
four outer bones, and will be seen by tearing these asunder. ments.
The synovial membrane that covers the small lateral articular Synovial
surfaces is derived in each instance from that which serves
for the articulation of the metatarsus with the tarsus.
teros- seous ligasacs.
liga- The digital ends of the metatarsus are further united by Anterior
the transverse metatarsal ligament, which has been described ment.
in page 677.
—
of meta- ARTICULATION OF THE METATARSUS WITH THE PHA- Union
LANGES. These are ball and socket joints, in which the tarsus
head of the metatarsal bone is received into the cup-shaped langes,
cavity of the phalanx.
and phaby
lateral
ferior
Each articulation has two lateral and an inferior ligament, two
as in the hand, and the joint is further strengthened by an and in
expansion derived from the tendon of the short extensor ofligathe toes. A distinct synovial membrane exists in each. In ments.
702 DISSECTION OF THE LOWER LIMB.
sac.
Synovial the articulation of the great toe there are two sesamoid bones
which are connected with the inferior and lateral ligaments.
All these structures are better seen in the hand, where
they are more distinct, and their anatomy may be learnt in
the dissection of that part. See page 297.
See the hand.
Union of the pha- ARTICULATIONS OF THE PHALANGES. There are two
langes phalangeal joints to each toe, except in the first. The same same as
describhand.
before ligaments are found in these as in the metatarso-phalangeal
ed in the joints, viz. , two lateral and an inferior. The joint between
the two last phalanges is least distinct, and oftentimes the
small bones are connected together by osseous material.
These ligaments are noticed more fully in the dissection of
the hand (p. 297.).
ARTERIES OF THE LOWER LIMB. 703
off gives ARTERY FEMOAL The
TABLE OF THE ARTERIES OF THE LOWER LIMB.
( External pu- Superior dic inferior.
superficial epi- gastric superficial cir- cumflex iliac.
External circumflex Ascending descending transverse .
internal circumflex
Profunda
Muscular
first perforating
Muscular articular ascending transverse
second perforating - nutritious .
third perforating
terminal branch.
Superficial Anastomotic - deep branch.
Muscular upper internal upper external articular lower internal lower external articular azygos articular sural.
Anterior tibial ·
Popliteal
Recurrent cutaneous muscular
} final branches.
internal malleolar external malleolar articular tarsal metatarsal Sthree inter- -
first interosseous communicating to deep arch
digital
(
theseous.
To great toe and half the next.
Muscular nutritious to peroneal fibula anterior pero- neal.
nutritious to tibia communi- cating to pe- roneal Posterior tibial - articular
internal plan- tar Muscular
external plan- tar plantar arch
Muscular posterior perfor- ating digital, for three toes and a half anterior perfor- ating.
The branches of the internal iliac artery that are dissected in the limb, will be found in the table ofthe arteries ofthe abdomen.
704 VEINS OF THE LOWER LIMB.
The FEMORAL VEIN continued ,the popliteal from receives
TABLE OF THE VEINS OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Anastomotic - deep branch Superficial
Muscular
Profunda
Internal phenoussaTerminal branch first perforating second perforating third perforating
External circumflex
Internal circumflex
-Nutritious.
Branch from dorsal arch of the foot plantar veins about os calcis communicating with pos- terior and tibial anterior
communicating with deep veins of thigh cutaneous from outer and inner parts of thigh
Ascending transverse descending.
Muscular {articular.
external pudic superficial epigastric superficial circumflex iliac. [muscular
external plantar
plautar arch
Posterior tibial internal plantar articular communicating to saphenous nutritious
peroneal
Anterior pero- neal muscular nutritious.
Popliteal · Anterior tibial
External saphenous
sural
communicating to deep arch interosseous
metatarsal -
tarsal malleolar communicating to saphenous muscular recurrent Branch from dorsal arch of foot plantar veins from outer side ofos calcis cutaneous in the leg.
Digital from great toe and half the next.
- {Three inter- osseous .
articular muscular
[Posterior forating perdigital from three toes and a half.
anterior perfor- ating.
NERVES OF THE LOWER LIMB. 705
Nerves ofthe Sacral Plexus inLimb . inLimb .Plexus Lumbar ofthe Nerves
1. External cutaneous
2. Obturator
TABLE OF THE NERVES OF THE LOWER LIMB.
Posterior and anterior branches.
accessory [To obturator trunk to pectineus to hip-joint.
to obturator externus to articulation
superficial divi- Muscular sion
deep division
·
to plexus in the thigh To adductor bre- vis and magnus articular.
(Togracilis to adductor longus.
To sartorius Muscular · ·
to pectineus.
3. Anterior crural
Superficial por- tion
middle cuta- neous internal cuta- neous
deep part ·
4. Branch of genito- crural To integu- ments.
1. Small sci- atic -
Muscular ·
internal saphe- nous
-
SAnterior and Linner branches.
To rectus to vastus externus - articular.
to vastus internus and crureus } - articular.
over patella to leg and foot.
Branch to plexus
Inferior gluteal inferior pudendal cutaneous to gluteal region, thigh, and leg.
Articular to hip to hamstrings.
2. Great sci- atic -
external popli- teal
Articular cutaneous peroneal com -
municating recurrent arti- cular musculo cutane- 5 To peronei ous
internal teal
3. To qua dratus and articular.
gemelli
Superior gluteal To glutei
cutaneous to foot and toes.
Muscular anterior tibial - articular cutaneous to two toes.
Articular muscular short saphenous.
popli- Muscular to flexors ·
Cutaneous ofthe sole muscular internal plantar four digital posterior tibial · communicating branch articular to the toes.
to tensor vaginæ femoris.
Ꮓ Ꮓ
Muscular [Superficial part two digital external plantar deep part ·
articular Muscular articular.
706
CHAPTER X.
DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
tion of
ball.
Situa- THE eyeball is the organ of vision, and is lodged in the orbit;
the eye- it is so placed that the axes of the two eyes are parallel
in a state of rest, but not those of the eyeball and the containing cavity. In this hollow it is supported on a mass of
fat, and is surrounded by muscles which impart to it its several movements. Two lids or shields protect the eyeball
from external injury, and moderate the quantity of light admitted into the interior ; and the anterior or exposed surface
is covered by a mucous membrane (conjunctiva).
Parts around and in front of it.
The dis- section to be
the eyes
--- Dissection. In the absence of specimens of the human eye, the
structure must be learnt on that of some large animal, as the ox
made on for example. Let the student, therefore, procure half a dozen or of the more eyes of the ox for the purpose of dissection. One or two
small basins will be needed, and in the bottom of one of them, or
of a deep plate, some melted wax or tallow should be run.
ox.
the mus- Detach To see the general form of the ball of the eye, and the outer
cles. surface of the external coat, the attachment of the different muscles
should be taken away, and the loose mucous membrane removed
from around the anterior part.
Form of the ball.
The ball of the eye is roundish in form, and presents on
the exterior two parts which differ greatly in appearance,
viz. an opaque posterior one, forming four-fifths of the whole,
and a smaller transparent portion (cornea) in front ; these
two parts are segments of different- sized spheres, of which
Position the anterior is the smaller. To the back of the globe the
nerve. optic nerve is attached, rather to the inner side of the axis of
the ball, and around it the nutritive vessels and the nerves
Diame are disposed. On a vertical section the antero- posterior
ofoptic
ter.
diameter of the ball will be found to exceed the transverse
by about a line.
SCLEROTIC COAT. 707
ofthe
of the
vision.
The organ of vision is composed of certain parts essential Outline
to the function, and of others requisite for protection and elements
support. Its sentient constituent is a fine expansion of the organ of
optic nerve (retina). To defend so delicate a stratum, certain
denser structures or coats are arranged around it ; and to
absorb the superabundant rays of light entering the eyeball,
one of them is covered by a layer of pigment cells. Within
the nervous expansion are central transparent parts to bring
the rays of light to a focus thereon, and in front of these is a
moveable curtain (iris ) to regulate the quantity of light admitted into the interior.
The of coats coats of the eyeball form three strata, which are ar- Number
ranged one within another, and are named sclerotic, choroid,
and retina . The transparent media in the interior are like- and cenwise three, viz. the lens, the aqueous humor, and the vitreous parts .
body.
tral
coat is The SCLEROTIC COAT (cornea opaca) is the most external Sclerotic
stratum of the eye-ball, and forms a firm, whitish, and opaque fibrous.
covering, which supports the more delicate structures within.
Dissection. - To examine the inner and outer surfaces of this Dissec- tion to coat as well as the cornea, it will be necessary to cut circularly see the interior.
through the sclerotic with a blunt pointed scissors, close to the
cornea ; then to separate the cornea from the front of the eye-ball,
by detaching a structure (ciliary muscle) that fixes it slightly ; and
lastly to remove the other structures from the interior of the
sclerotic covering. In raising the cornea, the student may observe
the aqueous fluid escape from its chamber. The central parts of
the ball are to be set aside for subsequent use.
and extures
This tunic of the eye is bell-shaped, and extends from the Form
entrance of the optic nerve to the margin of the cornea, tent.
forming about three fourths of the ball. At its posterior Aperpart and a little to the inner side of the centre ( one eighth behind
of an inch), the optic nerve is transmitted through an aperture in it : this opening decreases in size from without inwards, and is rendered cribriform by the union with its
margin of the bundles of fibrous tissue between the funiculi
of the nerve. Other smaller apertures for the passage of the
nutritive vessels and nerves are situate around that for the
optic nerve. In front is the large rounded hole into which and in front.
zz 2
708 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
and inner surface.
the cornea is received : it measures about half an inch transOuter versely, and rather less from above down. On the outer surface this coat is smooth, except where the muscles are
attached ; but on the inner aspect it is covered with a flocculent cellular layer, and with the ends of ruptured vessels
and nerves, and is of a dark colour. The sclerotic covering
Thick- is thickest at the back of the eyeball, but it becomes thinner
and whiter towards the cornea, where it is visible as the
" white of the eye."
ness.
Formed of white Structure -- . The sclerotic coat is formed of layers of
and yel- white fibrous tissue mixed with yellow or elastic fibres, which low tissue cross mostly at right angles, and construct this dense membrane for the maintenance of the globular form of the eyewith pig- ball. A few irregularly shaped pigment cells are scattered cells. amongst the fibres towards the cornea.
ment
Cornea :
and form .
Situa- tion in front ofthe sclero- tic.
- CORNEA. This thin transparent membrane (cornea pellucida) fits into the front of the eyeball, of which it forms
extent about one fifth. Its shape is circular, though, when viewed
in front, it appears largest in the transverse direction in
consequence of the sclerotic structure reaching further on it
above and below than on the sides. It is smooth and soft to
Curve. the touch, is convex anteriorly but concave posteriorly, and
is of equal thickness throughout. At the circumference it
is blended with the sclerotic coat by continuity of tissue.
This clear and diaphanous structure, resembling in appearance the glass of a watch, bounds the anterior chamber of
the eyeball, and gives passage to the rays of light entering
Has not the organ. In the healthy condition blood- vessels do not
vessels. permeate its structure, but cease in loops at its circumference. When the cornea is supported by the aqueous
the rays humour, it deflects the rays of light transmitted to the eye,
and thus influences by its greater or smaller convexity the
different degrees of sight at a distance. After death it
becomes flaccid from the transudation of the aqueous humour;
or if it is immersed in water it is rendered opaque by infiltration of the tissue by that fluid.
bloodIts ac- tion on
oflight.
Com- Structure. - The cornea is laminar in texture, and is conlayers. structed of a special, thick basement part called cornea posed of
STRUCTURE OF THE CORNEA. 709
proper. In front of this is a thin elastic layer with an
epithelial stratum, and behind is another fine elastic membrane covered by an epithelium : the two structures in front
of it constitute the conjunctiva.
proper is
oflayer,
The cornea proper (lamellated cornea) is made up of a Cornea
series of layers, about sixty in number, which are united formed
by intervening pieces of tissue, and cannot therefore be detached one from another. * This structure possesses great
toughness ; and its transparency depends upon the parallelism of the different strata, and their distance from one another being maintained, for, if they are disarranged by
compression or other means, the translucency is destroyed.
Between the layers there are elongated tubular spaces, which with inare mostly parallel on the same level, but cross obliquely bethose on a plane beneath, from which they are usually distinct ; these intervals do not contain fluid, but are moistened
by a vapour. The lamina of the cornea are formed of white
fibrous tissue, continuous with that of the sclerotic coat, but contihere flattened into membranous layers which are arranged into that
one over another.
tervals
tween.
Its tissue
nued
ofthe sclero- tic.
Posteelastic
The posterior elastic layer may be peeled off after a cut
has been made across the cornea. It is a thin, but dense rior
and hard membrane, that tears readily when an attempt is layer :
made to detach it, and curls up when it is separated ; it is
always transparent, and remains so after boiling, after the characaction of acids, and even after maceration. At the edge of ters ;
the cornea this lamina ceases in processes which turn back- attachwards, and become blended with the ciliary ligament, and margin ;
with the outer margin of the iris. Though very elastic, this
membrane is apparently without a definite structure. A
laminar epithelium, like that on serous membranes, clothes has an
its free surface.
ment at
epithe- lium.
elastic The anterior elastic layer is also a transparent structure, Anterior
similar in its properties to the posterior, which extends over layer is
the front of the cornea, and seems to be the basement mem- conjunc66 * The facts given here, and in many other places in the description,
are obtained from the work of Dr. Todd and Mr. Bowman, " Physiological Anatomy," part the third, 1847.
part of
tiva ;
z z 3
710 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
has an epithe- lium .
Choroid coat is vascu- lar.
Dissec- tion to see the choroid coat.
To see the ci- liary pro- cesses
brane of the conjunctiva. From its posterior surface fine
processes are continued into the cornea proper ; and on its
anterior aspect is the conjunctival epithelium, which is formed
of three or four layers of scales, the deeper of these being
columnar, but the superficial laminar in form.
CHOROID COAT. -The next coat or covering of the ball of
the eye is within the sclerotic, and is formed chiefly of bloodvessels and pigment cells ; its strength is but slight, and its
interior is lined by a pigmentary membrane.
Dissection. -
Supposing the sclerotic coat of an eye cut through
near the anterior part, as before directed (p. 707.) , it will be
necessary to bring into view the choroid, to take away in water
the rest of the sclerotic by means of an incision directed backwards
on each side of the ball to the optic nerve. In removing the flaps
of the outer coat, some cellular connections are to be broken
through, but the slender vessels and nerves are to be preserved.
The white ring around the eye in front is the ciliary ligament,
which limits the extent forwards of the black choroid coat.
For the purpose of seeing the anterior termination of the choroid
coat in the ciliary processes, take another eyeball on which the
sclerotic covering has been divided, and the cornea removed as
before ; after making two or three cuts in the sclerotic towards the
optic nerve, pin out the resulting flaps to the wax in the plate, so
as to support the eye in an upright position. Let another eye be prepared in the same manner. On the one ball, in which the ananterior terior view of the processes is to be obtained, proceed to remove
by an
posterior view.
with care the iris, tearing it away both from the white ring of the
ciliary ligament, and from the ciliary processes beneath, so as to and a leave these undisturbed and displayed. On the other ball a
posterior view ofthe processes is to be prepared : in this dissection
the iris is to be left in its natural position, but the choroid coat is
to be divided all round with a scissors, a little behind the ring of
the ciliary ligament, and to be taken away with that ligament, the
attached iris, and the ciliary processes behind all in one piece.
By gently washing the back of the iris the small processes will be
made manifest. By means of the last dissection, the interior of the in- the choroid coat may be seen. The structure of the membrane
be examined on a fragment obtained from the eye destroyed
in making the preparation of the sclerotic coat.
To see
terior and the struc- ture.
To make a vertimay
-
If a vertical section is made of another eyeball, it will show the
cal sec. ciliary processes in their natural position, and will demonstrate the
CHOROID COAT. 711
relative situation of all the parts. This section, which it is difficult
to make, should be attempted in water with a sharp, large knife,
and on a surface of wax or wood : after the eye has been divided,
the halves should remain in water.
and exAnterior termina- tion.
The choroid coat is a thin membrane of a dark colour, and Form
forms a segment of a sphere : like the sclerotic it extends tent.
from the optic nerve to the fore part of the eyeball. When
viewed on the eye in which the ciliary ligament is entire, it
appears to end at the ligament ; but it may be seen in the
other dissections to be reflected inwards behind that ring and
the iris, and to end in a series of pointed processes (ciliary)
around an anterior opening for the admission of the rays of
light. This covering is thicker and stronger behind than in
front. Posteriorly it is pierced by a round aperture for the openpassage of the optic nerve, and anteriorly is the large opening within the ring of the ciliary processes. The outer sur- Outer
face is flocculent, and is covered by the remnants of a pig- rough ;
mentary areolar tissue (membrana fusca) between it and the
sclerotic coat ; on it may be seen small veins arranged
in parallel arches as they open into the larger trunks, and
lying on this surface are the ciliary vessels and nerves. The
inner surface is smooth, and is lined by a thin pigmentary inner
epithelial layer (membrana pigmenti), though in the eye of
the ox it shines through that layer with a metallic lustre.
ings.
surface
smooth.
pro- cesses.
tion.
kinds :
The ciliary processes are the folds or plaits by which the Ciliary
choroidal coat is terminated in front, and are arranged
around the lens, like the many petals of a flower, form- Posiing a circle (corpus ciliare). These processes lie side by
side, and consist of larger and smaller folds ; the former are Two
from sixty to seventy in number, whilst the latter do not small,
reach the free extremity of the other kind, and often blend
with the larger ones. The large folds are thin and broad and
externally at the commencement, near the ciliary ligament,
but increase in thickness internally, and projecting inwards
half the depth of the iris, end in free points around the lens.
At the posterior aspect the ciliary processes are closely con- Conne
nected with the membrane of the vitreous humour, for they with
fit into hollows between other folds on the front of that mem- around.
brane. In front they are in contact with the back of the
large.
tions
parts
z z 4
712 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
Parts entering
iris, with the tissue of which they are continuous towards
their outer part, but are unattached to that structure towards
their inner part, and assist to bound posteriorly the chamber
of the aqueous humour.
Structure. -The choroid coat and the ciliary processes
into its are formed principally of blood- vessels, with dark pigment
cells, for there is only a small quantity of white fibrous tissue
intermixed with the other structures.
struc- ture.
A plexus ofblood- In the substance of this membrane the vessels may be seen
vessels in an injected eye to form a net-work of capillaries, whose
interstices are rather less towards the back than the front of
with large
exterclose inthe eyeball. On the outer surface the larger branches of
meshes both arteries and veins lie side by side, and the veins form
nally, parallel curves (vasa vorticosa) as they end in four or five
chief efferent trunks ; but on the inner surface the capillary
but very plexus has smaller meshes than elsewhere, and this part of
ternally. the choroidal coat is sometimes described as a separate layer
(tunica Ruyschiana). In the interspaces of the vessels towards the outer surface there are ramified irregular pigment
cells, which contain a nucleus and molecular grains of dark
cells brown colouring matter ; but towards the inner surface,
ternally. where the vessels form a very close plexus, the pigment cells
are wanting.
Pig- ment
only exture of Struc- In the ciliary processes there is also a texture of ramified
ciliary blood-vessels, with intermixed pigment cells, as in the choroid
coat, but the cells are in greatest abundance on the under or
posterior aspect.
pro- cesses.
Pigmen- tary
of cells
tain the
The pigmentary membrane (choroidal epithelium).— On
layer the inner surface of the choroid coat is a pigmentary thin
formed lining. This structure is easily detached, and may be seen
that con- with the microscope to consist of a single stratum of five or
pigment. six- sided nucleated cells with granular contents. Though
the layer covers the interior of the choroid coat the quantity
of contained pigment varies at different spots ; for in the eye
Осса- of the ox the colouring matter is absent from the cells in the sionally pigment bottom of the eye, and allows some fibrous tissue of the absent. choroid (tapetum) to shine through it ; and in the albino the
pigment is altogether deficient in the cells, so that the vessels
give a red appearance to the interior of the eye. This dark
CILIARY LIGAMENT AND THE IRIS. 713
layer absorbs the superabundant rays of light entering the
eyeball.
ligation .
CILIARY LIGAMENT AND MUSCLE.—In the eye from which Ciliary
the sclerotic coat has been removed, the white band of the ment.
ciliary ligament (annulus albidus) may be seen in its natural
position in front of the part of the choroid coat that is reflected inwards to form the ciliary processes. This circle is
situate in the ball of the eye nearly opposite the junction of Situathe cornea with the sclerotic tunic, and seems to serve the
purpose of suspending the iris and uniting the other coats at
the fore part of the eye. Externally it is closely connected Connec
with the sclerotic ; internally the iris is attached to it ; and with
behind it is a greyish stratum (ciliary muscle) on the surface parts.
of the choroid coat for about one eighth of an inch. It consists of fibrous tissue, and is pierced by both the ciliary
vessels and nerves.
tions
other
muscle.
ments.
The ciliary muscle consists of unstriped fibres, and forms a Ciliary
greyish layer on the surface of the choroid coat, close to the
ciliary ligament. It is connected externally with the sclerotic, Attachand the fibres are directed backwards and inwards, some to
end on the choroid coat, and others to dip behind the ciliary
ligament to blend with the ciliary processes. The nerves to
the iris pierce its fibres.
vascular The IRIS is a vascular contractile structure, whose vessels Iris is
are continuous with those of the choroidal tissue. Its posi- and mustion and connections may be observed in the different dissections that have been prepared.
cular.
tion ;
It is suspended vertically in the space between the cornea situaand the lens, in front of the aperture in the anterior part
of the choroid coat, which it partly closes, and is pierced by
an aperture for the transmission of the rays of light. It is form ;
circular in form, is variously coloured in different individuals, and is immersed in the aqueous humour.
ment. By its circumference the iris is connected with the ciliary attachligament, and thus with the sclerotic close to the cornea.
The aperture in it is named the pupil of the eye ; this is Situaslightly internal to the centre, and is nearly circular in form, size of tion and
714 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
tral aper- ture.
Ante- rior surthe cen- but its size is constantly varying ( from 2 to 3 of an inch)
by the contraction and relaxation of the muscular fibres, according to the degree of light acting on the optic nerve.
The anterior surface is free in the aqueous humour, and is
marked by lines converging towards the pupil ; the posterior
surface is blended at the circumference with the ciliary
processes, but is free in the inner half, and is covered with a
thick layer of pigment, to which the name uvea has been
applied.
face ;
poste- rior.
Ele- mentary struc- tures.
Muscu- lar fibres both ra- diating
cular ;
Structure. The iris is composed of some unstriped muscular fibres, of a plexus of blood- vessels, and of pigment cells
between the vascular twigs.
Muscular fibres. -On examining the iris with a lens after
it has been washed, its fibres will be found interlacing and
and cir- converging towards the pupil, where they are connected with
a more or less perfect ring of fibres around that aperture.
During dilatation of the pupil the radiating fibres are thrown
into a wavy state, but during its contraction they are stretched.
The involuntary movements of the iris regulate the quantity
of light admitted into the eye.
use.
Pigment cells dethe
The pigment cells in the iris are irregular in shape, like
termine those in the choroid coat, and are scattered in the same
The colour of the anterior surface of this part appears to be dependant upon a difference in
their number and arrangement.
colour.
Arteries are ramanner through the tissue.
The arteries of the iris have a looped arrangement, somediating thing like the muscular fibres. They are derived chiefly
from the long and the anterior ciliary branches, and on arriving at the ciliary ligament form a circle around the margin
and loop- of the iris ; from this loop other anastomotic branches are
fibres. directed towards the pupil, where they terminate in a second
arterial circle. Some vessels enter the iris from the ciliary
processes.
ed asthe
Mem- brane
pupil in the
Membrane ofthe pupil. -In the fetus before the eighth ofthe month, the aperture of the pupil is closed by a vascular
transparent membrane, which is attached to the iris over the
situation of the inner vascular circle, and divides the space
in which the iris is suspended, into two distinct chambers.
Vessels shoot into it from the circle before referred to, and
fetus ;
situa.
tion ; '
CILIARY VESSELS AND NERVES. 715
disap- communicate across the centre ; but at about the eighthtime of
month the vessels become impervious, and at the time of pearbirth only fragments ofthe membrane remain.
ance.
of the
are
CILIARY VESSELS AND NERVES. -The arteries that supply Arteries
the choroid coat, the ciliary processes, and the iris, are named eyeball
ciliary, and are offsets of the ophthalmic artery (p. 44. ) : they
are classed into posterior and anterior, and two of the first
set are named long ciliary, but they will not be seen without
a special injection of the vessels of the eye.
at the The posterior (short) ciliary branches pierce the sclerotic coat posterior
around and close to the optic nerve, and run on the surface of the back ;
choroid membrane till they enter its substance. Two of this set
(long ciliary) are directed forward to the ciliary ligament, one on two of
each side of the eyeball, the outer one lying rather above, and the named long inner one rather below the level of the axis, and form a circle ciliary.
around the iris, as before explained, before being distributed in the
texture of that part.
them
front.
The anterior ciliary arteries are smaller than the posterior, and Anterior ciliary arise at the front of the orbit, chiefly from muscular branches : they at the
pierce the sclerotic coat about a line behind the cornea, and join
the arterial circle of the long ciliary vessels before they end in the
iris. In inflammation of the iris these vessels are enlarged, and form
a ring around the cornea.
form
vortiThe veins leaving the choroid coat are commonly four in number, Veins
and the branches entering these trunks form arches (vasa vorticosa) vasa
on the surface : they perforate the sclerotic layer at separate points,
midway between the cornea and the optic nerve, and end in the in the
ophthalmic vein.
cosa, end
ophthal- mic.
nerves The ciliary nerves are derived from the lenticular ganglion, and Ciliary
from the nasal nerve (p. 43.) . Entering the back of the eyeball
with the arteries, they are continued forwards with the vessels
between the sclerotic and choroid coats as far as the annulus
albidus : at this spot the nerves pierce the fibres of the ciliary end in
muscle and ligament, and end in branches to the iris ; they are ciliary
said to supply the ciliary muscle. — (Todd and Bowman. )
iris and
muscle.
contains
humour
Chamber ofthe aqueous humour. -The space between the Space
cornea in front and the lens behind, in which the iris is sus- aqueous
pended, contains a clear fluid named the aqueous humour.
In the fetus this interval is separated into two distinct parts
by the iris and the pupillary membrane, but in the adult it is
716 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
divided is partly unequally and only partly divided, for the two communicate
into two through the pupil. There are two chambers described in the
adult, whose boundaries may be seen in the eye in which a
vertical section has been made.
by the iris.
Anterior part,
posteri- or ;
its
boundaries.
Aqueous
The anterior part of the space, anterior chamber, is the
larger of the two, and is limited in front by the cornea, but
behind by the ciliary ligament and the iris. The posterior
space or chamber is less than half the size of the anterior ; it is
bounded in front by the iris ; behind by the lens, covered
towards the circumference by a piece of the membrane of the
vitreous humour, and still further out by the ciliary processes, as these are inclined obliquely from the back of the
iris to the lens.
humour. nearly Theofaqueous pure water humour . Aissmall quitequantity transparent of chloride , and consists of soRetina is formed
dium, with some extractive matter, is in solution in it. It
has been supposed that this fluid was secreted by a special
membrane lining the cavity, but evidence of such a structure
is wanting.
RETINA. —This coat (tunica nervea) is formed by an exby optic pansion of the optic nerve, and is the most delicate of all the
structures in the eyeball. On it the rays of light are brought
to a focus so as to produce an image of the object observed.
nerve.
Dissec- tions to see the retina.
Situation in eye- ball ;
form
Dissection. The retina can be satisfactorily examined only on
an eye that is used before forty- eight hours have expired after death. To bring it into view, take the eyeball on which the
choroid coat was dissected, and tear away carefully that covering
with two pair of forceps when it is immersed in water. If an
entire eye is used for the purpose, pass a thread through the cornea,
and fasten it to a pin fixed in wax ; then remove in water the
sclerotic and choroid coats, and the retina will be laid bare. The
interior of the retina may be seen in the eye from which the cornea,
iris, and corpus ciliare have been removed.
The retina is the most internal of the three concentric
strata in the globe of the eye, and is situate between the
choroid coat and the transparent mass (vitreous humour) that
is lodged in the interior. It is moulded upon the vitreous
body that gives it support ; and its form is that of a segment
THE RETINA. 717
of a sphere, like the other coats, but its aperture in front is
rather large. Beginning behind in the optic nerve, this thin
layer extends forwards nearly as far as the annulus albidus, and exor to the spot at which the choroid coat becomes folded
(outer margin of the corpus ciliare), where it ends in a wavy
border, named ora serrata.
tent ;
This nervous expansion is of a greyish colour, and is semi- colour ;
transparent when fresh, so that an image can be seen at the
bottom of the eye through it when the two external coats are
removed ; but it soon loses this translucency, and is moreover transparendered opaque by the action of water and other substances. and
Its thickness is greater at the posterior than at the anterior ness .
part of the eyeball.
rency
thicksurface is
lent.
inner
are seen
opticus,
On the outer surface are some fine shreds, fragments of a Outer
structure to be noticed presently (Jacob's membrane), which floccufloat in the fluid in which the preparation may be placed,
and in a fresh eye dissected from behind a continuous layer
of this membrane may be detached with care. On looking
to the inner surface through the vitreous body, it will be onthe
found covered with accidental folds, in consequence of the ab- surface
sence of due support, and at the spot where the optic nerve expands (porus opticus) is the central artery of the retina. But porus
in the interior of the human eye, in the axis of the ball, and
of an inch outside the entrance of the optic nerve, is a slight
roundish eminence of the retina, of a yellow colour, and
of an inch in diameter, which is named the yellow spot of
Sommerring (limbus luteus). In the centre of that spot is limbus
placed a minute aperture, foramen centrale of Sommerring, foramen
which is supposed to penetrate through the nervous layer
of the retina, though not through the outer flocculent stratum
or the membrane of Jacob. In the eye of a fetus ofthe ninth
month, which had been hardened in chromic acid, Mr. Bowman found the foramen to be but the narrow neck of a small
"follicular pouch " of the retina, which projected towards
the vitreous body. *
luteus,
centrale.
Structure. In the retina are two layers or strata of dif- Two
* Vol. vi. p. 102. of the Dublin Quarterly Journal of Medical Science.
718 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
layers in the retina.'
One of nerve sub- stance
strata,
of altertubules,
ferent materials, together with blood-vessels ; the inner of
the two is formed by nervous substance, and the outer by
Jacob's membrane.
The layer of nerve substance is made up of the same elements as the grey matter of the encephalon, viz. of a granular
matrix containing different- sized nerve cells, with nerve
fibres : these constituents have the following arrangement : —
has two The nerve fibres having become solid in texture and grey in
colour from the absence of the white substance of Schwann,
an inner radiate from the end of the optic nerve, and communicate
ed nerve together to construct a thin stratum at the inner aspect of
the nervous layer ; this delicate lamina diminishes in strength
as it is followed forwards, and it cannot be traced backwards quite to the foramen of Sommerring, but its place over
that spot is taken by a layer of nucleated cells ( Todd and
Bowman). Outside these nerve fibres is another stratum of
granular the granular material, which contains large scattered nucleated vesicles towards its inner aspect, and a number of
nucleus -like cells towards its outer surface : it begins around
the entrance of the optic nerve, and becomes thinner, like
the fibrous, as it extends forwards.
and an outer of
and nu- clear bodies.
Blood- vessels in this layer.
Outer layer is
memIn the nervous layer is a plexus of blood- vessels which is
derived from the central vessels of the retina in the optic
nerve (p. 44. ). When the nerve becomes membraniform the
artery divides into four or five branches, that pierce the
stratum of fibres, and end in a network in the granular
matrix outside them, like the blood- vessels in the grey substance of the encephalon, and without forming a separate
layer ( Todd and Bowman). The larger branches of the
artery keep clear of the axis of the eyeball, and of the spot
of Sommerring. In the fetus a branch of the artery is distributed to the back of the lens.
The membrane of Jacob, which forms the outer layer
formed ofthe retina, is found, under the microscope, to be composed byJacob's of club- shaped bodies arranged vertically, so as to construct
brane ; a thin membranous covering. One end of these bodies is
pointed, and is turned to the nervous layer of the retina,
whilst the opposite larger end is directed outwards to the
pigmentary lining of the choroid coat. In water they are
its struc- ture.
THE VITREOUS BODY. 719
soon detached from one another, and the larger ends, which
seem to be produced by the bending of the stem, become
partly uncurled and resemble a hook.
body.
VITREOUS BODY. - A transparent mass fills the greater Vitreous
part of the space within the coats of the eyeball, which has
been named vitreous body from its resemblance to glass ; it
consists of a clear aqueous fluid, contained in a translucent
membrane, and has the consistence of jelly.
―
tain a
Dissection. The vitreous body will be seen by taking away the To obretina, the ciliary ligament and processes, and the iris, from the eye view on which the retina was dissected. To obtain a view of its anterior of it .
part with the lens in situation, an eyeball should be pinned upright
on wax, after the sclerotic and choroid coats are cut through about
two lines behind the cornea (p. 710. ) ; by removing carefully the
cornea, and the ciliary ligament and processes, the vitreous body will become apparent.
the
filled by
Outer
are the
corona.
The vitreous body is globular in form, and fills three Part of
fourths of the ball of the eye, reaching forwards nearly to globe
the iris. By its outer surface it is in contact with the retina it.
which it supports, but between the two is a layer of trans- surface.
parent nucleated cells (Todd and Bowman). In front the In front
vitreous body is slightly hollowed, and receives the lens with lens and
its capsule, to which it is closely united ; and around the
lens are some streaks of pigment, in the position of the
ciliary processes, which resemble the corolla of a flower.
The fluid of the vitreous body has nearly the same compo- Strucsition as the aqueous humour (p. 716.), and is contained in a web of
the meshes of a close web of fibrous tissue. Enveloping the containwhole is a thin membrane named hyaloid.
ture ;
tissue
ing water.
mem- brane
inwards
The hyaloid membrane is the fine transparent covering Hyaloid
of the vitreous body, which does not appear to have bloodvessels and nerves. It passes continuously over the surface sends
of that mass ; moreover, it sends inwards processes that septa.
are directed towards the centre, but do not appear to meet
in the middle line, and thereby divide the tissue into seg- Arrangements, as in an orange. In the fetus there is a canal in the these.
centre of the vitreous mass, named the hyaloid canal, through
which a branch of the vessel in the optic nerve is conveyed
ment of
720 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
is attached to cap- sule of the lens
to the back of the capsule of the lens. * ( Hanover. ) In
In front front the membrane is attached to the capsule of the lens on
the anterior aspect, and near the margin ; but it is not continued beneath that case, for the septa in the interior of the
vitreous mass are fixed to the back of the capsule. Around
the lens, where the surface is striated, the hyaloid membrane
is marked by a series of folds or plaits, constituting the
and ci- zonula ciliaris, by which it is connected with the choroidal
ciliary processes.
liary pro- cesses.
Corona ciliaris
ed by folds
The corona ciliaris, or the zonule of Zinn, is the striated
and plaited part of the hyaloid membrane, which is placed
around the lens, and intervenes between this and the anis mark- terior termination of the retina. When the pigment is
washed away the plaits or folds of the zonule, ciliary processes, are found to resemble the processes of the choroid
coat, but they are less prominent and longer. These two
that are sets of folds are dovetailed together, the prominences of one
between membrane being received into hollows on the other ; and
pro- they are further united by a layer of nucleated cells.
fitted
ciliary
cesses.
Canal of Petit ;
situa- tion ;
(Todd and Bowman. )
Canal of Petit.— Around the margin of the lens is a
small canal, about two lines across, which has received the
above name. It is placed beneath the plaited part of the
hyaloid membrane, and is excavated in the substance of the
anterior vitreous body. When the canal has been opened and disculated. tended with air, it is sacculated at regular intervals, like the
large intestine, in consequence of the inflation of the plaits
of the hyaloid membrane.
part sacLens of the eye- ball.
Open capsule
CRYSTALLINE LENS AND ITS CAPSULE. The crystalline
lens is a solid, transparent, doubly convex body, which is
situate behind the pupil of the eye, and acts chiefly in
bringing to a focus on the retina the rays of light passing
through that aperture.
Dissection. The lens will be obtained by cutting across the
of lens . thin membranous capsule in which it is enclosed .
* Mr. Bowman's recent researches (Dublin Quarterly Journal) seem
to corroborate the statements of Hanover respecting the structure of the vitreous body.
LENS AND ITS CAPSULE. 721
tion and
tions.
The lens is contained in a capsule, and is seated in a situahollow on the front of the vitreous body. The anterior part connec
projects towards the iris and the pupil ; whilst the posterior
is received in the vitreous body, and is attached thereto by
fibrous processes that are fixed to the capsule. The circumference is below the level of the surface of the vitreous mass,
and corresponds to the canal of Petit.
are
unequalThe curve of the lens is unequal on the two surfaces, the Surfaces
posterior being greater than the anterior, and the margin is curved
somewhat rounded. The density increases from the circum- ly ;
ference to the centre ; for whilst the superficial part rubs off density ;
easily with the finger, the deeper portion is hard and firm,
and is named the nucleus. Its measurement from side to dimen- sions ;
side is from one third to half an inch, and from before back
about one eighth of an inch. On each surface are three lines on
lines diverging from the centre, and reaching to within a faces.
third of the margin ; they are the edges of septa, and are so
situate that those on one side are intermediate in position to
those on the other. In the human eye they are not distinctly seen, because they bifurcate repeatedly as they extend
outwards.
the surof cells
to the
Covering the surface of the lens, and connecting it with A layer
the capsule, is a layer of very transparent nucleated cells, joins it
which can be recognised only in a fresh eye (Todd and capsule.
Bowman). After a little time these cells absorb water,
probably from the aqueous humour, and break down to form
the fluid called aqua Morgagni, but naturally there is not
fluid between the lens and its capsule.
Structure. After the lens is hardened by spirit or Lens is
boiling, it may be demonstrated to consist of a series
layers arranged one within another, like those on
onion, and each layer to be formed of minute fibres. No
blood-vessels are found in its texture. It consists mostly of
albumen.
any -
of
an
laminar.
of the The lamina of each surface have their apices in the Form
centre, where the septa meet, and may be detached from one lamina
another at that spot, and turned outwards. Each is constructed of minute fibres, that are continued from surface to
surface over the margin of the lens. The constituent fibres
3 A
722 DISSECTION OF THE EYE.
con- structed
nute fibres
wavy at
tached to the
of the lamina are about of an inch in diameter, but
of mi- they are flattened at the margin of the lens, and the deeper
fibres are narrowed and less separate. In the superficial
that are lamina they have slightly wavy edges, by which contiguous
the edge, ones are dovetailed together : this digitation is best seen in
and at the lens of the codfish. They are connected at their extremities to the partitions on the opposite surfaces of the
lens in this way : those that are attached to the root of
a septum on the one aspect are fixed to the extremity of a
septum on the other surface, and the rest of the fibres
passing between two septa begin and end at opposite points
in each.
septa by their ends.
Changes in situa- tion ;
form ,
-- Changes with age. In infancy the lens is situate further
forwards than in adult age, and touches the iris. Its form
is nearly spherical in the fetus, but its convexity decreases
with age, particularly on the anterior aspect, until the lens
colour, becomes flattened in old people. In the fetus it is reddish
in colour, is soft, and is not quite transparent ; in youth and
consist- mature age it is firm and clear, and in old age it becomes
denser and of a yellowish colour.
and
ence.
Capsule of the lens ;
rior part
and trans- parent ;
The capsule of the lens is a firm transparent case that
closely surrounds the lens. Its anterior surface is free in
its ante- the posterior chamber of the eye, but gives attachment is firm towards the circumference to the hyaloid membrane ; its
posterior surface is connected with the vitreous body by
fibrous processes. The anterior part of the capsule is three
or four times thicker than the posterior, and supports itself
after the removal of the lens ; it is firm and quite transparent, and remains clear after immersion in spirit or maposterior ceration in water, like the elastic layer of the cornea. The
fibrous ; posterior part of the capsule, which is thin and membranous,
is rendered opaque by spirit.
thin and
to it. 1
vessels In the adult human eye the capsule of the lens is not
supplied with blood- vessels ; but in the fetus a branch of
the central artery of the retina passes through the vitreous
body to supply it on the posterior aspect.
MEATUS AUDITORIUS EXTERNUS. 723
CHAPTER XI.
DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
tion.
THE ear is the organ through which sounds are perceived. DefiniIt is made up of many complex parts that are lodged in or
are attached to the surface of the temporal bone.
of the
of the
hearing.
The sentient structure in this organ is formed, as in the Outline
eyeball, by an expansion of a special nerve over a mem- elements
brane containing fluid . This structure is enclosed in the organ of
dense osseous substance, and is surrounded by certain ac
cessory bodies that collect, and convey to it the undulations
to be perceived, or influence the effect of the same on the
auditory nerve.
ment The several parts constituting the auditory apparatus may Arrangebe arranged into two sets, viz. those outside, and those into two
within the substance of the temporal bone.
sets.
A. The set .
external set (outer ear) which are to be first ex- Outer
amined include the pinna or auricle, and the auditory canal :
the former has been noticed at page 33., and the latter is
described below.
canal. The AUDITORY CANAL. (meatus auditorius externus) is the Auditory
passage which leads from the pinna to a cavity in the temporal bone named the tympanum, and transmits sounds inwards.
obtain a Dissection. To obtain a view of this canal, a recent temporal Howto
bone is to be taken, on which the cartilaginous pinna remains at- view of
tached. After the soft parts are removed, the squamous part offit ;
the bone in front of the Glasserian fissure is to be sawn off, and the
fore part of the meatus is to be cut away with a bone forceps,
except the portion below that gives support to the thin membrana
tympani.
This canal is about one inch and a quarter in length, and length ;
is formed partly by bone, and partly by cartilage and mem- 3A 2
724 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
direc- tion ;!
brane. It is directed forwards somewhat obliquely, and is
bent downwards about the middle of the osseous part, so that
the floor slopes from that spot both outwards and inwards.
size and In shape it is rather flattened from before backwards ; and
it is narrowest at the bent part. The outer extremity is
continuous with the hollow (concha) of the external ear, and
the inner is closed by the membrana tympani.
shape.
Cartila- ginous]
part
a. The cartilaginous part is about half an inch in length,
and is formed by that portion of the pinna of the outer ear
which is attached to the margin of the meatus ; but at the
is defi- upper and posterior aspect the cartilage is deficient, and the
tube is closed by fibrous tissue. Two or three fissures ( of
Santorini) are found in the piece of cartilage.
cient above.
Osseous part is bent ;
outer end ;
inner end ;
condi- tion in the fetus.
Lining memderived
skin.
Cerumib. The osseous part is about three quarters of an inch long
in the adult, and is constricted about the middle, where it is
bent as before said. Its outer extremity is dilated, and the
posterior projects more than the anterior part ; the margin
here is rough, and gives attachment to the cartilage of the
pinna. The inner end is less dilated, and is marked by a
groove in the dry bone, except above, for the insertion of
the membrane ofthe tympanum ; it is sloped very obliquely,
so that the anterior wall exceeds the posterior by about two
lines.
In the fetus the osseous part is absent, but after birth it
grows out of the osseous ring ( tympanic bone) that supports
the membrana tympani, and becomes joined to the rest of
the temporal bone.
In
Lining ofthe meatus.- A prolongation of the integument
brane is lines the auditory passage, and is continued over the memfrom the brane of the tympanum in the form of a thin pellicle.
Around the entrance of the meatus are some fine hairs.
the subcutaneous tissue of the cartilaginous part of the
meatus are some ceruminous glands, which secrete the ear
wax, and open on the surface ; but these are most abundant
in that portion of the tube which is formed by fibrous tissue.
Vessels. Vessels and nerves. The meatus receives its arteries
from the posterior auricular, the internal maxillary, and the
Nerves. temporal branches of the external carotid trunk. Its nerves
are derived from the auriculo-temporal branch of the fifth
nous glands.
-
TYMPANIC CAVITY. 725
nerve, and enter the auditory passage between the bone and
the cartilage (p. 87.).
set of B. The internal constituents of the auditory apparatus, Internal
that are enclosed within the temporal bone, consist of two auditory
large spaces, named tympanum and labyrinth, with their parts.
accessory parts.
num. The TYMPANUM, or drum of the ear, is a hollow interposed Tympabetween the meatus auditorius and the labyrinthic cavity,
which is lined by mucous membrane, and filled with air. It
communicates with the pharynx by a tube ( Eustachian) , and
is traversed by a chain of small bones that has muscles and
ligaments connected with it. The vessels and nerves of the
space are numerous and minute.
tion to open it
dry
Dissection. The tympanic cavity is to be opened both in a Dissecdried and in a recent bone. On the dry temporal bone, remove
most ofthe squamous portion by means of a vertical cut of the saw in the
directed through the root of the zygoma, and along the Glasserian bone,
fissure. By cutting away with the bone forceps the anterior part
of the meatus auditorius, and the projecting bone above that forms
the roof ofthe cavity, the tympanum will be brought into view.
the rebone.
In the recent bone, in addition to the preparation already made and in
ofthe meatus auditorius, the roof of the tympanum should be taken centi
away only as far as may be necessary, and without doing injury to
the membrana tympani, the chorda tympani nerve, and the chain
of bones with its muscles.
and The cavity of the tympanum has the form of a small, round, Form
and flattened box, placed on the side, for the outer and inner
boundaries are flat, and the circumference is circular. Its
size is greater from point to point of the circumference than dimenacross the space, or from without inwards, being in the
former direction about half an inch, but in the latter not
more than half that measurement.
sions.
wall
edby
tory and
The inner boundary is of greater extent than the outer, Inner
and on it the following objects are to be noticed. About is markthe centre is the large projection of the promontory, which promonbecomes pointed posteriorly, and is marked by two or three its
minute grooves that lodge the nerves forming the anastomosis of Jacobson. At the posterior or narrowed part of the
promontory are two large apertures, one above and the other
grooves.
3 A 3
726 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
ovalis,
below it , which lead into the labyrinthic space. The upper
opening resembles in shape the half segment of a circle, with
Fenestra the convexity placed upwards, and is named fenestra ovalis :
towards the vestibule ( part of the labyrinth) it has a sharp,
prominent margin, and into it, in the recent state, the inner
bone (stapes) of the osseous chain is fixed. The lower aperture is in form like the upper one, though more arched, and
the base is vertical and directed backwards : it is named
fenestra fenestra rotunda. In the recent state it is closed by a thin
membrane, secondary membrane of the tympanum ; and, in
the dried bone, an osseous ridge may be seen within its
margin, which divides it into two parts : one leads into the
vestibule, the other into the cochlea.
rotunda."
Its outer bound- ary mem- brana
and
-
The outer boundary of the cavity is formed by the
membrana tympani, and by a small part of the surrounding bone. Above the membrane and at its fore part,
tympani is the Glasserian or glenoid fissure, which is occupied, in Glasse- the fresh condition of the body, by the long process of one
fissure. of the small bones ( malleus) in the tympanic cavity, and by
a small muscle (laxator tympani). Crossing the membrane
towards the upper part is the chorda tympani nerve.
rian
Circumroof;
floor ;
The circumference of the tympanum is circular, but it is ference ; rough and uneven on the surface. In passing around the
cavity, the student will detect in succession the objects that
are noted below. The roof is flattened, and consists of the
thin osseous plate forming part of the cranial surface of the
temporal bone ; but the floor is curved over the subjacent
jugular fossa, and presents in the dry bone more or less of
an areolar or spongy texture, as well as some small apertures
at back ; that open into that fossa. At the posterior part of the circumference, towards the roof, is a large aperture leading
opening into the mastoid cells. Below this aperture, but nearer the
toid inner wall, and on a level with the narrowed part of the
promontory, is a small conical projection, named the pyramid,
which is perforated by an aperture, and contains the stapedius muscle attaching it to the above- mentioned part of
the promontory, is a small round spiculum of bone. Immediately above the pyramid, and arching over the fenestra
ovalis, is a ridge of bone marking the situation of the aque
of mascells ;
pyra- mid ;
aqueduct of Fallo pius.
EUSTACHIAN TUBE. 727
for tenpani and
duct of Fallopius. The frontof the tympanic cavity cor- In front
responds to the carotid canal, only a thin scale of bone intervening. In it are the apertures of two canals that lie on canals
the outer side of the passage for the carotid artery ; the sor tymupper one contains the tensor tympani muscle, and the lower Eustaone is the Eustachian tube. Between the two canals is a thin tube,
osseous lamina, which is hollowed above and dilated at the bone
inner end, and is named processus cochleariformis.
Two parts that have been referred to above, viz. the
membrana tympani and the Eustachian tube, require a separate notice.
chian
with
between.
brana
in the
and the
The membrana tympani is a thin partition between the Memmeatus auditorius and the cavity of the tympanum. It is tympani ;
oval in form, taking the shape of the meatus, and is attached state
by its circumference to a grooved surface at the inner end of adult
the auditory passage ; but in the fetus it is fitted into a se- fetus.
parate osseous ring, the tympanic bone. The membrane is
placed very obliquely with respect to the meatus, so that it situameets the floor of that space at an angle of 45 degrees, and
the outer surface is directed downwards. Towards the au- surfaces.
ditory canal the surface is concave ; but in the tympanum it
is convex, and has attached to its upper half the handle of
one of the tympanic bones (malleus).
tion ;
formed
líal, and
stratum .
Structure. This membrane is formed of three strata or It is
structures, an external, internal, and middle. Two of these of a cuti- cular,
are obtained from common tissues of the body : thus, the outer epitheone is cuticular, and is part of the integument lining the fibrous
meatus ; and the inner layer is derived from the ciliated epithelial covering of the mucous membrane of the tympanum.
The middle stratum is formed of fibrous tissue, and is fixed
to the groove in the bone as before said : from its centre,
where it is connected with the handle of the malleus, fibres
radiate towards the circumference, and near the margin at
the inner aspect is a band of circular fibres.
chian The Eustachian tube is the channel through which the Eustatympanic cavity is filled with air. It is about an inch and a tube has
half in length, and is directed downwards and inwards to the
pharynx ; like the meatus auditorius, it is partly osseous and
partly cartilaginous in texture.
3 A 4
728 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
an osse- ous part;
mina- tion.
The osseous part is rather more than half an inch in length,
and is narrowed at the middle. Its opening in the tympanum
situation and its situation with respect to the canal for the tensor
tympani muscle have been alluded to ; its course in the temporal bone is along the angle of union of the squamous and
petrous portions, external to the aperture that contains the
andter- carotid artery. Externally it ends in a dilated and somewhat
oval opening, with the longest measurement in a vertical
direction, whose margin is irregular, and gives attachment
to the special cartilage that completes the canal. The cartiCartila laginous part of the tube is nearly an inch in length, and extends from the temporal bone to the interior of the pharynx.
Use of (See p. 121.) Through this tube the mucous membrane of
the tympanum is continuous with that of the pharynx, and
through it, by reason of its inclination downwards, the mucus passes from that cavity.
ginous part.
the tube.
Ossicles ofthe tympathree.
OSSICLES OF THE TYMPANUM. -Three small bones are
united to form a chain across the tympanic cavity. The
num are outer one is named malleus from its resemblance to a mallet ;
the next, incus, from its similitude to an anvil ; and the last,
stapes, because it is very like a stirrup. For the examination
of these little bones the student should be provided with
some separate dry specimens, as well as with those seen in
position in the cavity.
Malleus has
head,
neck,
The malleus is the longest bone and is twisted and bent :
it is large at one end ( head) and small and pointed at the
other (handle), and has besides two processes, with a narrowed part or the neck. The head (capitulum) is free in
the cavity, is oval in shape, and is smooth except at the
back, where there is a depression for articulation with the
next bone. The neck is the slightly twisted part between
handle, the head and the processes ; the handle (manubrium) decreases in size towards the tip, and is flattened from before
backwards, except at the extremity where it is compressed in
the opposite direction : to its outer margin the membrana
tympani is connected. The processes of the bone are two in
number, long and short : the short one springs from the
root of the handle on the outer side, and reaches the memshort and long process.
OSSICLES OF THE TYMPANUM. 729
brane ofthe tympanum ; the long process ( processus gracilis)
is a slender point of bone, but seldom altogether ossified, which
is connected with the neck of the malleus on the anterior
aspect, and extends into the Glasserian fissure.
cesses ;
long,
The incus is a flattened bone, and consists of a body and Incus,
two processes. The body is hollowed at the upper and an- its body ;
terior part to articulate with the malleus. The two pro- processes (long and short) extend from the side opposite to the shortand articulation : the shorter process is somewhat conical, and
is received into the aperture of the mastoid cells ; the long
process decreases towards the extremity, where it curves
and ends in a rounded and convex point, the orbicular with orprocess.
-
bicular point.
The stapes has, like a stirrup, a base or wider part, and Stapes ;
two sides or crura that are blended at the opposite end in a
head. The base is formed by a thin osseous plate, which is base ;
convex at one margin and almost flat at the other, corresponding to the shape of the fenestra ovalis ; the surface
that is turned to the vestibule is convex, whilst the opposite
is excavated. The head is marked by a superficial depres- head ;
sion, that receives the orbicular process of the incus ; and
below it is a constricted part, the neck of the bone. The
crura extend from the base to the neck, and are grooved,
like the base, on the inner surface : the anterior crus is
shorter and straighter than the other.
crura.
of the Position ofthe ossicles. —The malleus is placed vertically Position
in the tympanum, with the head upwards, and its articular malleus,
surface turned backwards to be connected with the incus :
its handle is attached externally to the membrana tympani,
and its long process is directed forwards to the Glasserian
fissure. The incus is so placed that the long process is of the
vertical, and the short one horizontal. Externally it is
united with the malleus, and its processes are thus disposed :
incus,
the short one is received posteriorly into the mastoid
cells ; and the long process descends, like the handle of the
malleus, but rather posterior to it and nearer the inner wall
of the cavity, to join inferiorly with the stapes. The stirrup and of
bone has a horizontal position, with the crura directed for- stapes.
wards and backwards : its base is fixed into the fenestra
the
730 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
The bones
ovalis, and its head is united with the long process of the
incus.
Ligaments of the ossicles. - The small bones of the
have two tympanic cavity are united into one chain by articular ligaments, and are further kept in position by ligaments that
ments ; fix them to the surrounding bone.
sets of ligaeither to join one to an- other
by two perfect joints,
or to fix
the tymwall.
a - . From one bone to another. The ossicles are connected together at the points where they touch by articulations corresponding
to those of larger bones, for the osseous surfaces are covered with
cartilage, and are surrounded by a capsular ligament of fibrous
tissue, whilst a synovial sac lubricates the whole. By means of
these joints, perfect freedom of movement of the bones is secured
to convey inwards the vibrations of the membrana tympani to the
labyrinth. One articulation of the nature above described exists
between the heads of the malleus and incus, and a second between
the extremity of the long process of the incus and the head of the
stapes. In the recent bone a thin membrane closes the interval
between the crura of the stapes, and is attached to the groove on
their inner aspect.
b. Between the bones and the wall. The bones are kept in situthem to ation by the reflection of the mucous membrane, and by special
panic ligaments. From the head of the malleus a short suspensory band
of fibres is directed upwards to the roof of the tympanum. Another
ligamentous band passes backwards from the incus, near the end of
its short process, to the posterior part of the containing cavity ;
and the base of the stapes is connected to the margin of the
fenestra ovalis by fibres that constitute an orbicular ligament.
Three
to the ossicles.
Muscles of the ossicles. - Two muscles are plainly seen muscles in connection with the chain of bones, which possess striped
fibres. One of these is attached to the malleus, the other to
the stapes. A second muscle for the malleus is sometimes
described.
Tensor The tensor tympani (internal muscle of the malleus) is
tympani is in a contained in a special bony canal, and to see it completely
canal,
bony this must be laid open : it is the largest and most distinct
of the muscles of the tympanum, and takes the shape of the
it origin, containing tube. The muscle arises from the surface of its
which gives
bony canal, also slightly in front from the cartilage of the
Eustachian tube, and its fibres are directed backwards ;
posteriorly it ends in a tendon, which is reflected over the
VESSELS AND NERVES OF TYMPANUM. 731
name.
inserted
leus.
us is in
end of the cochleariform process as over a pulley, and is and is
inserted into the anterior part of the handle of the malleus, into malnear its base. The action of this muscle is expressed bythe Action.
It receives a special nerve from the otic ganglion.
The stapedius is lodged in the canal hollowed in the in- Stapediterior of the pyramid. Arising from the circumference of the pythe tube, the muscle ends in a small tendon that issues from
the pyramid, and is inserted into the neck of the stapes at attached
the posterior part. It assists in keeping the stapes applied stapes.
to the fenestra ovalis.
ramid
to
Action.
tympani
ful.
Laxator tympani (external muscle of the malleus) . —The Laxator
muscular nature of this band is doubtful. It is connected is doubtexternally with the spinous process of the sphenoid bone,
and passing through the Glasserian fissure is attached to
the neck of the malleus above the processus gracilis, or to
that process.
oftymcloses
rotunda
Mucous membrane ofthe tympanum. —The mucous lining Lining
of the tympanic cavity adheres closely to the wall, and is panum
continuous with that of the pharynx through the Eustachian fenestra
tube : it assists to close the fenestra rotunda, and is, moreover, continued into the mastoid cells through the aperture
leading into these. Its surface is covered with a ciliated
epithelium. A layer of epithelium can be detached from the Epitheinner surface of the membrana tympani, in the same manner
as a cuticular stratum may be separated on the outer side.
lium.
are
of caroBLOOD VESSELS. -The arteries of the tympanum are fur- Arteries
nished from the following branches of the external carotid, branches
viz. , internal maxillary, posterior auricular, ascending pha- tid.
ryngeal, and some offsets come also from the internal carotid ,
whilst it is contained in the temporal bone. The veins join
the middle meningeal and pharyngeal trunks.
internal
lary.
a. The internal maxillary artery supplies first a tympanic branch From
(inferior), that is distributed as described below ; next it gives an maxiloffset to the cavity from the petrosal branch of the middle meningeal artery, which enters the temporal bone by the hiatus
Fallopii.
b. Some twigs to the back of the cavity, and to the mastoid cells, Posteriare derived from the stylo -mastoid branch of the posterior auricular or auriartery, which enters the lower end of the aqueduct of Fallopius.
cular.
732 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
Inferior palatine .
One of this set, superior tympanic, anastomoses with the tympanic
branch of the internal maxillary artery, and forms a circle around
the membrana tympani, from which branches are directed inwards.
c. Other branches from the ascending pharyngeal, or from the
inferior palatine artery, enter the space along the Eustachian tube.
Nerves NERVES. The lining membrane of the tympanum is
several supplied by the tympanic plexus a communication established between Jacobson's and the sympathetic nerve ; but
the muscles derive their nerves from another source.
Crossing the cavity is the chorda tympani branch of the
facial nerve.
from
sources.
Dissec- tion to prepare the nerves
Dissection. The preparation of the tympanic plexus will require a separate fresh temporal bone, that has been softened in
hydro-chloric acid, after the nerves have been hardened in spirit.
The origin of Jacobson's nerve from the glosso- pharyngeal is first
to be sought close to the skull (p. 101.) ; and the auricular branch
entering, of the pneumo-gastric to be looked for at the same time.
before
and in the tym- Supposing the nerves to be found, the student should place the
panic scalpel on the outer side of the Eustachian tube, and carry it
cavity. backwards along a line passing through the vaginal and styloid
Tympa- nic nerve
processes of the temporal bone, so as to take away the outer part
of the tympanum, but not to open the lower end of the aqueduct
of Fallopius, lest the facial nerve should be injured. Now the
tympanum is laid open, Jacobson's nerve is to be followed in its
canal, and the branches that lie in the grooves on the surface of the
promontory are to be pursued -one of these arching forwards and
two coursing upwards.
The connections of the chorda tympani nerve can be seen on the
preparation used for the muscles.
The tympanic branch of the glosso- pharyngeal nerve
(nerve of Jacobson, p. 103.) enters a special aperture in the
temporal bone, and is conducted by it to the inner wall of
supplies the tympanum. At this spot the nerve supplies filaments brane to the lining membrane of the cavity, and furnishes the
three following branches, that are contained in grooves on
branch- the promontory, and connect this nerve with others. *
memand other
es ;
* Instead of viewing these filaments as offsets of the nerve of Jacobson, it may be supposed that they are branches derived from the nerves
they are connected with, which unite in the tympanum to form the
tympanic plexus.
VESTIBULAR SPACE. 733
the symanother
and a
otic
One branch is arched forwards and downwards, and enters the one to
carotid canal to communicate with the sympathetic on the artery pathetic,
(p. 110.). A second is directed upwards to join the large super- anopetroficial petrosal nerve in the hiatus Fallopii (p. 134. ) . And the third salnerve,
filament has the following course to reach the "otic ganglion : it third to
first ascends towards the upper surface of the petrous part of the gan- glion,
temporal bone, passing in front of the fenestra ovalis, but beneath
the canal for the tensor tympani muscle, and near the gangliform
enlargement on the facial nerve, to which it is connected by filaments (p. 136.) . Beyond the union with the facial, this nerve is
named small superficial petrosal, and is continued forwards external called
to the hiatus Fallopii, but without appearing on the surface of the petrosal,
temporal bone, until it issues from the osseous substance to end in
the otic ganglion ( p . 138.) .
small
for the Nerves to muscles. -The tensor tympani muscle is supplied Nerves
by a branch from the otic ganglion (p. 138. ) ; and the stapedius muscles.
receives an offset from the facial nerve ( Sommerring) .
cavity.
The chorda tympani is a branch of the facial nerve, which is now Chorda tympani seen in the part of its course through the tympanum. Entering crosses
the cavity behind, it crosses the membrana tympani, and issues
from the space by a special aperture to join the gustatory nerve.
It is described at page 137.
of vagus
outer ear.
The auricular branch of the vagus nerve, though not a nerve of Branch
the tympanum, is an offset to the outer ear, and may be now traced tothe
in the softened bone. Arising in the jugular fossa (p. 105.) , the
nerve enters a canal which conducts it across the lower end of the
aqueduct of Fallopius, and through the substance of the temporal
bone to the back of the pinna of the ear. In the bone it joins the
facial nerve.
rinth
of ossememTHE LABYRINTH. -The inner and fundamental portion of Labythe organ of hearing is so named from its complexness. It formed
is formed partly of dense osseous bodies, and partly of mem- ous and
branous sacs containing fluid on which the auditory nerve is branous
distributed. It is divided into an osseous and a membranous
labyrinth.
parts.
tuents
Osseous
A. The osseous labyrinth consists of three parts, viz. the Constivestibule, the semicircular canals, and the cochlea ; these of the
communicate externally with the tympanum, and internally part.
with the meatus internus that transmits the auditory nerve.
The VESTIBULE is the common central cavity of the osseous
734 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
Vesti bule.
Dissec- tion to see it.
Form,
labyrinth, and is placed behind the cochlea but in front of
the semicircular canals.
-
Dissection. This cavity may be seen on the dry bone used for
the preparation of the tympanum by means of the following cuts.
Saw vertically through the temporal bone close to the inner wall
of the tympanum, so as to expose this wall and the fenestra ovalis
leading into the vestibule. In this section one of the semicircular
canals (horizontal) will be laid open just above the fenestra ovalis.
By enlarging the fenestra ovalis a very little in a direction upwards
and forwards, the end of the superior semicircular canal and the vestibular space will appear. Other views of the cavity may be
obtained by sections of the bone in different directions, according
to the skill and the knowledge of the dissector.
The vestibular space is somewhat oval in form, the extremities of the oval being placed forwards and backwards, and
dimen- the floor is more narrowed than the roof. It measures
about of an inch in different directions, except from without inwards, in which direction it is narrower. The following objects are to be noted on the boundaries of the space.
sions.
Aper- tures be- In front, close to the outer wall, is a large aperture leading
fore and into the cochlea ; and behind are five round openings of the
three semicircular canals.
behind.
Crest on inner wall;
front of it ;
On the inner wall, nearer the front than the back of the
cavity, is a vertical ridge (crista). In front of the ridge is a
fossa in small circular depression, fovea hemispherica, which presents anteriorly some minute apertures for nerves, and corresponds to the bottom of the meatus auditorius internus.
Behind the crest of bone, near the common opening of two
of the semicircular canals, is the opening of the aqueduct of
the vestibule, which ends on the posterior aspect of the
Outer petrous portion of the temporal bone. The outer wall cortwoaper. responds to the tympanic cavity, and in it are the apertures
of the fenestra rotunda and fenestra ovalis.
and an aqueduct behind.
wall has
tures.
Roof has a fossa.
Three canals ;
On the roof is a slight transversely oval depression, forea
semi-elliptica, which is separated from the fovea hemispherica by a continuation of the crista before mentioned.
The SEMICIRCULAR CANALS are three osseous tubes, which
are situate behind the vestibule, and are named from their
form.
SEMICIRCULAR CANALS. 735
tion of Dissection. These small canals will be rendered visible after preparathe removal of the surrounding bone by means of a file or some them;
cutting instrument. Two may be seen opening near the aperture
made in the vestibule, and may be followed thence, but the third is
altogether towards the posterior aspect of the petrous portion of the
temporal bone.
terminafive
ings ;
The canals are of unequal lengths, but each forms more length ;
than half a circle ; they communicate at each end with thetion by
vestibule, and the contiguous ends of two are blended to- opengether so as to give but five openings into the cavity. Each
is marked by one dilated extremity which is called the one end
ampulla. When a tube is cut across, it is not circular but is
compressed laterally, and measures about of an inch, form and
though in the ampulla the size is as large again.
dilated ;
size.
named
superior vertical ,
rior verFrom a difference in the direction taken by the tubes, They are
they have been named superior and posterior vertical,
and horizontal. The superior vertical canal crosses the
upper border of the petrous part of the temporal bone,
where it forms a projection. Its extremities are more distant than in the other tubes ; its outer end is marked by the
ampulla, whilst the inner is joined with the following. The
posterior vertical tube is directed backwards from its junc- postetion with the preceding towards the posterior surface of the tical ,
temporal bone ; the upper end is united with the superior
vertical canal to form a common tube, and the lower end is
free and dilated. The horizontal canal has separate aper- and hotures, and is the shortest of the three. Deeper in position
than the superior vertical, it lies in the substance of the bone
nearly on a level with the fenestra ovalis ; its dilated end is
at the outer side close above that aperture.
rizontal.
COCHLEA. This part of the osseous labyrinth has a po- Cochlea.
sition anterior to the vestibule, and has received its name
from its resemblance to a snail's shell.
Dissection. To obtain a view of the cochlea in the dried bone,
it will be needful only to cut or file away gradually the surface of
bone forming the promontory of the tympanum, on the preparation
before used for displaying the vestibule, or on another piece of bone in which the semicircular canals are not laid bare. The horizontal direction of this body will be best seen by cutting away the
Dissec- tion for it in dry
736 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
and recent bone.
Form and sibone above it. To dissect the same parts in the recent state, a
softened bone should be used.
The cochlea is conical in form, and is placed almost horituation ; zontally in front of the vestibular space. The base of this
body is turned to the meatus auditorius internus, and is
perforated by small apertures, whilst the apex is directed to
the upper and anterior part of the inner wall of the tympanum, opposite the canal for the tensor tympani muscle.
Its length is about a quarter of an inch, and its width at the
Resem- base is about the same. Resembling a snail- shell in construction, the cochlea consists of a tube wound spirally round
a central part or axis ; but it differs from a shell in the fact
of the tube being subdivided into two by a partition, and in
the circumstance of the central part or axis being much
thicker.
size.
bles a
snail- shell in some respects.
Parts of the coch- lea.
A spiral tube closed
In describing the several parts of the cochlea it will be
necessary to notice separately its axis or centre, its spiral
tube, with the two passages into which it is subdivided, and
the partition between them.
The spiral tube forms two turns and a half around the
axis, and terminates above in a closed extremity, named the
cupola. Of the turns the first is much the largest, and inturns ; cludes the rest within its coil : at its commencement it
at one end forms 2
projects into the tympanum, and gives rise to the eminence
of the promontory on the inner wall of that cavity. When
measure- ment measured along the outer side, the tube is about one inch ;
and a half long ; its diameter at the beginning is about onetenth of an inch, but it gradually diminishes to half that size
towards the opposite end. In the recent bone the tube is
divided into two passages (scala) by a septum. A remnant
into two. of this partition is seen in the dry bone in the form of a thin
plate of bone (lamina spiralis) ; and, on the outer wall, opposite this ridge of bone, is a slight groove.
is di- vided
A cen- tral pil.
lar or
The axis or modiolus consists of the bony substance included within the coils of the spiral tube ; it is formed ex- axis ternally by a condensed stratum - the wall of the spiral
is porous tube ; and, internally, by a porous material. Its form is
conical, and its size diminishes rapidly towards the last half and co- nical ;
COCHLEA AND ITS SEPTUM. 737
ends
in the
bulum.
it is a
piece of
turn of the spiral tube, where it is very thin, and presents a howit
free margin ; but at the apex it widens a little, becoming above
funnel-shaped, and forms the infundibulum. The axis is infundi .
perforated by canals that transmit vessels and nerves in the
fresh state ; and the central one is larger than the others.
Winding around the axis is a thin osseous plate, the lamina Around
spiralis, which projects half-way across the spiral tube, and spiral
forms part of the septum. It begins inferiorly within the bone,
vestibule, and, diminishing in size in its progress, ends in a
point, named the hamulus, opposite the free margin of the that ends
modiolus in the last half turn of the cochlea. Between the a point
point in which the osseous lamina terminates and the margin
referred to is an aperture (helicotrema), that allows of the over an
communication of the passages of the spiral tube in the recent through
condition. The lamina spiralis is formed on the exterior of the scale
two plates of bone that are separated furthest at the modiolus, and enclose osseous canals for vessels and nerves.
above in
aperture ,
which
join.
of the Septum ofthe spiral tube. - The partition dividing the Septum
tube of the cochlea into two passages in the recent bone tube
consists of an osseous and a membranous portion.
bony and mem- branous.
Osseous
ence on
a. The osseous part, which is formed by the lamina spiralis,
extends rather more than half way across the tube, and is part ;
covered by the lining membrane of the cochlea. The side
turned to the lower of the two cochlear passages is freely differpierced by nerves and vessels ; whilst the opposite is covered, two
according to Todd and Bowman *, in the outer fifth of its
extent, by a structure resembling cartilage, which ends in
toothed edge near the margin of the spiral lamina, and
named by them denticulate lamina.
sides ;
on upper
a aspect is
is ticulate struc- ture.
branous
extent
b.The membranous part reaches from the edge of the Memlamina spiralis to the groove opposite in the outer wall of part
the tube of the cochlea, and is continued upwards to the top upwards;
of that tube beyond the extent of the bony part of the partition. Near the lamina spiralis this structure has a glassy
appearance, like the elastic layer of the cornea ; but beyond glassy,
that spot it is a gelatinous-looking tissue to which the authors
above quoted have given the name cochlearis muscle, beIn the work before referred to, " Physiological Anatomy," &c.
piece
3 B
738 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
soft, the piece cause it was found by them to be constructed of pale or
cochlear unstriped fibres, like those of the ciliary muscle of the eyeball.
muscle.
scalæ of the cochlear tube
above,
in vesti- bule;
Two Scale of the cochlea.-These are the two passages into
which the spiral tube of the cochlea is divided by its septum.
They are named scala vestibuli and scala tympani, and the
former is nearest the apex of the cochlea. Above they comthat join municate through the aperture named helicotrema ; and
and end below they open into the vestibule, one (scala tympani)
being very near the fenestra rotunda, and the other in the
front of the cavity. On the whole they are nearly equal in
differ in size, but each has certain peculiarities : thus the vestibular
and size scala alone extends to the apex of the cochlea ; whilst the
tympanic scala is largest near the base, and connected with
it at the beginning is the small aqueduct of the cochlea, that
opens on the under aspect of the petrous portion of the temporal bone, near the jugular fossa.
extent
at spots.
Fibro- serous mem- brane
Lining membrane ofthe osseous labyrinth. -A thin membrane of a fibro- serous character lines the vestibule, the semilines the circular canals, and the scale of the cochlea, and is likewise laby- rinth ; continued into the aqueducts of the vestibule and cochlea.*
On the outer wall of the vestibule it closes the openings into the
tympanic cavity. The outer surface of the membrane is
adherent to the bone ; but the inner is covered by an epilium and thelium, and secretes a thin serous fluid, liquor Cotunnii, or
This fluid in the interior fills the scale of the
has an epithe.
contains
a fluid perilymph. that fills cochlea. cochlea, and surrounds the membranous labyrinth.
Two sacs float in fluid B. The MEMBRANOUS LABYRINTH is constituted of sacs
of laby containing fluid, over which the special nerve of the sense
rinth of hearing (auditory) is expanded. The sacs are two in
number, viz. the utricle and the saccule, and have the general form of the surrounding bony parts : they are confined
to the vestibule and the semicircular canals, and are surrounded by the perilymph.
This membrane was supposed by Breschet to be originally part of
the fibro- serous lining of the skull, which has been enclosed by bone,
until the connection between the two has been obliterated, except
through the small process that lines the aqueduct of the vestibule.
Recherches Anatomiques et Physiologiques.
-
MEMBRANOUS LABYRINTH. 739
tion of
bone.
Dissection. -The delicate internal parts of the ear, with their Dissecvessels and nerves, cannot be dissected except on a temporal bone, themin
that has been put in spirit, and afterwards softened in acid. The a fresh
previous instructions for the dissection of the osseous labyrinth
will guide the student to the situation of the membranous structures within it, but the surrounding softened material must be
removed with great care. A lens and a microscope will be needed
for the complete examination of the sacs. For the display of the
blood- vessels a minute injection should be made of them.
utricle ;
form ;
The utricle, or the common sinus, is the larger of the two The
sacs, and is situate at the posterior and upper part of the situation
vestibule, corresponding to the fovea semi-elliptica in the
roof. It is transversely oval in form, and connected with it and
posteriorly are three looped tubes that are prolonged into the
semicircular canals. The sac and its prolongations are filled contains
with a clear fluid, like water, which is named endolymph ;
and in its wall is a small calcareous deposit (otolith) opposite and
the entrance of the nerve into it.
a fluid
otolith.
are sent
arched
The prolongations into the semicircular canals are smaller Tubes
than the osseous tubes, being only one third of their diameter, into the
and are surrounded by the perilymph. In form they re- canals,
semble the bony case, for they are marked at one end by a
dilatation corresponding to the ampulla of the osseous tube,
and, further, two are blended at one end, like the canals they dilated
occupy. They communicate with the utricle by five open- end,
ings, and are filled with the endolymphic fluid of that sac.
At each ampullary enlargement there is in the interior a contain
transverse projection into the cavity, and here a branch of
the auditory nerve enters the wall.
at one
a fluid.
sac is beother.
The saccule is a smaller and a rounder cyst than the utricle, smaller
and is placed in front of it in the hollow of the fovea for the
hemispherica. Like the larger sac, it has a translucent wall,
in which is an otolith opposite the entrance of the nerve ;
it is also filled by endolymph. It is doubtful whether the Dothe
two sacs communicate.
-
twojoin?
the sac Structure of the sacs. The wall of the membranous Wall of
labyrinth is translucent and firm, but it is more opaque has three
where the vessels and nerves enter it. Three strata of different materials enter into the construction of the membrane,
strata.
3 B 2
740 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
Otoliths are
lime in cells.
together with blood- vessels and nerves. The outer covering
is loose and flocculent, and easily detached, and contains
irregular pigment cells. The middle layer is clear and
tough, and appears like cartilage, or, where it is thin, like
the hyaloid membrane of the eyeball (Todd and Bowman) ;
and the inner one is formed by a stratum of nucleated cells,
that are easily separated from one another.
The small calcareous masses, or the otoliths, consist of
grains of minute grains of carbonate of lime deposited in cells
(Krieger), and connected with the inner part of the wall of
the utricle and saccule. Within the enlargement of the semicircular tubes the calcareous material ( otolith) is contained
in the cells lining it.-(Todd and Bowman. )
Blood- vessels of the memBLOOD-VESSELS. The membranes of the labyrinthic
cavity receive their blood from an artery that enters the
brane. internal auditory meatus with the nerve. The veins are
united into one, and end in the superior petrosal sinus.
Internal auditory artery
has a
branch
sacs ;
The internal auditory artery arises from the basilar trunk
within the skull (p. 166.), and enters the internal meatus
with the auditory nerve. In the bottom of that hollow it
divides into two branches
for the cochlea.
-
one for the vestibule, another
a. The branch to the vestibule, after piercing the wall ofthe cavity,
to mem- subdivides into small branches, that ramify on the exterior of the branous membranous labyrinth, and are continued on the tubes occupying
termina- the semicircular canals. The vessels end in a network of ca- tion ;
pillaries in the substance of the membranous wall, as well as on the interior about the termination of the nerves.
and an- other to
termina- tion.
b. The branch to the cochlea subdivides into small twigs that
the coch- enter the canals in the modiolus. Small offsets from these are lea. directed outwards in the holes in the lamina spiralis, and commuMode of nicate together in loops near the margin of that osseous zone, but
in greatest number towards the tympanic scala. From this
anastomosis vessels are supplied to the membrane lining the scale,
and to the cochlearis muscle. A capillary vessel is placed longitudinally in the membranous part of the septum scalarum, and
communicates here and there with the arterial arch before mentioned. (Todd and Bowman.)
VESSELS AND NERVES. 741
The vein ---- . - One branch of vein is derived from the vein to petrosal cochlea, and another from the membranous labyrinth : the sinus.
two are united near the cochlea, and the trunk ends in the
superior petrosal sinus.
tory NERVE OF THE LABYRINTH. Only one special nerve, Audiauditory, is distributed to the labyrinth. Entering the in- nerve
ternal auditory meatus (p. 18. ), the nerve divides into two divides
branches, like the artery, viz. , an anterior for the cochlea,
and a posterior for the membranous labyrinth.
into two.
lear a. The cochlear branch divides at the base of the modiolus into A cochtwigs that enter the apertures therein. These small divisions of branch,
the nerve are directed outwards with the vessels in the canals in
the lamina spiralis, but nearest the tympanic scala, where they form
a plexiform arrangement, with lengthened interspaces. Beyond
the bone the nerve tubules cease to divide, and reach a short dis- whose
tance into the membranous part of the septum scalarum, where they endin
are arranged in sets parallel to one another, and each set is rather the sepconical in shape in consequence of some tubules ceasing sooner than the rest. The nerve fibres do not lose the white substance retaining
of Schwann at their termination, but retain it in the minutest subtubules. (Todd and Bowman.)
filaments
tum,
white
stance.
lar
divides
b. The vestibular branch ends in three nerves for the membranous Vestibulabyrinth these pierce the cribriform plate in the bottom of the branch
meatus, and are thus distributed : -one appertains to the utricle, into
and to the enlargements on the tubes contained in the superior three ;
vertical and horizontal semicircular canals ; a second ends in the
saccule ; and the third belongs to the ampullary swelling on the
tube ofthe posterior vertical semicircular canal.
Termination of the vestibular nerves. -The ending of the nerve their terfibres on the sacs is different from their termination on the ampullary enlargements..
-
mina- tion;
sacs In the membranous sacs the nerve enters where the otolith is on the
situate, and its filaments separate, some passing amongst the calcareous matter, and spread out on the inner surface. Meeting with
the lining of nucleated cells, the tubules lose the white substance lose
of Schwann, and end in a "fibrous film," like that of the inner white
stratum of the nervous layer of the retina (Todd and Bowman) . stance.
The same authors state that the tubules surrounded by the otolith
3 B 3
sub-
742 DISSECTION OF THE EAR.
and end appear to terminate in free points, without losing their white substance, as in the frog.
in fibres inside.
In the arched tubes they form a
In the ampullary enlargement of the tubes of the semicircular
canals the nerve enters the concave side, where it forms a forked
eminence (Steifensand) , corresponding to the projection in the inprojec- terior. The nerve tubules do not spread out as in the sacs, but
and end are confined to the swelling in which they end in a series of loops
therein. (Wagner). In the cod-fish the nerves are said to terminate in
free extremities as well as in loops. -(Todd and Bowman. )
tion,
in loops
